 9th International Roma andTraveller
Women’s Conference Building Equality Together
 Organised by the Roma and Travellers Division, Council of Europe Government of North Macedonia Relevant international and national stakeholders (OSCE, UNDP, USAID and Romalitico)
REPORT
By Marija Sulejmanova General Rapporteur
  
9th International Roma1 and Traveller women’s conference Building Equality Together
30 November – 1 December 2023
Organised by the Roma and Travellers Division, Council of Europe Government of North Macedonia
Relevant international and national stakeholders (OSCE, UNDP, USAID and Romalitico)
REPORT
By Marija Sulejmanova General Rapporteur
Council of Europe
1. The term “Roma and Travellers” is used at the Council of Europe to encompass the wide diversity of the groups covered by the work of the Council of Europe in this field: on the one hand a) Roma, Sinti/Manush, Calé, Kaale, Romanichals, Boyash/Rudari; b) Balkan Egyptians (Egyptians and Ashkali); c) Eastern groups (Dom, Lom and Abdal); and, on the other hand, groups such as Travellers, Yenish, and the populations designated under the administrative term “Gens du voyage”, as well as persons who identify themselves as Gypsies. The present is an explanatory footnote, not a definition of Roma and/or Travellers.
 
The opinions expressed in this work are the responsibility of the author(s) and do not necessarily reflect the official policy of the Council of Europe.
The reproduction of extracts (up to 500 words) is authorised, except for commercial purposes as long as the integrity of the text is preserved, the excerpt is not used out of context, does not provide incomplete information or does not other wise mislead the reader as to the nature, scope or content of the text. The source text must always be acknowledged as follows “© Council of Europe, 2024”. All other requests concerning the reproduction/translation of all or part of the document, should be addressed to the Directorate of Communications, Council of Europe (F-67075 Strasbourg Cedex or publishing@coe.int).
All other correspondence concerning this document should be addressed to Roma and Travellers Division F-67075 Strasbourg Cedex, France E-mail: roma.team@coe.int
Photos : Council of Europe
This publication has not been copy-edited by the SPDP Editorial Unit to correct typographical and grammatical errors.
© Council of Europe, September 2024 Printed at the Council of Europe
 
Contents
1. INTRODUCTION 5 2. GENERAL OBSERVATIONS AND CONCLUSIONS 7 3. RECOMMENDATIONS 9
3.1. Civil society recommendations to the Council of Europe 9 3.2. Civil society recommendations to member states 9 3.3. Civil society recommendations regarding the work of NGOs 10
4. PROCEEDINGS 11
4.1. Opening statements and keynote speeches 11
4.2. Plenary session 1: Stocktaking of the results of previous International Roma and Traveller
Women’s conferences and presentation of the Draft Recommendation of the Committee of Ministers
of the Council of Europe to member states on Equality for Roma and Traveller women and girls 13
4.3. Plenary session 2: Building alliances between women’s networks. Effective implementation
of legal and policy standards for Roma and Traveller women and girls 13
4.4. Plenary session 3: Presentation of workshop conclusions and recommendations 14
4.5. Plenary session 4.1: International and national policy roadmaps on ensuring equality for Roma
and Traveller women and girls 16
4.6. Plenary session 4.2: A national perspective on measures aimed at addressing the vulnerable situation
of Roma and Traveller women and girls 17
4.7 Closing remarks 18
               
1. Introduction
W omen throughout Council of Europe member states still face inequalities in many respects. Antigypsyism, racism, discrimination, exclusion, and extreme poverty reinforce the disadvantages faced by Roma and Traveller women. To effectively improve the situation of Roma and Traveller women, national and local
authorities need to follow certain international and national standards. The civil society sector is essential in monitoring the implementation of those standards. Building alliances between minority and mainstream women’s lobbies can foster a more inclusive and intersectional approach towards gender equality advocacy. Together, these alliances can develop effective work aimed at achieving meaningful and lasting change for the benefit of all women.
The Ninth International Roma and Traveller Women’s Conference “Building Equality Together” was organ- ised in Skopje from 30 November to 1 December 2023 in close collaboration with the Government of North Macedonia and several international and national civil society stakeholders. The event served as a forum for exchange between Roma and Traveller women’s civil society on building alliances with the goal of achieving a coordinated, inclusive, and overarching central support and monitoring system in the implementation of key standards of the Council of Europe and other international organisations. Moreover, the Ninth Conference contributed to supporting the implementation of the Council of Europe Strategic Action Plan for Roma and Traveller Inclusion (2020-2025) and creating synergies with similar policies adopted by international organisa- tions, such as the United Nations, the OSCE and the European Union.
The Conference was divided into plenary sessions and workshops. The structure was as follows:
Plenary Sessions:
► Plenary Session 1: Stocktaking of the results of previous International Roma and Traveller Women’s Conferences and presentation of the Draft Recommendation of the Committee of Ministers of the Council of Europe to member states on Equality for Roma and Traveller women and girls;
► Plenary Session 2: Building alliances between women’s networks. Effective implementation of legal and policy standards is applied for Roma and Traveller women and girls;
► Plenary Session 3: Presentation of workshop conclusions and recommendations;
► Plenary Session 4.1: International and national policy roadmaps on ensuring equality for Roma and
Traveller women and girls;
► Plenary Session 4.2: A national perspective on measures aimed at addressing the vulnerable situation of Roma and Traveller women and girls.
Workshops:
► Workshop1:CombatingantigypsyismanddiscriminationagainstRomaandTravellerwomenandgirls
and supporting real and effective equality;
► Workshops 2: Supporting the democratic participation of Roma and Traveller women and promoting trust and accountability;
► Workshop 3: Supporting access to inclusive quality education and training for Roma and Traveller women and girls.
With approximately 80 participants physically present, the Conference was enriched by valuable discussions from the Roma and Traveller women from 16 member states and Kosovo*. The recommendations drawn up throughout the conference are presented in part three of this report.
*All reference to Kosovo, whether to the territory, institutions or population, in this text shall be understood in full compliance with United Nations Security Council Resolution 1244 and without prejudice to the status of Kosovo.
  ► Page 5

2. General observations and conclusions
Many speakers and participants highlighted that the challenges faced by Roma and Traveller women and girls are multilayered, intersectional and require a tailor-made approach to tackle them.
Elevating every issue through the lens of Roma and Traveller women and girls
The gender approach should be present in every aspect of the work done for and by the Roma and Traveller community. By incorporating the gender lens, the stakeholders and the civil society sector can address the unique challenges faced by Roma and Traveller women and girls. Not only does this approach emphasise the need for a stronger gender equality agenda, but it also highlights the need for an intersectional approach which can respond to the different generational needs. Besides the focus on the narrative/context and activi- ties, financial support remains crucial and the most challenging for addressing the needs and shortcomings.
“We cannot discuss gender equality if we do not discuss what is happening when the two intersect and meet each other (race and gender)”2
Roma and Traveller women have the powerful potential to change the realities of the community. However, this requires more measures, joint activities, concrete actions, and adequate investment in advancing their position in society. Roma and Traveller women remain mostly out of the labour market and, in this sense, more knowledge-sharing, training, and incentives are required to make their active participation feasible within it. The current trends in the digital and green transition can also help to advance the position of Roma and Traveller women and girls.
New trends offer new opportunities
Embracing new trends such as green and digital initiatives can tremendously benefit Roma and Traveller women and girls, since they create an opportunity to gain new skills, access employment opportunities, share experiences through connectivity and improve financial independence. Therefore, challenges such as a lack of digital literacy and understanding of the environment should be tackled though upskilling and reskilling measures.
Economic empowerment is key for the elimination of gender-based violence
The elimination of violence is crucial for promoting gender equality and access to employment and education of Roma and Traveller women and girls. It serves the wellbeing of women, empowers them, and benefits the whole community. The elimination of gender-based violence against Roma and Traveller women and girls also requires education to recognise violence and obtain knowledge of the rights and mechanisms, as well as to fight against early marriages in the Roma and Traveller communities.
The economic empowerment of Roma and Traveller women and girls is the key feature of the fight against gender-based violence. There are positive examples of Roma women’s entrepreneurship in North Macedonia that has provided enough financial freedom to enable women to make sustainable change in their com- munities. However, in communities where gender-based violence is still a burning issue, shelters must be established with the relevant service providers and social workers who understand the struggles of Roma and Traveller women and girls and are equipped to assist them whenever necessary. Finally, the Council of Europe’s Istanbul Convention on preventing and combating violence against women and domestic violence should be instrumental in the work on Roma and Traveller women and girls.
The active involvement of women in policies, politics and the gender equality agenda
Roma and Traveller women and girls can bring diverse experience to policy making, contribute to the agenda of gender equality in general, build an inclusive society, and design more suitable public policies, yet they are
 2. Statement by Sebijan Fejzula, Kale Amenge Portugal, Panellist, Plenary Session 2.
► Page 7

often excluded from the mainstream gender discussions and in the design and implementation processes of design and implementation of gender equality policies. There is a crucial need for Roma and Traveller women to become active agents in the political arena and decision-making processes at national and local level. The first step to achieve this would be to enhance the understanding of Roma and Traveller women and girls about essential political tools and concepts, such as the power of voting, membership of political parties, electoral mechanisms at various levels, etc.
To support Roma and Traveller women and girls, it is therefore crucial to build alliances and include them in all gender equality efforts, as well as in the mainstream agenda. The struggle of Roma and Traveller women and girls is seen as unique; however, they can benefit from shared discussions with other marginalised women’s communities and other communities of colour, leading to solutions and support.
“Look for contacts with mainstream organisations and get close to them because they have impact on policies”3
Alliance and solidarity with mainstream and other marginalised women’s groups is necessary
Establishing connections and creating alliances between Roma and Traveller women and mainstream and other marginalised groups can facilitate collective advocacy, leverage the support and visibility of Roma and Traveller women and girls, contribute to an exchange of experiences, and ensure a resilient and supportive feminist community.
The education of Roma and Travellers, especially that of women and girls, remains a significant challenge. Roma and Travellers face discrimination in schools, segregation, and bureaucratic difficulties in accessing measures created for them, as well as institutional racism. There is still a strong need for dialogue and the sharing of experiences and initiatives, for more networks specifically focused on Roma and Traveller commu- nities, frequent collaboration, and an assessment of progress made on the path towards feminism. Roma and Traveller women’s organisations lack sufficient financial resources and sustainability for their projects. Further initiatives are needed to enhance capacity-building, training and empowerment to foster more structured discussions on gender equality.
Towards a Roma feminist movement
Tackling the unique challenges and experiences that Roma and Traveller women face requires constant com- munication and collaboration between civil society organisations, activists, and institutions. A Roma feminist movement could amplify the voices of Roma and Traveller women in politics and activism, serving as a tool for advocacy, the sharing of experiences and bringing about common actions.
“Roma women’s networks and relevant alliances can set up a platform that goes beyond individual empowerment, it can contribute social change.”4
The next step is to involve men in the discussion
In addition to support from mainstream women’s movements and movements of women of colour, Roma and Traveller women and girls also require support from men, both from the Roma and Traveller community and the mainstream community.
Involving men in the discussions about gender equality can have significant benefits. When men actively participate in gender equality discussions, they gain insights into the specific challenges faced by Roma and Traveller women and girls. This understanding helps address intersectional discrimination.
By fostering multi-layered discussions, we can create a cultural shift that can lead to transformative change. Involving men also educates them about gender equality, its importance, benefits, and their own role in advancing the gender equality agenda.
3. Soraya Post, Chair of the Board, European Roma Grassroots Organisations (ERGO) Network, former Member of the European Parliament, former Chair of the International Romani Women’s Network (IRWIN), Panellist in Plenary 2.
4. Georgios Stamatis, Member of the Greek delegation to the Parliamentary Assembly of the Council of Europe, speaking in the opening panel.
Page 8 ► 9th International Roma and Traveller Women’s Conference

3. Recommendations
3.1. Civil society recommendations to the Council of Europe
The Council of Europe should:
1. facilitate activities that promote not just gender equality, but also an introduction to feminism, how to discuss and see the issues from a gender angle and how to advocate as a feminist;
2. facilitate discussions with other important donors to create synergies between projects which can strengthen the planning of activities for Roma and Traveller women and girls;
3. continue supporting Roma and Traveller women’s empowerment through activities including joint programmes;
4. develop outreach activities to create networks between Roma and Traveller women at local, national and European levels and to raise awareness of the importance of a unified voice;
5. initiate a study on the status of Roma and Traveller women’s movements including a collection of best practices;
6. conceptualise and implement advocacy initiatives that promote gender equality of other marginalised groups, mainstream groups and Roma and Traveller women and girls;
7. continue its work on intersectionality and include Roma and Traveller women in discussions and working groups that address mainstream challenges, including on the green and digital transition;
8. promote the need for funding, including the creation of a women’s initiatives fund, and support joint initiatives between Roma and Traveller women and mainstream groups;
9. facilitate dialogue with member states on implementation of the Committee of Ministers Recommendation for the Equality of Roma Women and Girls5 and encourage member states to budget for activities to benefit Roma and Traveller women and girls.
3.2. Civil society recommendations to member states
Member states should:
1. mainstream Roma and Traveller women and girls’ issues into their gender equality strategies and agendas and involve Roma and Traveller women and girls in the drafting and implementation of them;
2. enhance action against discrimination through policies that recognise the multidimensional discrimi- nation faced by Roma and Traveller women and girls;
3. strengthen collaboration with Roma and Traveller women’s organisations and gender equality organ- isations in the implementation of relevant strategies and other mainstream policies, including, but not limited to, housing, education, health, and employment;
4. grant support to local women’s civil society organisations that work on gender-based violence, access to justice and the emancipation of Roma and Traveller women and girls;
5. include Roma and Traveller gender sensitive budgeting in the implementation of national and local equality policies;
6. create and budget for the implementation of national action plans on the empowerment of Roma and Traveller women;
7. improve the visibility of Roma and Traveller women and girls by involving them in campaigns run by different state and local institutions;
8. create policies related to the green and digital transition that recognise and tackle the gap between Roma and non-Roma, including the gender gap faced by Roma and Traveller women and girls;
   5. The Recommendation was in draft status at the time of the Conference.
Page 9

9. create programmes to enable Roma and Traveller women and girls to obtain and upgrade their digital skills, as well as benefit from training for entrepreneurship, social entrepreneurship and employment;
10. provide training to educators and teachers on inclusive models of education that include intersectional and intercultural dimensions and an understanding of combating discrimination and school segrega- tion of children, especially of Roma and Traveller pupils and children with disabilities;
11. include mentorship programmes in the educational system for Roma and Traveller pupils and students that rely on leadership and empowerment and communication with parents;
12. include systematic solutions to meet the needs of Roma and Traveller women and girls who are vic- tims of violence by creating accessible shelters for women and girls in or near Roma neighbourhoods, providing legal support, protection and information in an understandable language;
13. organise training of social workers to raise their awareness of the intersectional dimension of violence that Roma and Traveller women and girls can face;
14. collect disaggregated data on hate speech and tackle the aspects faced by Roma and Traveller women and girls;
15. provide additional financial incentives for girls to attend school by creating targeted conditional cash programmes6;
16. revise and/or remove the legal barriers that can limit the employment of women, including Roma and Traveller women.;
17. provide free locally accessible health services and insurance to Roma and Traveller women and girls with gender sensitive facilities;
18. ensure that the Istanbul Convention on Preventing and Combating Violence Against Women and Domestic Violence as transferred in the national system, should also respond to the needs of Roma and Traveller women and girls;
19. support infrastructure for connectivity and ensure that every Roma child has internet access.
3.3. Civil society recommendations regarding the work of NGOs
Civil society organisations should:
1. utilise digital platforms, communication channels, events, and media platforms to raise awareness about the creation of networks for Roma and Traveller women and girls;
2. create safe spaces for exchanges between organisations for Roma and Traveller women, mainstream women and/or women of colour;
3. advocate for their involvement in national and European discussions and working groups on green and digital policies;
4. advocate for training programmes on digital skills and green technologies which can enhance the employability of Roma and Traveller women and girls;
5. implement activities that foster discussions between men, and between men and women, on gender equality and the active participation of Roma and Traveller women and girls in society and politics;
6. organise introductory sessions on feminism and capacity-building for activists and advocates for Roma and Traveller women and girls;
7. promote a positive representation of Roma and Traveller women and girls in the media to challenge stereotypes and prejudices.
6. TheWorldBankimplementsprojectsthatincludetargetedcashprogrammestowomenperhouseholdandareframedascondi- tional cash transfer programmes (CCTs). This recommendation was proposed by the World Bank as CCTs are effective in postponing marriage and reproduction among school-age girls.
 Page 10 ► 9th International Roma and Traveller Women’s Conference

4. Proceedings
4.1. Opening statements and keynote speeches
The Ninth International Roma and Traveller Women’s Conference “Building Equality Together” was opened by Mabera Kamberi, representative of the Ministry of Labour and Social Policy of North Macedonia, and Vice-Chair and Gender Equality Rapporteur of the Council of Europe Committee of Experts on Roma and Traveller Issues (ADI-ROM). In her opening remarks, she stated that the conference represented an “extraor- dinary opportunity for institutions, other partners, and civil society organisations to discuss important topics affecting Roma and Travellers women and girls and to jointly trace the status of Roma and Traveller women.”NorthMacedonia,hostingtheconferenceforthesecondtime,incorporatesthegenderperspective through the Gender Equality Strategy in all state policies. The Istanbul Convention entered into force in North Macedonia in 2018. As a multicultural state, North Macedonia continuously creates policies to make equality a reality through the “one society for all concept,” including a gender approach at levels.
In her capacity as Vice-Chair and Gender Equality Rapporteur of the Council of Europe’s Committee of Experts on Roma and Traveller Issues (ADI-ROM), she shared the priorities of the Gender Equality Strategy of the Council Europe 2018-2024, namely the prevention of gender stereotypes and sexism, prevention and fighting against gender-based violence, equal access to justice, participation of women and men in decision making and integration of gender policies into all other policies.
Bojan Maricic, Vice-Prime Minister of the Government of North Macedonia, described North Macedonia as a functional multiethnic state with a strong and full political will to continuously implement the Strategy for Roma Inclusion which aimed to integrate the Roma community equally with all other communities in the country, stating that “we are firmly committed to following the Roma policies, including the European Roma Platform; and for the priorities for Roma we included resources from the central budget and other available funds”. He highlighted that North Macedonia provided systematic solutions for the issues faced by Roma, such as the latest changes undertaken for persons without official identity documentation, and that the country aimed to fight against antigypsyism as a specific form of racism against Roma.
   ► Page 11

Bjørn Berge, Deputy Secretary General of the Council of Europe, stated that these conferences represented a unique platform for Roma and Traveller women to discuss and share their knowledge and experiences, as well as reflect on the causes of the current problems and propose solutions. He informed the audience that the conference would serve as a place for developing cooperation on different projects and that the recom- mendations arising from it would be brought to decision makers.
He referred to the Council of Europe priorities and shared that “gender equality as a key requirement for functioning democracy”.
He noted that all 46 leaders of the Council of Europe’s member states had agreed upon the Reykjavik principles for democracy that also emphasized the equal participation of women and girls in public and political life and shared that “gender equality is a key requirement for functioning democracy”. He highlighted that the challenges faced by Roma and Traveller women needed to be tackled from different angles and required new standards, one of which would be the future Committee of Ministers Recommendation on Equality for Roma and Traveller women and girls that the Council of Europe was currently working on.
Jovana Trencevska, Minister of Labour and Social Policy of North Macedonia, expressed her gratitude to the Council of Europe for organising the conference in North Macedonia in close collaboration with the Government. The conference served as a platform to address the obstacles confronted by Roma and Traveller women and girls, as well as an opportunity to put forward viable solutions to overcome these challenges. Minister Trencevska affirmed that North Macedonia’s efforts to improve the circumstances of Roma women came from both the Strategy for Inclusion of Roma and the National Action Plan for the Protection, Promotion, and Fulfilment of the Human Rights of Roma Women and Girls, highlighting that “the improvement of the Roma community situation is directly linked to the empowerment of Roma woman”. The Minister also stated that North Macedonia was actively advancing the gender agenda by integrating gender aspects into every state policy, including targeted efforts to address gender stereotypes, prevent violence against women, ensure equal access to justice, promote balanced participation in decision-making processes, and implement gender responsive budgeting.
Sini Paukkunen Mykkanen, Ambassador of the Permanent Representation of Finland to the Council of Europe, stated that “since 2007 these conferences provide an opportunity for women to address on an international stage the issues affecting them and present a valuable space for sharing experience”. She reminded the audience that the Recommendation of the Committee of Ministers on improving access to justice for Roma and Travellers in Europe was a response to the needs expressed in previous conferences and the work undertaken through Joint EU/CoE JUSTROM Programme. She highlighted that this conference was, firstly, a forum for building alliances, secondly, an opportunity to discuss the Draft Recommendation of the Committee of Ministers on Equality for Roma and Traveller women and girls and thirdly, a contribution to the creation of synergies with other international stakeholders, like the UN, the OSCE and the EU.
Kilian Wahl, Ambassador and Head of the OSCE Mission to Skopje, shared that North Macedonia had shown political will to improve the situation of Roma with the work carried out for persons without documentation and by the fact that this conference was being held for the second time in Skopje. He highlighted that “the struggle of Roma women is complex and followed by multiple forms of discrimination.” He stated that Roma women’s NGOs lacked the financial resources to conduct long-term projects and that donors needed to continue and increase support. He added that more efforts are needed to improve the employment and representation of Roma women in state institutions. He added that OSCE would continue to address the structural challenges faced by Roma women.
Armen Grigoryan, United Nations Development Programme Resident Representative for the Republic of North Macedonia, stated that “Roma women are deprived from integration and full participation in the societybecauseoflowlevelofeducation,employmentandweakopportunities.”UNDPinNorthMacedonia has implemented joint initiatives regarding inclusion, such as the socio-economic integration of returnees by providing education and entrepreneurship training. In addition, UNDP works toward creating the most suit- able models of integration for returnees and systematic interventions for education and employment. With the Norway Funds and in partnership with the Ministry of Labour and Social Policy and the Municipality of Suto Orizari, UNDP built a new and modern kindergarten in Suto Orizari.
Georgios Stamatis, member of the Greek delegation to the Parliamentary Assembly of the Council of Europe, shared that this conference was “an international platform that gives Roma and Traveller women and girls a chance to exchange views and experiences on matters of common interests”. He stated firstly that “Roma and Traveller women are the core of the families and that their wellbeing affects the community as a whole.”Secondly,hehighlightedthatempowermentwasessentialandthatallstakeholdersshouldimplement
Page 12 ► 9th International Roma and Traveller Women’s Conference

measures involving advocacy, policy changes and recognition of the diversity of Roma and Traveller women and girls. Thirdly, he recalled that women’s networks had a crucial role to play in advancing the gender agenda and that both men and women needed to be educated about the socio-economic situation and the impact on stereotypes to women and girls. He concluded by highlighting the need to support the establishment of safe spaces for women to share their experiences and create solidarity.
4.2. Plenary session 1: Stocktaking of the results of previous International Roma and Traveller Women’s conferences and presentation of the Draft Recommendation of the Committee of Ministers of the Council of Europe to member states on Equality for Roma and Traveller women and girls
Mabera Kamberi, representative of the Ministry of Labour and Social Policy of North Macedonia, and Vice-Chair and Gender Equality Rapporteur of the Council of Europe Committee of Experts on Roma and Traveller Issues (ADI-ROM), shared that the Council of Europe’s working group of government representatives and experts had met six times to prepare the Draft Recommendation on Equality for Roma and Traveller women and girls. The aim of the recommendation is to assist member states and other relevant stakeholders to promote and achieve equality with a specific focus on antigypsyism, intersectional discrimination and violence. The refer- ence to intersectional discrimination recognises the diversity of Roma and Traveller women and girls includ- ing the nomadic way of life, migration and refugee status, religion, sexual orientation, age, disability, gender identity and expression and other personal characteristics. She recalled that the Draft Recommendation reflected the obstacles faced by Roma and Traveller women and girls as reported by many international and national bodies.
Oana Taba, Senior Project Officer of the Roma and Travellers Division of the Council of Europe, and Co-Secretary of the ADI-ROM, presented the measures contained in the Draft Recommendation and the arguments used in the drafting process. The Draft Recommendation was followed by specific guidelines in all essential areas. The guidelines and draft recommendation were based on the judgments of the European Court for Human Rights which not only obliged member states to refrain from a violation of human rights, but also to take measures to advance rights. Furthermore, the guidelines were also based on the findings of monitor- ing bodies such as the European Commission against Racism and Intolerance (ECRI), the Group of Experts on Action against Violence against Women and Domestic Violence (GREVIO), and the Group of Experts on Action against Trafficking in Human Beings (GRETA), as well as reports from the Commissioner for Human Rights. She also stated that the Draft Recommendation resulted from the discussions raised during the eight previous Roma and Traveller Women’s conferences. The Council of Europe will provide support to member states for the implementation of the recommendation in forms of law revisions, actions, plans, strategies, and capacity- building activities. It also calls upon civil society organisations to advocate for, make use of and monitor the initiatives to be developed through this draft recommendation.
Recommendation CM/Rec (2024)1 of the Committee of Ministers to member States on equality of Roma and Traveller women and girls was adopted on 5 April 2024.
4.3. Plenary session 2: Building alliances between women’s networks. Effective implementation of legal and policy standards for Roma and Traveller women and girls
Soraya Post, Chair of the Board of ERGO network, former Member of the European Parliament, and former Chair of the International Romani Women’s Network (IRWIN), shared her experience in activism and her path towards becoming a member of the European Parliament by making alliances with mainstream structures. She highlighted that now “there is a Roma woman in almost every member State being active and work- ing on improving the situation of the community.” A challenge remains in the political arena, especially in terms of the presence of right-wing parties in the European Parliament. She further stated that the women’s lobby in Brussels was strong, and that Roma and Traveller women activists needed to fight together against early marriages, domestic violence, and trafficking of women since these are societal problems. She recom- mended the following:
► RomaandTravellerwomenshouldcommunicatewithmainstreamorganisationsandmakethem understand that they all face the same prejudice;
► RomaandTravellerwomenshouldknowtheirrights,obtainknowledge,andusethatknowledge in politics.
                      4. Proceedings Page 13

 Sebijan Fejzula, from Kale Amenge, Portugal, shared that the foundation of activism lay in the fact that Roma women survived despite the five centuries of oppression, recalling and affirming the resilience of Roma and Traveller women. In her view the gender equality discussion must incorporate the intersectional discrimination of race/ethnicity and gender and that this would bring Roma and Traveller women closer to a dialogue with other women experiencing the same issues, such as women of colour and other marginalised minority women. Roma and Traveller women should be part of discussions of the majority. She recommended the following:
► Roma and Traveller women should re-shift the agenda and form general notions that Roma problems are societal problems; and
► Roma and Traveller women should rethink what they want to achieve with alliances with other women, especially with women of colour.
Terezia Rostas, representative from the Feminist Collective of Romani Gender Experts, shared her personal struggle and experience of attending the educational system in the United Kingdom while maintaining the tradition of wearing a Roma scarf. She presented the work carried out with the Roma community in her city, at the local level, and explained that this work at grassroots level requires the building of alliances with political partners to address the needs of the community and Roma women. The women in her city would like to have multicultural museums which represent Roma women. She recommended the following:
► RomaandTravellerwomenshouldcreatepoliciesanddiscussthemcloselywiththelocalauthorities; ► Romashouldandcouldbeteachers/educatorsandactivelyparticipateintheeducationalsystem; ► Roma and Traveller women should share their culture with other minorities.
4.4. Plenary session 3: Presentation of workshop conclusions and recommendations
4.4.1. Workshop 1: Combating antigypsyism and discrimination against Roma and Traveller women and girls and supporting real and effective equality
In her keynote speech, Zaneta Popovska, National Rule of Law Officer at the OSCE Mission to Skopje, pro- vided an explanation of the term “discrimination”, the mechanisms for protection and the legal framework on discrimination in North Macedonia, and covered topics such as education, health, housing, gender-based violence and the trafficking of women and girls.
     Page 14 ► 9th International Roma and Traveller Women’s Conference

 The ensuing discussion gave participants the opportunity to exchange on the need to recognise and sanc- tion antigypsyism through laws, as well as to recognise and eliminate it from school textbooks. Furthermore, participants discussed the need for measures for women who are victims of gender-based violence and struggle to obtain protection. For example, in Finland, there is a need for a detailed database on victims of gender-based violence, whereas in North Macedonia victims need a women’s shelter. Workers in shelters and administration need to be aware that violence is not part of Roma culture. The economic empowerment of Roma and Traveller women as a precondition for fighting gender-based violence is also necessary. In Ireland, there is a need to change the protection system for victims of gender-based violence, however political will is lacking. Discrimination is also present in Ukraine, where Roma encounter difficulties to access humanitarian aid.
4.4.2. Workshop 2: Supporting the democratic participation of Roma and Traveller women and promoting trust and accountability
Alexandra Raykova, ROMACT facilitator from Bulgaria, shared her experience of local development in Bulgaria and Romania, in particular the decision-making and policy-making processes at local level, the participation of women in Community Action Groups and the organisation of coaching sessions in communities. Small grant scheme projects have given women the opportunity to participate in municipal budgeting and project planning. Similar results were highlighted through the Joint European Union / Council of Europe ROMACTED Programme in the Western Balkans, such as community mobilisation and specific activities targeting the empowerment of Roma women and youth.
The importance of women’s involvement in politics and decision-making processes, including in local politics, was highlighted. Essential steps to support democratic participation are voter education and ensuring that women’s needs are the main targets of it. In addition, Roma and Traveller women must be involved in the design and implementation of gender equality policies. This requires resources - Roma women’s networks need both practical and financial support. Participants also expressed the wish to see the continuation of joint programmes of the European Union and Council of Europe.
4.4.3. Workshop 3: Supporting access to inclusive education and training for Roma and Traveller women and girls
In her keynote speech, Manjola Veizi, Executive Director of the Roma Women Rights Centre from Albania, gave a broad overview of the challenges and needs in supporting inclusive education and fighting segregation in
4. Proceedings Page 15

schools. She shared her experience in working on segregation in Albania, specifically regarding early marriages, economic hardship, bureaucratic procedures in accessing measures, and cultural norms.
Roma children, including girls, struggle to access education. Teachers in Ireland have low expectations of Traveller children and there is a lack of implementation of Traveller-targeted policies in accessing education. A huge challenge is the lack of topics on the history and culture of Travellers in the educational system. In Norway, there is a concern about the situation of Roma and Travellers. They lack high education. There is a need for parental support and digital education for their children. Stereotypes and segregation persist and there is a need for both policymaking policies and proper monitoring.
4.5. Plenary session 4.1: International and national policy roadmaps on ensuring equality for Roma and Traveller women and girls
Valerie Morrica, Senior Social Development Specialist from the World Bank, presented the international gender policy agenda in the region of Europe and Central Asia, the trends in the region and the investments of the World Bank around the Roma gender equality agenda. She highlighted that, despite the assumption that this region did not have to boost the gender equality agenda, there were still many challenges in the fields of labour market, access to assets, access to finance, ownership and lend property. She stated that women were disproportionately affected by external impacts, as seen during the COVID-19 pandemic, as well as events in Ukraine and natural disasters. The Roma gender agenda has significant potential in the region, as an expected 20% of new labour markets entrants in the Western Balkans will be Roma. An analysis of investments and the 33 programmes focusing on Roma revealed that one third of them emphasize educa- tion. However, most are pilot programmes lacking rigorous data, monitoring and impact evaluation. Key areas identified as critical include education, due to low secondary school participation, early marriages, financial incentives for girls to attend school, targeted conditional cash transfers for children, and access to pension and health insurance.
Vesna Bisheva, Team Leader for the Inclusive Growth Team from the United Nations Development Program (UNDP), outlined their principles guiding their work on Roma issues, emphasizing a holistic approach. She highlighted the importance of understanding the diversity among Roma women and ensuring their inclusion in all initiatives. The principle of “leaving no one behind” addresses the challenges faced by the most marginalised, not only by providing support, but also by empowering them and making structural changes. She stressed the need for collective targets and objectives, robust data, and collaborative initiatives. With financial support from the EU, UNDP is currently conducting an in-depth analysis of the situation and vulnerabilities of Roma in Ukraine, the Republic of Moldova, and Georgia. In 2025 UNDP will repeat the survey carried out in 2017 on Roma in the Western Balkans. Additionally, she emphasized that local platforms, comprising key stake- holders such as institutions and NGOs, should work together to address the complexity of the issues.
          Page 16 ► 9th International Roma and Traveller Women’s Conference

Clara Pastor Sanchez, Programme Assistant for Roma Regional Programmes in the Western Balkans, and Türkiye (European Commission/DG NEAR), stated that the topic of the plenary session was currently being discussed in the European Commission. She emphasized two main policies, the Gender Action Plan and the Roma Strategic Framework, as both being part of Chapter 3 which is followed by countries in the accession process. The Gender Action Plan sets standards that member states should follow and, by 2025, 85% of new projects to be financed will have to be gender responsive. Additionally, 5% of these new projects will incorporate the empowerment of women and girls. This implies the need to make Roma projects gender sensitive. Additionally, she shared that discussions are ongoing about mainstreaming Roma issues and recommended that everyone join forces to continue empowerment efforts.
 4.6. Plenary session 4.2: A national perspective on measures aimed at addressing the vulnerable situation of Roma and Traveller women and girls
Mila Carovska, Executive Director of the Health Education and Research Association (HERA), former Vice-Prime Minister and the Minister of Labour and Social Policy in North Macedonia, shared her views on the impor- tance of multilayered discussions about the needs of Roma women. She stated that most existing policies are not gender-sensitive and do not accommodate the needs of diverse groups in society. She further underlined that only 23% of Roma are employed in North Macedonia, and just 8% of them are Roma women.
         4. Proceedings Page 17

She stressed the need for employment campaigns and raised concerns about dropout rates, with 5% of the new generation leaving school each year.
Biljana Kotevska, Gender Equality Expert for the “EU for Rule of Law” Project (European Policy Institute), explained the process conducted regarding the adoption of the Roma Women’s Action Plan in North Macedonia which was supported by the Council of Europe. Regarding the drafting methodology, two focus groups were organised, including a public discussion. The priority areas of the Action Plan were selected based on input arising from those. The draft text of the Action Plan was open for comments and later circulated to the gov- ernment for approval. This Action Plan covers employment, education, healthcare, gender-based violence, access to justice and participation in public life. The aim of the Action Plan is to ensure that Roma women and girls have equal access in all areas.
Lillan Stoen, Taternes Landsforening (Norway), talked about the lack of alternatives to nomadic and semi- nomadic education and the effect that this had on Traveller children. Antigypsyism is not mentioned in key documents such as the Government’s strategy against hate speech 2016-2020, the Action Plan to improve the conditions of Roma, the Government action against racism and discrimination 2020-2023, or the new Action Plan against racism and discrimination 2024-2027.
Bridget Kelly, Community development worker in the National Traveller Women’s Forum from Ireland, referred to the National Strategy for Roma of Ireland and the planning of the strategy for the 2024-2029 period. She highlighted that the biggest challenge was the lack of timeline and progress indicators. She recalled the importance of the implementation and functioning of the Istanbul Convention to protect Roma and Traveller women and girls.
4.7. Closing remarks
In his closing speech, Fljakron Bedzeti, State Secretary in the Ministry of Labour and Social Policy of North Macedonia, stated that the next step of the country was to include Roma in the circular economy and in the implementation of the green and digital agenda by increasing their digital literacy and skills. The next work at the local level would be the design of local plans and increased involvement and commitment in local actions of municipalities.
Eleni Tsetsekou, Head of the Roma and Travellers Division, Council of Europe, provided a retrospective of the two-day conference and the main takeaways. She thanked the Government of North Macedonia for co-hosting the event, as well as the partners who contributed to its organisation, namely OSCE, UNDP, USAID and the Institute for Research and Policy Analyses – Romalitico. She concluded her remarks by stating that the topic of gender equality and the equality of Roma and Traveller women and girls would remain among the priorities of the Council of Europe in the years to come.
  Page 18 ► 9th International Roma and Traveller Women’s Conference

  PREMS 149924
ENG
 www.coe.int
The Council of Europe is the continent’s leading human rights organisation. It comprises 46 member states, including all members of the European Union. All Council of Europe member states have signed up to the European Convention on Human Rights, a treaty designed to protect human rights, democracy and the rule of law. The European Court of Human Rights oversees the implementation
of the Convention in the member states.
 
 Version endorsed by the CAHROM at its 3rd meeting
Ohrid, 23 May 2012
CAHROM (2012)6
 AD HOC COMMITTEE OF EXPERTS ON ROMA1 ISSUES (CAHROM)
__________
THEMATIC REPORT
by the experts of the CAHROM thematic group on
SCHOOL DROP-OUT/ABSENTEEISM OF ROMA CHILDREN
following the CAHROM thematic visit to Nieuwegein and Veldhoven, The Netherlands, on 12-14 March 2012
__________
Experts from THE NETHERLANDS, requesting country:
Mr Cor de Vos, CAHROM Expert and former Mayor of Nieuwegein
Mrs Magda Jablonski, Secretary of the Platform for Dutch Roma Municipalities
Experts from HUNGARY, SPAIN and SWEDEN, partner countries:
Hungary: Mr Iván Sörös, Expert on Public Education and Social Inclusion, State Secretariat for Social Inclusion, Ministry of Public Administration and Justice, who was invited to present inter alia the Tanoda Extracurricular Programmes;
Spain: Mr Ángel Pérez Barandiarán, Officer at the Education Department of Fundación Secretariado Gitano (FSG), who was invited to provide information on the Promociona Programme, which provides preventive measures against drop-out;
Sweden: Ms Tiina Kiveliö, from the Stockholm County Administrative Board, who has a coordinating and following-up role within the Board regarding the Swedish national minority policy.
1 The term “Roma” used at the Council of Europe refers to Roma, Sinti, Kale and related groups in Europe, including Travellers and the Eastern groups (Dom and Lom), and covers the wide diversity of the groups concerned, including persons who identify themselves as Gypsies.
   
I. INTRODUCTION
page 3
page 3 page 3 page 4 page 4
page 5
page 7
page 7 page 7 page 8 page 8 page 9
page 9 page 9 page 10 page 12 page 12
page 14 page 14 page 15
page 16 page 17 page 18 page 19 page 20 page 21 page 23 page 23
page 24
p. 25-34 p. 25-34 p. 25-34
page 35
page 35 page 35 page 35
APPENDICES:
Appendix 1: Appendix 2: Appendix 3:
Formal invitation to CAHROM Agenda of the thematic visit
List of participants of the thematic visit
3.3.1 3.3.2
-
3.3.3
- - - - -
3.3.4
Mainstream vs. minority approach
Nationally- vs. locally-based approach
The Dutch programme to fight crime in general and the exploitation of Roma children
Law enforcement vs. preventive measures
The Wisselgeld/Exchange Money programme in Nieuwegein The local policy approach towards Roma in Veldhoven
The TANODA extracurricular learning programmes in Hungary The PROMOCIONA programme in Spain
The pre-school system in Sweden
Consultation with- vs. active participation of Roma
TABLE OF CONTENTS __________
1.1 Background
1.2 Composition of the thematic group of experts
1.3 Agenda of the thematic visit
1.4 Purpose of the request and expectations from the requesting country
II. RELEVANT EUROPEAN AND INTERNATIONAL STANDARDS AND REFERENCE TEXTS
III. COMPARATIVE ANALYSIS (SITUATION, POLICIES, MEASURES)
3.1. Size and composition of the Roma groups 3.1.1 The Netherlands
3.1.2 Hungary 3.1.3 Spain 3.1.4 Sweden
3.2. General policy and legislation covering school attendance 3.2.1 The Netherlands
3.2.2 Hungary 3.2.3 Spain 3.2.4 Sweden
3.3 Policy approach
IV. LESSONS LEARNT AND GOOD PRACTICES IDENTIFIED
(the following sub-chapters appear in the summary table)
4.1 Main reasons and obstacles for low school attendance of Roma children
4.2 Responses and measures undertaken, and good practices
4.3 Relevant international standards, recommendations and projects
2
CAHROM (2012)6

I. INTRODUCTION 1.1 Background
The thematic groups on school drop-outs/absenteeism of Roma children, especially when transiting from primary to secondary education, and with a special focus on Roma girls, was set up at the request of the Dutch CAHROM member, Mr Cor de Vos, following the request made by two Dutch municipalities, Nieuwegein and Veldhoven. Both of them belong to the Platform for Dutch Roma Municipalities, which is acting under the Association of Dutch Municipalities (VNG).
Initial contacts with both Mr Cor de Vos and Ms Magda Jablonski, Secretary of the Platform for Dutch Roma Municipalities, were followed by a written invitation received by the Secretariat on 1 March 2012 from Mr Frans Backhuijs, Mayor of Nieuwegein and Chairman of the Platform who formally invited CAHROM experts and the Council of Europe Secretariat to visit the municipalities of Nieuwegein and Veldhoven on 12-14 March 2012 (see Appendix 1).
With a view to preparing the thematic visit, each expert of the thematic group was asked to provide background information about the situation of Roma, the legislative framework pertinent to the topic, and measures and policies towards Roma education, including financial means. Written background documents submitted by the requesting and partner countries and presentations made during the visit appear in an Addendum to this report.
1.2 Composition of the thematic group of experts
The thematic group of experts was composed of two experts from the requesting country, Mr Cor de Vos, CAHROM member and former mayor of Nieuwegein, and Mrs Magda Jablonski, Secretary of the Platform for Dutch Roma Municipalities, as well as of an expert from each of the three partner countries2. Two of them were suggested by the Roma Education Fund for programmes addressing school absenteeism: Mr Iván Sörös from Hungary who was invited to present Tanoda Extracurricular Programmes and Mr Ángel Pérez Barandiarán from Spain was invited to provide information on the Promociona Programme, which contains preventive measures against drop-out. Sweden, which had manifested its interest in being part of this group, nominated Ms Tiina Kiveliö from the Stockholm County Administrative Board.
The Netherlands and Sweden have a comparable size of Roma population (close to 40,000 and 50,000 respectively), whilst Hungary and Spain have a much larger Roma population (650,000- 750,000 approximately). It was felt useful to compare the different policy approaches between the four countries: in the Netherlands, the mainstream approach prevails and Roma are not recognised as a national minority3. In Hungary and Sweden on the contrary, Roma are considered as a national minority and benefit from targeted measures. Spain is somewhat in the middle: whilst it does not recognise Roma as a minority, this group is nevertheless covered by the Framework Convention for the Protection of National Minorities and Spain was the first country in Europe to adopt a targeted policy for Roma4, as early as 1985. Hungary and Spain are participating countries of the Decade of Roma Inclusion, whereas the Netherlands and Sweden are not.
2 The Slovak CAHROM member who had proposed his country for this thematic group indicated to the Secretariat that he would prepare comments on the theme of the report for the 3rd CAHROM meeting. The Croatian CAHROM member who had initially made a similar proposal finally gave preference for Croatia’s participation in the CAHROM thematic group on social housing for Roma.
3 See in that respect the Opinion of the Advisory Committee of the Framework Convention for the Protection of National Minorities on the Netherlands at http://www.coe.int/t/dghl/monitoring/minorities/3_FCNMdocs/Table_en.asp.
4 Spanish Programme for the Development of the Gypsy People.
CAHROM (2012)6
    3

1.3 Agenda of the thematic visit
Following words of welcome by Mr Frans Backhuijs, Mayor of Nieuwegein, and Mr. Bert Lubbinge, alderman (deputy to the mayor), Mr Cor de Vos made a focused introduction to the topic of school absenteeism of Roma children in the Netherlands and indicated the Dutch expectations for this visit and a series of issues that he would wished to also see addressed. This introduction was followed by a presentation from the manager of the Wisselgeld project carried out in Nieuwegein and a general discussion. At lunchtime the CAHROM team of experts visited the “special” primary school SBO De Evenaar and met with the school director and vice-director. The afternoon was devoted to presentations by partner countries’ experts and a discussion in which Mr Peter Jorna, consultant on Roma and Sinti issues, took part. Mrs Mila van Burik from the NGO Triana could unfortunately not join the group. On 13 March, the CAHROM team of experts went to Veldhoven where it heard, after the words of welcome from Mr Huub Verhagen, Head of the Municipal Department of Work, Income and Care, various presentations from the Municipality Officer dealing with Roma, two “intermediaries” (municipal social workers), one community worker, one school attendance officer and a policeman from the Dutch Police Academy. Following a lengthy exchange of views between participants, the CAHROM team of experts visited a primary and a secondary school and several Roma locations. The morning of the third day was devoted to a debriefing between experts of the thematic group and the Secretariat. The agenda and the list of participants appear in Appendices 2 and 3 respectively.
1.4 Purpose of the request and expectations of the requesting country
Mr de Vos started by explaining that, as former mayor of Nieuwegein for eleven years dealing with about 61,000 people in that municipality, including 400 of Roma origin, he was obliged to have his feet firmly on the ground, far beyond theoretical discourse. He recalled the starting point of Dutch policy: everybody is equal, everybody has the same rights but also the same duties. Laws and rules are the same for everybody whether of Dutch, Moroccan, Turkish or Roma origin. Likewise, everybody, as a citizen and member of a municipality, is expected to contribute to the local community according to his/her ability. This being said, there are families of Dutch and other origin with numerous problems (poverty, unemployment, debt, low level of education, domestic violence, physical and/or psychological health problems, etc.) who are unable to contribute to society. In Mr de Vos’ experience, a lot of Roma families belong to this group.
To respond to the needs of so-called “Roma multi-problem families”, Nieuwegein municipality set up the Wisselgeld/Exchange Money programme (see chapter 3.3.3 below).
Whilst enforcing the law would bring some improvement, Mr de Vos also said that other measures are needed, notably the involvement of Roma parents and families who must understand that the only way to achieve recognition in Dutch society is to educate their children and obey domestic laws. The Dutch, meanwhile, have to accept that Roma have their own habits and culture. Mr de Vos concluded his introduction underlining that the Netherlands offers a lot of opportunities to everybody who wants to take them: e.g. the conditions for housing and health are rather good, including for Roma. The main problem remains school drop out and, as a consequence, access to the regular labour market. Mr de Vos acknowledged that some discrimination exists with the current atmosphere among parts of the population in the Netherlands not favouring people who are not of Dutch origin. Although segregation within society is much bigger in Eastern Europe, the distance between Roma and the rest of the Dutch population remains much wider than between other minority groups and the majority.
Mr de Vos finally raised a series of questions that he wished to be addressed during the visit:
• Is it normal that girls drop out of school, get married and have children at a very young age? • Can being sold by your parents (dowry) be associated with human trafficking?
CAHROM (2012)6
 4

CAHROM (2012)6
• What should prevail: the Roma culture and traditions or the law in the Netherlands which makes going to school compulsory?
• If parents do not send their children to school, can this justify the council of child protection or for youth care institutions taking children away from their family and bringing them to foster parents or a residential institute?
Some of these questions were addressed and are reflected upon in parts of the report (see e.g. sub- chapter 3.3.3 and Chapter IV Lessons learnt).
II. RELEVANT EUROPEAN/INTERNATIONAL STANDARDS AND REFERENCE TEXTS
The right to education for all children, and for Roma children in particular, including the issues of school drop-out and absenteeism, has been extensively addressed and documented by European and international governmental and non-governmental organisations through conventions, recommendations, case-law, reports and specific projects. References to a number of those and specific quotations are made either in footnotes of this thematic report, in the summary table of lessons learnt (see chapter IV below) or in the Addendum.
For additional research, it was felt; however, useful to recall the titles of the most relevant texts and documents of reference in this chapter.
As far as the Council of Europe is concerned, special attention should be given to:
- the 1950 Council of Europe Convention for the Protection of Human Rights and Fundamental Freedoms (ETS No. 5), in particular in Article 14 (Prohibition of discrimination), in the 1952 Protocol thereto (ETS No. 9), in particular in its Article 2 (Right to education), and in the 2000 Protocol No. 12 thereto (ETS No. 177);
- the 1995 Framework Convention for the Protection of National Minorities (ETS No. 157)5;
- the 1992 European Charter of Regional or Minority Languages (ETS No. 148)6;
- the 1961 European Social Charter (ETS No. 35)7;
- the Recommendation CM/Rec(2009)4 of the Committee of Ministers on the education of
Roma and Travellers;
- the Recommendation CM/Rec(2008)5 of the Committee of Ministers to member states on
policies for Roma and/or Travellers in Europe;
- the Recommendation No. R (2000) 4 of the Committee of Ministers on the education of
Roma/Gypsy children in Europe;
- the Recommendation 1924 (2010) and Resolution 1740 (2010) of the Parliamentary
Assembly on The Situation of Roma in Europe and relevant activities of the Council of
Europe”;
- the Congress Recommendation 315 (2011) and Resolution 333 (2011) on the situation of
Roma in Europe: a challenge for local and regional authorities;
- ECRI General Policy Recommendations No. 3 on combating racism and intolerance against
Roma/Gypsies (1998), No. 7 on national legislation to combat racism and racial discrimination (2002), No. 10 on combating racism and racial discrimination in and through school education (2006) and No. 13 on combating anti-Gypsyism and discrimination against Roma;
5 http://www.coe.int/t/dghl/monitoring/minorities/default_en.asp. 6 http://www.coe.int/t/dg4/education/minlang/.
7 http://www.coe.int/T/DGHL/Monitoring/SocialCharter/.
     5

CAHROM (2012)6
- the Final Declaration of the 22nd session of the Standing Conference of the Ministers of Education, on “Building a more humane and inclusive Europe: role of education policies” (Istanbul, 4-5 May 2007);
- recommendations and policy orientations included in the White Paper on Intercultural Dialogue “Living together as equals in dignity”, launched at the 118th Session of the Committee of Ministers (Strasbourg, 7 May 2008);
- the Strasbourg Declaration on Roma adopted at the High Level Meeting on Roma (Strasbourg, 20 October 2010);
- the Declaration adopted at the Summit of Mayors on Roma (Strasbourg, 22 September 2011), which inter alia calls for the support of the ROMED programme and the setting-up of a European Alliance of Cities and Regions for Roma Inclusion8;
- the Roma Youth Action Plan based on guidelines proposed by the participants of the Roma Youth Conference (September 2011).
Additionally, apart from the reports of the relevant Council of Europe monitoring bodies (the Commissioner for Human Rights, the Advisory Committee of the Framework Convention for the Protection of National Minorities, the Committee of Experts of the European Charter for Regional or Minority Languages and the European Commission against Racism and Intolerance (ECRI), as well as the case law of the European Court of Human Rights9, and the conclusions and decisions of the European Committee of Social Rights, the following Council of Europe reports and publications could be used as sources of inspiration for this thematic report:
- the Commissioner for Human Rights’ Viewpoint “The key to the promotion of Roma rights: early and inclusive education”10;
- the Commissioner for Human Rights’ publication “Human Rights of Roma and Travellers in Europe”, Council of Europe Publishing (February 2012);
- Jean-Pierre Liégeois “Roma in Europe”, Council of Europe Publishing (2009);
- Jean-Pierre Liégeois “The Council of Europe and Roma: 40 years of action”, Council of
Europe Publishing (2010 for the French edition; 2012 for the English one);
- The Commentary of the Advisory Committee on Education under the Framework
Convention for the Protection of National Minorities11;
- the project ““Education of Roma children in Europe” (2002-2009)”12 and its publications;
- the current joint CoE/EU ROMED programme “Intercultural mediation for Roma”)13.
Other relevant European and international reference texts and documents include:
- the United Nations Convention on the Rights of the Child14;
- the 2003 Action Plan on Improving the Situation of Roma and Sinti within the OSCE Area15;
- the ODIHR Status Report on the Implementation of the Action Plan on Improving the
Situation of Roma and Sinti within the OSCE Area (Warsaw, 2008);
- the ODIHR Mapping of participation of Roma and Sinti children in early education processes
within the OSCE Region16 (Warsaw, November 2010);
8 Most of these documents are electronically accessible at http://www.coe.int/web/coe-portal/roma_reference-texts.
9 In particular D.H. and Others v. The Czech Republic, Sampanis and Others v. Greece, and Orsus and Others v. Croatia. 10 http://www.coe.int/t/commissioner/Viewpoints/080331_en.asp. 11http://www.coe.int/t/dghl/monitoring/minorities/3_FCNMdocs/PDF_CommentaryEducation_en.pdf.
12 http://www.coe.int/t/dg4/education/roma/histoCulture_en.asp.
13 http://www.coe-romed.org/.
14Full text of the UN Convention at http://www2.ohchr.org/english/law/crc.htm.
15 Full text of the OSCE Action Plan on Roma and Sinti at: http://www.osce.org/odihr/17554.
16 See this OSCE-ODIHR mapping published in Warsaw in November 2010 at http://www.osce.org/odihr/73874.
         6

CAHROM (2012)6
- the European Union Council conclusions on an EU Framework for National Roma Integration Strategies up to 2020 in Brussels on 19 May 2011;
- The European Union Fundamental Rights Agency (FRA) Overview of the situation of Roma and Travellers in Public Education in EU Member States17 (published by EUMC, May 2006);
- the European Parliament Resolution on the EU Strategy on Roma Inclusion (March 2011);
- the joint UNICEF/OSI/REF Overview report “Roma Early childhood Education” (2012).
III. COMPARATIVE ANALYSIS OF SITUATIONS, POLICIES AND MEASURES
3.1. Size and composition of the Roma groups
3.1.1 the Netherlands
There are no exact figures regarding the number of people of Roma origin in the Netherlands as registration based on ethnicity is prohibited. Estimates vary from a few thousand to forty thousand, which means that no more than 0.24 per cent of the Dutch population is of Roma origin.
Roma in the Netherlands can be divided into five different groups according to their historical presence:
a) Roma, Sinti and Dutch Travellers traditionally residing in the Netherlands: this group concerns Sinti and a few Roma families present on the Dutch territory since the 15th century18 who, until the 1960s lived a nomadic lifestyle. This group of Dutch Sinti and Roma contains approximately 2,500 people. Dutch Travellers (woonwagenbewoners) are estimated to be 35,000 and have Dutch ethnicity. They do not have a language of their own and their history dates back to ‘only’ around 1850. A small number of Travellers, Sinti and Roma live in caravans or mobile homes (predominantly fixed in situ), situated in special centres or campsites.
b) About 1,500 Roma who came to the Netherlands as migrant workers and labourers around the late 1960s and 1970s and as refugees from Turkey in the 1980s.
c) Roma who were granted a residence permit in 1978: this third group, often referred to as the General Pardon group, concerns Roma who were legalised in the 1970s. Although most of them did not have any identity papers, it is assumed that the majority originates from the former Yugoslavia. In the 1980s, eleven municipalities welcomed those Roma. One of these municipalities, Nieuwegein, has admitted publicly that the policy to integrate this group into society has failed. Most municipalities represented in the Dutch Platform for Roma municipalities accommodate Roma from the General Pardon group. In 1978, this group consisted of 520 individuals dispersed around eleven municipalities. In the meantime, this group increased to approximately 2,800-3,000 individuals.
d) Roma who came to the Netherlands in the 90s: this fourth group is more a collection of individuals and families from the former Yugoslavia, the Czech Republic, Slovakia, and Bulgaria. They are not concentrated into certain cities or areas but can be found anywhere in the Netherlands. This group concerns about 1,000 people.
17 EUMC Study available on FRA website at: http://fra.europa.eu/fraWebsite/attachments/roma_report.pdf.
18 See e.g. Marko D. Knudsen, The history of the Roma, RomNews Society, Hamburg, Germany and Jean-Pierre Liégeois, Roma in Europe, Council of Europe Publishing, 2009.
  7

CAHROM (2012)6
e) Roma newcomers, arriving since the expansion of the European Union (as from 2000): this last group concerns essentially Bulgarian and Romanian Roma.
Within the Netherlands, approximately 55 municipalities house Roma residents from various backgrounds. Eleven of these municipalities, with predominantly Roma from group C above, belong to the Platform for Dutch Roma Municipalities acting under the Association of Dutch Municipalities (VNG).
In the two municipalities visited by the team of experts reside essentially populations from the first group (Dutch Roma in Veldhoven) and the third group (General Pardon Group in Nieuwegein).
3.1.2 Hungary
According to the data of the census conducted in 2001, based on ethnic affiliation, 190,046 persons declared themselves to be Roma. In the present decade, researchers estimate the Roma population to be between 650,000 and 750,000. This represents approximately seven per cent of the entire population of the country.
Three linguistic sub-groups are identified: the Romungros (Hungarian-speaking Roma), the Vlach Roma (bilingual, speaking both Romani and Hungarian) and the Beash Roma group (who speak Hungarian and Beash, a dialect of Romanian).
The Roma population has an uneven geographical distribution in the territory of the country. In certain counties, Roma can reach fifteen per cent. Additionally, territorial differences are extreme at the level of smaller territorial units; in a number of localities and locality groups, the Roma constitute the majority of the population.
More than 60% of Roma live in the countryside, in a rural environment, mostly in segregated residential zones, in rather poor housing conditions. There are some one hundred localities in Hungary which have definitively turned into poor Roma ghettos, while in another two hundred localities, this situation will emerge in the near future as a result of seemingly irreversible processes. Most of the segregated localities and localities on their way to micro-regional ghettoisation are situated in the country’s economically depressed north-eastern and south-western regions which are typically characterised by a structure of small localities.
The age composition of the Roma population is substantially younger than that of the non-Roma population. In 2010, the rate of children aged between 0 and 14 amongst Roma was 36.8%, while this proportion within the non-Roma population was 15.4%.
3.1.3 Spain
Roma people (locally called Gitanos, an accepted term) have been present in Spain since the 15th century. As in the rest of Europe, their history has been marked by persecution and phases of social exclusion. Currently, the Spanish Roma population stands at around 725,000-750,000. They speak Spanish (some of them also speak the Caló dialect).
In spite of the limitations in determining the total scale of the Roma population in Spain, it is accurately known that the Roma people are distributed across the national territory, with a most concentrated presence in Andalusia, where around 40% of Spanish Roma reside, as well as in
 The general socio-economic situation of Roma in Hungary is worse than that of the majority population, specifically in the areas of unemployment, health and education. Most of the Roma suffer from a low educational level (barely 20% of them reach secondary final examinations).
8

CAHROM (2012)6
Catalonia, Valencia and Madrid. Although their history has been associated with rural life and geographic mobility, the current trend is for prolonged, stable settlement in urban areas which consolidated in the 1950s, 60s and 70s to coincide with the general wave of domestic migration between rural areas and cities.
All social demographic studies carried out show that it is a young population, wherein around a third are aged below 16 years, with birth rates substantially higher than the population average, although in the last decade this disparate rate has begun to reduce.
3.1.4 Sweden
The Roma population in Sweden, estimated at around 50,000 (0.53% of the total population), is culturally, linguistically, and religiously heterogeneous, made up of different groups such as Kalderash, Lovari, Churari, Kaale, Travellers, Sinti, Arli and Gurbeti.
The earliest Roma groups arrived on the territory of what is now Sweden in the 16th century. Different Roma groups have been arriving in the country over a prolonged period of time, from recent migrant workers and refugees in the 1960s to the latest arrivals of citizens from new EU countries, particularly from Romania and Bulgaria. Most Roma in Sweden are Swedish citizens or have permanent residence in the country, with the same social rights as provided to other citizens. Nearly all Roma in Sweden speak Swedish.
3.2. General policy and legislation covering school attendance 3.2.1. the Netherlands
The Dutch Compulsory Education Act19 is applicable to all children with or without Dutch nationality, refugees or illegally entered individuals who are of school age. Education is compulsory for children between 5 and 18 years old20. The paper on Policy Measures in The Netherlands for the social inclusion of Roma submitted by the Ministry of the Interior and Kingdom Relations to the European Commission on 16 December 2011, in response to the European Commission Communication about a EU framework for national Roma integration strategies, recalls the main principles of the Dutch Compulsory Education Act.
Municipalities are responsible for enforcing the law and employ school attendance officers to ensure compliance with this requirement. Parents bear primary responsibility for complying with the Compulsory Education Act, i.e. for enrolling their children into school and for ensuring their daily presence at school. When children, Roma or otherwise, are persistently absent, the school attendance officer takes action – if necessary legal – to ensure they go to school. As a last resort, the attendance officer can report the case to the Public Prosecutor; judicial proceedings can lead to a fine or even a custodial sentence on the parents21.
To increase school attendance among Roma children, and girls in particular, the previous government made €.0.6 million available to the Platform for Roma Municipalities of the Association of Dutch Municipalities (VNG) in 2010. Some of these municipalities used the funds to finance projects aimed at encouraging Roma children, and girls in particular, to attend school. The VNG is sharing the
19 More information on the Dutch Compulsory Education Act is available on: http://www.european-agency.org/country- information/netherlands/national-overview/legal-system
20 In the Netherlands, many students follow full-time education at least until they are 18. Between 16 nad 18 they are allowed to work but are required to follow part-time education related to their job.
21 Fines to Roma parents remain usually unpaid and both Dutch interlocutors and experts from partner countries agree that they are not a suitable answer as they increase family debt and poverty. This is why, in Veldhoven, the fine was replaced by a work penalty (parents who do not send children to school must work on a Saturday).
   9

CAHROM (2012)6
knowledge and experience gained from these projects with other municipalities facing similar issues. As a result, there is a basis for effectively combatting persistent absence among Roma children.
A compensatory policy is in place for disadvantaged primary school pupils, including Roma children. Municipalities receive €.260 million in government funds for this purpose every year. They are required to use these funds to finance pre-school education, bridging classes and summer school, and have the option of organising other activities aimed at improving children’s language skills. Bridging classes provide extra tuition for pupils whose language skills fall short. Summer school programmes offered during school holidays are also aimed at improving pupils’ Dutch language skills. Over the course of the next few years, an additional €.100 million will be invested in pre-school education, bridging classes and summer schools. Approximately €.400 million a year is available for children whose parents have a low level of education. In general, schools use these funds to pay for extra teaching staff, which enables them to reduce class sizes so that disadvantaged pupils can be given more attention.
Secondary schools receive extra funds for staff if, over the course of two or more years, a certain percentage of their pupils come from neighbourhoods identified as having multiple poverty-related problems. Schools can use these funds to reduce drop-out rates and provide more intensive guidance to individual pupils in order to help them improve their academic performance.
Parents are free to choose their children’s school. No distinction is made on the basis of ethnicity or home address. There are no longer schools attended solely by Roma children.
3.2.2. Hungary
The target groups of educational equal opportunities programmes are, in every instance and regardless of ethnicity, groups of pupils/students qualifying as pupils/students with multiple disadvantages or as disadvantaged as defined in Section 121 Point 14 of Act LXXIX of 1993 on Public Education.
The educational integration of the Roma population came to a halt in the years preceding the changes of 1989. While in the decades before the 1990s, the Roma significantly caught up with the national average in terms of the completion of their elementary studies and there was an increase in the ratio of Roma individuals with vocational qualifications, their ratio in secondary schools providing final examinations remained negligible and consequently so did their participation in higher education. Their relative situation regarding studies at a higher educational level has since further deteriorated. While their integration in elementary schools continued, their ratio in secondary schools providing final examinations remained below 15 per cent, in contrast to the national average in excess of 80 per cent. Additionally, most of the few Roma who do continue their studies tend to seek admission to vocational schools. They have a much higher drop-out rate than their non-Roma counterparts. In vocational schools, every fourth student on average is required to repeat at least one year during the course of his/her studies (the ratio of students required to repeat a year in grammar schools is 5% in relation to the total number of students), many of them indeed never complete their studies and depart the educational system without qualifications. This phenomenon, which has been on the rise in recent years, greatly contributes to youth unemployment and a rise in poverty and plays a major role in the regeneration of a population with low educational qualifications.
As a result of measures implemented in recent years22, there has been a decrease in the number of pupils classified as having special educational needs due to a mild mental disability. Decree No.
22 In particular, the extraordinary reviews conducted as part of the “From the desk at the back” programme, the amendment of the relevant legal rules, including measures related to the establishment of the diagnosis of mildly mentally or intellectually challenged.
 10

CAHROM (2012)6
4/2010. (I.19.)OKM identifies the relevant procedure and the professional requirements of the tests and examinations serving as the basis of the subsequent expert opinion.
In the case of premature drop-outs, the so-called “second chance schools” designed to assist the re- integration of drop-outs into the school system are of particular significance.
A number of state and private scholarship programmes, mentoring programmes and talent fostering programmes23 help to promote the educational success of disadvantaged elementary school pupils and secondary school students and students in higher education, including disadvantaged Roma, such as:
A.
•
•
Programmes designed and financed by the State:
The scholarship programme (‘MACIKA’) was first launched in 2000. Managed by the Hungarian Public Foundation for the Roma, it merged with the ‘On the Road’ (Útravaló) Scholarship Programme in 2010. This merged programme covers 20,000 students with almost 11,000 mentor-teachers participating in the programme on an ongoing basis. The programme is exclusively financed by the Hungarian State Budget, which provides more than 2 billion HUF (app. 7 million EUR) through budget estimate to the programme annually.
Integrative Pedagogical System. The programme has been running since 2003 and its main aim is to promote inclusive education and the equal distribution of multiply disadvantaged children in peer classes to ensure equal opportunities for them. Approximately 300,000 children, 90,000 of which have multiple disadvantages, as well as 15,000 teachers, take part in the programme annually. Approximately 1,600 public educational institutions were involved in 2011. The programme operates in two ways: on the one hand, it supports measures promoting equal opportunities; on the other hand, it issues wage supplements for teachers working with children from disadvantaged backgrounds. The theoretical base of the programmes is quality education based on individual diversity, therefore any institutional development and design need to align with that. The integrative pedagogical programme has a special status among the programmes of the State Secretariat of Social Inclusion. The programme is exclusively financed by the Hungarian State Budget, which provides more than 7 billion HUF (app. 24 million EUR) through budget estimates to the programme annually.
The Arany János Programmes:
- The Arany János Talent Fostering Programme for Disadvantaged Students was
launched in 2000. A sub-programme was devised in 2004 under the title ‘Arany
János’ Talent Fostering Boarding Facility Programme for Disadvantaged Students;
- The Arany János Talent Fostering Boarding Facility – Vocational School
Programme for Students with Multiple Disadvantages, was launched in 2007; The Higher Education Mentor Programme has operated since 2005;
Programmes designed by the State and financed by EU funds: TANODA extracurricular learning programmes
Programmes designed and financed by non-governmental organisations:
The Romaversitas Foundation is operated by non-state and EU funding and was established in 1996;
Scholarships have been granted by the Roma Education Fund in the last five years.
•
•
B.
•
C.
• •
 23 See the Addendum of the report for a more detailed description of these programmes. 11

3.2.3. Spain
The Organic Law of Education 2/2006 from 3rd May 200624 states that “in order to prevent students dropping out of school and to offer more training opportunities and subsequent qualifications and facilitate access to the workplace, there will be initial vocational training programmes for students over sixteen who have not obtained the Certificate in Compulsory Secondary Education”.
The distance between the educational situation of the Roma population (adult and school age) and the rest of the population is truly alarming and is a factor contributing to widening inequalities and to the social exclusion gap affecting a large proportion of this community. The transition to compulsory secondary education remains an insurmountable barrier. There are few boys and even fewer girls who even embark upon secondary education and 80% of those who do so fail to complete their studies.
The high rate of early school-leavers during the compulsory education period is one of the most important challenges facing the educational system, Roma families and society at large and is standing in the way of true social inclusion of the Roma minority.
According to the 2008 Survey of the Roma population, an analysis conducted by Spain's Sociological Research Centre, 24% of this community have reached post-primary school education (in other words, 76% have only primary school studies) compared with 64% of the overall Spanish population. This inequality in the area of education has a negative influence on their labour market integration and therefore on the development of a life project on an equal footing with the rest of the citizens.
Spain and NGO partners have developed educational support actions for the promotion of young Roma and their families.
Since its creation, one of the priorities of the Fundación Secretariado Gitano (FSG) has been the educational advancement of the Roma community. It should not be forgotten that this process got under way only 25 years ago and important progress has been made. Nevertheless, to this day FSG continues to find major voids which pose serious challenges. The 1980s witnessed the implementation of the so-called bridge schools which constituted the first enrolment plan targeting the Roma population.
Over the last several years, FSG has continued to make strides in this area through enrolment support programmes, keeping students in post-compulsory studies through the awarding of scholarships and tutoring, by conducting surveys and research, training, general and technical advisory support for professionals in the field of education and social education and by implementing actions aimed at involving Roma families in the education of their children.
Hence, in the area of education, the FSG has been working to foster the educational advancement of the Roma community at all levels and ages, with a special emphasis on those stages that are proving to be the most difficult, in particular secondary education. This is among the priorities that the FSG envisages in its 2007-2013 Strategic Plan. It includes the PROMOCIONA programme (see below).
3.2.4. Sweden
On 16 February 2012, the Swedish Government adopted a coordinated and long term Strategy for Roma Inclusion for the period 2012–203225 (see Official Communication 2011/12:56)26.
24 Full text of the Organic Law of Education (ley orgánica de educación – LOE) available in English at http://planipolis.iiep.unesco.org/upload/Spain/Spain_LOE_eng.pdf. See especially the Heading II "Equity in Education".
25
http://ec.europa.eu/justice/discrimination/files/roma_sweden_strategy_sv.pdf
CAHROM (2012)6
  The text of the Swedish Roma Strategy (available in Swedish only) is available at:
 12

The twenty-year strategy is to be regarded as a strengthening of the already existing minority policy that applies to all the five national minorities in Sweden: Jews, Roma, Sami, Sweden Finns and Tornedalians.
The Swedish strategy for Roma inclusion, which was already planned, also serves as a response to the call of the European Commission on Member States to adopt national Roma integration strategies or further develop existing strategies. The strategy is based on human rights, with particular emphasis on the principle of non-discrimination. This means that the government emphasises that the Roma, like all others, are entitled to enjoy all human rights.
The target group is above all those Roma who are living in social and economic exclusion and are subject to discrimination. Women and children are a special priority.
The overall goal of the twenty-year Roma strategy is for a Roma who turns twenty years of age in 2032 to have the same opportunities in life as a non-Roma. The rights of Roma who are then twenty should be safeguarded within ordinary structures and areas of activity to the same extent as are the rights for twenty-year-olds in the rest of the population.
The Swedish strategy contains goals and measures within six specific areas of activity: a) education, b) employment, c) housing, d) health, social care and security, e) culture and language and f) the organisation of civil society.
The Government has allocated SEK 46 million for the period 2012–2015 to measures for the Roma. This sum is in addition to the ordinary means allocations for national minorities.
The Government offices have the overall responsibility for coordinating and monitoring the strategy. Implementation as a whole is aimed at reinforced implementation and continuous follow-up of Roma people’s access to human rights at the local, regional and national level. To achieve results, authorities and municipalities must participate and take active responsibility, within their ordinary activity, for drawing attention to and guaranteeing Roma people’s access to their rights. Follow-up will be done in relation to the six goals for the various areas of activity. Progress reports on the implementation of the strategy will be presented annually to the Riksdag in the budget proposal.
The Swedish Education Act stipulates that all children and young people must have access to education of equal value, irrespective of gender, place of residence and social and financial circumstances. In Sweden, compulsory schooling lasts for nine years and children have a right to education from the age of seven. The aim of compulsory school education is to provide all pupils with the knowledge and skills they need to participate in social life and in continued education. Special support is given to pupils who have difficulties with school work. Attending school is free of charge, although minor amounts may be charged for one-off activities. Educational content is determined by the curriculum and subject syllabuses. Individual development plans and written assessments are to be provided every school year and grades are given from year 8 onwards.
The new Schools Act reinforces the pupils’ right to support and improves the monitoring of pupils in need of special support by way of written assessments, earlier formal qualifications and more national tests. In its reform work, the Government has focused on the earlier school years, since these lay the foundations for a subsequent successful education. The Government is also making efforts to develop pupils’ skills in reading, writing and arithmetic.
26 Further information about the Government’s official communication “A coordinated and long term strategy for Roma inclusion 2012-2032 (official communication 2011/12:56), about national minorities, minority policy, minority conventions, and the Government bill “From recognition to empowerment” (bill 2008/09:158) is available on the Government’s websites www.manskligarattigheter.se and www.regeringen.se/romastrategin.
CAHROM (2012)6
   13

3.3. Various policy approaches
3.3.1 Mainstream vs. minority policy approach
It was made clear during the thematic visit that the Dutch and Swedish policies towards Roma differ from each other in terms of policy approach. Whilst the Netherlands has a mainstream policy approach, Sweden follows a national minority one in line with the Framework Convention for the Protection of National Minorities. The Netherlands, in addition to offering perspectives, puts emphasis on enforcing the law as an ultimate resort.
In the Netherlands, there is no specific legislation or specific national policy for Roma28. The current approach towards all groups is to comply with general policy, as the previous tendency for target group policy is no longer up to date. To reduce Roma-issues, generic policy measures have to be taken into consideration.
The first principle of this general policy is that integration is not the responsibility of the government but rather of those who decide to settle in the Netherlands. The second is that a person’s future is more important than their origin. People need to have the will and the means to integrate into society.
CAHROM (2012)6
 The responsibility for the student to fulfill their compulsory schooling relies with several parties. The municipality should ensure that the students in primary education and with basic learning disabilities attend school. Anyone with custody of a child of school age shall ensure that the child fulfills their compulsory schooling. If a student does not attend school because the pupil's guardian has not done what he is required to ensure this, the municipality shall oblige the pupil's guardian to fulfill their obligations. A compliance order may be combined with a penalty.
 The Roma strategy developed by Sweden focuses on the rights of Roma as both a minority with special cultural and language rights and a target group for improving their socio-economic situation. The current minority policy, whose objectives are to protect the national minorities, increase their power and influence and support the historical minority languages in order to promote and preserve them, was adopted in 2000, in conjunction with Sweden’s ratification of the Framework Convention for the Protection of National Minorities 27 and the European Charter for Regional and Minority Languages.
   The policy approach in Hungary is somehow a mixed approach between mainstreaming and targeting. Since most of the Hungarian Roma, about 80% of them, live in extreme poverty in disadvantaged regions, a policy aimed at the inclusion of the Roma in Hungary cannot be separated from the general fight against poverty and the improvement of social and economic competitiveness. At the same time, the Hungarian government agrees that particular attention should be paid to the ethnic group of the Roma as experiences show that they are the poorest of the poor and have been least reached by the various inclusion programmes. In accordance with the EU basic principle of
  explicit but not exclusive targeting, the Hungarian government considers that special means, methods
 and approaches for the involvement of the Roma population are needed.
  27 Minority groups recognized in Sweden are Sami, Sweden Finns, Jews, Roma and Tornedalians. These groups respond to
  the following criteria: a) they have inhabited Sweden for a long time and are explicitly connected in communities; they have unique linguistic, religious or cultural signifiers; and they have a desire to keep their identity.
28 See in that context Resolution CM/ResCMN(2011)3 on the implementation of the Framework Convention for the Protection of National Minorities by the Netherlands, adopted by the Committee of Ministers on 12 January 2011 at the 1102nd meeting of the Ministers' Deputies, as well as paragraphs 20 to 24 of the Opinion of the Advisory Committee of the Framework Convention for the Protection of National Minorities adopted on 25 June 2009 [document ACFC/OP/I(2009)002]. Only Frisians in the province of Frisia are recognised as a national minority in the Netherlands.
14

The forms, content and framework of the kindergarten and school education of the Roma minority are regulated in the decrees on kindergarten education of national and ethnic minorities and on school education of national and ethnic minorities. The purpose of kindergarten education is to prepare children for a successful entry into the school system by consciously building on the differences and similarities between the Roma culture and the majority culture.
3.3.2 Nationally- vs. locally based approach
All experts of the thematic group agreed that municipalities have a central role in common efforts to improve the situation of the Roma as they are responsible for activities that are decisive for Roma people’s inclusion in society.
To summarize the current position of the Netherlands, one could refer to the letter dated 26 June 2009 to the House of Representatives33 in which the Dutch government sets out its position on policy in respect of Roma in the Netherlands.
“The Dutch government’s first principle is that municipalities in which Roma populations are concentrated, referred to as “Roma municipalities”, are best placed to bear responsibility by themselves for the correct approach to the problems of the local Roma population.
29 The extension of the European Charter for Regional and Minority Languages to the Romani and Beash languages spoken by the Roma in Hungary was promulgated by Act XLIII of 2008.
31 Cigány, the Hungarian term for “Gypsies” is not as derogatory and pejorative as in neighbouring countries of Central and South-Eastern Europe. The word “Roma” (Romák), however, is increasingly used in official documents since 2011.
32 Article 2 of the Spanish Constitution states “The Constitution is based on the indissoluble unity of the Spanish Nation, the common and indivisible country of all Spaniards”.
33 House of Representatives 2008-2009, 31 700 XVIII, no. 90 which was quoted in para. 14 of the Comments of the Government of the Netherlands on the first Opinion of the Advisory Committee on the Implementation of the Framework Convention for the Protection of National Minorities received by the CoE Secretariat on 17 February 2010.
CAHROM (2012)6
 Article 68 of the 1990 Hungarian Constitution provides minorities with the right to preserve their culture, language and history, allowing political collective participation in public life as well as the rights to their own organisations and to establish regional and national self-governing bodies. The Romani language is recognised as an official minority language and the group is officially recognised as a minority29.
In 1990 the Office for National Minorities was set up, including a Department on Roma issues. The recognition of both individual and collective rights of minorities and members of minorities was granted through the 1993 Act on the Rights of National and Ethnic Minorities30 which granted 13 such groups, including Roma, the right to self-government and personal autonomy. All the 13 minorities listed in the Minorities Act of 1993 possess dual identity (Hungarian and ethnic minority)
 and have the right to elect their own local self-governments, parallel to the national one. This provided the path to Romani autonomy and the formation of the National Gypsy31 Minority Self- Government (National Roma Self-Government since 2011). The self-governing bodies act as advisory boards in co-operation with the national and local majority authority (see sub-chapter 3.3.3 below for their role in the field of education).
 In Spain the Constitution does not formally recognise or define ethnic minorities32. Nor is there any state or government institution or agency responsible for minorities. Roma are therefore not recognised as a national minority. This group is, nevertheless, from a pragmatical point of view covered by the Framework Convention for the Protection of National Minorities. Spain has adopted and developed at the level of the State and Autonomous Communities (Regions) a series of targeted Roma programmes since 1985 and has set up a State Council of Roma Community since 2005.
   30 The Act on the Rights of National and Ethnic Minorities was modified in 2011. According to the new Act, Roma are also recognised as a minority.
 15

This involves a limited number of municipalities in the Netherlands and a relatively small Roma population. The second principle is that central government is encouraging the “Roma municipalities” to utilise the options provided to them by the generic policy as effectively as possible in order to deal with the problems signalled by them concerning a segment of the local Roma communities.
[...] In 2010, the Dutch government has put €600,000 at the disposal of the “Roma municipalities” in order to combat the dropping out of school among female Roma students.”
According to the government, primary responsibility for dealing with the problems of the local Roma population lies therefore with municipalities. Central government acknowledges the urgency and severity of these problems. In the absence of a Roma national policy, municipalities are encouraged to make effective use of existing measures and the tools available to deal with problems within certain segments of local Roma communities.
Since 2008, several Dutch municipalities exchange knowledge on Roma-issues. This co-operation was formalised in 2009 in the Platform for Dutch Roma-municipalities, accommodated by the Association of Dutch Municipalities (VNG), in order to share experience and information34. The Platform was provided with a grant for three years by the government. Over the last two years, several municipalities were given the possibility to invest in the education area.
These municipalities came to the conclusion, however, that the causes of school drop out and absenteeism could not be solved at municipal level only. A national programme called “Fight crime in general and exploitation of Roma children”35 was established at the end of 2011 by the Dutch Government after a request from all Dutch Roma municipalities. Its aim is to stop and prevent exploitation of Roma children using an approach in which municipalities, police, central government and other relevant organisations work closely together. Criminal activity will be tackled comprehensively by means of law enforcement, discouragement and putting up barriers. It is important to note that the policy underpinning the programme does not target Roma specifically, but is aimed at combating crime (see below the views expressed by one of the Dutch interlocutors during the thematic visit, Mr Walter Hilhorst from the Dutch Police Academy).
Views expressed by Mr Walter Hilhorst from the Dutch Police Academy
“In my job as a policeman, since 1995, I have been confronted with families with an ethnic Roma background in Nieuwegein. Members of these families committed a large number of crimes, they took their children out of school sending them out to steal, none of them had a job, they were involved in social benefit fraud and so on. Whenever my police colleagues were talking about “Gypsies”, these sorts of problems were automatically associated with them. Not surprisingly, time after time, and year after year, they were confronted with this behaviour by 'Gypsies'. Later on I learned that the families in Nieuwegein and some other municipalities were not representing the Roma community as a whole. In my opinion, it is precisely these families who maintain the negative image about Roma within the Dutch police and society. Members of these families call out loud that they are discriminated against because they are Roma. The police and local government in turn talk about Roma-criminality and Roma-problems. A vicious circle.....This situation has not changed a lot nowadays and the same is happening in relation to citizens from Eastern Europe with a Roma background.
The challenge for the Dutch (and European) police organisations is to find a way to fight the crimes that are committed and deal with deviant behaviour, using the knowledge we have about the background of the perpetrators without drawing conclusions for the whole group. I train my colleagues to do so. I do not ask them
34 Municipalities with Roma not represented in the Platform do not focus on this group as they do not encounter or acknowledge Roma issues within their territory.
35 In response to the call of the European Commission on Member States to adopt national Roma integration strategies or further develop existing strategies, the Dutch Government presented a general policy document that is seen as relevant to improving the position of Roma in the Netherlands. In addition to the themes set by the European Council (education, employment, health and housing), the Dutch government highlighted two other subjects, namely combating socially unacceptable and criminal behaviour and exploitation of Roma children.
CAHROM (2012)6
  16

CAHROM (2012)6
to look the other way when a Roma or anyone else commits a crime. I ask them whether it is relevant to know that they are dealing with a Roma and to be aware of the existence of prejudice they have concerning people with an ethnic Roma background. What knowledge is really necessary?
I think statistical rates about crime will do more harm than good to the Roma minority. We must stop talking about Roma as one group and treat them as individuals. When an individual or a whole family commits crime, they should be held accountable for it. More interesting is the question of how to deal with the knowledge that some types of crime are mainly committed by people with a Roma background. For example, all over Europe citizens from Eastern Europe with a Roma-background commit the exact same crimes. I personally believe that a lot of these people are both perpetrator and victim at the same time and that they are recruited and exploited by criminal organisations. Therefore it is important that European police organisations are aware of this problem and co-operate in exchanging information, not based on a Roma problem but based on fighting crime.”
In Sweden the Roma strategy also foresees measures at the local levels, in particular: a pilot project at the municipal level 2012–2015. In order to speed up developments at the local level, the Government will arrange a special pilot project in a number of municipalities, in which county councils will also be involved. The Stockholm county administrative board will be responsible for monitoring and coordinating the project. The National Agency for Education, the Public Employment Service and the Equality Ombudsman will be involved, and the Swedish Association of Local Authorities and Regions will also be invited to participate. State measures in the pilot project include training of bridge builders, testing the use of health communicators, and increased knowledge of the extent to which support is given to Roma children in school in accordance with the law. It is envisaged that a number of these municipalities join the European Alliance of Cities and Regions for Roma Inclusion to be set up by the Council of Europe in autumn 2012.
   In Hungary, through Act LXXIX of 1993 on Public Education (amended in 1996 and in 2003), an action programme was elaborated in the field of education, which allowed the regional minority self- governing bodies the possibility of setting up educational institutions in the minority language, alongside the possibility to address educational desegregation.
  The National Roma Self-government and the Roma minority self-governments have the right to maintain and to establish schools and also operate schools of their own in the spirit of cultural and educational autonomy. Education in the school system enables Roma pupils to acquaint themselves with the cultural values of the Roma and provides information on the status, rights, organisations and institutions of the Roma. This form of education and teaching successfully operates in a number of localities. It is, however, necessary to provide further guarantees which prevent Roma minority education from becoming a means of segregation.
Spain’s internal organisation allows promotion of cultural identities and diversity, given the high degree of decentralisation and the broad powers assigned to the Autonomous Communities in a number of pertinent fields.
3.3.3 Law enforcement vs. preventive measures
Dutch policy includes a law enforcement component which is used as an ultimate resort. Dutch authorities at national and local levels came to the conclusion that a policy of only preventive measures did not always bring the expected results in terms of school enrolment. In that sense, it differs from the Hungarian and Spanish approaches which essentially give priority to preventive measures for combatting absenteeism and school drop-out.
In the Netherlands, in case of absenteeism, compulsory school attendance officers are notified. Together with the school and parents, or the child from the age of 12, the officer searches for solutions to prevent absenteeism. If the violation of the Compulsory Education Act continues, the
17

CAHROM (2012)6
compulsory school attendance officer reports the child. The public prosecutor decides whether prosecution will be undertaken, which could result in a maximum fine of 3,700 Euros or a one month prison sentence by the sub-district court judge.
• The Wisselgeld/Exchange Money programme: an integrated approach towards Roma multi-problem families in Nieuwegein municipality
The Roma community in Nieuwegein consists of approximately 400 persons who have been present in the municipality since 1978. They are living in houses, scattered through different city areas. It is an isolated group: there is not so much contact with other inhabitants of Nieuwegein and a decreasing unity among the Roma community itself is being witnessed.
Within the Roma community in Nieuwegein, there is an increasingly problematic situation in terms of neighbourhood nuisance, criminality, debt accumulation, unemployment, dependence on social benefits and health problems. The absenteeism of Roma children is still high, especially in secondary school. Discrimination also exists.
Due to the seriousness of these problems and the cry of distress from inhabitants of Nieuwegein to do something about the rising crime rates and nuisance in their living areas or shopping centres, a new, integrated programme to manage the situation was developed. This programme is based on a new methodology called Wisselgeld (Exchange Money).
The Wisselgeld programme, which started on on 1 January 2009, has a two-fold approach: offering perspectives and enforcing the law. The main target groups were initially Roma families with children. The main goal is to reach a positive change in the family system, with a focus on the child, the parents and the living environment. The more specific objectives of the programme include: 1) improving the schooling of Roma children; 2) decreasing the reliance on social benefits; 3) decreasing poverty; 4) decreasing anti-social behaviour in neighbourhoods; and 5) reducing criminality.
Wisselgeld is considered as an integrated approach bearing in mind that it includes a variety of actors36. Its implementation relies on the work of two “intermediaries” who work according to the same model: “one family, one plan, one director”.
In terms of results, the CAHROM team of experts was informed that 70 out of 73 Roma children (42 girls and 31 boys aged between 5 and 12) of the 27 families participating in the Wisselgeld approach go to primary school now (6 of them remain relatively absent). Roma pupils are present in almost all primary schools in Nieuwegein and their participation has largely increased in the past years. No big difference was noticed in terms of absenteeism between the schools.
Participation of the 35 Roma pupils in secondary school (aged between 12 and 18) is, however, not yet sufficient, especially for girls: 33% of them go to school (8 boys, 4 girls), 36% are relatively absent (8 boys, 5 girls), whilst 31% are absolutely absent (3 boys, 8 girls, all over 15). There is a high concentration of Roma students in practical education (Baanbreker). An important bottleneck remains the switch from primary to secondary school.
Roma families participating in the Wisselgeld programme are less dependent on social benefits and take a more active part in debt relief programmes. Less anti-social behaviour has also been noticed in
36 Those actors include primary and secondary schools, the Office of the Public Prosecutor; Municipal Departments (Compulsory Education, Social Affairs, Integration, Debt Relief); the police; housing corporations; welfare/community work (Movactor); social work (Vitras CMD); the Province of Utrecht; the Youth Care Bureau ; the Council of Child Protection and the Public Health Service.
  18

CAHROM (2012)6
the neighbourhood. As a direct effect of the integrated approach, there is better co-ordination and co- operation of services and institutions around the families.
In 2012, the budget allocated to this programme is €.340,000. Recently, the local government of Nieuwegein decided to expand the focus of the Wisselgeld programme to more issues and to all families with multi-problems.
Some of the challenges raised by Mr de Vos in his introductory presentation were addressed in the context of the discussion following the Wisselgeld programme, i.e. child exploitation, trafficking, and early marriages. When implementing the Wisselgeld programme, the municipality became more and more aware of substantial school absenteeism or even drop-out of Roma children in primary school. The situation gets even worse at secondary level, especially for girls who stop going to school when they reach the ages of 12, 13 or 14. Even more alarming for the authorities was the fact that these girls disappeared and the local police and youth care institutions did not know where to. The parents knew but would not say the truth. Authorities suspect that these girls were forced to marry in exchange for a dowry paid to the parents, and that they now live elsewhere in Europe.
When asked about the absenteeism and drop-out of Roma children from school, Roma parents and associations explained that this lack of school attendance is part of Roma culture. Roma parents are afraid of assimilation to the culture of the majority. According to Dutch standards, however, those arguments are unacceptable. National and local authorities have a duty to fight this and ensure that any child attends compulsory education, which is a fundamental right of all human beings, especially children37.
• The local policy approach towards Roma in Veldhoven municipality
Mr Eric van der Sommen, Policy Advisor for Roma in the municipality, briefly presented the
situation in Veldhoven.
In 2002, there were 223 Roma registered in 45 caravans. These were mainly Dutch Roma in addition to a number of Eastern European brides with children. The number of Roma present in the municipality had increased by 142% over the last 25 years. Almost 100% of the adults were unemployed. Very few Roma children attended primary school (essentially during the winter months).
In 2004, Veldhoven tightened the enforcement of compulsory education. Roma were informed that they had rights and duties, including sending their children to school during the school year. The municipality started with separate classes for Roma pupils divided into two different groups (4-8 years old and 8-14 years old). Roma children started secondary education in special schools at Sondervick College. Education focused on practical and social skills was accompanied by intense contacts between educational mediators and parents, as there was a strong mistrust towards institutions and schools.
In 2009 the first children started attending regular classes in Sondervick College. In 2011, the system of special Roma classes was abandoned because children could follow education in regular classes (the last Roma-only class was closed in 2010). Currently, all Roma children are enrolled in regular education.
37 Article 28 a. of the UN Convention on the Rights of the Child states: “States Parties recognize the right of the child to education, and with a view to achieving this right progressively and on the basis of equal opportunity, they shall, in particular: (a) Make primary education compulsory and available free to all;”
  19

CAHROM (2012)6
At present the number of Roma has stabilised to 225 Roma registered in 57 houses/caravans scattered over four town districts (Schutwal, Hopeenven, De Wegerd and Beerze). Approximately 10 adults are working and school attendance is over 90%. At primary level, 52 Roma children are spread around seven schools. Among the 24 Roma pupils eligible for secondary education, 14 students are spread across two schools and 10 students are exempt due to different causes such as having children, detention or work. Most of these children possess Dutch nationality. A few of them originate from Slovakia or Belgium.
The fact that the number of Roma had not increased over that period was explained by a tighter enforcement of the law on compulsory education and measures to discourage new Roma coming to settle in Veldhoven. Due to the obligation for Roma parents to send their children to school, families had to abandon their nomadic lifestyle (in some of the locations, a caravan has been kept next to the house). A few Roma families refused these enforcement duties and left the municipality.
The municipality policy adviser cooperates with a large range of interlocutors and social workers, including a Roma policy officer, a “Roma intermediary” (a non-Roma community worker), a compulsory school attendance officer, two (non-Roma) mediators called education counsellors for Roma, primary and secondary school teachers, as well as jobcoaches and a customer manager who help Roma in their job search.
Mrs Suzan Smolders, School Attendance Officer, explained that she works closely with public health care, Stichting Stimulans (mediators/jobcoaches), the Public Prosecution Service, the Youth Care Organisation, the Youth Protection Board and the Work, Income and Care Department.
Mrs Marjolein van de Klundert, one of the two community workers (mediators) employed by Stimulans, explained that she used to visit the Roma locations every week to encourage parents to send their children to primary and secondary schools. If not, this is reported, via the School Attendance Officer, to the Public Prosecution Service which can take legal action against the family. In 2011, one third of the reports on absenteeism concerned Roma. Attendance of secondary education has increased but there is always a risk of drop-outs, especially among teenage girls. Co- operation with Stimulans also includes jobcoaching for Roma teenagers between 16 and 18 years old. Students may receive school exemption in order to attend a traineeship or a working programme. The Work, Income and Care Department takes over jobcoaching for teenagers over 18.
In terms of results, a decrease in total absenteeism has been noticed. However, absenteeism due to illness has increased, hence a co-operation agreement with the Public Health Care to limit children’s absence. Co-operation has increased with the Youth Care Organisation and the Child Protection Board which initially had little knowledge about Roma families and their problems. Among the positive results, parents are more aware of governmental and school rules and their involvement, as well as their children’s, in school activities has increased. Children are more open to asking for assistance and Roma teenagers have a better perspective on the regular labour market.
• The TANODA extracurricular learning programmes in Hungary
TANODA extracurricular learning programmes, a type of informal education for disadvantaged children, came into being on the basis of a standardised model, as developments financed from EU funding. The main purpose of the SROP sub-measure 3.3.5 “Aid for extracurricular learning programmes” project is to reduce the school drop-out rate and to reinforce the path towards the continuation of studies (in secondary schools providing final examinations and in higher education if possible) for pupils/students with multiple disadvantages, Roma youth, pupils/students under child protection care and migrant pupils/students.
 20

CAHROM (2012)6
The extracurricular learning centres are chosen by children and their parents out of their own free will and designed to assist and manage learning adjusted to the personal educational needs of participants, serving to improve the chances of integration into the formal school system. As part of the programme, 60 alternative learning facility projects were financed in total. However, the sustainability of extracurricular learning centres and the need for the streamlining of parallel institutional development and funding forms are issues yet to be resolved.
The first Tanoda extracurricular learning programmes were launched in Hungary in 2004. The programmes’ main objectives are to reduce school dropout and to facilitate access to secondary and tertiary education for multiply disadvantaged children/Roma children, including those children living under child protection care and migrant students. 20 to 60 students can participate in one Tanoda. The programme operates out of the regular school curriculum and is based on standards worked out by the competent ministries. These standards outline the basic conditions of a programme. Civil organisations are responsible for the implementation of the goals.
The Tanoda programmes were financed by EU resources. Between 2004-2007, 800 million Hungarian forints (3,200,000 Euros) were available in the framework of the Tanoda tender. In between 2009-2011 this sum could reach 1,500 million forints(5,660,000 Euros). Successful applicants for tender could win 12-15 million forints (48,000-60,000 Euros) from 2004-2007, and from 2009-2011, this sum reached 14-22 million forints (56,000-88,000 Euros) for an implementation period of 20-24 months.
In addition to the Tanoda , other pedagogical systems were designed to create equal opportunities for children with multiple disadvantages in local pedagogical practice, such as the Integrative Pedagogical System (IPS)38 which was introduced in 2003. Institutions using IPS were supported professionally by the National Education Integration Network. IPS is now used by a quarter of elementary schools, whilst kindergartens and secondary schools also have joined the methodology- based programme. In total, approximately 1,600 public educational institutions, 300,000 children (including 80,000 pupils with multiple disadvantages and 20,000 children with multiple disadvantages) and some 13,000 teachers are involved. A study on the impact of IPS shows that the programme has led to a general improvement in the development of the pupils/students of the participating schools.
• The PROMOCIONA programme in Spain
From 2000-2006, the FSG managed actions targeting the Roma population through a Multi-Regional Operational Programme to Combat Discrimination financed by the European Social Fund (Acceder Programme). This programme is focused on providing access to employment through the training of the Roma population in Spain. Today, within the framework of the new 2007-2013 period, a new Operational Programme is being implemented which continues to focus on labour market integration but which also includes a new line of action in the field of education.
The aim of this new line of action is not only to encourage Roma students to complete their compulsory studies but to go on to higher levels of education. This requires a reduction in early school leaving, a problem affecting a significant proportion of Roma students.
To this end, the Promociona Programme, supported to a large extent by the European Social Fund and the Spanish Ministry of Health and Social Policy through the allocation of income tax funds, targets the different players taking part in the educational process of young people: the students themselves, their families, schools and other social and educational professionals.
38 See the Addendum of this report for further information.
21
 
CAHROM (2012)6
The objective of the Promociona Programme is to ensure an adequate supply of services that reinforces the prevention of early school dropout and encourages higher rates of completion of Compulsory Secondary Education.
In other words, the Promociona Programme seeks to promote both the educational mainstreaming of Roma students with a view to achieving higher academic standards at the end of primary education and throughout the compulsory secondary level of education, as well as continued middle and/or higher studies and vocational training. It has two specific objectives:
▪ to facilitate the transition between primary and compulsory secondary education, permanence in the educational system and advancement to further education;
▪ to generate and enhance the conditions needed to achieve academic success within the Roma community and, in general, of the entire educational community, through work with the different stakeholders: students, families, schools and other social agents.
The lines of action of the Promociona Programme are as follows:
▪ Actions aimed at students who leave prematurely at the compulsory secondary education stage, by means of actions which are adapted to their reality, leading to continuation and/ or reintegration into the educational system;
▪ Actions to reinforce and support continuity in the educational process:
o Through programmes and actions aimed at Roma adolescents and their families, based on awareness and support elements and, thus, framed in “external compensation”, with the participation of and collaboration between the educational system and social services, in active partnership with social organisations, and carrying out actions such as the training of school promoters, the training of Roma father-mother facilitators, the promotion of the presence of
fathers and mothers in Parents Associations (AMPAs) and School Councils.
o Through the promotion of the attractiveness of vocational training and, in the medium and the long term, the access of young Roma to Regulated Vocational Training, beginning with measures promoting better access to information and
vocational guidance.
The main actions of the Promociona Programme target Roma students and their families in the final stages of primary education (years 5 and 6) and in compulsory secondary schooling (years 7 to 10). Collaboration with schools and joint work with teachers constitute another of the essential pillars of the implementation of actions.
These actions are specifically aimed at children who are in a standard school environment but who have been identified as requiring accompaniment to increase their likelihood of obtaining their compulsory education degree and to pursue post-compulsory studies.
The requirements for the implementation of the Promociona Programme are as follows:
▪ Students should be in the last two years of primary education or in compulsory secondary
education;
▪ Students must regularly attend class, i.e. at least 80% of the classes during the past quarter;
▪ There must be an agreement between the student's family and those responsible for the
programme;
▪ The school where the student is enrolled must commit to participate in the actions carried out
through the Promociona Programme, i.e. prior consent.
In terms of results:
• 80% of the students from the last year of Primary Education passed to the first year of
Secondary Education.
22

CAHROM (2012)6
• 79% of the students of the last year of Secondary Education have graduated. Most of them will continue to study.
• The pre-school system in Sweden
In Sweden, the pre-school system is intended for children from the age of one until they start compulsory education. The purpose of pre-school is to stimulate children's development and learning in a secure and caring environment. Pre-school takes a holistic view of children and their needs and is designed so that care, development and learning come together to form a whole.
The pre-school class is a voluntary form of school within the state school system. Municipalities are required to offer children places in pre-school classes from the autumn term of the year in which a child turns six until the child starts his/her compulsory schooling. Today approximately 96 per cent of all six-year-olds go to pre-school classes. The aim of education in pre-school classes is to stimulate pupils development and learning and to prepare them for their future school career.
3.3.4 Consultationwith-vs.activeparticipationofRoma
In Sweden, all Roma-related questions and problems must, as far as possible, be approached and handled in close co-operation with Roma themselves. As an example, the Swedish Roma strategy is based on proposals from the Delegation for Roma Issues, which was active between 2006 and 2010. The Delegation’s final report (SOU 2010:55) has been circulated for comment and a number of meetings have been held with Roma representatives in drafting the proposals to the strategy.
All aspects of the implementation of the strategy should be characterised by Roma participation and Roma influence. This should be done by means of consultation, by basing actions on the work of Roma people themselves in civil society, and by asserting Roma language and culture competencies in the implementation.
In the Netherlands, the Roma community itself is also expected to play a crucial role, which is the third principle emphasized in the letter dated 26 June 2009 of the Dutch government addressed to the House of Representatives39 in which sets out its position on policy in respect of the Roma in the Netherlands.
“Central government’s third principle is that the involvement of the Roma community is of crucial importance when tackling the problems of their own community. It is up to the “Roma municipalities” to involve the Roma community concerning the policy that also applies to them.
Moreover, the Dutch government has resolved to enter into consultation with the Roma community twice a year from 2010 onwards. [...] In addition, the Netherlands Institute for Sinti and Roma was founded in 2009, this being a centre of expertise for Roma and Sinti”.
Similarly to the consultation process in Sweden, the Dutch Sinti and Roma Institute (NISR) and the Roma community were consulted by the Government in the drafting phase of the Dutch Government policy document for improving the position of Roma in the Netherlands. The CAHROM team of experts was, however, informed during the visit that NISR has recently been dismantled since their work did not bring any progress to the situation of Roma and Sinti in the Netherlands As a direct
39 House of Representatives 2008-2009, 31 700 XVIII, no. 90 which was quoted in para. 14 of the Comments of the Government of the Netherlands on the first Opinion of the Advisory Committee on the Implementation of the framework Convention for the Protection of National Minorities received by the CoE Secretariat on 17 February 2010).
    23

CAHROM (2012)6
result, projects such as those conducted by the Triana Roma Foundation in Utrecht, cannot be implemented any longer due to lack of funding40..
The Dutch experts emphasized the difficulty in the Netherlands to find good Roma-role models who have completed their education and can be employed either as mediators or in public institutions. In that respect, the situation in Hungary where Roma are represented in various state, regional and local institutions and in Spain, where Roma organisations are very active in the field and manage EU-funded projects, the Hungarian and Spanish Roma experts in the CAHROM thematic group being telling examples, represent a vivid contrast with the situation in the Netherlands.
To improve the situation in the Netherlands, the partner country experts suggested involving as much as possible Roma in extra-curricula activities, organising capacity building training (e.g. internship), using mentoring techniques (a Rom and a non-Rom working together), or promoting a better image of Roma in the Dutch society through awareness-raising campaigns (as in Spain) or by making interviews with role models and successful Roma in local press so that hey feel of local life (as in Sweden) in order to increase self-confidence and make the majority understand that Dutch Roma are an integral part of the Dutch society.
IV. LESSONS LEARNT AND GOOD PRACTICES IDENTIFIED
The following table summarizes the main obstacles that have been identified as preventing school enrolment of Roma children and their school attendance, as well as various policies and measures undertaken in the countries that composed the CAHROM team of experts. In the third column, reference is made to relevant European and international standards and projects. Information contained in this table takes into consideration personal conclusions of the experts, as well as information collected prior and during the thematic visit to the Netherlands. The following list of obstacles has been identified (see the table for details, responses and international standards):
4.1.1 Multiple disadvantaged families (poverty, unemployment, debt, domestic violence, etc.);
4.1.2 Lack of willingness from Roma parents to enrol their children in school or to ensure their regular presence; low level of education of Roma parents; lack of dialogue between Roma
parents and the school; mistrust in the education system and fear of assimilation;
4.1.3 Lack of perspectives on the regular labour market;
4.1.4 Lower expectation from teachers as concerns Roma children’s education; lack of knowledge
of Roma culture by teachers and public institutions;
4.1.5 School segregation; lack of (accessible) public transport and documents; housing
segregation;
4.1.6 Lack of Roma children in pre-school; lack of knowledge of the national language among
Roma children;
4.1.7 Difficulties to enrol in some classes due to age limit or learning difficulties;
4.1.8 Lack of knowledge of the Romani language among Roma children; lack of Romani language
teachers; lack of Romani language textbook; absence of recognition of Roma’s culture and
historical presence in school curricula;
4.1.9 Early marriages of Roma girls, child exploitation and trafficking;
4.1.10 Lack of political will and interest at national and local levels to improve the situation ; lack
of visibility of state or local action towards Roma; the negative perception of Roma;
4.1.11 Lack of impact assessment of educational policies for Roma pupils/students: lack of funding.
40 The CAHROM team of experts did not meet with any Dutch Roma representatives during the visit. Ms Mila Burek from the Triana Roma Foundation was invited to participate to a session of the agenda but could not attend.
  24

CAHROM (2012)6
  4.1 Main reasons and obstacles for low school attendance and drop-out of Roma children
   4.2 Responses and measures, including good practices, to combat school absenteeism/dropout of Roma children
   4.3 Relevant European and international standards, recommendations and projects
    4.1.1
* Multiple disadvantaged families
- Poverty;
- Unemployment41;
- Debt;
- Domestic violence,
- Criminality, etc.
Within the Roma community in Nieuwegein, there is an increasingly problematic situation in terms of neighbourhood nuisance, criminality, debt accumulation, unemployment, dependence on social benefits and health problems.
In Veldhoven, in 2002, almost 100% of the adults were unemployed.
  4.2.1
➢ Policies addressing multi-problems families
Both Hungary and the Netherlands conduct policies targeting so-called “multiple-disadvantaged families” or “multi-problems families” which widely cover Roma families but not exclusively (stigmatisation should be avoided). See for example the Wisselgeld/Exchange Money project carried out in Nieuwegein described in this report (page 18).
In the Netherlands, secondary schools receive extra funds for staff if a certain percentage of their pupils come from neighbourhoods identified as having multiple poverty-related problems (see page 10 of the report).
In Hungary, in addition to the Tanoda programmes (see page 20), Integrative Pedagogical System (IPS) were designed to create equal opportunities for children with multiple disadvantages in local pedagogical practice (see page 11).
➢ Social benefits and incentives to attend schools (free textbooks, free meals, priority given for accessing social housing, etc.)
The group of experts had a long discussion about the pros and cons of linking social benefits and school attendance. Some of the members of the delegation were of the opinion that providing too high social benefits might be counterproductive and could result in keeping Roma as socially-supported people.
In Veldhoven, the fact that Roma parents who are sending regularly their children to school might be given priority when requesting access to social housing, was considered by some of the experts as a positive incentive. Others expressed doubts about this practice as it does not reflect equal treatment policies.
    4.3.1
▪ Council of Europe Commissioner for Human Rights’ publication “Human Rights of Roma and Travellers in Europe:
o Page 112: “Many of the vulnerability factors such as domestic violence, high school dropout rates, homelessness or being in state care affect children and youth exclusively or disproportionately.”
International guidelines for Roma inclusion policies include the following reference texts:
▪ CoE CM/Rec(2008)5 on policies for Roma and/or travellers in Europe
▪ The Strasbourg Declaration on Roma adopted at the High Level Meeting on Roma (Strasbourg, 20 October 2010);
▪ The Declaration of the Summit of Mayors on Roma (Strasbourg, 22 September 2011);
▪ The OSCE Action Plan on Improving the Situation of Roma and Sinti (Warsaw, 2003);
▪ The European Union Council conclusions on an EU Framework for National Roma Integration Strategies up to 2020 (adopted in Brussels in May 2011).
    41 Thomas Hammarberg: Human Rights of Roma and Travellers in Europe (Council of Europe Publishing, February 2012). The Commissioner for Human Rights reported on page 117 that some pre-schools preferentially enrol children whose parents both work, which disadvantages most Roma children whose both parents are often unemployed.
25

43 For further information concerning ROMED, please consult the programme website : http://www.coe-romed.org.
CAHROM (2012)6
  4.1 Main reasons and obstacles for low school attendance and drop-out of Roma children
   4.2 Responses and measures, including good practices, to combat school absenteeism/dropout of Roma children
   4.3 Relevant European and international standards, recommendations and projects
    4.1.2
* Lack of willingness from Roma parents to enrol their children in school or to ensure their regular presence
Some Roma parents and community leaders may feel annoyed that Roma children get more educated than they are.
* Low level of education of Roma parents
Roma parents who have a low level of education do not necessarily see the importance for their children to be educated. They have difficulties in helping their children at home with their homework.
* Lack of dialogue between Roma parents and the school
Roma parents are not always involved in the school environment and parents’ associations.
* Mistrust in the education system and fear of assimilation (see “fear of assimilation” under 4.1.8 below)
Roma parents may fear that children going to “gadgé” schools will lose Romani cultural identity and traditions.
  4.2.2-
➢ Mediators / bridge-builders / intermediaries
The group of experts agreed that this was very helpful to increase dialogue between the Roma parents, on the one hand, and school institutions/teachers, on the other hand. Mediators also increase school enrolment. This practice exists in Hungary (mediators) Spain (mediators and social workers) and Sweden (bridge- builders) and in a limited number of municipalities in the Netherlands, such as Veldhoven (where municipal social workers are called “intermediaries”). Experts from partner countries highlighted the added-value of mediators of Roma origin.
➢ Inclusion and participation of Roma parents in school activities/environment
See the Promociona programme in Spain (pages 21-22). The team of experts agreed that - alongside law enforcement measures - more investment is needed to increase dialogue with Roma parents and involvement of Roma parents in school activities.
In Sweden, schools need to be flexible and find ways to adapt their teaching as far as possible to the needs of each pupil. At least once a term, the pupil, teacher and the pupil's guardian meet to discuss progress in school and how the pupil is feeling. This is called development dialogue. The dialogue should give an all- round view of the pupil's learning and social development. During the dialogue, discussion can cover how the school can support and stimulate the pupil's development. The dialogue gives the pupil and guardian the opportunity to influence, and take responsibility, for the pupil's schooling.
➢ Fines and work penalties for Roma parents who do not send their children to school
The team of experts and Dutch interlocutors in Veldhoven agreed that fines remain usually unpaid and are not a suitable answer as it increases family debt and poverty. A work penalty on Saturdays for Roma parents as practised in Veldhoven could be a better option provided it does not systematically result in associating “work” with “punishment” for the families concerned.
    4.3.2
▪ Council of Europe CM Recommendation No R (2000) 4 on the education of Roma/Gypsy children in Europe:
o Para. 5 of Chapter 1. “Structures” on mediators, inclusion of parents and measures to combat illiteracy.
o Para. 20 of Chapter V. “Consultation and co- ordination” on the use of mediators.
▪ Council of Europe Recommendation CM/Rec(2009)4 on the education of Roma and Travellers in Europe
o Para. 15 of Chapter II. “Structures and provision for access to education” on mediators/assistants.
▪ Council of Europe/European Commission programme “Intercultural Mediation for
Roma Communities” (ROMED)43: During the 1st phase of the ROMED training programme
launched in 2011, 37 trainers and 533 mediators; mostly but not exclusively of Roma origin, from 16 member states (including Hungary and Spain) were trained.
▪ United Nations International Convention on the Elimination of All Forms of Racial Discrimination (CERD) on the role of teaching assistants/mediators in reducing
absenteeism and assisting communication between schools and families.
   26

CAHROM (2012)6
  4.1 Main reasons and obstacles for low school attendance and drop-out of Roma children
   4.2 Responses and measures, including good practices, to combat school absenteeism/dropout of Roma children
   4.3 Relevant European and international standards, recommendations and projects
    ➢ Taking the children out of their family and bringing them to foster parents or a residential institute
This does not seem to be a valid response to the problem. See e.g. the positions of Amnesty International and of the Council of
     Europe Commissioner for Human Rights on the matter42.
   4.1.3
* Lack of perspectives on the regular labour market
Some Roma parents and teenagers question the time invested in education if, at the end, educated Roma remain unemployed. The Netherlands also encounters problems with stateless Roma44.
The economic crisis, but also the low level of education of Roma and discrimination in accessing jobs and internships, particularly affect Roma’s access to the labour market.
Experts considered that the employment of Roma is often the weak point of many inclusion strategies. Beside education and housing programmes, they recommend that a complex training and employment programme should be developed to increase opportunities for Roma on the regular labour market.
  4.2.3
➢ Job-coaches
Veldhoven provides an example of jobcoaching for Roma teenagers between 16 and 18 years old.
➢ Validation of professional skills
See the experience conducted in France for example and mentioned during the visit.
➢ Adult and vocational training
In Hungary, the Arany János Talent Fostering Boarding Facility, launched in 2007, is a Vocational School Programme for Students with Multiple Disadvantages launched in 2007.
See 3.2.3 of this report regarding legislation in Spain on vocational training programmes for students over 16 who have not graduated compulsory education and Promociona on pages 21-22.
   4.3.3
▪ Council of Europe CM/Rec(2009)4 on the education of Roma and Travellers in Europe
o Para. 12 of Chapter II. “Structures and provision for access to education” on access to vocational training and validation of knowledge acquired by experience.
▪ Council of Europe CM Recommendation No R (2000) 4 on the education of Roma/Gypsy children in Europe:
o See Preamble: “educational policies in favour of Roma children should be backed up by an active adult education and vocational education policy”.
      4.1.4
* Lower expectation from teachers as concerns Roma children’s education
The Swedish expert signalled that teachers in Sweden tend to have lower expectations from Roma children attending school, which also sometimes results in insufficient efforts to address school absence.
* Lack of knowledge of Roma culture by teachers and public institutions
Intermediaries (municipal social workers) in Veldhoven, explained that several public institutions dealing with children and youth were not familiar with Roma culture and
   4.2.4
➢ Training of teachers
In Hungary the on-the-job training of teachers participating in the education of the Roma minority is subsidised annually via tenders. Curriculum development and the development of programme packages may be implemented as part of the SROP sub-measure 3.4.1.
➢ Close co-operation between mediators, schools, public institutions and families
The experience conducted in Veldhoven and Nieuwegein shows that closer co-operation between various municipal social workers, public institutions and Roma families help overcome barriers and
     4.3.4
▪ Memorandum of the MG-S-ROM for the Committee of Ministers entitled Strategic elements of education policy for Roma children in Europe [MG-S-ROM(97)11]: “Majority-minority relations, so often hostile and based on stereotyped and prejudiced views of Roma people, have helped to maintain the disadvantaged position of Roma in society. Unequal status, discrimination and social exclusion which were, and are, characteristic of
these hostile relations, have had a direct and an indirect impact on schooling, creating a school
  42 Thomas Hammarberg: Human Rights of Roma and Travellers in Europe (Council of Europe Publishing, February 2012), page 103.
44 Until the age of 18 they are obliged to be educated, but due to the lack of papers unable to start an internship/work in order to graduate. With the perspective of not being able to complete your education, school attendance becomes less important. Recently the court decided that ‘illegals’ are allowed to start their internship and complete their education.
27

45 For more information about the Pestalozzi programme: http://www.coe.int/t/dg4/education/pestalozzi/home/default_en.asp.
46 In that respect, see the REF/Equality pilot study From Segregation to Inclusion.
47 Thomas Hammarberg: Human Rights of Roma and Travellers in Europe (Council of Europe Publishing, February 2012), page 117: “In some countries, especially in the Balkans, the fact that Roma lack personal documents (such as birth certificate or proof of residence) has a negative impact on school enrolment.”
48 Through Act LXXIX of 1993 on Public Education (amended in 1996 and in 2003) an action programme was elaborated in the field of education, which gave regional minority self- governing bodies the possibility to address educational desegregation. See also the Act on Equal Treatment and the Promotion of Equal Opportunities and the Civil Code for general anti- discrimination legislation. Since 2002, a Ministerial Commissioner with Responsibility for Integration of Disadvantaged and Roma Children ensures better coordination between national, regional and local administrative bodies.
CAHROM (2012)6
      4.1 Main reasons and obstacles for low school attendance and drop-out of Roma children
4.2 Responses and measures, including good practices, to combat school absenteeism/dropout of Roma children
4.3 Relevant European and international standards, recommendations and projects
          problems encountered by the families.
build a relation of trust.
environment in which Roma children feel
alienated. [...]”.
▪ Council of Europe Pestalozzi programme45which offers training on inter-
 culturalism to educational professionals.
          4.1.5
* School segregation
Although segregation within society and school system is much bigger in Central and Eastern Europe (e.g. Hungary), compared to Western Europe where the education is more inclusive46, still the distance between Roma and the rest of the Dutch population remains much wider than between other minority groups and the majority in the Netherlands. The same applies in Spain and Sweden.
* Lack of (accessible) public transport or documents
Lack of available or accessible public transport represents an additional obstacle to Roma, especially in countries where Roma are living far away from city centres. Lack of personal documents is also a serious obstacle47. It was not specifically mentioned by the experts during the thematic visit; it might however concern a limited number of children from Roma communities originated from ex-Yugoslavia.
* Housing segregation
In Hungary, more than 60% of Roma live in a rural environment, mostly in segregated residential areas of in the country’s economically depressed north-eastern and south- western regions. There are some 100 localities which have definitively turned into poor Roma ghettos, while in another
4.2.5
➢ Legally ban and stop school segregation
Despite difficulties in its implementation due to the hostility of schools and local population/authorities, Hungary provides a positive example of anti-segregation legislation in education48. Only desegregation projects receive EU and INGO funding.
The Netherlands has closed the last Roma-specific school, in Veldhoven, in 2010. Every child is equal, there is no difference in approach by the teacher on ethnic grounds.
In Sweden, the Roma strategy is based on human rights, with particular emphasis on the principle of non-discrimination.
➢ Mobile registration units
See the good practice of mobile registration units in the Republic of Moldova identified during another CAHROM thematic visit.
➢ Integration in the town environment
The housing policy example in Veldhoven where the three Roma locations visited by the team of experts were located in the centre of the municipality, at walking distance to schools and sports centres, with a dozen families each to avoid a ghetto-like area, was considered as a good example of integrated housing approach. It is, however, not easily transferrable in Hungary since the size of
4.3.5
▪ ▪
o
▪
o o
▪
▪
European Court of Human Rights and its case law (see footnote no. 9 of the report).
CoE CM/Rec(2009)4 on the education of Roma and Travellers in Europe
Para. 5 of Chapter I. “Principles of policies”
ECRI General Policy Recommendation no. 13 on combating anti-Gypsyism and discrimination against Roma
Para 4.d. on putting an end to school segregation. Para. 6.B on combatting housing segregation.
The Roma Education Fund (REF)
specifically addresses the issue of educational integration and mainstream educational inclusion of Roma children, as opposed to segregated schooling.
CoE Commissioner for Human Rights report “Human Rights of Roma and
Travellers in Europe: segregation of Roma and Traveller children into separate and/or
       28

49 See pages 116-117 which provide, based on ECRI reports, examples of school abandonment in Albania, France, Georgia, Greece, Portugal and the Russian Federation related to direct and indirect discrimination such as lack of vaccinations, prejudices, refusal of schools to register Roma children, non-Roma parents protesting against the presence of Roma children in schools, bullying by non Roma children, etc.
50 See this OSCE-ODIHR report at: http://www.osce.org/odihr/73874.
CAHROM (2012)6
  4.1 Main reasons and obstacles for low school attendance and drop-out of Roma children
  4.2 Responses and measures, including good practices, to combat school absenteeism/dropout of Roma children
  4.3 Relevant European and international standards, recommendations and projects
  200 localities, this situation will emerge in the near future.
   the Roma population is much higher in most towns and villages.
   substandard education is the most widespread violation with respect to the right to education49.
    4.1.6
* Lack of Roma children in pre-school
Around 83 per cent of all children between one and five years of age in Sweden attend pre-school (2011 data). However, there are indications that very few Roma children attend pre- school, which places them at a disadvantage in later school years.
* Lack of knowledge of the national language among Roma children
In the Netherlands all children are educated to become a part of the Dutch society. Every child is supposed to speak and understand Dutch, when the school curriculum starts at the age of four.
In addition, Dutch children have a larger vocabulary when entering pre-school (around 2.000 words). As Romanes is only spoken and Dutch words do not have systematically an equivalent in Romanes, the Roma children start with a language disadvantage which is hard to catch up.
  4.2.6
➢ Pre-school attendance
In the Netherlands, a compensatory policy is in place for disadvantaged primary school pupils. Municipalities receive €.260 million in government funds for this purpose every year. They are required to use these funds to finance pre-school education, bridging classes and summer school, and have the option of organising other activities aimed at improving children’s language skills. Over the course of the next few years, an additional €.100 million will be invested in pre-school education, bridging classes and summer schools.
In Hungary, the forms, content and framework of the kindergarten and school education of the Roma minority are regulated in the decrees on kindergarten education of national and ethnic minorities and on school education of national and ethnic minorities. The purpose of kindergarten education is to prepare children for a successful entry into the school system by consciously building on the differences and similarities between the Roma culture and the majority culture.
In 2003, a Pre-school programme was designed in Hungary to increase pre-school attendance of multi-disadvantaged children. In 2009 extra financial support was given to multi-disadvantaged children if parents enrol their children in pre-school at the age of three.
In Sweden, the pre-school system is intended for children from the age of one until they start compulsory education. The purpose of pre-school is to stimulate children's development and learning in a secure and caring environment. Pre-school takes a holistic view of children and their needs and is designed so that care, development and learning come together to form a whole.
    4.3.6
▪ Council of Europe CM/Rec(2009)4 on the education of Roma and Travellers in Europe
o Para. 10 of the Appendix states that: “Attendance of preschool education for Roma and Traveller children should be encouraged, under equal conditions as for other children, and enrolment in preschool education should be promoted if necessary by providing specific support measures.”
▪ UNICEF/REF/OSI Overview report “Roma early Childhood inclusion”
o See chapter 2 key message no. 5 “National kindergarten and primary education systems are failing to recruit, include and educate Roma children”.
▪ OSCE-ODIHR Report Mapping of participation of Roma and Sinti Children in Early education processes within the OSCE Region (Warsaw, November 2010)50
o See pages 7 and 27 of the report on awareness- raising campaigns as a tool to outreach Roma and Sinti parents and communities and increase school enrolment.
   29

CAHROM (2012)6
  4.1 Main reasons and obstacles for low school attendance and drop-out of Roma children
   4.2 Responses and measures, including good practices, to combat school absenteeism/dropout of Roma children
   4.3 Relevant European and international standards, recommendations and projects
      The pre-school class is a voluntary form of school within the state school system. Municipalities are required to offer children places in pre-school classes from the autumn term of the year in which a child turns six until the child starts his/her compulsory schooling. Today approximately 96 per cent of all six-year-olds go to pre- school classes. The aim of education in pre-school classes is to stimulate pupils development and learning and to prepare them for their future school career.
➢ Awareness-raising campaign for (pre-) school enrolment
Spain provides a good example with the awareness raising campaign “De mayor quiero ser...” (When I grow up, I want to be...), launched in Madrid on the 30th of September 2010 by Fundación Secretariado Gitano (FSG) to promote Roma education among Roma parents as a key aspect of social inclusion.
        4.1.7
* Difficulties to enrol in some classes due to age limit or learning difficulties
In some cases, the age limit to enrol in some classes affects Roma children51. Some Roma children have reportedly been refused enrolment into the appropriate grade level because they were too old, or children have to take an examination, which represents a considerable challenge for children who have never attended school.
An insufficient level of education makes it more difficult for Roma students to follow.
  4.2.7
➢ Extra-curricular activities
In Hungary organisations under the TANODA network are providing a wide range of after-school, extra-curricular activities for Roma and other disadvantaged students. The activities serve to strengthen educational achievements and attainment levels amongst students, while engaging parents and communities in the educational process (see the report).
Among the preventive programmes carried out in Spain Promociona can be considered as a good practice. It has been described in this report (see pages 21-22).
➢ Catch-up schools
Although the name is somewhat misleading, the primary “special school” De Evenaar that the CAHROM team of experts visited in Nieuwegein is not a segregated school, nor a school for physically or mentally disabled students. It includes children, Roma and non- Roma, who have learning difficulties, children with neuro-
    4.3.7
▪ Council of Europe CM/Rec(2009)4 on the education of Roma and Travellers in Europe
o Para. 11 of Chapter II. “Structures and provision for access to education on special provisions for preventing school drop out and stimulating the return to school of those who did not finish compulsory education.
  51 Thomas Hammarberg: Human Rights of Roma and Travellers in Europe (Council of Europe Publishing, February 2012), page 117 quotes examples in Georgia and Kosovo* (All reference to Kosovo, whether to the territory, institutions or populations, in this text shall be understood in full compliance with United Nations Security Council Resolution 1244 and without prejudice to the status of Kosovo).
30

CAHROM (2012)6
      4.1 Main reasons and obstacles for low school attendance and drop-out of Roma children
4.2 Responses and measures, including good practices, to combat school absenteeism/dropout of Roma children
4.3 Relevant European and international standards, recommendations and projects
          linguistics problems like ADHD or Asperger, often coming from families with violence, stress, etc. The main purpose is, through special attention from teachers, to help the child catching up education and re-integrate the regular schooling system. The admission to that special education is decided by an independent commission which decides based on several tests (which are not
 purely written tests). There is no ethnic criterium.
          4.1.8
* Lack of knowledge of the Romani language among Roma children, lack of Romani language teachers and lack of Romani language textbooks
These issues were essentially raised by Sweden, where Roma children have the possibility to be taught in their own language. However, there is a belief that many Roma children choose not to study their mother tongue. They may not tell people that they are Roma because they fear harassment or discrimination, and thus do not obtain the extra tuition in their mother tongue to which they are entitled52. Mother tongue teaching does not always work as much as one might hope, either. There is a lack of teachers of Romani, few Roma pupils choose to study their mother tongue and there is a lack of educational material/textbooks in Romani.
In the Netherlands, this is not an issue since most of the Roma speak Dutch. According to the authorities, there is no demand for Romani. The current policy of the Government is not to favour the teaching of minority languages.
There is also no such demand among Roma parents in Spain, since Spanish Roma do not speak Romani any longer.
* Absence of recognition of Roma’s culture and historical presence in school curricula
This is an argument against school enrolment often put forward by Roma parents who are afraid of assimilation to the culture of the majority. There is generally-speaking a low
4.2.8
➢ Teaching and promoting the Romani language Several initiatives, now included in the Swedish Roma Strategy, have been launched in Sweden to improve the situation, even though the Swedish expert recognised that more needs to be done.
The Pécs Gandhi Foundation Grammar School and Boarding Facility, which was established in 1994, is Hungary’s, and also Europe’s, first Roma national minority institution offering final examinations. As part of the national minority programmes, students have the opportunity to acquaint themselves with both languages spoken by the Roma in Hungary, Beash and Lovári. In the course of the education of Roma studies, students familiarise themselves with Roma traditions and culture, learn about the history, ethnography and folk art of the Roma, the works of Roma authors, etc.
➢ Teaching of Romani culture and history at school
Sweden provides a good example having translated the Council of Europe factsheets on Roma history into Swedish. In school curricula, one of the overall knowledge goals is that students must get acquainted with national minorities’ culture, language and history.
In Hungary, in the abovementioned Pécs Gandhi Foundation Grammar School and Boarding Facility, students familiarise themselves with Roma traditions and culture, learn about the
4.3.8
▪ Memorandum of the MG-S-ROM for the Committee of Ministers entitled Strategic elements of education policy for Roma children in Europe [MG-S-ROM(97)11]: “Policies pursued by the State authorities toward Roma populations throughout their history in Europe and aimed at solving the so-called ‘Gypsy problem’, have meant so often, the eradication of Roma identity and life-style. The school institution and the schooling of Roma children thus became a central means of achieving the goals of assimilation.”
▪ Council of Europe CM/Rec(2009)4 on the education of Roma and Travellers in Europe
o Para. 25 of Chapter IV. “European exchanges, sharing experience and good practices”: “The materials elaborated in the Council of Europe project “Education for Roma Children in Europe” (2002-2009), such as the collection of pedagogical fact sheets on Roma history, the teaching kit, the guide for Roma school mediators or assistants, and the reference framework for educational policies in favour of Roma, Sinti and Travellers, as well as other tools developed by other Council of Europe sectors, such as the framework curriculum for the Romani language or the kit for combating
    52 Sweden ratified the European Charter for Regional or Minority Languages in 2000. The Romani language (Romani ćhib) is protected under Part II of the Charter, as a non-territorial language.
31

           CAHROM (2012)6
      4.1 Main reasons and obstacles for low school attendance and drop-out of Roma children
4.2 Responses and measures, including good practices, to combat school absenteeism/dropout of Roma children
4.3 Relevant European and international standards, recommendations and projects
          level of awareness in schools among teachers about the Roma people, their historical presence and contribution to national and European culture and history. This “invisibility” is also reflected in educational material and textbooks.
history, ethnography and folk art of the Roma, the works of Roma authors, etc.
prejudices and stereotypes that was produced in the framework of the Dosta! awareness-raising campaign, should be widely disseminated and used in implementing the above-mentioned provisions.”
     4.1.9
* Early marriages of Roma girls, child exploitation and trafficking
The drop out of Roma girls from schools is a common phenomenon throughout Europe, but is more specific to Roma traditional communities. Roma parents may fear that girls go out with gadge boys. Girls may be asked to work in the household, and boys to assist fathers in their work.
In the Netherlands, there are few boys and even fewer girls who even embark upon secondary education and 80% of those who do so fail to complete their studies. In both Veldhoven and Nieuwegein the drop out rate, especially of Roma young girls, is almost the same, although the groups of Roma are different (Roma in Veldhoven are already living in the Netherlands for many years; whilst Roma in Nieuwegein only live in the Netherlands for just more than 30 years. The first generation is still there and has its own influence on their children and grandchildren).
It might be part of Romani culture and Roma youth may serve as a source of income for poor families, still the Dutch authorities consider that selling girls for a dowry is human trafficking and violates human rights and children’s rights.
In Spain, there is also a substantial drop-out of Roma girls in secondary education.
4.2.9
➢ Use of educated Roma as role models
The situation in Hungary where Roma are represented in various state, regional and local institutions and in Spain, where Roma organisations are very active in the field and manage EU-funded projects represented a vivid contrast with the situation in the Netherlands. In the latter, it seems impossible for the moment to find good Roma-role models who have completed their education.
To increase school attendance among Roma children, the previous government made €.0.6 million available to the Platform for Dutch Roma Municipalities of the Association of Dutch Municipalities in 2010. These municipalities used the funds to finance projects aimed at encouraging Roma children/Roma girls to attend school.
➢ Awareness-raising activities on the risks of trafficking
The thematic group of experts agreed that teaching Roma and non- Roma students at the beginning of secondary schools about the risks of trafficking and prostitution could be an option.
➢ Develop a European approach towards the exploitation of Roma children
The Dutch experts of the team felt that, in addition to anti- discrimination and social inclusion approaches, there was a need for a European approach in the field of the exploitation of Roma children, especially in relation to early marriages of Roma girls.
4.3.9
▪ ERRC/PiN152 study53: vulnerability factors of Roma to trafficking include “structural forms of ethnic and gender discrimination, poverty and social exclusion which result in low educational achievement, high levels of unemployment, usury, growing up in state care, domestic violence affecting predominantly women and children and substance abuse.”
▪ OSCE and Council of Europe experience
on training anti-trafficking (Roma) mediators54.
▪ Council of Europe Commissioner for Human Rights’ publication “Human Rights of Roma and Travellers in Europe
o Chapter 5 Roma and trafficking in human beings
▪ Council of Europe Action against
trafficking in human beings (GRETA)55.
▪ Council of Europe Strategy for the Rights of the Child and campaign Building a Europe and with children which both promote children's rights and the protection of children from violence56
    53http://www.coe.int/t/commissioner/source/prems/prems79611_GBR_CouvHumanRightsOfRoma_WEB.pdf
54 The Council of Europe carried out such a project in Albania, the Republic of Moldova and the Slovak Republic in 2011, with the financial assistance of Norway and using OSCE trainers. Most of the mediators trained were Roma women.
55 More information about GRETA at http://www.coe.int/t/dghl/monitoring/trafficking/default_en.asp.
56 Further information at : http://www.coe.int/t/dg3/children/.
32

CAHROM (2012)6
  4.1 Main reasons and obstacles for low school attendance and drop-out of Roma children
   4.2 Responses and measures, including good practices, to combat school absenteeism/dropout of Roma children
   4.3 Relevant European and international standards, recommendations and projects
    4.1.10
* Lack of political will and interest at national and local levels to improve the situation , lack of visibility of state/local action towards Roma
In the Netherlands there is still a need to confront municipalities and national authorities with Roma-related problems (hence the deliberate choice to attract national attention through the topic of Roma children’s exploitation).
While in Nieuwegein the policy towards Roma is highly debated in the city council, in Veldhoven, on the contrary, actions are kept as discreet as possible to avoid protest by the majority population.
Due to the lack of a national Roma policy, Dutch municipalities are free to choose to invest or not in Roma habitants. As a result there is no homogeneous Roma policy and the approach is different in every municipality.
* The negative perception of Roma
The image of Roma is very bad and unfortunately a number of Roma people portrayed in the press answer to that image. Successful stories of integrated Roma are not visible.
 4.2.10
➢ Ensure greater co-operation at all levels and need for European guidelines on Roma policies
Although Roma inclusion policies should take into consideration national and local circumstances, some of the experts felt that there was a need for a European concerted policy towards Roma that would provide guidelines to national governments.
Experts from partner countries were of the opinion that, while both the Wisselgeld/Exchange programme in Nieuwegein and the policy conducted in Veldhoven were local examples of an integrated approach, involving various policy areas and actors (education, health, housing, employment, security, justice, etc.), the Netherlands should consider adopting a national Roma comprehensive strategy as it would encourage widely spread initiatives and not be limited to the good will of local authorities.
➢ Raise awareness among the general public and local authorities
The example of Stockholm municipality which speaks and promotes Roma in its municipal publications or in Swedish or Roma press is a good one. This is a tool to raise awareness on the benefits of Roma policies.
   4.3.10
See reference texts for European and International guidelines for Roma inclusion policies at 4.3.1.
o CoE CM/Rec(2008)5 on policies for Roma and/or travellers in Europe
▪ See Chapter 8 on Monitoring and Evaluation.
▪ The European Alliance of Cities and Regions for Roma Inclusion to be set up by the Council of Europe shortly after summer 2012 could be used to increase awareness and cooperation among regional and local authorities and bring together existing national networks of municipalities working for Roma inclusion.
▪ The Council of Europe Dosta! awareness- raising campaign addressing prejudice and stereotypes towards Roma can be used at national and local levels to overcome “mental” barriers. None of the four countries covered by this report have made full use of this campaign so far.
    4.1.11
* Lack of data to assess the impact of educational policies for Roma pupils/students
In the Netherlands, there is a lack of knowledge about Roma living in the country due to the impossibility of registration on ethnic ground and, generally-speaking, by a lack of interest on the part of authorities and the Dutch population.
As registration based on ethnicity is undesirable and prohibited, the lack of numbers also makes it more difficult to address Roma issues on the political agenda. In the meantime
   4.2.11
➢ Need to collect data and assess the impact of educational policies
Some of the experts from partner countries considered that the Platform for Dutch Roma Municipalities was best placed to design an action plan in order to collect information and data at the local level with a view evaluating the impact of policies being conducted, as well as the financial and human investment.
In the Netherlands, the number of people of Roma origin is relatively small which makes an individual approach possible.
     4.3.11
▪ Council of Europe CM Recommendation No R (2000) 4 on the education of Roma/Gypsy children in Europe:
o Para. 18 of Chapter IV 58on the evaluation of the results of educational policies for Roma children.
▪ ODIHR Report Mapping of participation of Roma and Sinti Children in Early education processes within the OSCE Region59
  58 The evaluation of the results of educational policies towards Roma/Gypsy children should take account of many criteria, including personal and social development, and not be limited to estimates of school attendance and drop-out rates.”
59 This report published in November 2010 states on page 27 that ten countries (Croatia, Czech Republic, France, Greece, Latvia, Norway, Poland, Romania, Serbia, and Slovak Republic) mention the existence of assessments regarding the effectiveness of state policies and programmes promoting the access of Roma and Sinti children to early education.
33

CAHROM (2012)6
      4.1 Main reasons and obstacles for low school attendance and drop-out of Roma children
4.2 Responses and measures, including good practices, to combat school absenteeism/dropout of Roma children
4.3 Relevant European and international standards, recommendations and projects
          political awareness has been raised at national level, but at local level this still remains a struggle.
* Lack of funding
Generally-speaking states or municipalities lack funding for their inclusion policies. The current economic crisis makes it even more difficult to attract funding.
Investment per Roma family is bigger than in countries such as Hungary where the Roma population is much larger.
➢ Use of EU (structural) funds
Spain provides a very good example for joining funds from European, national, regional and local levels. Hungary has made significant efforts in recent years for the increased enforcement of equal opportunities in education57.
▪ Roma Education Fund impact assessment study on education of Roma children in Hungary.
▪ The EURoma Network60 is a EU Network, made of 12 EU Member States, determined to promote the use of Structural Funds to enhance the effectiveness of policies targeting the Roma and to
 promote their social inclusion.
    57 In addition to local programmes, EU co-funded programmes (Phare, HEFOP – Human Resources Operational Programme, TÁMOP – Social Renewal Operational Programme, TIOP – Social Infrastructure Operational Programme, ROP – Regional Operational Programmes), too, have been available in the magnitude of tens of billions of forints.
60 Further information at: http://www.euromanet.eu/. Hungary, Spain and Sweden are part of the EURoma Network. The Netherlands could consider joining it.
 34

Appendix 1:
Formal invitation letter from the Mayor of Nieuwegein and Chair of the Dutch Platform for Roma Municipalities
Programme of the thematic visit to Nieuwegein and Veldhoven, The Netherlands, 12-14 March 2012
CAHROM (2012)6
  invitation CAHROM meeting.pdf
Appendix 2:
******
  Program visit CAHROM.pdf
Appendix 3:
******
 List of participants of the thematic visit to Nieuwegein and Veldhoven, The Netherlands, 12-14 March 2012
20120309 List of persons present.pdf
 35

CAHROM (2012)18
 Version endorsed by the CAHROM at its 4th meeting
Strasbourg, 29 November 2012
AD HOC COMMITTEE OF EXPERTS ON ROMA1 ISSUES (CAHROM)
__________
CAHROM (2012)18
 THEMATIC REPORT
by the CAHROM thematic group of experts on
INCLUSIVE EDUCATION FOR ROMA CHILDREN AS OPPOSED TO SPECIAL SCHOOLS (following the CAHROM thematic visit to the Czech Republic and Slovakia on 1-5 October 2012)
__________
Experts from the CZECH REPUBLIC and the SLOVAK REPUBLIC, requesting countries
Czech Republic:
Mr Viktor Piorecký, Roma Education Department of the Czech Agency for Social Inclusion.
Mr Ondřej Klípa, CAHROM member and Head of Secretariat of the Council for Roma Minority Affairs and the Council for National Minorities, Office of the Government of the Czech Republic.
Slovak Republic:
Mr. Igor André, Education Officer, Office of the Plenipotentiary of the Slovak Republic Government for Roma Communities.
Mr Ján Hero, CAHROM member and Board member of the NGO “Through the Children to the Family”.
Experts from HUNGARY, SLOVENIA and UNITED KINGDOM, partner countries
Hungary: Ms Zsófia Pillár, Rapporteur on Social Inclusion in Public Education, Deputy for Social Inclusion, Ministry of Human Resources.
Slovenia: Ms Erika Rustja, Under-Secretary, Education Development Office, Ministry of Education, Science, Culture and Sport of the Republic of Slovenia.
United Kingdom: Ms Claire Lockwood, Leeds City Council, Gypsy, Roma and Traveller Achievement Service Manager, Joint President of the National Association of Teachers of Traveller and other professional – NATT+.
1 The term “Roma” used at the Council of Europe refers to Roma, Sinti, Kale and related groups in Europe, including Travellers and the Eastern groups (Dom and Lom), and covers the wide diversity of the groups concerned, including persons who identify themselves as Gypsies.
      1

I. INTRODUCTION
page 3
page 3 page 3 page 3
page 4
page 4 page 6 page 7 page 7 page 8 page 9 page 10 page 10
page 12 page 12 page 12 page 13 page 14 page 16 page 18 page 19 page 19 page 20 page 21 page 22 page 22 page 25 page 29 page 30
page 60
page 60
page 60 page 62 page 64 page 65 page 67
page 69
page 69 page 69 page 69 page 70
TABLE OF CONTENTS __________
1.1 Background
1.2 Composition of the thematic group of experts
1.3 Agenda of the thematic visit
II. CONTEXT AND EXPECTATIONS
2.1 Context of the CAHROM thematic report and visit
2.2. Expectations and items for discussion
2.3. Size and composition of the Roma groups & educational level of Roma
2.3.1 Czech Republic 2.3.2 Slovak Republic 2.3.3 Hungary
2.3.4 Slovenia
2.3.5 United Kingdom
III. COMPARATIVE ANALYSIS (LEGISLATION, POLICIES, MEASURES)
3.1. Legislation and policy measures covering education
3.1.1 Czech Republic 3.1.2 Slovak Republic 3.1.3 Hungary
3.1.4 Slovenia
3.1.5 United Kingdom
3.2. Main problems identified
3.2.1 In both requesting countries
3.2.2 In the Czech Republic more specifically 3.2.3 In the Slovak Republic more specifically
3.3 Visits to elementary schools: a comparative summary
3.3.1 Visited schools in the Czech Republic
3.3.2 Visited schools in the Slovak Republic
3.4. Workshops’ discussion
Comparative summary table of the replies to 20 questions
IV. LESSONS LEARNT AND GOOD PRACTICES IDENTIFIED
4.1 Systemic desegregation measures and legislation envisaged
by the authorities of the two requesting to change the system
4.1.1 Changes proposed in the Czech Republic
4.1.2 Changes proposed in the Slovak Republic
4.1.3 Conclusions and lessons learnt for the Czech Republic 4.1.4 Conclusions and lessons learnt for the Slovak Republic
4.2 General conclusions, good practices and follow-up proposals
APPENDICES: Appendix 1:
Appendix 2: Appendix 3: Appendix 4:
Formal invitations to CAHROM
Agenda of the thematic visit
List of participants of the thematic visit
National, European and International reference texts and reports
CAHROM (2012)18
2

I. INTRODUCTION
1.1 Background
The thematic group on inclusive education for Roma children as opposed to special schools was set up at the request of the Czech and Slovak CAHROM members during the 3rd CAHROM meeting (Ohrid, 22-25 May 2012)2. Invitation letters to the CAHROM group of experts to visit these two countries were received on 5 and 25 September respectively (see Appendix 1 to this report).
With a view to preparing the thematic report and visit, each expert of the thematic group was asked to provide background information about the situation of Roma, the legislative framework pertinent to the topic, and measures and policies towards Roma education, including financial means. Written background documents submitted by the requesting and partner countries, extracts of relevant international texts and reports, as well as presentations made during the visit appear in an Addendum to this report.
The CAHROM team of experts is grateful to the Czech authorities for having provided simultaneous interpretation during the visit and offered a lunch. They are equally grateful to the Slovak authorities and to UNDP for having provided interpretation and local transport.
1.2 Composition of the thematic group of experts
The nomination of the experts taking part in this thematic group resulted from consultation with CAHROM members from the requesting and partner countries followed by domestic consultation.
The choice of the partner countries, agreed upon by the Bureau of the CAHROM and supported by various studies and reports, was inspired by the wish to include experience with a) desegregation legislation and measures as a response to the practice of enrolling Roma children into special schools (e.g. Hungary), b) inclusive education, including for Roma migrants from the requesting countries (e.g. United Kingdom) and c) human rights approach in the field of Roma education and use of European funds for Roma education (e.g. Slovenia3). Studies presented at the 3rd CAHROM meeting (Skopje, 22 May 2012) were also taken into consideration when choosing the partner countries4.
A summary of the professional background of the experts participating in this thematic group, their contact details, as well as the list of Czech and Slovak interlocutors appear in Appendix 2.
1.3 Agenda of the thematic visit
The agenda of the thematic visit was jointly prepared by the Secretariat of the Council for Roma Minority Affairs of the Office of the Government of the Czech Republic and by the Office of the Plenipotentiary of the Slovak Republic Government for Roma Communities, and the CAHROM Secretariat and respective CAHROM members. It includes visits to elementary schools (mainstream schools, special/practical schools for mentally disabled and so-called “Roma schools”), as well as meetings with state officials, teachers, school directors and NGO representatives. The agenda appears in Appendix 35.
2 See document CAHROM (2012)10 Abridged Report of the 3rd CAHROM meeting and document CAHROM (2012)14 Report of the 3rd CAHROM Bureau meeting, as well as previous CAHROM thematic reports at http://www.coe.int/web/coe-portal/cahrom1.
3 See http://www.coe.int/t/commissioner/Activities/GoodPractices/Slovenia_RomaEducation.pdf and Good Practice n°14 in the Council of Europe Database on Roma-related policies and good practices http://goodpracticeroma.ppa.coe.int/en.
4 In particular REF publication Ten years After: a History of School Desegregation in Central and Eastern Europe presented by Iulius Rostas, Roma Education Fund expert, and REF/Equality Pilot Study From segregation to Inclusion presented by Lucie Fremlova, Equality expert. See Appendix 4 for links to these reports.
5 On 2 October 2012, the Special Representative of the Secretary General for Roma issues held bilateral meetings with Ms Šimůnková, Czech Government Human Rights Commissioner, and with Mr Fryc, Deputy Minister, and Mr Stárek from the Ministry of Education.
CAHROM (2012)18
        3

II. CONTEXT AND EXPECTATIONS
2.1. Context of the CAHROM thematic report and visit
In recent years, there has been growing concern at segregation of Roma children in the school system, in particular following the European Court of Human Rights (ECtHR) judgment of 13 November 2007 in D.H. and Others v. The Czech Republic. The Court held that the placement of a disproportionate number of Roma children in special schools, without an objective and reasonable justification unrelated to ethnic origin, amounted to discrimination contrary to Article 14 of the European Convention on Human Rights (ECHR) in conjunction with Article 2 Protocol 1. Before and after, several human rights bodies of the Council of Europe have expressed their concern at such segregation in education. In its role to supervise the execution of judgments of the ECtHR under Article 46 of the Convention, the Committee of Ministers supervises the execution of the D.H. judgment, notably to ensure that general measures are adopted to put an end to the violation found by the Court. This supervision of the execution process is on-going. The Committee is currently closely supervising the execution of the judgment under its Enhanced supervision track and has adopted a number of decisions in the examination process. The topicality of the theme of this CAHROM report may be illustrated by the following non-exhaustive chronological list of developments in 2012. Relevant extracts of reports, publications and statements appear in the Addendum to this report.
In January 2012, the Prešov District Court (Eastern Slovakia) delivered a landmark judgment in which it condemned the municipality of Šarkisské Michal’any for discrimination of Roma pupils who were taught in separate classes in the village school6;
In February 2012 the previous Council of Europe Commissioner for Human Rights, Mr Thomas Hammarberg, published “Human Rights of Roma and Travellers in Europe” in which he devoted a sub- chapter on school segregation of Roma children7;
On 19 March 2012 the Advisory Committee on the Framework Convention for the Protection of National Minorities published its Opinion on the Czech Republic (which was adopted on 1 July 2011) 8;
In April 2012, the Roma Education Fund (REF) published “Pitfalls and bias: entry testing and the overrepresentation of Romani children in special education”;
On 23 May 2012 the European Commission against racism and intolerance (ECRI) published its conclusions on the implementation of the recommendations in respect of the Czech Republic9 and Slovakia10;
From 21 to 25 May 2012, a team of nine experts from the OSCE Office for Democratic Institutions and Human Rights (ODIHR) visited the Czech Republic to assess educational opportunities for Roma children in the country. Advisers on Roma and Sinti issues from ODIHR, representatives of the Irish OSCE Chairmanship and the OSCE High Commissioner on National Minorities, as well as legal and academic
6 See Amnesty International: Press release of 9 January 2012: Slovak court rules against segregation in education. In 2008, the school authorities had transferred all Roma pupils who were attending standard school into the special class already attended only by Roma children. The court dismissed all the arguments of the school regarding the fact that separate education was presumably the only way of providing equal access to education to Roma children. The Court ordered the municipality to eliminate all forms of segregation and replace it with inclusive education.
7 http://www.coe.int/t/commissioner/source/prems/prems79611_GBR_CouvHumanRightsOfRoma_WEB.pdf
8 http://www.coe.int/t/dghl/monitoring/minorities/3_FCNMdocs/PDF_3rd_OP_CzechRepublic_en.pdf. FCNM/AC Opinions on other countries participating in the CAHROM thematic group can be consulted at: http://www.coe.int/t/dghl/monitoring/minorities/3_FCNMdocs/Table_en.asp.
9 See ECRI Conclusions on the implementation of the Recommendations in respect of the Czech Republic subject to interim follow-up (adopted on 23 March 2013) http://www.coe.int/t/dghl/monitoring/ecri/Country-by-country/Czech_Republic/CZE-IFU-IV-2012-027- ENG.pdf.
10 See ECRI Conclusions on the implementation of the Recommendations in respect of the Slovakia subject to interim follow-up (adopted on 21 March 2013) http://www.coe.int/t/dghl/monitoring/ecri/Country-by-country/Slovakia/SVK-IFU-IV-2012-029- ENG.pdf.
CAHROM (2012)18
          4

CAHROM (2012)18 experts on education and Roma issues travelled to six cities (Ostrava, Brno, Rumburk, Šluknov, Ústí nad Labem and Prague) to examine good practices and challenges in providing education for Roma children. The
OSCE-ODIHR report was released on 22 October 201211;
The FRA/UNDP report on the situation of Roma in 11 EU Member States and in neighbouring countries12, which was published end of May 2012, also provides information about school attendance of Roma children of compulsory school age in the Czech Republic and Slovakia;
On 4 June 2012, UNDP/World Bank/EC published their Regional 2011 Roma Survey “Toward an Equal Start: Closing the Learning Gap for Roma Children in Eastern Europe", followed by UNDP Issue 19 “Opportunities for Roma Inclusion”;
In June 2012, the Council of Europe Committee of Ministers’ Deputies adopted their most recent decision on the implementation of the ECtHR Judgment concerning D.H. and Others v. The Czech Republic13. In that decision, it called on the authorities to provide a consolidated action plan setting out the steps to execute the judgement, which the Committee would examine at its 1157th meeting (4-6 December 2012).
In July 2012 the European Roma Rights Centre (ERRC) filed a lawsuit in the Czech Republic against four schools in Ostrava (two special schools and two mainstream schools with segregated classes).
In August 2012 UNICEF/OSF/REF published an Overview Report “Roma Early Childhood Inclusion”14; On 1 October 2012, the Roma Education Fund organised a debate and presented its publication “Ten years
After: a History of School Desegregation in Central and Eastern Europe”15 at Charles University in Prague;
On 8 November 2012, Amnesty International and the European Roma Rights Centre (ERRC) published their joint report “Five more years of injustice: Segregated education for Roma in the Czech Republic”17;
On 8 November 2012, the CoE Commissioner for Human Rights published a Human Rights Comment on resolute measures to be taken by the member states to end school segregation of Roma18. On 12-16 November, he visited the Czech Republic.
11 See OSCE-ODIHR press release following this visit at http://www.osce.org/odihr/90813. The OSCE-ODIHR report is available at http://www.osce.org/odihr/96662.
12 http://fra.europa.eu/sites/default/files/fra_uploads/2099-FRA-2012-Roma-at-a-glance_EN.pdf.
13 See the Committee of Ministers Deputies’ decision, whilst sitting as a body to supervise the execution of the Court’s Judgment, on DH and others v. The Czech Republic at http://www.coe.int/t/dghl/monitoring/execution/Reports/pendingCases_en.asp?CaseTitleOrNumber=&StateCode=CZE&SectionCode. See also the supervision of the execution of the judgments in the case of D.H. and others against Czech Republic, judgment of 13/11/2007 - Grand Chamber - prepared by the Department for the Execution of Judgments of the European Court of Human Rights (DG-HL) dated 24 November 2010 at https://wcd.coe.int/ViewDoc.jsp?id=1707993&Site=CM and documents submitted by the authorities/civil society at http://www.coe.int/t/dghl/monitoring/execution/Themes/Add_info/CZE-DH_en.asp.
14 http://www.soros.org/sites/default/files/Roma-Early-Childhood-Inclusion-Report-20120813.pdf. 15http://www.romaeducationfund.hu/news/ref/news-and-events/ten-years-after-history-roma-school-desegregation-central-and-eastern-
europ.
16
 In June 2012, the Ombudsman of the Czech Republic released the results of a study covering 67 schools for
 children with special needs (now called “practical schools”);
 In July 2012 the Czech School Inspectorate released a new report showing that the percentage of Roma
 pupils in special education decreased to 26.4%;
 On 31 October 2012, the Regional Court in Prešov, Slovakia, has ruled that schools cannot place Roma children in segregated classes16;
         Read more at: http://www.upi.com/Top_News/World-News/2012/10/31/Slovak-court-No-separate-classes-for-Roma/UPI- 41991351710118/#ixzz2C0eqiCZz.
17 http://www.errc.org/cms/upload/file/five-more-years-of-injustice-november-2012.pdf.
   5

2.2. Expectations and items for discussion
This thematic visit was aimed at gaining more information on the practice of school segregation in Slovakia and in the Czech Republic, at discussing measures undertaken or envisaged to combat misplacement of Roma children in practical schools, whilst at the same time looking at the situation and experience in partner countries, in particular inclusive education (United Kingdom), the human rights approach to education (Slovenia) or desegregation policies and measures (Hungary).
Prior to the CAHROM thematic visits to the Czech Republic and Slovakia, the following issues were identified by the team of experts as items for discussion during the thematic visit.
1. How do you define “special schools” and “children with special (educational) needs”?
2. What is the number/proportion of Roma children enrolled in special schools?
3. How are "special needs" or "support intensity scale" defined and measured?
4. Are social exclusion and/or ethnicity among criteria defining special needs?
5. How do you define “vulnerable” or “disadvantaged” children/families/social environment?
6. Do you test children before entry into school?
7. Do the tests take into consideration the reality of living conditions (families who speak Romani
language at home, isolated and poor living environment, large families, illiteracy of parents...)?
8. What are incentives in place for children placed in special schools (free meals, free textbooks) and for
special schools (extra salaries for teachers, state/local additional funding for special schools, etc.)?
9. How to make education practices more interactive, co-operative and inclusive?
10. How to work with and involve Roma parents and families to convince them to send their children to
regular schools despite incentives for special schools or their fear for assimilation, mixed environment
or hostility from non-Roma children/parents/teachers?
11. How to work with cultural, linguistic and social specificities of Roma children?
12. How can school mediators/teachers’ assistants help overcoming cultural, linguistic or social barriers?
13. How to prevent and combat hostility of parents/majority population?
14. How to avoid that non-Roma parents withdraw their children from regular schools if more Roma
children are enrolled?
15. What can be done by mainstream schools to accommodate the needs of socially excluded Roma?
16. How to prepare regular elementary schools to be able to educate disadvantaged children?
17. Is compulsory pre-school an option?
18. How to allocate (financial, human) resources for the transformation from a segregated education
system into an inclusive one?
19. How European Funds are being used for Roma education and/or for desegregation policies?
20. How do you define “inclusive education”?
Answers to these questions by the experts of the thematic group and participants of the workshops are summarized in comparative tables under Chapter 3.4 below.
18 See the Commissioner’s Human Rights Comment at http://www.coe.int/t/commissioner/Activities/IPList_en.asp and the press statement following his visit to the Czech Republic at http://www.coe.int/t/commissioner/News/2012/121115CzechRepublic_en.asp.
CAHROM (2012)18
   6

2.3. Size and composition of the Roma groups and educational level of Roma
2.3.1 Czech Republic
Size and composition of the Roma groups
According to the 1991 census 32,903 people declared themselves of Roma nationality, and 16,630 Czech citizens as having Romani as their mother tongue19. At the next census in 2001 only 11,716 people declared themselves as of Roma nationality, with a further 784 people declaring Roma nationality in combination with Czech or Slovak nationality. The decline in the number of Roma declared can have a number of causes. In the past census counts of Roma were associated with a series of anti-Roma measures which has brought about mistrust on the part of Roma towards any state activities targeted at identifying people of Roma nationality.
Expert estimates of the number of members of Roma communities which depend rather on identification of members of Roma communities by another person or group (most often by experts or staff of public institutions) put the number at 150,000 to 400,000 Roma in the Czech Republic. The number of Roma has been estimated by the office of the government Interdepartmental Commission for Roma Community Affairs at 150,000 to 200,000. According to the 2010 Gabal and Víšek report the current estimate of the number of Roma in the Czech Republic is 250,000, of whom 80,000 (32%) are designated as socially excluded. According to the study “Promoting social inclusion of Roma in the Czech Republic: a study of national policies” published by Tomáš Sirovátka from Masaryk University in July 2011, the share of Roma in the Czech population is usually estimated at 200,000. This represents approximately two per cent of the entire population of the country.
According to the same study, the Roma are exposed to strong discrimination practices in the Czech Republic. The 2009 EU-MIDIS survey20 has shown that Czech Roma are among the groups to have declared the highest degree of discrimination (83%) when comparing EU countries. Due to the Act on the Protection of Personal Data, it is impossible to collect data on ethnic affiliation even though it would be an advantage for the Roma.
Educational level of Roma
According to the aforementioned 2011 Study by Tomáš Sirovátka, the age structure of Roma is much ‘younger’ when compared to the overall population: 30% of the Roma are below 15 years of age; only 5% are over 60. The low level of education of the Roma is considered to be a key factor (in addition to other factors) of their labour market disadvantage, which is apparent in their low participation rate (61% for men and 30% for women) and high unemployment rates. Specifically, 74% of the Roma have primary education at most, while in the overall population it is 20%. Their educational structure has improved within the past two generations in the sense that the share of those with no education dropped significantly; however, only to the extent of primary education (Census 2001). One of the problems is the persistent segregation of Roma children into special schools and recently into ‘practical’ schools. There are about 330 socially excluded Roma localities in the country (most of them in areas of high unemployment) where about 60-80 thousand Roma are living and where unemployment is estimated at 90-100%. About one-fourth of these localities are spatially segregated (Gabal 2006) and their numbers seem to be growing.
In the case of Roma pupils educated according to the (standard) Framework Education Programme, more than 30% went on to study for their school leaving certificate. The UNDP/WB survey shows the great likelihood that if a pupil completes elementary education conducted under the Framework Educational Programme for Elementary Education with an Annex for the education of children with mild mental disabilities (hereafter MMD), he or she will attain only secondary education without a school leaving certificate.21.
19 Romani variants spoken in the Czech Republic include Northern Central Romani and Lovari.
20 See http://fra.europa.eu/fraWebsite/eu-midis/index_en.htm.
21 See UNDP/World Bank/EC Regional 2011 Roma Survey “Toward an Equal Start: Closing the Learning Gap for Roma Children in Eastern Europe” (published on 4 June 2012).
CAHROM (2012)18
  7

2.3.2 Slovak Republic
Size and composition of the Roma groups
In 1991 the Roma, for the first time, were given an opportunity to claim their Roma nationality. Ethnicity was recorded in the Census on the principle of self-declaration, which probably resulted in a significant statistical drop in the recorded number of Roma population compared to estimates. Such a trend persisted in the 2001 census as well. According to the 2011 Census of Citizens, Houses and Apartments, 89,920 persons declared themselves to be Roma.
According to some activists the size of the Roma population of Slovakia could reach 800,000, while field studies and statistical projections yield a range of 320,000 to 440,000. The 2004 ATLAS of Roma communities quotes the number of Roma living in Slovakia at 320,000 individuals. The Centre for Demographic Research estimates with great probability that 440,000 Roma resided in the territory of the Slovak Republic in 2011, which represents around eight per cent of the total population. Regionally, the Roma are mostly concentrated in the Prešov, Košice and Banská Bystrica regions.
The ATLAS mapped 1,087 municipalities and towns. Therein 1,575 settlements of various types were identified, populated by communities perceived as Roma. In 772 municipalities or town these communities live integrated, interspersed within the majority population. The ATLAS lists 149 segregated settlements located on the outskirts or outside the limits of municipalities/towns.
Educational level of Roma
Statistical projections indicate that the Roma population of compulsory school-age in Slovakia currently accounts for nearly one-fifth (18.8 per cent) of the country’s entire Roma population.
Roma`s educational achievements continue to be far below those of non-Roma, regardless of how these are measured.
There is a large gap in pre-school access, Roma children are much more likely to be streamed into special schools for mentally disabled children or into special classes in regular schools, and rates of secondary school completion and performance on standardized tests are much lower.
According to the 2010 sample household survey conducted by UNDP, 40.5 % of the marginalized Roma population has not completed full elementary education (ISCED 2). As a comparison, according to the 2001 census, 80 % of the Slovak Republic citizens have higher than full elementary education. With respect to secondary education, the 2010 UNDP survey shows that only 17 % of marginalized Roma population members has completed education at levels ISCED 3C (no GCSE) and ISCED 3A (with GCSE) 22.
Among the Roma who have completed education, the dominant group comprised individuals who have completed elementary schools (48 %); 17 % of Roma have not completed elementary education. This amounts to almost 65 % of individuals who have not continued their studies at high school, but have finished their education on the elementary level, most of them successfully. There were 24 % of individuals continuing their studies after completing elementary school, the most numerous of which were Roma with completed high- school education (16 %), which included trade schools (14 %) and high schools with GCSE (2 %). Unfinished high-school education had been quoted by 8 % of respondents, while in most of the cases the school in question was a trade school (8 %).
Special elementary schools were attended and completed by 4 % of Roma. Other types of education reached were represented marginally, including high-school education with graduation.
22 ISCED stands for International Standard Classification of Education. GCSE stands for General Certificate of Secondary Education. 8
CAHROM (2012)18
 
CAHROM (2012)18 Men differed to an extent from women with regard to the level of education reached. More frequent among Roma women were persons who had not continued their studies at high-schools, i.e. persons with incomplete mandatory 10-year elementary school and with incomplete elementary education. These differences manifested themselves in the respective representations of the higher level of education. Difference between Roma men and women in the number of persons with completed high school education represented more than eight percentage points. The educational structure of surveyed Roma women may be assessed as slightly
lagging behind the educational structure of men.
The vicious circle of social exclusion is further reinforced by the fact that Roma students from the marginalized communities often fail at the elementary schools because they are unable to socialize in the current system of schooling (the process of socialization is too short). Thus the Slovak schooling system may contribute to the reproduction of social differences, since children from low-income families are more likely to achieve lower education, which in turn increases the likelihood of the next generation of children being raised in poverty.
2.3.3 Hungary
Size and composition of the Roma groups
According to the data of the census conducted in 2001, based on ethnic affiliation, 190,046 persons declared themselves to be Roma. In the present decade, researchers estimate the Roma population to be between 650,000 and 750,000. This represents approximately seven per cent of the entire population of the country.
Three linguistic sub-groups are identified: the Romungros (Hungarian-speaking Roma), the Vlach Roma (bilingual, speaking both Romani and Hungarian) and the Beash Roma group (who speak Hungarian and Beash, a dialect of Romanian).
The Roma population has an uneven geographical distribution in the territory of the country. In certain counties, Roma can reach fifteen per cent. Additionally, territorial differences are extreme at the level of smaller territorial units; in a number of localities and locality groups, the Roma constitute the majority of the population.
More than 60% of Roma live in the countryside, in a rural environment, mostly in segregated residential zones, in rather poor housing conditions. There are some one hundred localities in Hungary which have definitively turned into poor Roma ghettos, while in another two hundred localities, this situation will emerge in the near future as a result of seemingly irreversible processes. Most of the segregated localities and localities on their way to micro-regional ghettoisation are situated in the country’s economically depressed north-eastern and south-western regions which are typically characterised by a structure of small localities.
The age composition of the Roma population is substantially younger than that of the non-Roma population. In 2010, the rate of children aged between 0 and 14 amongst Roma was 36.8%, while this proportion within the non-Roma population was 15.4%.
Educational level of Roma
The educational integration of the Roma population came to a halt in the years preceding the changes of 1989. While in the decades before the 1990s, the Roma significantly caught up with the national average in terms of the completion of their elementary studies and there was an increase in the ratio of Roma individuals with vocational qualifications, their ratio in secondary schools providing final examinations remained negligible and consequently so did their participation in higher education. Their relative situation regarding studies at a
  The general socio-economic situation of Roma in Hungary is worse than that of the majority population, specifically in the areas of unemployment, health and education. Most of the Roma suffer from a low educational level (barely 20% of them reach secondary final examinations).
9

CAHROM (2012)18 higher educational level has since further deteriorated. While their integration in elementary schools continued, their ratio in secondary schools providing final examinations remained below 15 per cent, in contrast to the national average in excess of 80 per cent. Additionally, most of the few Roma who do continue their studies tend to seek admission to vocational schools. They have a much higher drop-out rate than their non-Roma counterparts. In vocational schools, every fourth student on average is required to repeat at least one year during the course of his/her studies (the ratio of students required to repeat a year in grammar schools is 5% in relation to the total number of students), many of them indeed never complete their studies and depart the educational system without qualifications. This phenomenon, which has been on the rise in recent years, greatly contributes to youth unemployment and a rise in poverty and plays a major role in the regeneration of
a population with low educational qualifications.
2.3.4 Slovenia
Size and composition of the Roma groups
The latest statistical data available (results of the 2010 population census) shows that there are 2,048,951 persons living in Slovenia. Autochthonous Italian and Hungarian national communities and the Roma ethnic community are recognized as being traditionally and historically settled on the national territory of Slovenia.
Official data on the number of members of the Roma community living in Slovenia were collected during the census of 1991 and 2002, but they do not distinguish between Roma residing in Slovenia permanently and those residing only temporarily. In the 2002 census, 3,246 persons claimed to belong to the Roma community23, and 3,834 persons stated that their mother tongue was the Romani language. These are official 2002 census figures; however, different bodies and non-governmental organisations in Slovenia estimate that the number of Roma living in Slovenia is between 7,000 and 10,000.
The majority of them live in Prekmurje and Dolenjska and, to a lesser extent, in Posavje and Bela krajina.
Educational level of Roma
The education situation in Prekmurje and Dolenjska regions is different: in Prekmurje the Roma children attend school and Roma people have a better socio-economic situation, whilst in Dolenjska region the school attendance is lower and people face bigger problems in terms of living conditions.
2.3.5 United Kingdom
Size and composition of the Roma, Gypsy and Traveller groups
A number of traditional travelling groups have lived and travelled in Great Britain and Ireland for centuries. They include Romani Gypsies, Irish Travellers and Scottish Gypsies/Travellers. Many now live in houses and do not travel, or do not travel all of the time, but nonetheless consider travelling to be part of their identity. There are no firm statistics on the numbers of Gypsies and Travellers in the UK. Estimates vary from 80,000 to 300,000. This represents approximately 0.31% of the entire population of the country.
The 2011 census for the first time included a Gypsy and Traveller tick-box in the ethnic origin question. When the results of this are available, it is hoped that they will provide clearer indication of the numbers of people who identify as Gypsy or Traveller.
The term “Roma” is usually used in the UK for people of Roma origin who have come to the UK in recent years, particularly following the end of the Cold war and successive enlargements of the EU in 2004 and 2007. There are no reliable data on the number Roma in the UK – entrants to the UK are not monitored by
 23 The number of self-declared Roma increased by 28.2% in comparison with the 1991 census.
10

CAHROM (2012)18 ethnic origin. The number of Roma migrants present in the UK is estimated by some NGO source as 500,000,
a figure that is not backed up by governmental sources24.
Education level of Roma
The 2011 study ‘From segregation to inclusion: Roma pupils in the UK’25 found that Roma primary and secondary pupils, some of whom had been sent to special schools in the Czech Republic and Slovakia, studying at UK schools perform just as well as their non-Roma peers or slightly below average. Many go on to study in higher education, including tertiary education. Mainstream/inclusive schooling has proven to be a key factor in the process of every pupil’s socialisation and social inclusion as Roma and non-Roma pupils grow up side by side. It is a decisive force contributing to overall social cohesion.
As an example taken from this study, the Babington Community College has built up experience in working with Roma pupils from Central Eastern European countries for several years now. There are currently 70 Roma heritage pupils from Slovakia, the Czech Republic and Romania. Many of these pupils choose Babington as their preferred school even though there are several schools nearer to where they live because they appreciate the efforts Babington has made to engage with their community.
At Babington Roma pupils attend 90% of the time even though most live 5 miles away and the most common reason for absence is the inability to pay the bus fare when money is short. Many Roma pupils achieve well. Last year 38.3% of year 11 Roma pupils left with 5A*-C with English and Maths and one Roma pupil passed maths GCSE at grade B at the end of year 926.
 24 The University of Salford is currently undertaking a major piece of research to explore the size of the UK's Roma population (not including Gypsies and Travellers). This includes a survey of all local authorities in the UK and semi-structured interviews in specific case study areas. The University researchers are currently chasing responses from the local authorities that have not yet responded. The final report will be produced in March 2013 and should give us a much better understanding of the size and origin of the Roma population of the UK.
25 The Report of the Research by Lucie Fremlova and Heather Ureche is available at www.romaeducationfund.org. 26 Additional information about the Babington Community College is available in the Addendum to this report.
  11

III. COMPARATIVE ANALYSIS (LEGISLATION, POLICIES, MEASURES)
3.1. Legislation and policy measures covering education, including “special schools”
3.1.1 Czech Republic
Several programming documents have been adopted by the Czech Government since 2000, such as the Strategy of Roma Integration27, the National Action Plan for Social Inclusion, the National Action Plan for Inclusive Education, the Strategy to Combat Social Exclusion for 2011-2015. Responsible bodies have been established as well, including the Inter-ministerial Commission for Roma Community Affairs and the Agency for Social Inclusion in Roma Localities. Several initiatives, such as pedagogical assistants, preparatory classes, programmes of community field work and others have been started.
Mr Tomáš Sirovátka from Masaryk University, the author of a study on the Czech national policy for promoting social inclusion of Roma published in July 2011 concludes that, although the policy objectives in the above-mentioned documents cover all the important areas, the targets are formulated only at a general level (except for the new Strategy to Combat Social Exclusion 2011-2015). Social inclusion of Roma is not well mainstreamed or coordinated. Progress in key areas is minor, as indicated by the small increase in the numbers of pedagogical assistants, preparatory classes, kindergartens in Roma communities, field social workers, health assistants, social housing; employment programmes, etc.
This critical analysis has been echoed by other observers. The National Action Plan for Inclusive Education (NAPIE), adopted in 2010, was said to lack concrete actions for its implementation and fail to acknowledge racial discrimination as a main cause for segregation28. The European Commission, commenting the National Strategy for the Integration of Roma 2012-2020, equally reported a lack of concrete measures in the chapter on desegregation and a lack of focus on inclusive education29. The Strategy to Combat Social Exclusion (2011-2015), however, foresees a number of concrete measures to promote desegregation, including a progressive closing down of primary practical schools and increased access of Roma children to pre-school education.
In June 2012, the Council of Europe Committee of Ministers’ Deputies, in the context of its supervision of the execution of the European Court of Human Rights judgment D.H. and Others vs. The Czech Republic of 200730
1. “took note of the information provided on 15/05/2012 by the Czech authorities on legislative and practical measures, on-going or envisaged, aimed at inclusion of Roma children in the education system in a non-discriminatory manner (see DH-DD(2012)49831);
2. regretted that a full assessment of the information provided proves difficult insofar as the information does not clearly link with the action plan initially provided by the authorities (the NAPIV), the status of which needs to be clarified in relation to the Strategy for the fight against social exclusion 2011- 2015; also expressed concern on the absence of information to date on the impact of the measures adopted during the current school year and that the results of the monitoring carried out in this area by the Czech School Inspectorate will only be published in July 2012, just a few weeks before beginning of the next school year;
27 See details of the measures foreseen under the Roma Integration Concept of the Czech Government for 2010-2013 in the Addendum to this report. Some references to those measures have been also made throughout this report.
28 See Joint Statement of the League of Human Rights and MDAC concerning the implementation of the ECtHR judgment D.H. and others v. Czech Republic, 29 May 2011.
29 See European Commission: National Roma Integration Strategies, a first step in the implementation of the EU framework, 2012.
30 See also Open Society Justice Initiative, European Roma Rights Centre and COSIV: Submission to the Council of Europe Committee of Ministers: D.H. and others v. Czech Republic, June 2012. 31https://wcd.coe.int/com.instranet.InstraServlet?command=com.instranet.CmdBlobGet&InstranetImage=2087410&SecMode=1&Doc Id=1890262&Usage=2
CAHROM (2012)18
         12

CAHROM (2012)18
3. underlined the importance of accelerating the implementation of the judgment, which has been final for nearly five years, in order to achieve concrete progress on the ground; called on the authorities to provide a consolidated action plan based on a clear medium- and short-term strategy, with a time- table and budget for the implementation of the measures foreseen, and which responds to all the outstanding questions identified in memorandum CM/Inf/DH(2010)47;
4. invited the authorities to submit in due time for their 1150th meeting (September 2012) (DH) the results of the monitoring of the impact of the measures adopted during the current school year and the report of the Czech Public Defender of Rights (“Ombudsman”) and decided to examine the case at its 1157th meeting (December 2012) (DH) in the light of the consolidated action plan to be prepared in a close co-operation with the Secretariat. 32”
Indeed, while all remedial schools were renamed (from “special schools” to “practical schools”) in 2005 and some of them were transformed into regular primary schools, it appears that the content and methods of education applied in these schools have not changed. A report of the Czech School Inspectorate released in 2010 revealed that 83% of the now practical schools continued to function as “hidden special schools” just as before 200533.
In July 2012, the Czech School Inspectorate published a new Thematic Report on Progress in Transformation of Former Special Schools in the School Year 2011/2012, with a view to monitoring progress in accordance with requirements set out in the Education Act, as per the latest amendments34. According to the reported data the number of Roma pupils included in programmes for mild mental disabilities (MMD) has moderately decreased to 26.4%. However, support measures for socially disadvantaged pupils and pupils who are borderline do not differ much from the support provided to pupils suffering from MMD. The Czech School Inspectorate considers that is partially caused by diagnostics, as well as by the way in which the diagnosis is further used, and partially by decisions taken by statutory representatives of pupils. According to that institution, amendments to legislation which came into effect in the 2011/2012 school year could have more considerable effects in the following year, in particular in the area of diagnostic placements which are permitted for a period of one year in the case of pupils with health impairment and for five months for socially disadvantaged pupils.
A more positive approach towards desegregation and inclusive education seems, however, to gain ground among Czech policy makers, as was noted by the CAHROM group of experts following discussion with the Ministry of Education during their visit in Prague. On 20 September 2012, the Ombudsman, the Human Rights Commissioner of the Government and the Minister of Education took part in a meeting on equal opportunities for Roma pupils in education. They discussed the results of the Ombudsman’s study of 2012 and ways of promoting desegregation of the education system and promoting inclusion of Roma pupils into mainstream education. They have inter alia discussed the need for a reform of the system of funding of schools and for providing additional financial support for children in need of support in mainstream schools, including at pre-school level.
3.1.2 Slovak Republic
Article 34 paragraph 1 of the Constitution of the Slovak Republic guarantees national minorities, including Roma, the right to comprehensive development, especially the right to develop – along with other members of the minority or group – own culture; the right to disseminate and accept information in a mother tongue, to associate in national associations; to found and maintain educational and cultural institutions.
32 The CAHROM thematic group of experts and the Special Representative of the Secretary General for Roma issues were given oral information on the main measures envisaged for the consolidated action plan during the visits organised at the Czech Ministry of Education.
33 Source: Equality: From segregation to inclusion, Roma pupils in the United Kingdom, a pilot research project, November 2011.
34 Amendments were made in September 2011 to Decree No. 72/2005 Coll. on Providing Advisory Services in Schools and School Advisory Centres and to Decree No. 73/2005 Coll. on. Education of Children, Pupils and Students with Special Educational Needs and Exceptionally Gifted Children, Pupils and Students.
  13

Article 34 paragraph 2 of the Constitution of the Slovak Republic and international documents of the Council of Europe ratified by the Slovak Republic35 guarantee citizens of Roma ethnic origin, aside from the right to learn the state language, also the right to education in their mother tongue.
In the case of the Roma national minority, however, implementation of this right was complicated by the fact that the Romani language has been standardized only in 2008. Thus, in reality, the Roma minority has within the schooling system of Slovakia, to this day, officially only one school where Slovak and Romani languages are both used, i.e. the eight-grade private high school of Zeferin J. Malla in Kremnica. Besides this school, there are three other secondary schools and two primary schools instructing in the Romani language but they are not yet officially registered as minority schools by the Ministry of Education.
The terms pupils/students from “marginalized Roma communities” (hereinafter “MRC“), and/or pupils from “socially disadvantaged environment” (hereinafter “SDE“) are commonly used since Roma constitute one of the socially weakest and most disadvantaged parts of the Slovak population.
The main legislative norm regulating the regional school system, the School Act, uses, instead of “pupils from marginalized Roma communities”, the term “pupils from socially disadvantaged environment”. A SDE child/pupil is considered to have special educational needs.
An important institution that ought to assist SDE students is the so called “zero grade” (see a description in reply to question 8 under sub-chapter 3.4 below).
There are two sorts of Centres for pedagogy-psychological prevention (regular and special), but Special Centres for pedagogy-psychological prevention have stronger competencies and are mostly located in the same buildings with special schools and under the same administration.
With the adoption of the Anti-discrimination Act, definitions of equal treatment and discrimination were introduced into the Slovak legal system (2004).
In January 2012, the Government of the Slovak Republic adopted the National Roma Integration Strategy (NRIS) of the Slovak Republic up to 2020. The main policy areas formulated in the National Roma Integration Strategy in the field of Education are as follows:
• access to schools with good-quality standard education should be provided for everyone, including pre-school, primary, secondary and higher education;
• Special emphasis should be placed on the elimination of ethnic segregation;
• Whilst the dropping out of education needs to be prevented at the earliest possible stage, attention
should also be given to the facilitation of a smooth transfer for students from school to work.
The NRIS calls for the introduction of policies that will eliminate the grave disparities at the level of education between Roma and the majority population.
3.1.3 Hungary
CAHROM (2012)18
 The policy approach in Hungary is somehow a mixed approach between mainstreaming and targeting. Since most of the Hungarian Roma, about 80% of them, live in extreme poverty in disadvantaged regions, a policy aimed at the inclusion of the Roma in Hungary cannot be separated from the general fight against poverty and the improvement of social and economic competitiveness. At the same time, the Hungarian
 government agrees that particular attention should be paid to the ethnic group of the Roma as experiences
 show that they are the poorest of the poor and have been least reached by the various inclusion programmes.
 35 The Slovak Republic ratified the Framework Convention for the Protection of National Minorities in 1995 and the European Charter for Regional and Minority Languages in 2001 (Part II and III of the Charter are applicable to Romani).
14

The State Secretariat for Social Inclusion plays a coordinative role between the various ministries and secretariats with the aim to promote social inclusion. It also closely co-operates with the National Roma Minority Self-government.
The forms, content and framework of the kindergarten and school education of the Roma minority are regulated in the Decrees on kindergarten education of national and ethnic minorities and on school education of national and ethnic minorities. The purpose of kindergarten education is to prepare children for a successful entry into the school system by consciously building on the differences and similarities between the Roma culture and the majority culture.
International organisations and human rights defenders had expressed over the last 20 years their deep concern about school segregation of Roma pupils and enrolment of children in remedial schools.
According to human rights monitoring bodies’ reports, segregation could and, to a lesser extent, still does take various forms. It started with limited access for Roma children to pre-school education (kindergarten level) due to a lack of kindergarten in areas with large Roma population and restrictive enrolment policies by a number of kindergartens. Many Roma pupils consequently started school later (age 8 and beyond) than
36 Hungary ratified the Framework Convention for the Protection of National Minorities in 1995. The extension of the European Charter for Regional and Minority Languages to the Romani and Beash languages spoken by the Roma in Hungary was promulgated by Act XLIII of 2008.
38 Cigány, the Hungarian term for “Gypsies” is not as derogatory and pejorative as in neighbouring countries of Central and South- Eastern Europe. The word “Roma” (Romák), however, is increasingly used in official documents since 2011.
CAHROM (2012)18
 In accordance with the EU basic principle of explicit but not exclusive targeting, the Hungarian government considers that special means, methods and approaches for the involvement of the Roma
 population are needed.
 Article 68 of the 1990 Hungarian Constitution provides minorities, including Roma, with the right to preserve their culture, language and history, allowing political collective participation in public life as well as the rights to their own organisations and to establish regional and national self-governing bodies. The Romani language is recognised as an official minority language and the group is officially recognised as a minority36.
In 1990 the Office for National Minorities was set up, including a Department on Roma issues. The recognition of both individual and collective rights of minorities and members of minorities was granted through the 1993 Act on the Rights of National and Ethnic Minorities37 which granted 13 such groups,
 including Roma, the right to self-government and personal autonomy. All the 13 minorities listed in the Minorities Act of 1993 possess dual identity (Hungarian and ethnic minority) and have the right to elect their own local self-governments, parallel to the national one. This provided the path to Roma autonomy and the formation of the National Gypsy38 Minority Self-Government (National Roma Self-Government since 2011). The self-governing bodies act as advisory boards in co-operation with the national and local majority authority.
 Through Act LXXIX of 1993 on Public Education (amended in 1996 and in 2003), an action programme was elaborated in the field of education, which allowed the regional minority self-governing bodies the possibility of setting up educational institutions in the minority language, alongside the possibility to address educational desegregation.
The National Roma Self-government and the Roma minority self-governments have the right to maintain and to establish schools and also operate schools of their own in the spirit of cultural and educational autonomy.
 Education in the school system enables Roma pupils to acquaint themselves with the cultural values of the Roma and provides information on the status, rights, organisations and institutions of the Roma. This form of education and teaching successfully operates in a number of localities. It is, however, necessary to provide further guarantees to prevent Roma minority education from becoming a means of segregation.
 37 The Act on the Rights of National and Ethnic Minorities was modified in 2011. According to the new Act, Roma are also recognised as a minority.
 15

CAHROM (2012)18 children from the majority population (age 6 or 7). They were then often channelled to remedial school based
on tests for school readiness carried out before entry to primary education.
Segregation also happened through Roma-only classes in mainstream schools, often as a means for schools to increase their school population (and funding provided accordingly) with a view to avoiding any “white flight” (majority pupils leaving the school). These classes could often be found in separate and lower quality buildings39. Physical separation of pupils within a school could at times be extreme, with different entry doors, separated meals and separate end-of-year ceremonies.
The curriculum in special schools/classes was significantly lighter and teachers were reportedly often not adequately trained to work with Roma pupils40.
Additionally, a growing number of Roma children were not attending school at all, as a result of becoming “private pupils” in line with the Public Education Act, which foresees the possibility for children to be exempted from class attendance while having to pass end-of-year exams in order to progress to the next grade. The decision of exempting a child from school attendance could be made by parents, but could also be recommended by the educational counselling services. The latter reportedly pressured Roma parents to request private pupil status for their children. Those facing special educational needs or disability could benefit from financial and academic assistance, including private lessons. However, in practice, it appeared that neither financial nor teacher assistance was available. This practice represented another form of segregation of Roma children and it often resulted in non-completion of compulsory education. Lastly, Roma having completed primary remedial education were often pushed into short-term vocational education, which trained pupils for low-skilled work and was usually disconnected from the employers’ needs.
Both the Act on the Promotion of Equal Treatment and Equal Opportunities adopted in 2003 and the Civil Code provide general anti-discrimination legislation. Article 10 (2) of the 2003 Act on the Promotion of Equal Treatment and Equal Opportunities defines segregation in education and prohibits it as a form of discrimination: “unlawful segregation is a conduct that separates individuals or groups of individuals from others on the basis of their characteristics as defined in Article 8 without a reasonable explanation resulting from objective consideration”.
The target groups of educational equal opportunities programmes are, in every instance and regardless of ethnicity, groups of pupils/students qualifying as pupils/students with multiple disadvantages or as disadvantaged as defined in Section 121 Point 14 of Act LXXIX of 1993 on Public Education. Decree No. 4/2010. (I.19.) OKM identifies the relevant procedure and the professional requirements of the tests and examinations serving as the basis of the subsequent expert opinion.
As a result of the adoption and implementation in recent years41of the above-mentioned legislation, there has been a decrease in the number of pupils classified as having special educational needs due to a mild mental disability. This could be a source of inspiration for the requesting countries covered by this report.
3.1.4 Slovenia
The situation and rights of members of the Roma community are mainly regulated by Article 65 of the Constitution, the Government Programme of Measures to Assist Roma (adopted in 1995), the Strategy of Education of Roma in the Republic of Slovenia (adopted in 2004, revised in 2011), the Roma Community Act (adopted in 2007) and the National Programme of Measures for Roma for the Period 2010–2015 (adopted in 2010).
39 Roma Education Fund: Pitfalls and bias: entry testing and the overrepresentation of Romani children in special education, (2012).
40 See National Social Inclusion Strategy –Extreme Poverty, Child Poverty, the Roma, 2011-2020.
41 In particular, the extraordinary reviews conducted as part of the “From the desk at the back” programme, the amendment of the relevant legal rules, including measures related to the establishment of the diagnosis of pupils with mild mental or intellectual disabilities.
   16

CAHROM (2012)18 Article 65 of the Constitution of the Republic of Slovenia states that the status and special rights of the
Romani community living in Slovenia shall be regulated by law.
In 1995 the Government adopted the Programme of Measures to Assist Roma. The underlying principle of the national programme of measures is the following: the Roma community in Slovenia enjoys special status and members of this community, in order to be successfully integrated into the Slovenian society and able to assume relevant responsibilities, are granted, besides the rights and obligations accorded to all Slovenian citizens, additional rights provided by law.
On 30 March 2007, the Slovenian National Assembly adopted the Roma Community in the Republic of Slovenia Act42. This Act comprehensively regulates the status of the Roma community in Slovenia and the competences of national authorities and authorities of self-governing local communities concerning the implementation of special rights of the Roma community. It stipulates that these bodies must ensure the implementation of the special rights of the Roma community at the national and local levels. The Act also regulates the organisation of the Roma community, including funds for financing activities. Under this Act, Slovenia has committed itself to ensure special rights to the Roma community in the fields of education, culture, employment, territorial management and environmental protection, health and social care, information and co-decision in public matters that concern members of the Roma community.
In order to ensure better education to Roma people, the Strategy of Education of Roma in the Republic of Slovenia was adopted in 2004 and revised in 2011. The Strategy was prepared in close collaboration with the Union of Roma of Slovenia. The Strategy is based on priority areas, such as:
• Inclusion of Roma assistants in the educational process;
• Early inclusion in educational processes (setting up conditions for inclusion in pre-school education);
• Creating conditions for developing confidence in schools, including the learning about Roma culture
and the removal of prejudices;
• Raising the quality of education provided to Roma children;
• Establishing a "support for learning" network, in particular for secondary school Roma students.
Numerous activities defined in the Strategy have already been carried out (see details in the Addendum).
In 2010 the National Programme of Measures for Roma of the Government of the Republic of Slovenia for the Period 2010–2015 was adopted. It has been implemented through sector specific programmes and measures by relevant state bodies and self-governing local community bodies and is monitored by the Government Commission for the Protection of the Roma Ethnic Community. Indeed, all ministries and government offices are requested to devote special concern to Roma issues within their field of competence and include them in national programmes in their respective fields of work.
Among the specific support measures for the education of Roma community members, the following can be mentioned:
• The education of Roma children is guided by the Strategy adopted in 2004 and amended in 2011;
• A supplement to the curriculum for pre-school institutions working with Roma children and instructions for the implementation of the elementary school programme for Roma children were
approved.
• The child-adult ratio pre-schools groups including Roma children is more favourable (1st age period -
4 children per 1 adult, 2nd age period - 7 children per 1 adult).
• Roma culture is one of the elective subjects in the elementary school.
• In elementary schools the norms for forming class groups which include at least three Roma pupils
are more favourable than in regular schools (maximum 21 pupils).
• In the 1st grade of elementary school two teachers are present in the class group for longer time than
in regular class groups.
42 Official Gazette RS, No. 33/2007. The Act came into force on 28 April 2007.
     17

CAHROM (2012)18
• The elementary school may employ an additional teacher or school counsellor who offers Roma children learning and other assistance; a school with more than 45 Roma pupils may employ two
teaching assistants.
• Within the framework of a special project, Roma assistants are employed in pre-school institutions
and schools, who are typically members of the Roma community and who help children to overcome the emotional and linguistic barriers and bridge the gap between a pre-school institution and school and the Roma community.
• The state additionally finances school meals, textbooks and excursions for Roma pupils. 3.1.5 United Kingdom
In 1993 the general principle that children with special educational needs should – where this is what parents want – normally be educated at mainstream schools was enshrined into law. However, pupils and their families had to satisfy a series of conditions – the mainstream’s ability to ensure the child received the educational provision his or her learning difficulty called for while also ensuring the efficient education of others with whom she or he would be educated and the efficient use of resources – before they secured access to mainstream education. These conditions were open to abuse and children who would have benefited from inclusion were denied access to mainstream education.
Like most countries in the world the United Kingdom supports the Salamanca Statement, drawn up by a UNESCO World Conference held in Salamanca, Spain, in 1994, which called upon all Governments to “adopt as a matter of law or policy the principle of inclusive education, enrolling all children in regular schools, unless there are compelling reasons for doing otherwise”.
In 1997 the new Government published ‘Excellence For All Children – Meeting Special Educational Needs’. This set out a strategy to improve standards for pupils with special educational needs. A clear commitment to promoting greater inclusion was signalled, as was the need to develop the role of special schools. In doing this the significant educational, social and moral benefits of inclusion were highlighted. Following substantial consultation ‘Meeting Special Educational Needs – A Programme of Action’ was published in 1998. This undertook to review the statutory framework for inclusion in conjunction with the Disability Rights Task Force.
The Task Force’s report ‘From Exclusion To Inclusion’ – published in 1999 – recommended “a strengthened right for parents of children with statements of special educational needs to a place at a mainstream school”.
The Special Educational Needs and Disability Act 2001 delivers a strengthened right to a mainstream education for children with special educational needs. This Act has amended the Education Act 1996 and transformed the statutory framework for inclusion into a positive endorsement of inclusion. The Act seeks to enable more pupils who have special educational needs to be included successfully within mainstream education. This clearly signals that where parents want a mainstream education for their child everything possible should be done to provide it. Equally where parents want a special school place their wishes should be listened to and taken into account.
18

3.2. Main problems identified
3.2.1 Problems identified in both requesting countries
Over-representation of children in special schools, and of Roma children in particular
In the Czech Republic, Slovakia and Hungary, the percentage of pupils with special educational needs placed in special schools is respectively at 8.6%, 7.7% and 5.8%, whereas it is at around 2% in Italy, France or in the United Kingdom.43. Many Council of Europe member states (including Finland that was recently visited by another CAHROM team of experts44) are in the process of keeping the number of special institutions to the minimum and to enrol as many children with light mental or physical disabilities in the mainstream system.
Testing
Misplacement in remedial schools (called “practical schools” in the Czech Republic and Slovakia) occurs mainly in Central and Eastern European countries, where Roma pupils form a large share of the pupils attending these schools. The Commissioner for Human Rights of the Council of Europe has noticed that this problem is particularly acute in Slovakia and in the Czech Republic. One of the reasons for these practices is the existence of over-extended networks of remedial schools and generally low levels of integration of children with difficulties (including those with disabilities) into mainstream education45. Additionally, testing to determine the placement into remedial education continues in many cases to be based on the principle of “defectology”, which was the leading concept in dealing with disability under the Communist regimes. “Defectology” is a medical approach aimed at diagnosing disability or difficulties and then at placing children in various educational facilities according to established categories, in order to treat them. On the contrary, inclusive education aims at providing educational support to respond to possible specific needs of the Roma children with a view to helping them overcome difficulties in the context of mainstream education.
The tests applied to determine the intellectual abilities of children, sometimes before even they enter primary school, are often culturally biased and do not take into account the linguistic problems Roma children are often facing (due to the fact that they often speak Romani at home) and their socio-economic environment. The very idea of testing intellectual abilities of children with a view to providing them with different types of education is opposed by many experts as running counter to the concept of inclusive education. Inclusive education implies that children should not be tested but, in case specific needs are identified, supported as appropriate within the context of mainstream education. According to UNICEF, inclusive education is a strategy for addressing all forms of exclusion and discrimination resulting from the fact of being different, including ethnic origin, disability and other vulnerabilities46.
Attitude and living conditions of Roma parents
A number of testimonies heard from school directors in the Czech Republic and Slovakia indicate that there is a need for stronger efforts and more dialogue with Roma parents to convince them to send their children to mainstream schools and make them understand the benefit for their children to attend regular schools and finish their studies. A number of obstacles to this process have been identified during the visit:
• high level of illiteracy among the parents;
• mistrust towards the education system viewed as an instrument of assimilation;
• Roma parents asking for flexibility and not ready to receive any form of pressure from schools.
43 Source: Roma Education Fund: Pitfalls and bias: entry testing and the overrepresentation of Romani children in special education, April 2012.
44 See CAHROM thematic report on school drop out and absenteeism of Roma girls – CAHROM (2012)19.
45 In the Czech Republic, Slovakia and Hungary, the percentage of pupils with special educational needs placed in special schools is respectively at 8,6%, 7,7% and 5,8%, whereas it is at around 2% in Italy, France or the UK. Source: Roma Education Fund: Pitfalls and bias : entry testing and the overrepresentation of Romani children in special education, April 2012.
46 See 2002 UNICEF report: The right of children with disabilities to education: a rights-based approach to inclusive education.
19
CAHROM (2012)18
    
CAHROM (2012)18 There are some other factors that prevent Roma children and youth to take advantage of the educational system; most common constraints are the lack of appropriate clothes, lack of financial resources, lack of electricity and drinking water. Such factors are not predominant, but they do exist and all mentioned goals
should be therefore taken into account when dealing with Roma education.
3.2.2 Problems identified more specifically in the Czech Republic
According to the Czech Ombudsman’s 2012 report, the crucial causes of the school failure of Roma pupils at elementary schools include the lack of pre-school education, inadequate involvement of the parents of children from socio-cultural disadvantaged backgrounds in the education process, the language barrier (use of the Romani language at home) and the process of diagnosing (“testing”) the special educational needs of pupils (see above).
The status of the "MMD Annex" is not clear. It is supposed to be only a methodological tool for education pupils who score in IQ tests below certain line. Instead of this, the MMD Annex works as a separate educational programme according to which groups of pupils are educated in separate classes. Moreover, the whole separate schools work according to this "mere" Annex, which explains how "segregated schooling" is established in the Czech Republic. Many intellectually able Roma children in the Czech Republic are still being enrolled into the "practical primary schools" intended for children who are "lightly mentally disabled”.
In its 2012 report, the Czech School Inspectorate identified the following problems within the Czech schooling system:
To reduce the proportion of the Roma ethnic group at former special schools not offering education in compliance with the Educational Framework Programme for Primary Education. For the time being, at such schools the proportion of the Roma ethnic group is still significantly higher than corresponds to its representation in the regional demographic structure, out of which 26.4 % have been diagnosed with a mild mental disability (MMD) at the nation-wide level.
A material breach of the Education Act was ascertained in 110 cases during the school year 2009/2010; these schools used to allocate pupils to the MMD programmes without undergoing any diagnostic assessment; measures to remove these deficiencies were taken within the specified periods, a follow-up inspection was carried out at four schools last year.
The regional practical primary schools are competing in vain with municipal schools which have the duty to provide all pupils with equal access to education in accordance with the Act and which also have sufficient capacity available in terms of space.
Specific needs for supporting socially disadvantaged pupils and pupils with minor mental disorders are not distinguished. It is necessary to identify pupils’ needs correctly, to show them properly and allocate them to programmes of support of MMD at the school level. To remove risks of breaching the right to equal treatment and provision of corresponding education and, at the same time, also the unauthorized drawing of financial means from the state budget by this.
Systemic funding of special needs of the group of socially disadvantaged pupils has not yet been resolved. The situation when institutional support of pupils with MMD is most convenient in economic terms for schools is to be changed. Any targeted means of a comparable amount are not aimed at forms of the group and individual integration at common schools and specific support in accordance with the needs for socially disadvantaged pupils and Roma pupils. The means to offer economic provision implicitly supports continuous unwanted attitudes at former special schools. It is necessary to provide systematic support for teaching assistants, preparatory classes, individualized educational plans and other specific measures for education of socially disadvantaged pupils within the state budget.
20

3.2.3 Problems identified more specifically in the Slovak Republic
As it was mentioned by the Office of the Plenipotentiary of the Slovak Republic Government for Roma Communities during the workshop held in Košice, special school attendance in Slovakia is on the increase, and so is school segregation. Over one third (36%) of Roma children are reported to be in all or mostly Roma classes, and 12% of Roma pupils are reported to be in special schools. While only 6% of Roma over the age of 30 attended special schools, the rate stands at 11% among pupils who are currently of schooling age: in other words, in the space of approximately a generation, Roma‘s attendance rate of special schools has more or less doubled47.
A study conducted by the Roma Education Fund in 200948 highlighted the fact that up to 60 % of all students in special schools are Roma from Marginalised Roma Communities (MRC), and in special classes in regular elementary schools more than 86 % of all students come from MRC. Having poor and uneducated parents - or parents who went to a special school - represents an enormous burden that is not easy to overcome, regardless of personal aspirations.
Special schools educate pupils with health disabilities – Roma pupils are mostly classified by the psycho- diagnostic tests as pupils with light mental disability or being on the „border-line“ – psychological testing may in many cases confuse socio-cultural disadvantage with mental disabilities.
Another problem is the philosophy of the School Act in relation to MRC pupils is currently pro special education oriented. As a consequence of the 2.7 times higher regular normative sum, teachers in special school are better paid than in mainstream schools. There are two sorts of Centres for pedagogy-psychological prevention (regular and special), but Special Centres for pedagogy-psychological prevention have stronger competencies and are mostly located in the same buildings with special schools and under the same administration board.
When it comes to Roma education, the present system of no pre-school education combined with streaming Roma children to special schools or classes is a “lose-lose proposition”. Failing to invest in Roma education dooms large numbers of Roma to unemployment or extremely low-paying jobs and deprives the Government of substantial fiscal revenues.
With regard to the low rate of secondary school completion among Roma pupils, there are three main factors to it:
1. Mandatory schooling ends at the age 16 – means that a pupil placed in the zero class and repeating a grade ends up being out of school system right after finishing the 9th grade in elementary school
2. The accessibility of upper secondary schools – on the one hand, the financial burden (transport + food + tools) and, on the other hand, the problem of enrolment of the graduates of special education into the mainstream vocational schools
3. Potential high/vocational school SDE students are motivated by the activation allowance which is higher than the scholarship assigned for the students in material/social need.
Despite increased financial interventions in the education of Roma students, it needs to be pointed out here, that SDE students fail within the Slovak educational system. The gap in the formal educational level of Roma (especially marginalized) population compared to the majority population is tremendous.
Another persisting problem in Slovakia is the continuing shortage of teachers skilled in Romani language courses, as well as the lack of textbooks and material in Romani. The vast majority of the Roma population therefore attends Slovak schools, which do not provide teaching on Romani language and literature.
47 Source: UNDP/World Bank/EC regional Roma survey (2011). 48 School as a Ghetto, Roma Education Fund (2009).
CAHROM (2012)18
 21

3.3.
Type of school
School master/mistress
Visits to elementary schools: a comparative summary
3.3.1 Visited schools in the Czech Republic (Prague, 1 October 2012)
CAHROM (2012)18
  Visited schools / Prague district
   “Havlíčkovo náměstí” Prague 3
   “Lyčkovo náměstí” Prague 8
   “Grafická” Prague 5
 So-called “Roma school” but not
a practical school for mentally-
disabled.
Mrs Elena Masnerová, school Mr Jan Korda, school director director for the past 20 years. for the past 9 years.
So-called “Roma school” but not a practical school for mentally-disabled.
Mrs Ivana Rosová, school director for the past 15 years.
Mainstream elementary school.
       Surroundings/his tory
 Located in Žižkov district (Prague 3) which used to be regarded as a Roma-district in Prague but not any longer.
  Located in Karlín district Prague 8 which was flooded some years ago. Flats were renovated and rents got higher. Many Roma families moved away. The population in this district is now mixed: 50% Roma and 50% non-Roma.
   Located in Smíchov district (Prague 5), Many Slovak Roma families used to live in this part of Prague. A number of those families moved away after the building of the tunnel close to the school in 1995. A new generation of mainly Slovak Roma families came later (with little contacts between the two groups). The population of this district is composed of 30% Roma and 70% non-Roma families. However, the number of Roma children is 85%.
   Total number of pupils
  The school used to have 450 children 20 years ago. The number dropped off to 176 at present.
   The number of pupils in the elementary school has increased from 250 in 2004 to 435 in 2011. The school refused 40 applicants this year, essentially children living from other Prague districts. Local inhabitants, including Roma, receive priority (obliged by law).
    150 children at the moment.
   Percentage of Roma pupils
Roma used to represent 40% of the total number of children 20 years ago; now they represent almost 85%. After the fall of communism, non-Roma parents progressively withdrew their children. As a result it became a so-called “Roma school”. Non- Roma pupils are often coming from socially-disadvantaged or migrant families (e.g. from Arab countries).
 The school includes 15 to 20% Roma children (2 to 3 Roma children per class is an ideal number for effective integration programmes according to the school director).
  Roma used to represent 35% to 40% of the total number of children; now they represent 80% to 85%. Most of the Roma children have non- educated Roma parents.
   Average number of pupils per class
  Around 10-12 the day we visited the school, mostly but not exclusively Roma. Some pupils were not at school due to bank holiday the Friday before.
   20 in average.
    15 in average.
 22

Teaching of None None. Romani at school
None but Romani culture put forward.
CAHROM (2012)18
   Inclusion of children who are slightly mentally disabled
  A number of children “with special needs” are integrated in the classrooms with other children. They receive the same schooling certificate with, however, a mention that they have followed a (lighter education programme.
   A limited number of children with special needs are integrated in the classrooms with other children.
    The school includes children with special education needs. The school has both very talented and borderline children (slightly mentally retarded).
   School policy
 The school has a long tradition in educating Roma pupils and favours a bottom-up inclusive policy approach.
There is a small number of children per class.
The school often substitutes itself to families since most of them are coming from socially- disadvantaged background. Flexibility in working methods (the school and parents are mutually accommodating).
Good atmosphere at school, with Roma assistants and teachers. Trust building which progressively allows school staff to be stricter with Roma parents/children.
  Effective integration and inclusive education but with a limited number of Roma children per class.
Quality education (which continues to attract non-Roma parents).
School is strict with Roma parents (no privileges).
   The school places emphasis on arts and cultural activities (dancing, painting, gardening, etc.).
The classes are kept small.
The school provides specific classes with methodologies to teach in an illustrative way (using hands).
The school encourages motivation and responsibility. Cooperation with other schools, in particular French schools.
    Incentives to attract non-Roma parents/children
  Early teaching of English. Computer classes.
   Quality education.
    French classes.
The school tries to attract non Roma children possessing artistic skills.
   Supportive/incen tive measures for school enrolment of Roma children
 Pre-school introduced since 1995 (one of the first schools to do so).
Use of Roma assistants since 1994 (currently 5). Two of them act as Roma mediators on a voluntarily basis (go and fetch the children at home in case of absenteeism).
Free after school activities. Computer classes (also addressed to parents). Counselling centre.
Special pedagogues.
Good cooperation with NGOs (e.g. ®. Moste).
  Pre-school for children who are not mature enough has been introduced for the last 3 years. The school does not use Roma assistants any longer (bad experience with other Roma not accepting the Roma assistant) but non Roma teaching assistants.
Extra-curricular school activities, including time for helping pupils with their homework.
The school tries to motivate parents in order let them know that education is important.
A full time special pedagogue and a psychotherapist who work with children individually and contribute to improve quality of the school (tailor-made education).
   There is a kindergarten in the surrounding opened for three- year old children. However, most of the Roma parents do not send their children to kindergarten.
There are 4 Roma assistants working in the school.
The school acts as a community centre for the neighbourhood.
After school and leisure activities with the help of volunteers.
Use many projects, art, culture etc.
Specialists (psychologists) and an in-house counselling centre. The school has close contacts with the certified centre for pedagogy.
 23

CAHROM (2012)18
   Financial issues
  No ESF any longer since Prague is regarded as a rich city.
Roma assistants used to be funded until 5 years ago 100% by the Ministry of Education. It has decreased by 5% every year and now the Ministry of Education covers 75% of the costs. It obliges the school to ask for subsidies elsewhere (e.g. NGOs) or take money from the teachers’ budget. This year the school received financial support from the city district.
   The grant received from the Ministry of Education is getting lower every year.
The school tends to recruit junior staff as it is cheaper.
    In 1995 the school received almost all the funds from EU but now there are no longer such funds available. The school receives grants.
   Main problems identified in that particular school
Financial difficulties.
The total number of pupils is decreasing due the fact that non- Roma children leave the school. School absenteeism: if too much pressure is put on the parents, they take children away from school.
Education is not valued enough among Roma families. Due to the economic crisis, education is becoming less and less attractive for Roma families.
The burden of school enrolment falls on schools rather than on parents.
 It is difficult for the school to reach parents who are not motivated enough for the education of their children
Some Roma parents do not accept the rules and requirements (a few families decided to withdraw their children from this school as it was too strict for them). Inclusive education is more demanding so there is a trend for exclusive education in Prague.
  They don’t have enough financial support.
The school is labelled as a «Gypsy school» and does not attract many non Roma parents.
The Roma parents look for a flexible approach. Parents adjust the education system to the child, not vice versa.
The presence of a shopping centre closed to the school creates competition for school presence.
   Requests addressed to authorities
  More financial support is needed (to cover e.g. twice more Roma assistants).
To help motivating Roma parents to send regularly children to school (e.g. through an awareness-raising campaign).
   Need for feedback from state authorities.
Need for a definition of “inclusive education” and “quality education” (these are left to the discretion of school masters).
Need for financial but above all moral support and recognition.
    The education system that leaves the choice to parents to choose their school should be changed. Parents should be obliged to send their children to the nearest school. This would encourage mixed classes.
   Prospects for future education
 60% of the pupils manage to finish their compulsory education, whilst 40% fail to do so. The pupils apply to secondary schools (however most of the Roma pupils go to vocational schools).
95% of children finish 9 years compulsory education but some of them drop off before the last compulsory school year.
  80% - 90% of children finished 9 years compulsory education and passed to secondary school. (310 children, including 4 Roma). Children are free to leave after accomplishing the 9 years compulsory education. Many Roma children do so (e.g. one Roma girl failed to graduate the last year but had already spent 9 years at school. Instead of repeating her 9th year, the parents decided to enrol her as hairdresser).
   It depends on years. As an average about 60% of children finish their compulsory education and pass to secondary school; they mostly go to vocational schools.
 24

CAHROM (2012)18
3.3.2 Visited schools in the Slovak Republic (4 October) and meeting with school directors and teachers (5 October)
On 4 October 2012, the CAHROM thematic group of experts visited the Elementary School in Spišský Hrhov and met with the principal of the school, Mr Peter Strážik. The visit was followed by a meeting with local authorities at the town hall. The group also met with Mr Alexander Mušinka whom, in his publication “The things that worked - Examples of successful activities on the level of local administration aimed at improving the situation of the Roma”49, quotes the primary school of Spišský Hrhov as a good example of an integrated educational programme based on inclusive principles and as one of the 21 listed good practices regarding Roma inclusion in Slovakia. The description of the school below is partly an extract of the abovementioned publication.
The choice of the Slovak organisers of the CAHROM thematic visit was to present a successful example of inclusive education in Slovakia and to demonstrate that it can be done.
The primary school with a nursery school in Spišský Hrhov is a fully organised state countryside school with Slovak as its teaching language. The school has 9 grades and in accordance with international standards for classification of education (ISCED) offers a primary education for approximately 270 pupils and a pre- primary education for 60 pupils in a nursery school every school year. The school provides primary and secondary levels (from 6 to 16 years old) and optional activities, like sports, gardening, cooking, computers and languages. The educational process is provided by 20 fully qualified teachers and professional employees. Some of them speak Romani. The average number of children per class is 20. Two special classes exist for children with specific needs and who require special attention (100% of children in these classes are Roma).
From the total number of pupils, more than half (exactly 51%) are of Roma origin, which to a significant measure influences the character of the school’s educational programme with elements of inclusion and enrichment by a multicultural dimension and cooperation with non-profit and non-governmental organisations. Many schools in the region consider the presence of a large number of Roma pupils as a negative element. The School in Spišský Hrhov has become, on the contrary, a positive example of problem- free co-existence, cooperation and removal of minority tensions and barriers.
Roma pupils attending the school are coming from Spišský Hrhov itself and from the marginalised community in Roškovce. These two communities are characterised by a diametrically different social environment, including the type of housing, the number of children in families, hygienic habits and the approach of pupils towards school obligations. Despite this diversity, the school accepts pupils from both communities and makes the effort for an individual approach.
The school director knows all of the pupils by name, regardless of differences in origin and nationality, which contributes to the exceptionally personal approach and feeling of importance from the viewpoint of the self- confidence of the pupils. Pupils coming from marginalised communities in particular respect this fact and are aware of a position of equality among majority residents. This method of approach of the school leadership brings positive feedback with the solving of disputes, which are rare anyway. The Roma pupils visit the school director during breaks without bashfulness or fear, with a feeling of satisfaction that their problems and attitudes are accepted and can be resolved.
The school ranks among its priorities the teaching of foreign languages, computer literacy, strengthening of the social and environmental awareness of pupils, respecting regional and folklore traditions, increasing reading literacy and a wide scale of different activities which are not commonly accessible at schools of the same type in this region. It places great emphasis on thorough preparation of pupils for studying at secondary schools. This is also shown in the excellent results of testing which the pupils achieved in Monitor 9 in the scope of the district during recent years. Each ninth class has a number of Roma pupils who are not only finishing their primary education with a successful percentage result in the monitor, but are continuing on to
49 Alexander Mušinka “The things that worked - Examples of successful activities on the level of local administration aimed at improving the situation of the Roma”, Institute of Roma Studies, Publication Department of the University of Prešov, 2012.
 25

CAHROM (2012)18 grammar school or vocational school in the district. As an average 90% of the children finish the secondary school. However, 10% of Roma girls leave before finishing the 9th grade (during the 6th or 7th
class, they become pregnant, leave the school and obtain social benefits).
Ten Roma pupils who had left the school came back later and were provided a second chance to finish their studies. They received free textbooks from the school. Another four pupils left with their families to England but came back to Slovakia to pass their exams.
From an organisational point of view this school is not anything exceptional and we find this type of school in many villages. Its activities are, however, unique in this context. The success and attractiveness of the school for both Roma and non-Roma parents are essentially due to the great number of projects and activities which are carried out, the majority of which are done from the school’s own resources and initiatives, or from resources from different donation schemes, grants, foundations and the like.
The school is indeed very active in writing applications for donations and grants (doing it itself or recruiting an agency). It has in recent years been a successful applicant and initiator of projects from obtained from European Union funds, company philanthropy and foundations supporting education.
The school has for instance received, via the Ministry of Education, grants from European Structural Funds (ESF) amounting 230,000 €. These grants have been used to buy materials, books, laptops, to refurbish the kitchen or to connect the school with Wi-Fi and Internet. The school has also recruited two additional Roma assistants from these grants (one was already working at the school).
A non-exhaustive list of projects developed at the school is indicated below as food for thought. A more detailed explanation of each project can be found in the Addendum of this report.
• “Not-a-test” is an initiative of the school director to increase the visits of pupils to the school library. Pupils borrow a book and read it. This dispenses them once from participating in a test. By doing so, it increases the interest of pupils for reading (as a result, 40% of children are more motivated to read alone).
• Foreign qualified teachers and lecturers from the USA and from Great Britain helped Roma pupils focus on conversation, practice correspondence and simulate situations needed for travelling and working abroad. The lecturers also provided education to pupils’ parents.
• The programme of the Regional development partnership called the Roma Educational Development Fund (RED Fund) involves tutoring of selected intellectually gifted Roma students, financed by American donor and philanthropist Jarret Schecter from New York, who is known for activities in the process of supporting education of marginalised pupils.
• “Let’s Give the Weak a Chance”: thanks to a grant by the Orange Foundation in the amount of EUR 3,000, a group of 50 selected Roma children took part in activities focused on increasing literacy in the English language during the summer holidays.
• Through a grant obtained from the Comenius Regio programme from the British Council, a lecturer taught pupils the German language.
• The project “Christmas Gathering”, supported by the Polish institute in Slovakia, was implemented together with a Czech partner from Moravany and a Polish school from Poronin.
• The trans-border project “Let’s Learn about the Slovak-Poland Border Region,” supported through the Prešov VÚC by a sum of EUR 50,000, gave pupils the opportunity in the course of one year to visit places, villages and natural sites.
• “Get to Know Your Friends” is a cross-border cooperation project between Poland and Slovakia.
• In partnership with a Polish school, the project “Crafts Gathering” was carried out, in which approximately 20 craftsmen from the Spiš region trained pupils in individual crafts and skills. The
entire activity was sponsored by small local businesses.
• In the project “Let’s Teach Children the Traditions of our Forefathers – Crafts of the Spiš,
supported by the Orange Foundation with EUR 3,000, the school carried out over a six-month period hundreds of hours of crafts production of small objects.
 26

CAHROM (2012)18
• The project “An herbal mosaic – a step for the young toward health” received a grant of approximately EUR 5,000 from the foundations Deťom Slovenska (To the Children of Slovakia) and
Hodiny deťom (Children’s Hour).
• Pupils from the school won first place in the Slovak-wide Medicinal Plant Olympics. Roma pupils
looked over English translations and descriptions of herbs and medicaments.
• Through the school activity “Tourist Guide Services”, and with the help of a lecturer from Sandwell College, University of Birmingham (United Kingdom), pupils became a part of an intensive language
and professional preparation for tour guide services in the region.
• Afternoon activities are organised in the segregated community in Roškovce supported by the
organisation People in Need Slovakia.
• Together with volunteers from the same organisation, the school carries out so-called green days for
all pupils of the school, with inter alia the aim of demonstrating the equality of people of different
ethnic background, and the needs for protecting the environment.
• An Austrian philanthropist and student of Roma cultural studies at University in Vienna, Barbara
Tiefenbacher, regularly supports the school not only financially but by offering the opportunity to
participate in international meetings in the fields of culture, art and education.
• In 2008-2009 the school was involved in the project “An Equal Chance” which overall goals were to support the social integration or Roma pupils, reduce the number of Roma segregated classes, create a model of integrated (inclusive) school environment, improve quality education and train pedagogical
workers on intercultural diversity.
• Through the project “The World of Bread – Bread of the World” the school currently carries out
non-traditional teaching strategies to develop the pupil’s relations to nature, crafts, and traditions.
• Through cooperation with a methodological-pedagogical centre, a day-long educational system for
pupils from marginalised Roma communities was launched.
This innovative methodology of implementing traditional classes combined with leisure activities and implication of parents and NGOs to promote cultural activities has been mainstreamed to other villages in Poland, England (London) and Scotland (Inverness)50.
The atmosphere at the school is for the pupils, but mainly for the school employees, remarkably motivational. Many of the employees accept to work extra hours as volunteers. Ideas and initiatives are highly welcomed and in the case of any problems, solutions are sought and not justification for why things are not feasible.
Proof of the attractiveness and popularity of the school is also its unprecedented mediatisation both at home and abroad, when for the past two years it has appeared 30 times in print media and 20 times in television in the news reports of Slovak and foreign television51.
The primary school has earned the reputation as a modern, democratic and rapidly developing institution of the family type where school-pupil-parent relations are an elementary element in the process of management and communication. Regardless of nationality close contact is built especially with parents of Roma pupils, who regularly communicate with the school leadership and class teachers in person or by telephone and occasionally through e-mail. The key of the success of this integrative policy is indeed the motivation and participation of Roma families. It creates an atmosphere of cooperation and reciprocity and improves relationships. Roma families are involved in the construction of buildings and apartments, as well as in social events (festivals, coffee evenings, etc.). The level of stereotypes is decreasing little by little among the majority society.
The school leadership and the pedagogical corps to a maximum extent respect the individuality of pupils, their social origin and the environment from which they come. Parents perceive the process of education at school positively, and they join directly in activities at school and outside of school. Parents are in contact with the
50 More information about the school is available in Slovak at www.skolahrhov.sk.
51 Nearly 30% of media coverage, particularly in TV Markíza, was associated exclusively with programmes and activities carried out especially for Roma pupils.
  27

CAHROM (2012)18 school and through their input and cooperation improve the educational process. A well-developed school
educational programme with elements of inclusion ensures balanced personal development of the pupils.
The recommendations addressed by the Spišský Hrhov school director to other schools are the following:
• to be more interested and confident in applying for donors’ support for projects;
• to manage correctly the funds so as to obtain good results, improve efficiency and quality of
education;
• to spend funding properly with the view to improving methodologies and testing new perspectives;
• to have adequate and motivated staff;
• to keep good mutual relations with parents and with the municipality.
In that regard, the Deputy Mayor of Spišský Hrhov municipality, Mr Pavol Urda, expressed satisfaction as concerns cooperation with the school management and with Roma families. The municipality puts much emphasis on cohabitation. “From blocks of concrete, you can either build a wall or a bridge. We chose the second option”. Roma families are active members of the local community life. Roma teenagers do not create more problems than any other teenagers.
Mr Urda informed the CAHROM thematic group of experts that Roma represent 25% of the total number of inhabitants. The number of Roma increased from 900 to 1,400 over the last ten years as the municipality attracted people from other villages who settled in Spišský Hrhov. In that respect, the municipality would be interested to obtain advice how to deal with the legalisation of settlements.
The municipality further informed the CAHROM team of experts that a large part of local taxes (84%) is attributed to children’s education. This includes support for the municipality kindergarten. Indeed, one pre- school year is compulsory before entering primary school and has to be financed by local authorities’ budget. 36 children attend the kindergarten (30% of them are Roma). The municipality also used to provide support for a leisure centre; however, as from 2013, the municipality will have to reduce its financial contribution.
Roma are, however, not represented at the municipal council level. Their level of participation as voters is low and when they vote, they usually vote for non Roma. Therefore Roma candidates to the position of municipal counsellor were not elected (the best candidate got 1/4th of Roma votes). The municipality has nevertheless established a Roma Council with a consultative character composed of three Roma representatives (one woman and two men).
The programme continued with a visit to a Practical Elementary School for mentally disabled children in Spišská Nová Ves. The CAHROM team of experts had a chance to exchange views with PhDr Ľuboš Bazár, Head of the School, with his Deputy Head, as well as with teachers (including a recently recruited English teacher), psychologists, special pedagogues, and other staff responsible for the diagnosis and school enrolment of children.
The School Director, who has been teaching for 20 years and who is also teaching students in Bratislava University (some of them visiting the Spišská Nová Ves school as trainees), informed the CAHROM team of experts that 96% of pupils of the Spišská Nová Ves practical school were of Roma origin (270 out of a total of 280 children). The school is the biggest united school in Košice area and includes five different institutions in three different buildings, all under his responsibility52.
During the discussion, the School Director indicated that
52 This United School (Spojená škola) include the five following organisational components: a special primary school (Špeciálna základná škola), a practical school (Praktická škola), vocational training (Odborné učilište), a primary school by the Hospital and a centre for special educational consultancy.
 different because of their background and environment of poverty, relations with drugs, alcohol, robberies,
experience shows that Roma children are considered
  poor settlements, etc. He considers that this is equivalent to having a mental disease or being disabled. This is why special schools are attended not only by children with real problems of mental disorder but also many
 28

CAHROM (2012)18
 Roma children. He was surprised that Roma pupils could follow regular education in England and suggested that either the British system has lower education quality standards, or that the British schools had not
 received from Slovak schools information indicating that these children had special educational needs.
 According to him, the methods of teaching for special children are good because they do some testing regarding the skills at the beginning of the education (0 class) and if children are not able to pass, they stay at this 0 class. Children cannot go to primary school unless the academic staff has decided so. The psychologist decides who is able and who is not. After five years the diagnosis is repeated to see if any progress has been achieved. Social workers help the parents and the pedagogues to decide whether, in case of any improvements, children are able to go to elementary school. School offers specialization on subjects, such as artistic skills, social services, cleaning, and pastry-making. The school receives subsidies from the Ministry of
 Education for digitalization but not for implementing methodologies.
 He considers that the Ministry for Education, apart from defining the rules for special education, should adapt
 the subjects to the children even if they are under the general average level of knowledge.
3.4. Workshop discussions: a comparative summary
A research conducted by the Czech Ministry of Education in conjunction with the Education Information Institute in the first half of 2009 shows that Roma children from a disadvantaged sociocultural background have a lower probability of obtaining a good education and during their school attendance show worse results compared to their peers; this prevents them from pursuing further study at secondary school or university, which in turn has a negative impact on their future working life. The investigation pointed out the unequal educational opportunities of Roma pupils in comparison with other pupils, since the probability that a Roma child will be educated in line with the RVP LMP is much greater than for other children.
29

Question 1:
CAHROM (2012)18
 · How do you define “special schools”53 and “children with special (educational) needs”?
  SITUATION IN THE CZECH REPUBLIC
   The term “special schools” was used until 2004 and was later replaced by “elementary practical schools” (zakladni skola prakticka). According to the Framework Educational Programme for Elementary Education (RVP ZV) with the Annex regulating education of pupils with mild mental disability (MMD), pupils who score in IQ tests below certain line are labelled as “light mentally disabled” and are directed to these “practical schools”. Some pupils are enrolled in regular elementary schools but follow the so-called LMP Annex curriculum. These children will receive a school certificate indicating that they have not followed the “regular” curriculum.
  SITUATION IN THE SLOVAK REPUBLIC
   The terms pupils/students from “marginalized Roma communities” (hereinafter “MRC“), and/or pupils from “socially disadvantaged environment” (hereinafter “SDE“) are commonly used since Roma constitute one of the socially weakest and most disadvantaged parts of the Slovak population.
The main legislative norm regulating the regional school system „the School Act“ uses, instead of “pupils from marginalized Roma communities”, the term „pupils from socially disadvantaged environment“. A SDE child/pupil from SDE is considered to have special educational needs.
  SITUATION IN HUNGARY
   The terminology used is “special and conductive educational institution” which is defined as an institution educating exclusively students with special needs and which can only enrol students based on the opinion of the Special Needs Experts Committee.
According to the Hungarian Public Education Act, a pupil/student with special needs is defined in the following way: “a student in need of special attention who - according to the opinion of the Special Needs Experts Committee - has a locomotor/sense perception/speech/mental/learning or behavioural disorder or who is suffering from autism”.
  SITUATION IN SLOVENIA
 The definition of children with special needs according to the Placement of Children with Special Needs Act of the Republic of Slovenia is the following: “Children with special needs, who need adjusted implementation of programmes with additional expert assistance or adjusted and special education programmes, include children with mental development disorders, the blind and partially sighted, the deaf and hard of hearing, children with speech and language impairments, movement-impaired children, children with chronic diseases, children with deficiencies in individual fields of learning and children with mental and behavioural disorders.”
Children with SEN have the following options:
• to attend regular schools and pre-schools;
• to attend schools offering the adjusted programmes;
• to attend units at regular schools which follow the adjusted programme; • to attend units at special institutions.
By a prescribed procedure, the Commission for Placement decides on the placement of children in a programme and integration into a pre-school institution or school as well as on the necessary adjustments of the education programme, the scope, type and manner of the implementation of additional professional or physical assistance and possible other rights (e.g. free transport, adjusted equipment etc.). Parents may appeal against the decision. The body deciding on the appeal is the second instance commission, which acts within the Ministry of Education and Sport.
In conducting the placement procedure, the commission takes into account the criteria and the achieved level of development, the capacity for learning and achieving the necessary standards of knowledge, aetiology and prognosis with regard to the child's deficiency, impairment or disability. The criteria for defining the types and degree of disadvantages, impairments and disabilities of children with special needs are laid down in the Rules on the organisation and methods of work of commissions for the placement of children with special needs and on criteria for determining the
  type and degree of disadvantages, impairments and disabilities of children with special needs.
     53 See in the Addendum the definition of “special school” in the Dutch context provided for information and comparison.
30

CAHROM (2012)18
   The groups of children with SEN integrated in regular schools are as follows:
- Children with deficiencies in specific fields of education who could be very successful with adjustments and
additional assistance;
- Children with emotional and behavioural problem; mainly such problems are the result of a disorderly domestic
environment;
- Children with a long-term illness who, during their hospital treatment, attend the hospital school – a unit of a
regular school, located in the same city as the hospital;
- Children with speech and language problems, provided that such deficiencies are not too severe (autism); in
such cases children attend special institutions for the deaf or schools offering an adapted programme;
- Children with physical disabilities attending education at an institution which corresponds to their intellectual abilities; if their movement is heavily restricted or they suffer from any other deficiency that requires medical
rehabilitation, they are integrated into special institutions;
- The majority of deaf children or children with hearing impairments, and blind children or children with visual
impairments; only children who suffer from an additional deficiency beside their main disability are integrated into specialised institutions.
Children with complex or severe mental problems attend schools with adapted programmes that provide education at a lower level and special education programmes. Formal recognition of practice based on the formation of groups, following the adapted education programme(s), within regular schools is increasing.
The Ministry of Education will introduce changes to the legislation regarding SEN probably in 2013.
          SITUATION IN THE UNITED KINGDOM
 Most of the children and young people are educated in mainstream schools with all the other children and young people in their locality. All children attend their local schools. Communities with different ethnicities will live in the same area or location and attend the same school. As an example, in Leeds there are schools with over 40 different nationalities and home languages.
 Children and young people with complex physical or leaning needs which generally cannot be fully met in a mainstream setting are educated in special schools. In Leeds these schools are known as Specialist Inclusion Learning Centres (SLICs).
The Department for Education (DFE) has a consultation document out entitled “Support and aspirations: A new approach to special educational needs and disabilities” which includes wide-ranging proposals to improve outcomes for children and young people who are disabled or have special educational needs. The information in this publication supports this vision as it will help teachers, parents, school governing bodies, local authorities and those they work with to assess the quality and efficiency of the provision they make with a view to improving outcomes for children and young people. Chapter 1 of this publication covers the following topics:
  · Prevalence of pupils with special educational needs
· How do the achievements compare between pupils with and without special educational needs?
· How does progression vary between Key Stages for pupils with special educational needs?
· How do activities up to age 19 vary according to the level of provision and type of special educational need?
· Absence and exclusion from school
· Characteristics of pupils with special educational needs
· Attainment of pupils with special educational needs
· Progression of pupils with special educational needs
· How do activities up to age 19 vary according to the level of provision and type of special educational need?
· Absence and exclusions from schools for pupils with special educational needs.
   31

Question 2:
· What is the number/proportion of Roma children enrolled in special schools?
CAHROM (2012)18
   SITUATION IN THE CZECH REPUBLIC
   The Ombudsman of the Czech Republic released in June 2012 the results of a study covering 67 schools for children with special needs (now called “practical schools”). He estimates that, although Roma form only about 2% of the total population, they constitute 32% of the pupils in practical schools.
These results confirm figures obtained previously by the Czech School Inspectorate in March 2010. The latter studies indicated that Roma constituted up to 53% of the children enrolled in remedial schools in some regions, their average number being at 35%. At least 5,000 children without any diagnosis of disability were placed in special schools for disabled children. In the first level (grades 1 - 3), 39.52 % of the Roma children are enrolled in practical schools versus only 2.17% of children belonging to the majority population.
Of the total number of all Roma elementary school pupils, almost a third (26.7% to be precise) attend schools teaching according to the Framework Education Programme for Elementary Education of those with Minor Mental Disability (in Czech: RVP ZV LMP), whereas these schools are attended by only 2.17% of other pupils.
In August 2012, the School Inspectorate released a new report. According to the results of this research, the proportion of Roma pupils being educated as if they are mentally disabled has fallen over the past two years due to the impact of recent change in legislation. While Roma children previously comprised 35 % of the pupils educated in programmes for the disabled, they currently comprise only 26.4 %. Big differences between the individual regions have been detected here. The highest rate of Roma pupils classified as diagnosed with MMD was in the Region of Liberec (45.7 %), the Moravian-Silesian Region (39.0 %) and the Hradec Králové Region (34.7 %). There was a significant decrease of 22.7 % in the Ústí Region.
School inspectors conducted their investigation in practical primary schools which were previously designated "special" (zvláštní) schools. Only school children with diagnoses of "light mental disability" should end up in such schools, but children are often enrolled into them solely on the basis of their poor social backgrounds.
Since last school year, parents must give their "informed consent" to enrolling their children into the "practical primary schools".
According to the Czech Education Ministry, recent efforts to enrol Roma children - and not only them - into mainstream education have started producing some results. Two years ago, the former "special" schools educated a total of 68 % of their pupils on the basis of disability, but today only 49 % of their pupils are enrolled on that basis.
The Ministry of Education does not have any statistics concerning the number of children in elementary practical schools nor do they have statistics of children taught according to the programme for light mentally disabled in regular schools. However, in the context of the execution of the ECtHR Judgment in the case D.H. and Others v. The Czech Republic, the Ministry of Education is planning to perform annual investigations to establish the number of Roma pupils educated in programmes according to the LMP Annex of the Framework Educational Programme for Elementary Education (RVP ZV), as well as to collect information about the number of children enrolled in the so-called “integration groups”, i.e. classes created only for children with special educational needs.
  SITUATION IN THE SLOVAK REPUBLIC
   A 2009 study by the Roma Education Fund estimates the proportion of Roma pupils in special primary schools (for disabled –mentally and physically- children) to be at 59.4%, in special secondary schools at 35%, and in special classes in mainstream schools at 85.5%.
The proportion of Roma children in special schools can reach up to 75% in Eastern Slovakia, while it is of around 40% in Western Slovakia. It is also much higher in schools located in rural areas than in cities (above 75% against 50% respectively). The study also indicates that in families with one child enrolled in special education, the other children are also likely to be enrolled in these schools.
Regarding special classes in mainstream schools, Roma represent between 85% and 90% of all pupils in these classes, even though in the schools concerned Roma constitute on average only 40% of the school population. Special classes in mainstream schools are located mainly in the rural areas of Eastern Slovakia.
 32

CAHROM (2012)18
   Moreover, the REF study shows that among pupils in special primary schools who completed mandatory education at grade nine, half were Roma. Among pupils in special primary schools completing mandatory education at a level lower than grade nine, Roma account for 80%.
Special primary schools and special classes in primary standard schools are reportedly in a significantly worse material situation and the proximity to Roma settlements makes the situation worse. Special classes in standard schools are sometimes located in unsuitable areas such as the basement of the school. It is to be noted that Roma pupils are often also segregated outside the classroom, for instance at lunchtimes, in corridors and sometimes in the very class room where Roma are attending mainstream education.
The curriculum is lighter in special primary schools than in mainstream schools (it consists of approximately 60% of the standard curriculum and there is a reported four-year gap between the two curricula) and more focused on practical subjects than on general knowledge. There is no possibility to learn a foreign language in special schools, as according to the school authorities, children with light mental disability (most Roma pupils are placed in special schools on this ground) cannot learn a foreign language (even though most Roma children speak Romani and Slovak). Pupils enrolled in special schools usually finish with the ISCED1 knowledge level.
  SITUATION IN HUNGARY
 Although school segregation is banned by the Act on Public Education of 1993 and the Equal Treatment Act of 2003, the proportion of Roma children studying in segregated schools or classes has steadily increased in Hungary since 1990. While in 1992, 7.1% of Roma pupils studied in a school attended mainly by Roma, this proportion rose to 20-25% in 2004. In 2007, schools were segregated in 170 villages and towns throughout the country and separate Roma-only classes existed in 700 communities.
The policy approach has, however, changed over recent years and through legal reform, the system is on its way towards a more inclusive educational system.
 In Hungary, special schools are now reserved for children with autism background or children with severe psychological problems or physical disabilities. The current trend is to move Roma children who are purely socially vulnerable away from special schools and integrate them into the mainstream educational system. There is a Commission which decides
  who needs special schools and
who does
not. The opinion of an Equal Opportunities Officer is required.
  SITUATION IN SLOVENIA
   The starting point is that Roma children are not, as a group, children with special needs. If they have special needs, they are treated as any other children with special needs. There is a Special Commission which determines if the child has special needs or not.
There is a trend to close down special schools and to integrate children in the general system. Special units or departments exist within mainstream pre-school institutions and elementary schools implement adjusted and special programmes for children with special needs. The majority of children with special needs are therefore included in mainstream pre-school institutions and schools, which adjust the implementation of the programme and offer additional help. This combination of both models provides better qualitative results. In the school year 2009/2010, there were 0.9% of such children in pre-school institutions, 4.5% in elementary schools and 3.18% in secondary schools. In addition to that, the system allows individual programme for a child who is integrated into a mainstream class.
According to the Statistical Office of the Republic of Slovenia, adjusted programmes in mainstream pre-school institutions were conducted in 36 development departments in the school year 2009/2010, and included 0.3% of children. Adjusted elementary school programmes with a lower educational standard and special programmes in special departments were conducted in 21 mainstream elementary schools in the school year 2009/2010, and included 0.2% of children. Children with special needs may transfer to the regular elementary school programme in individual courses.
  SITUATION IN THE UNITED KINGDOM
  In the United Kingdom, the experience is focused on integration. The system does not distinguish between Roma and non-Roma children. Gypsy, Roma and Traveller (hereafter “GRT”) children and young people are not over-represented
 in Specialist Inclusion Learning Centres (SILCs). SILC.
In Leeds there are 1.02% of GRT children and young people in a
 Children learn and teachers learn too and the mainstream schools have a very high level of good results. Special schools for really disabled children or with mental disabilities also offer a good quality education. There is a penalty in case of
 abandoning school.
     33

Question 3:
CAHROM (2012)18
 · How are "special needs" or "support intensity scale" defined and measured?
Special schools shall provide the Government with information identifying children mentally or physically disabled and therefore with special needs, together with the agreement of parents.
SITUATION IN HUNGARY
Special needs are not decided by politics. However, here has been a revision of criteria for diagnosis and new definitions of special needs treat separately autism, socially disadvantaged and mentally disabled children.
  SITUATION IN THE CZECH REPUBLIC
   The concept of “special needs” is linked to health disabled, health disadvantaged or social disadvantaged children. There is a lack of definitions in laws and regulations. Schools decide or not to have a special needs assistance person. The mental disability is measured by psycho-diagnostic instruments in Pedagogical-psychological centres, at this time predominantly by WISC-III and the borderlines are defined by an IQ test.
  SITUATION IN THE SLOVAK REPUBLIC
      SITUATION IN SLOVENIA
   Slovenia does not use the terms “support intensity scale”.
As regards the definition of “special needs”, see reply to question 1. The Ministry of Education will introduce changes to the legislation regarding SEN probably in 2013.
  SITUATION IN THE UNITED KINGDOM
   Children who are slow to learn or who are of a minority ethnic group are not segregated in special schools; they attend mainstream schools.
There are Specialist Inclusion Learning Centres (SILCS) for the profoundly physically and mentally disabled children and young people.
Having English as an additional language is not a special need. Being socially disadvantaged is not a special need.
Special Educational Needs Coordinator or Inclusion Coordinator in schools work with children who need to “catch up” their learning. Schools have now Inclusion Managers or Integrated Service Managers.
Special educational needs (SEN) in mainstream schools have three different levels:
Action – where the child is little below the rest of the peers and may be given extra intervention classes;
Action Plus – the school can apply for extra funding called FFI (Funding for Inclusion) to offer the child more support in classes or in intervention classes.
Statement – this is confirmed by an educational psychologist when the child is significantly below the peers. This will secure more funding to enable that child to, either stay in mainstream education and get the support needed for this, or to attend a SILC for the most profoundly disabled.
Action Plus and Statemented children all have individual educational programmes that the teachers write. They are shared with all who teach or work with the child. These are reviewed regularly to show improved learning.
Children with Statements have an annual review with all involved to improve outcomes.
The school provides support to these children and their families.
Roma twins in one school have an extra support from a “nurture group” as they have emotional problems.
 34

Question 4:
Social exclusion and/or ethnicity are not criteria defining special needs (see reply to question 1).
SITUATION IN THE UNITED KINGDOM
Social exclusion and/or ethnicity are not amongst the criteria defining special needs/schools. Special schools are for pupils who have profound learning or physical disabilities.
CAHROM (2012)18
 · Are social exclusion and/or ethnicity among criteria defining special needs?
  SITUATION IN THE CZECH REPUBLIC
   Socially disadvantaged is one of the groups of special needs children, though there is a lack of clear legal definition. Therefore, the psychologists and special needs specialists find it difficult to decide who is socially-disadvantaged and who is not. The term “socially excluded” is not used in education legislation.
Amendments were made in September 2011 to the Decree on Counselling (No 72/2005) and the Decree on Special Education (No. 73/2005). However, based on an assessment of the Office of the Commissioner for Human Rights, the two decrees still contain provisions which appear inconsistent with inclusive education goals. Section 3 of the Decree on Special Education (No. 73/2005) still allows for children with a “social disadvantage” to be placed in separate classes for children with disabilities for up to five months if that child fails to cope in mainstream school over an extended period. Currently, no clear checks exist to assess the type and quality of support provided to children with “social disadvantage” temporarily placed in “practical schools”, nor is adequate support provided to such students before or after such an assignment to “practical school”. Many Roma children in the Czech Republic fall into this category.
  SITUATION IN THE SLOVAK REPUBLIC
   Experience shows that Roma children are considered to be different because of their background and environment of poverty, relations with drugs, alcohol, robberies, living in settlements, etc. This is often seen as equivalent to having a mental disease or being disabled. As a result, especially in rural areas, not only children with real problems or disorders but also Roma children attend special schools.
  SITUATION IN HUNGARY
   Ethnicity or social aspects are not among the criteria defining special needs.
Ethnicity can only be taken into consideration for positive discrimination or vindicating minority rights and only if the individual makes a voluntary declaration that he/she considers him/herself a member of a minority group.
  SITUATION IN SLOVENIA
     35

Question 5:
CAHROM (2012)18
 · How do you define “vulnerable” or “disadvantaged” children/families/social environment?
  SITUATION IN THE CZECH REPUBLIC
   One of the criteria to recognise a socially disadvantaged child, according to the Decree 73/2005 on Special Education, is the unsupportive, non-incentive family background meaning a family which is not able or not willing to support their child(ren)’s education. Broader social environment is not (formally) taken into account.
  SITUATION IN THE SLOVAK REPUBLIC
   The terms pupils/students from “marginalized Roma communities” (hereinafter “MRC“), and/or pupils from “socially disadvantaged environment” (hereinafter “SDE“) are commonly used since Roma constitute one of the socially weakest and most disadvantaged parts of the Slovak population.
The main legislative norm regulating the regional school system, the School Act, uses, instead of “pupils from marginalized Roma communities”, the term “pupils from socially disadvantaged environment”. A SDE child/pupil is considered to have special educational needs.
  SITUATION IN HUNGARY
   There is no definition of the concept of vulnerable groups in Hungarian legislation. The National Social Inclusion and Roma Strategy talk about people with low work intensity, income poverty or serious material deprivation and that these groups tend to be of low level of education. We also often talk about groups more exposed to discrimination.
The Child Protection Act defines the term “socially disadvantaged” based on the family’s income per capita and “socially multiply disadvantaged” based on the parents’ level of qualification (the maximum qualification of multiple disadvantaged students’ parents is elementary school certificate).
“Socially excluded localities” is not a terminology used in Hungarian legislation. According to the Central Statistical Office’s definition: segregated residential zones are areas where more than 50 % of the inhabitants of active age (15- 59) have no permanent work income or have elementary level qualification at most.
In case of settlements below 2,000 inhabitants, segregated areas are considered those parts of the settlement which are judged by the local people as “poor zones” or “Roma zones”, i.e. those areas which are accommodated by the poorest in one unit of the settlement and are in a deteriorated condition.
  SITUATION IN SLOVENIA
   There is no special definition of vulnerable groups.
Acts define the following groups of children, pupils and students who due to personal, socio-economic or cultural circumstances are entitled to assistance or special measures:
· Persons belonging to the Italian and Hungarian ethnic communities have the right to education in their mother tongue and to form and develop education in ethnically mixed areas.;
· Members of the Roma community are defined as a special group whose rights are regulated by legal provisions in the Constitution of the Republic of Slovenia. The exercise of special rights is regulated by the Roma Community Act
and, in the field of education, by the Kindergarten Act and the Basic54 School Act;
· Migrants (foreigners): the rights of foreign children are regulated in detail by the Kindergarten Act, the Basic
School Act, the Gymnasium Act and the Vocational Education Act; the Asylum Seekers Act ensures the right to
education of refugees and asylum seekers;
· Based on the Kindergarten Act and the Basic School Act children receiving hospital treatment are entitled to pre- school and elementary education in hospital.
   54 “Basic” is officially used in English translation. It should, however, be understood as “Elementary”.
36

CAHROM (2012)18
   In accordance with the education objectives in the Organization and Financing of Education Act, children from less favourable social and economic environments are entitled to receive support and assistance of a pre-school institution or school.
According to the governmental decision, there is a scale of regions according to their state of development :
· The so-called index of developmental endangerment, which is calculated on the basis of pondering between the indexes of development, endangerment and developmental possibilities ;
· Indexes of development: GDP per inhabitant; gross value-added per employed; gross basis before income tax per inhabitant; number of workplaces per active population ;
· Indexes of endangerment: index of ageing population; registered unemployment rate and employment rate;
· Indexes of development possibilities: average number of years of schooling; equipment with municipal infrastructure, share of Natura 2000 areas, index of settlement.
  SITUATION IN THE UNITED KINGDOM
   It is very unclear whom the Department for Education (DFE) refers to as vulnerable children but certainly this group includes look after children, SEN children, those on the Child Protection register and those whose families are on benefits.
Families who are on benefits can apply for free school meals for their children and this will generate more money for the school through the Governments new Pupil Premium. The Government has put 1.25 billion pounds for this academic year and to rise to 2.5 billion in 2014-2015.
Socially excluded localities are an issue for the governments and town planners. Isolating communities leads to ghettoising these communities. Children and young people in these localities should have the same expectations of an excellent education as any other community.
Floor target developed by the Department of Education were set in 2000 by the Department of Education to help reduce the gap between the poorest areas and disadvantaged groups and the rest of the country. Each local authority has to prioritise areas of improvement and to minimum standard for poor areas and disadvantaged groups to improve and “close the gap”.
 37

Questions 6 and 7:
· Do you test children before entry into school?
· Do the tests take into consideration the reality of living conditions (families who speak Romani
language at home, isolated and poor living environment, bi-size families, illiteracy of parents, etc.)?
CAHROM (2012)18
   SITUATION IN THE CZECH REPUBLIC
   According to the Framework Educational Programme for Elementary Education with an Annex on Mild Mental Disabled pupils (MMD), pupils who score in IQ tests between 60 and 70 points are labelled as “mild mental disabled” and are directed to these “practical schools”.
One of the crucial causes of the school failure of Roma pupils at elementary schools includes the process of diagnosing the special educational needs of pupils (“testing”). The psychological diagnostic test itself does not take social background into account. The system of testing itself takes the children's IQ as granted and static figure. Moreover, the working language of these tests is Czech, therefore the ability to “measure” children from different or mixed language background is very limited.
  SITUATION IN THE SLOVAK REPUBLIC
   Approximately 60% of the children in special education in Slovakia during the 2008/2009 academic year were Roma. Roma are reportedly 28 times more likely to be assigned to a special school than non-Roma, up to 50% of them erroneously.
The tests for placing children in these schools do not take into account Roma children’s language barriers.
  SITUATION IN HUNGARY
   By Decree at the age of six (i.e. the year when in August the child is six years old) - and at the parents’ request - a committee examines if the child is physically, mentally, affectively and socially mature to start school. The Committee gives an expert opinion and a recommendation.
As a result of measures implemented in recent years, there has been a decrease in the number of pupils classified as having special educational needs due to a mild mental disability. Decree No. 4/2010. (I.19.)OKM identifies the relevant procedure and the professional requirements of the tests and examinations serving as the basis of the subsequent expert opinion.
These measures include the extraordinary reviews conducted as part of the “From the desk at the back” programme, the amendment of the relevant legal rules, and measures framing the establishment of the diagnosis of mildly mentally or intellectually disabled.
National competence test - standardised test measuring mathematical and reading skills in every year - students have an identification number. Institutions get a feedback about the results. It forecasts chances of the students getting into secondary education and success in the job market.
“Text evaluation” in the first 1.5 years in every end of the term. Previously only text feedback in the first 2 years.
The authorities have taken measures to remedy the impact of ability testing on Roma children and their resulting overrepresentation in remedial education. In 2007, an amendment to the Act on Public Education established a distinction between organic (physical, intellectual impairments, autism, etc.) and non-organic disabilities (adaptive, learning and behavioural difficulties). Pupils with organic disabilities are channelled to remedial schools, while children with non-organic disabilities are supposed to be educated in mainstream kindergarten and schools, with additional support.
Nonetheless, mild mental disability, which is the most frequent diagnosis for Roma children, is considered in Hungary to be an organic disability. Consequently, the amendments to the law did not have a substantial impact on the overrepresentation of Roma in remedial schools. Moreover, there is no clear diagnostic procedure, which renders the whole examination inconsistent and leaves space for bias.
  SITUATION IN SLOVENIA
 38

CAHROM (2012)18
   Testing before entry into school is not compulsory and is normally not used. Testing for special needs does not exist (for more details, see reply to question 1).
Pupils are tested when they are in school. At the end of year 6 and year 9, pupils are assessed in national examinations in the mother tongue and mathematics, in year 6 also in a foreign language, and in year 9 in a subject determined by the Minister. Assessment in year 6 is not mandatory. Results do not affect pupils’ grades; they are only additional information about their knowledge levels.
For pupils who need learning assistance, schools organise remedial classes, and for those who go beyond the prescribed knowledge standards, supplementary classes are available. Schools are free to adapt assessment to pupils who are enrolled in music schools, promising athletes, pupils with special needs and, since 2008/2009, to foreign pupils. The rules of assessment and examination are stipulated by the Basic School Act and by different rules and regulations.
  SITUATION IN THE UNITED KINGDOM
  No child or young person is tested before entry to school.
Pupils are tested when they are in school on the Early Years Foundation Stage Profile (baseline assessment). They are later tested at age 11 and 16 to measure progress. Statutory assessments (tests) at the end of each Key Stage are outlined below:
These are national tests and they help the Government to assess how well the school is doing. In the British education system, schools are ultimately the tested ones, not the children. It is a matter of providing quality education.
Schools are challenged and monitored by the Office for Standards in Education (OFSTED) to improve standards if the children are not performing well in the tests. When schools are inspected, inspectors will take into account groups of children in the school, including Roma. So schools have to improve outcomes, as well as their teaching and learning methods (solid pedagogy). Roma are often independent learners so they should be taught the way they learn best. Children are supposed to take responsibility for their own learning. Children and teachers set together learning targets.
Schools which fail meet floor targets (set in maths and English) and improve their children’ attainment significantly will go into special measures. Head teachers’ performance management is related to their pay, which itself is linked to how vulnerable groups perform educationally.
Apart from the abovementioned key stages tests, children and young people have continuous teacher-led assessments termly to measure progress.
  · Early Years Foundation Stage Profile (usually age 5): children are tested as a baseline to test how well the school does at teaching that child to improve outcomes.
· Key Stage 1 (KS1): tasks and tests during Year 2 (usually age 7).
· Key Stage 2 (KS2): National Curriculum tests in English and maths taken at the end of Year 6 (usually age 11).
· Key Stage 3 (KS3): teacher assessment judgements at the end of KS3 (usually age 14).
· Key Stage 4 (KS4): (usually age 16).
 39

Question 8:
· What are the incentives in place for children placed in special schools (free meals, free textbooks) and for special schools themselves (extra salaries for teachers, state/local additional funding for special schools, etc.)?
CAHROM (2012)18
   SITUATION IN THE CZECH REPUBLIC
   Health disabled children get higher “normative” sum per child. Therefore special education gets more funds to provide education of these children. Unfortunately both social disadvantaged and health disadvantaged children do not get any kind of such financial support. Regular schools teaching children from these two groups of special needs children are left only with regular amounts of money, but they have to provide more adapted teaching. This is one of the systemic reasons why Roma children are so often labelled as light mentally disabled.
The schools receive 2.7 times more per child with mild mental disability. On the contrary, they receive no financial support for enrolling purely socially disadvantaged children or children with physical disadvantages.
Since last school year, parents must give their "informed consent" to enrolling their children into the "practical primary schools".
  SITUATION IN THE SLOVAK REPUBLIC
   The education system as it stands provides financial incentives for special schools (or special classes in standard schools) to continue to enrol high numbers of Roma pupils. These schools receive more funding per children than mainstream schools - the normative sum is more than twice as high as in mainstream education - and the same applies to special classes in mainstream schools. It is therefore attractive for schools to keep Roma in special schools and/or open special classes in mainstream schools.
Furthermore, special schools are funded by regional authorities, whereas mainstream schools are funded by municipalities; therefore, transfers between schools result in competition for funding between the different levels of authority.
There are also incentives for Roma parents to enrol their children in special schools, among which the fact that pupils in special schools/classes receive higher marks and the educational expectations are lower. Additionally, there are material advantages, such as free meals, and the overall approach to pupils is more individualised.
The fact that the practical schools are provided with almost three times more funding than mainstream schools in direct proportion to the number of registered children is an incentive for schools to enrol Roma children even when they may not be disabled.
The allowance for improving conditions for education and upbringing of SDE students is granted (100€ in year 2012) to the school founders under § 107 paragraph 4 of the Act in question for students from families, the average income of which in the preceding six consecutive years was equal to or below the subsistence minimum (as specified by separate legislation).
The Notice of the Ministry of Education enabled using the allowance even for the purpose of covering the fee of a pedagogical assistant. Originally this institution was intended to provide students from MRC with a Roma teacher’s assistant, ideally from the given community, fluent in Romani and the local dialect. Currently out of the total number of more than 700 teacher’s assistants (tutors) only a minimum are fluent in Romani.
Another important institution that ought to assist SDE students is the so called “zero grade”. The minimum number of students per class in a zero grade is 8, while maximum is 16. Per each child enrolled in the zero-grade class, the school will receive 200 % of the regular normative sum. For many teachers this is an important and meaningful tool for SDE pupils to catch up in social and cognitive area with children who are raised in normal environment so that they could eventually move into the “education mainstream”. The school having SDE students should employ teachers’ assistants. The pupils of the zero-class grade usually form a homogenous class and remain in the same class throughout their elementary school studies. SDE students are eligible for an allowance from the Ministry of Labour and Social Affairs which takes the form of school lunches, school supplies, and also a motivation allowance for the child’s regular school attendance.
 40

CAHROM (2012)18
  SITUATION IN HUNGARY
   Schools receive an extra fee for special needs children but there are nowadays strict rules for “diagnosing” a child with special needs.
Following the adoption of desegregation legislation, only those schools that engage in desegregation receive benefits.
  SITUATION IN SLOVENIA
   There are specific support measures for the education of children from less favourable social and economic environments (in schools generally, not as special incentives to place children in special schools):
· Children, whose parents submit certificate about vulnerability due to the social situation of the family to a social work centre, have an advantage for admission to the pre-school institutions.
· The counselling service in a pre-school institution or school assists in searching and providing possible forms of support and assistance to the child’s, pupil’s or student’s family (e.g. assistance in seeking for scholarships, the programme for overcoming financial difficulties, the organisation of studying space in schools, assistance in ensuring textbooks and school supplies, the organization and coordination of additional assistance to students whose parents are unable to offer help etc.).
· Schools may offer students individual or group help.
· Pre-school institutions and schools cooperate with the relevant social work centre.
Support measures carried out under the Strategy of Education of Roma in the Republic of Slovenia include:
- a proper scholarship policy;
- additional funding for individual and group support to Roma,
- more favourable norms and standards for classes wherein the Roma children are integrated;
- financing of nutrition, textbooks, school trips, etc.
  SITUATION IN THE UNITED KINGDOM
   Families who are on benefits can apply for free school meals for their children and this will generate more money for the school through the Governments new Pupil Premium. This support measure concerns, however, mainstream schools and is not an incentive to place children in “special schools”.
In the United Kingdom, all textbooks are free as is paper, pens, etc.
Schools can apply for extra funding called FFI (Funding for Inclusion) for pupils/students with special educational needs (SEN) to offer the child more support in classes or in intervention classes. Schools are accountable on how the money is spent. See reply to question 3 about the 3 different SEN levels.
 41

Question 9:
· How to make education practices more interactive, co-operative and inclusive?
CAHROM (2012)18
   SITUATION IN THE CZECH REPUBLIC
   In the Czech Republic, several projects concerning teachers’ training and interactive, participative and co-operative methods are being developed. None of them is among central methodologies published by the Ministry of Education or other central bodies. The mainstreaming of such methods is done exclusively by the NGO sector and some passionate experts at universities.
  SITUATION IN THE SLOVAK REPUBLIC
   The Methodology-Pedagogical Centre in Prešov implements the national project "Education of teaching staff for the inclusion of marginalised Roma communities", which is financed under the Education Operational Programme. The aim of the project is to improve the professional competence of teaching staff and national professional staff involved in the education of the pupils coming from marginalised Roma communities. The main objectives of the activities are:
• to train pedagogical staff to obtain the professional competence required to deal with the specific educational needs of pupils coming from MRC;
• to create an educational school model using the Day-long Educational System as an instrument of inclusion of pupils coming from MRC;
• to promote the effective implementation of the pedagogical school model with the Day-long Education System;
• to modernise the teaching process within the participating primary schools by using ICT technologies.
Strategic activities in the project are: education teaching staff, professional staff for a day-long educational system in primary schools and support technical activities of the national project.
The target group of the project are pedagogical staff, teachers’ assistants, elementary school pupils coming from socially disadvantaged backgrounds (age structure: 6-18 years old) and their parents, as well as the other employees of the state administration and self-government co-operating with MRC.
Some of
• • • •
• •
the most important outputs of the project include:
the development and implementation of programmes of continuous education;
the creation of learning resources for the pedagogical staff;
a platform for distance education;
the establishment and implementation of a pedagogical school model with a Day-long Education System in 200 elementary schools with respectively more than 20% of pupils from socially disadvantaged backgrounds;
the development of a methodology of teaching resources for students from disadvantaged backgrounds; the implementation of awareness-raising programmes for socially-disadvantaged parents of these pupils.
Part of the project is devoted to the modernisation of the teaching process through interactive didactic systems and devices, as well as through the electronic support of activities and outputs. Schools are also involved in networking and sharing of experience through the Website of the project.
  SITUATION IN HUNGARY
   Measures include motivating schools to learn and apply co-operative, modern practices by a surplus of financial resources. It is also important to underpin the process with continuous pedagogical support and supervision.
Another possible measure is network-learning with mutual visits between schools to exchange of good practices. In Hungary, the School-Net Programme supports the development and distribution of exemplary educational programmes which promote equal chances of socially disadvantaged students in education. The programme seeks to support educational programmes which endeavour to reform the school itself, form the attitudes of teachers and the whole pedagogical programme of the school in order to make the school institutions inclusive. The schools get funding to develop their already existing programmes and to make their programmes adaptable for other schools.
 42

CAHROM (2012)18
  SITUATION IN SLOVENIA
   Under the Roma Education Strategy, a network including all schools with Roma children was set up in view of promoting the exchange of experience and good practices among teachers. Additional teacher training is also provided.
Teachers are required to observe the stipulations made by law and the Roma Education Strategy regarding individualisation and differentiation and additional learning support.
  SITUATION IN THE UNITED KINGDOM
   Based on the British experience, here are some suggestions:
· Early years education should be provided for all (early intervention is key).
· Formal education should start at 3 for 15 hours per week and should be free to all children.
· Families should be involved in the child’s education.
· Romani culture, history and lifestyle should be reflected in schools.
· Roma communities should be invited to launches and celebrations.
· Race equality training should be organised and policies and action plans developed.
· The SEAL (Social and Emotional Aspects of Learning) programme (which is successfully run in most English schools) should be used. SEAL is a comprehensive, whole-school approach to promoting the social and emotional skills that underpin effective learning, positive behaviour, regular attendance, staff effectiveness and the emotional health and well-being of all who learn and work in schools.
· Clear messages to all should be transmitted via school prospectus and websites.
 43

Question 10:
· How to work with and involve Roma parents and families to convince them to send their children to regular schools despite incentives for special schools or their fear for assimilation, mixed environment or hostility from non-Roma children/parents/teachers?
CAHROM (2012)18
   SITUATION IN THE CZECH REPUBLIC
   The practice of several schools in the Czech Republic shows that it is high standard of education, individual approach, positive school and class climate and conscious work with all kind of tensions among children that makes a school attractive to all families including Roma families. The work with Roma families itself is mostly done by NGOs providing social work. Several schools use Roma assistants to do this work.
One of the envisaged actions under the Concept of In-Time Care for Children from Socio-Culturally Disadvantaged Environments prepared by the Ministry of Education is to systematically work on the attitudes of the parents of disadvantaged children and increase their awareness of the positive impact of their children's attendance in early care on their educational achievement.
Some Roma parents have preferred the former "special" schools for their children, unaware that attending such schools would mean their offspring would lose the opportunity to attend higher education and a chance at a better future. Despite the recent reforms, the 2012 School Inspectorate’s investigation shows there are still cases of parents who do not want to transfer their children into mainstream education even though school guidance counsellors recommend the transfer. The report mentions that, since 2009, 38 pupils in 15 of the schools monitored were educated according to a "special education" regime at the wishes of their parents, even though they were actually intellectually healthy.
According to the Czech Education Ministry, recent legislative changes regarding this issue will become more apparent from the start of this school year. According to the new rules, pupils may only be assigned into the "practical primary schools" for one year at the very most. After that year, experts will have to verify whether the pupil enrolled in such a school still belongs there. In the case of pupils who are socially disadvantaged, the time in the "practical primary school" has been shortened to five months.
  SITUATION IN THE SLOVAK REPUBLIC
   Roma parents often value the almost entirely Roma environment in which children are not bullied as they often are in mainstream schools (by majority pupils) or discriminated against by teachers. More generally, it appears that Roma parents are rarely well informed and aware of the consequences of special education and of other existing options for their children.
Under the National Project developed by the Methodology-Pedagogical Centre in Prešov (see reply to question 9 above), a programme for further education called “Co-operation with Roma parents and Roma communities” was developed.
  SITUATION IN HUNGARY
   A number of state and private scholarship programmes, mentoring programmes and talent fostering programmes help to promote the educational success of disadvantaged elementary school pupils and secondary school students and students in higher education, including disadvantaged Roma, such as:
A. Programmes designed and financed by the State:
• The Integrative Pedagogical System. The programme has been running since 2003 and its main aim is to promote inclusive education and the equal distribution of multiply disadvantaged children in peer classes to ensure equal opportunities for them. Approximately 300,000 children, 90,000 of which have multiple disadvantages, as well as 15,000 teachers, take part in the programme annually. Approximately 1,600 public educational institutions were involved in 2011. The programme operates in two ways: on the one hand, it supports measures promoting equal opportunities; on the other hand, it issues wage supplements for teachers working with children from disadvantaged backgrounds. The theoretical base of the programmes is quality education based on individual diversity, therefore any institutional development and design need to align with that. The integrative pedagogical programme has a special status among the programmes of the State Secretariat of Social Inclusion. The programme is exclusively financed by the Hungarian State Budget, which provides more than 7 billion HUF (app. 24 million EUR) through budget estimates to the programme annually.
• The Higher Education Mentor Programme has operated since 2005.
 44

CAHROM (2012)18
 •
•
•
• •
The scholarship programme (‘MACIKA’) was first launched in 2000. Managed by the Hungarian Public Foundation for the Roma, it merged with the ‘On the Road’ (Útravaló) Scholarship Programme in 2010. This merged programme covers 20,000 students with almost 11,000 mentor-teachers participating in the programme on an on-going basis. The programme is exclusively financed by the Hungarian State Budget, which provides more than 2 billion HUF (app. 7 million EUR) through budget estimate to the programme annually.
The Arany János Programmes:
- The Arany János Talent Fostering Programme for Disadvantaged Students was launched in 2000. A
sub-programme was devised in 2004 under the title ‘Arany János’ Talent Fostering Boarding Facility Programme for Disadvantaged Students;
- The Arany János Talent Fostering Boarding Facility – Vocational School Programme for Students with Multiple Disadvantages, was launched in 2007;
B. Programmes designed by the State and financed by EU funds:
TANODA extracurricular learning programmes.
C. Programmes designed and financed by non-governmental organisations:
The Romaversitas Foundation is operated by non-state and EU funding and was established in 1996; Scholarships have been granted by the Roma Education Fund in the last five years.
    SITUATION IN SLOVENIA
   The Project “Increasing the Social and Cultural Capital in Areas Populated by Members of the Roma Community” has started on 1 June 2010 and will finish at the end of August 2013. Its emphasis is placed on the development and implementation of various models and concepts of pre-school education of Roma children, the organisation of learning assistance for Roma pupils and secondary school students with the aim of raising the quality of learning and school performance, understanding, encouraging motivation and active self-managed learning. The project is carried out by the Institute for Ethnic Studies. The main activities are:
– Analysis of demographic spatial features of Roma settlements in Slovenia;
– Promotion of the importance of knowledge and education and awareness-raising of the Roma
population;
– Motivating children and parents to attend educational institutions regularly;
– Establishment of day centres (Roma Education Incubators) where the following activities are carried
out: social activities and workshops for pre-school and school children and their parents; homework and study help; workshops for parents in social topics of interest;
– Development and implementation of various forms of extra-curricular and leisure activities for Roma children, youth and parents in the Roma community;
– Practical multi-lingual activities for the whole family; extra-curricular activities for all;
– Education and training of teachers and other professional staff with an emphasis on problem-oriented
practical activities to promote the staff's motivation;
– Encouraging those members of the Roma community who possess a degree to serve as role models and help motivate Roma children to learn and develop their potential.
Under the Roma Community Act, Slovenia has committed itself to ensure special rights to the Roma community in the field of co-decision in public matters that concern members of the Roma community (sectorial legislation), implementing national regulations and regulations adopted by self-managing local communities, as well as special programmes and measures adopted by national authorities and organs of self-managed local communities.
Under the Roma Education Strategy,
• the Ministry of Education and Sport has been co-financing education of adult Roma by Institutions for adult Education;
• Young Roma intellectuals endeavour for the awareness raising of members of the Roma community about the significance of knowledge and education through the Roma Academic Club.
• Numerous symposia on enhanced inclusion of Roma children in education and training system were carried out.
 45

CAHROM (2012)18
  SITUATION IN THE UNITED KINGDOM
   Based on the British experience, here are some suggestions:
· All Roma special schools should be closed down.
· Work with families both in school and at home should be developed.
· Third sector and voluntary contributions should be used.
· Legislation should be reformed at the top.
· More rigorous attention should be paid to improve school attendance.
· Anti-racist, anti-bullying policies and buddy systems should be put in place.
· Both staff and children race equality ambassadors should be elected/designated.
· Roma parents should be consulted and key Roma parents should be asked to play a bigger role.
 46

Question 11:
· How to work with cultural, linguistic and social specificities of Roma children?
CAHROM (2012)18
   SITUATION IN THE CZECH REPUBLIC
   Several schools in the Czech Republic work with the history of Roma in the country and few of them use special methods of teaching the Czech language. However, the majority of schools do not work with these specific working methods.
  SITUATION IN THE SLOVAK REPUBLIC
   Within the schooling system of Slovakia, there is only one officially recognised school where Slovak and Romani languages are both used, i.e. in the eight-grade private high school of Zeferin J. Malla in Kremnica. Besides this school, there are three other secondary schools and two primary schools instructing in the Romani language but they are not yet officially registered as minority schools by the Ministry of Education.
In 2010 the Romani language, literature and culture curriculum effectiveness were evaluated experimentally, overseen by the State Pedagogical Institute. The evaluations led to developing content and performance standards for these courses and in including the subject “Romani language and literature” among optional courses for the General Certificate of Education (by amending a Decree on Completion of Studies at High Schools). A persisting problem here is the continuing acute shortage of teachers skilled in the aforementioned courses as well as a lack of textbooks and other materials.
  SITUATION IN HUNGARY
   In Hungary, 27 % of the Roma populations speak their own language(s) but almost all Roma speak Hungarian. Minority education provides children with the opportunity to learn their languages, to be educated in their languages and learn about their culture.
If the parents of eight children apply, organising minority education on the settlement is obligatory for the maintainer of the school.
Early childhood education has a crucial role in helping Roma and socially disadvantaged children overcome linguistic barriers.
  SITUATION IN SLOVENIA
   Following the adoption of the Roma Community Act in 2007, an inter-ministerial working group was set up. At its second meeting of 23 January 2008, it adopted a methodology for drafting measures aimed at improving the status of the Roma community and for its more rapid and better integration into society that would ensure at the same time the preservation of linguistic, cultural and other ethnic characteristics of the Roma community.
One of the main goals of the National Programme of Measures for Roma of the Government of the Republic of Slovenia for the Period 2010–2015 is to preserve and develop cultural, informational activities of the Roma community, to preserve and develop different variants of the Romani language, as well as to raise raising awareness both among the majority population about the existence, culture, customs and traditions of the Roma community, and among the Roma minority population about their rights and obligations as citizens.
Within the chapter of the National Programme related to cultural and information activities, the goals include:
· creation of conditions for the protection of special rights of Roma community members (special programme);
· monitoring and promotion of integration of Roma cultural activities (integration programme);
· creating conditions for training and employing Roma in the field of culture, in due consideration of the gender aspect and provision of special services for authors, artists and professionals working in the field of Roma culture.
The following activities defined in the Roma Education Strategy pertinent to Romani culture and language have already been carried out:
· The standardization of the Roma language is being carried out as a basis for its teaching;
· The syllabus for a course in Roma culture was drafted and adopted and Roma culture was introduced as one of the optional subjects in elementary schools.
Additionally, texts (books) in the Romani language were published.
 47

CAHROM (2012)18
  SITUATION IN THE UNITED KINGDOM
   One of the most successful programmes designed to the teaching of English to new-to-English pupils is the STEPs programme. The younger the child the quicker he/she will learn the language. It takes approximately six months for a 3- 5 year-old child.
The main features of the British approach dealing with cultural, linguistic and social specificities of Roma children are the following:
· Children should be submerged in the language as much as possible;
· Gifted and talented students (i.e. in music) should be put into higher academic classes;
· Romani culture, history and lifestyle should be reflected in schools.
 48

Question 12:
· How far can school mediators and teachers’ assistants help overcoming these cultural, linguistic and social barriers? What are other measures in place to build bridges between Roma and non-Roma?
CAHROM (2012)18
   SITUATION IN THE CZECH REPUBLIC
   Roma assistants are important because their role is not only to improve the quality of the measures but also to work as mediators with families and parents in order to engage and involve them in their children’s education.
Czech schools conceive Roma teaching assistants as one of the most effective measure to support Roma children’s education. However, the funds and the number of assistants are insufficient.
In the schools visited in Prague, Roma teachers’ assistants are considered as positive role models. Several Roma pupils indicated that they wanted to become teacher’s assistant when they grow up.
A Programme “Teaching Assistants for Socially Disadvantaged Children, Pupils and Students” has been developed under the framework of the Roma Integration Concept of the Czech Government for 2010–2013. In that context, the Ministry of Education - in conjunction with the regions - is considering developing a methodological handbook (the aim is to create a working group at the level of the Ministry of Education with the participation of staff from the regional government offices and Centres for the Support of Inclusive Education).
The output from the working group will be methodological material which will clearly define the competencies of teaching assistants and the activities which they should perform in schools and teaching establishments, as well as recommendations and clarifications of the teaching assistant's job. The aim of the current efforts by the Ministry of Education is to strengthen the skills of the school and schools advisory centres in respect of pupils from socio-culturally disadvantaged backgrounds.
The aim of the measure is:
• To improve the professional competence of teaching staff so that they are able to react to the specific needs of
these children;
• To change the climate in schools and ensure openness of the education system to children with different cultural
and social experiences.
The training should be aimed at developing the skills of teachers in:
• The diagnosis of pupils' educational needs;
• Setting up and implementing individual educational plans related to their specific needs arising from the
different cultural and social experiences of these pupils;
• Effective cooperation with the parents of disadvantaged children in implementing these plans;
• Incorporate the topics of inclusive education, work with children from sociocultural disadvantaged backgrounds
and the topic of Roma history, culture and language into the educational programmes of secondary schools with
a teacher training emphasis;
• Develop recommendations for universities also to include training for student teachers in the aforementioned
areas in their accredited fields of study;
• Make inclusive education and the upbringing of children from socio-culturally disadvantaged backgrounds part
of further training and methodological support for teaching staff in their normal work;
• Linked to this methodological support is regular supervision, which permits teachers to obtain an overview of
their own work and solve everyday problems which they face in teaching;
• A key part in methodological support and training for teaching staff is played by the Centres for Support for
Inclusive Education which have been set up in each region.
  SITUATION IN THE SLOVAK REPUBLIC
   Teachers’ assistants are considered to be an effective instrument to improve the results of Roma students and co- operation with Roma families. More than 20 school mediators were trained in 2011 by the Council of Europe Roma mediators’ training programme ROMED. The challenges to develop sustainable financial support for teachers’ assistants and to create a legislative status for their work remain.
The school having SDE students should employ teachers’ assistants.
 49

SITUATION IN HUNGARY
Roma assistants and mediators can help by strengthening the links between the family and the school, by convincing the parents, by seeing an example (role model).
CAHROM (2012)18
     SITUATION IN SLOVENIA
   The inclusion of Roma assistants in the educational process is part of the objectives of the Strategy of Education for Roma in the Republic of Slovenia adopted in 2004. The post of Roma assistant is considered as an important measure for raising the school achievement and attendance of Roma children. The role of the Roma assistant is to help children overcome emotional and linguistic impediments during inclusion in kindergarten or school, and to act as a liaison between the kindergarten or school and the Roma community.
Under the Roma Education Strategy:
• A professional standard for Roma assistants was adopted;
• A project introducing and educating Roma assistants is being implemented;
• Annual programmes addressing intercultural co-existence are prepared and implemented by the Roma Union of
Slovenia;
• Training seminars for teachers are being carried out every year;
• Schools projects and other activities fostering intercultural dialogue have been carried out.
Under the Project "Successful inclusion of Roma in educational processes", Roma assistants have been employed and financed from the European Social Fund (ESF). The first project (June 2008-August 2011) was co-ordinated by the Roma Union of Slovenia and the Ministry of Education and Sport and received 1,593,100 Euros from the European Social Fund.
The project selected in the call for tenders of the European Social Fund in July 2011, entitled “Successful inclusion of Roma in educational processes II", builds on the results of the project of the Roma Union of Slovenia, on the current project conducted by the Institute for Ethnic Studies, as well as on the solutions from the Strategy and its supplement from 2011. The project Phase II will last from 1 September 2011 until 31 August 2014. The contract value is 1,675,680 Euros. The project co-ordinator is the Adult Education Institute of Kočevje.
  SITUATION IN THE UNITED KINGDOM
   School mediators and teaching assistants along with all school staff and local educational authorities need to work in partnership to build bridges. This change involves everyone. The school staff who works closely with the families will be the one who supports both Roma and non Roma on a daily basis. They need 100% support.
In the United Kingdom, schools employ parent support workers, learning mentors and/or attendance officers. As part of their jobs they will work with all families to support them in accessing education for their children. This often requires home visit for the harder to reach families. It is vital that all children attend school every day and is part of the school’s responsibility to ensure this happens. In the United Kingdom, authorities pay for specialist teams to work with Gypsy, Travellers and Roma as an addition resource that schools can call on. These teams have the skills, experience and expertise to work closely with the families and schools. Over the year they have gained the trust of the families and find that inclusion in education has improved. These teams are known as Traveller Education Services - TES. The National Association Of Teachers of Travellers and other professionals –NATT+ is a national association which was established to support the TESs. There are also various Gypsy, Traveller and Roma 3rd sector organisations that support the work of the TESs and support GRT communities on issues of health, housing, jobs, finance, crime and education.
 50

Questions 13 & 14:
CAHROM (2012)18
 · How to prevent and combat hostility of parents/majority population?
· How to avoid that non-Roma parents withdraw their children from regular schools if more Roma
children are enrolled?
  SITUATION IN THE CZECH REPUBLIC
   Two of so-called “Roma schools” that the CAHROM group of experts visited in Prague are proposing some ad hoc solutions to attract non-Roma parents, such as early teaching of foreign languages (English or French), putting emphasis on artistic activities, providing computer classes, etc. However, the effects of those measures remain limited.
The practice of several schools in the Czech Republic, including the 2nd school visited in Prague by the CAHROM group of experts, shows that it is high standard of education, individual approach, positive school and class climate, as well as conscious work with all kind of tensions among children that makes a school attractive to all families, including Roma.
At the end of the day, since parents in the Czech Republic have the right to choose the school, the school can do little to avoid this. Schools are obliged to accept children from the surroundings of the school environment but parents have the possibility to choose any school. We have seen examples in Prague where parents cross the city to bring their children in schools they consider better for their children.
  SITUATION IN THE SLOVAK REPUBLIC
 Despite some incentives to enrol Roma pupils in mainstream schools (by providing additional funding per student), non- Roma parents often oppose the enrolment of Roma pupils in mainstream schools.
  SITUATION IN HUNGARY
   Measures addressing hostility of non-Roma parents include:
• communication through media, forums, mentors, and mediators, as well as by high rank public figures (see for
instance the Hódmezővásárhely model);
• high-quality education programmes (Hejőkeresztúr model);
• involvement of parents (Generációk közti együttműködés).
  SITUATION IN SLOVENIA
   Roma assistants are a good tool to combat hostility of non Roma parents as they are a bridge between Roma parents, school, teachers and other parents. Roma educational incubators are another example how the majority and Roma can work together for the benefit of their children. When children and parents are more co-operative (doing things together) such hostility is rare. Addition help for Roma children in school, when such help is needed and provided, also helps overcoming barriers because in this way the majority (other children) can be present at school without interruptions.
Other possibilities include meetings of parents at school; so called “school for parents”, which are financed by local communities and normally carried out in schools; projects carried out by non-governmental organisations, etc.
  SITUATION IN THE UNITED KINGDOM
   Here is a list of suggestions implemented in the UK to avoid hostility of non-Roma/migrant communities’ parents:
- Open and consistent message through website, prospectus, newsletters and notice boards;
- School are clearly reflecting the community in staffing, displays, equipment, etc.;
- Through legislation;
- All committed to inclusive education;
- School Open days;
- Launch - welcome booklets ;
- Positive press coverage;
- Work with 3rd sector and voluntary organisations;
- Roma parental workers – as highly respected members of the school staff;
- Accountability from the Government;
- Cluster working – schools supporting schools;
 51

CAHROM (2012)18
   - Clear on catchment areas for the schools;
- All school good schools or strong school giving the same messages to the Roma;
- Supplementary schools, i.e. extra schools run at the weekends usually by community members paid for by the
community to learn home language;
- Awareness raising – training for ALL staff on Roma culture, history and lifestyle in a positive and celebratory way;
- Awards ceremonies – here in Leeds – details on the GRT Leeds and NATT websites;
- Motivational speakers – professional Roma role models;
- Hubs of excellent practice - raise the profile;
- Involve the parents;
- Afterschool homework clubs.
 52

Questions 15 & 16:
CAHROM (2012)18
 · What can be done by mainstream schools to accommodate the needs of socially excluded Roma?
· How to prepare regular elementary schools to be able to educate disadvantaged children?
  SITUATION IN THE CZECH REPUBLIC
   Due to individual and structural condition obstacles, it is not easy for Roma pupils and students to continue their studies in the secondary and tertiary education systems.
In order to accommodate the needs of socially-excluded Roma pupils, mainstream schools should:
• create the position of (Roma) teaching assistant;
• create welcoming environment;
• support children individually in achieving educational requirements (not lower than for non-Roma pupils);
The educational system as a whole should:
• adapt educational programmes;
• educate teachers;
• provide financial support for the schools to implement supportive measures.
Under the framework of the Roma Integration Concept of the Czech Government for 2010–2013, a Support Programme for Roma pupils from elementary schools when transferring them to the secondary and tertiary education systems has been developed. The aim of this programme is to:
• offer support to Roma pupils and students in improving their school results and eliminating barriers for the transfer to a higher educational level;
• prevent the premature departure of Roma children from the education process by taking the following steps:
a) Closely link the activities of the schools advisory centres with the work of schools. The work of the staff at schools advisory centres should be closely linked to schools, where children requiring it should be offered individualised support in the form of targeted counselling, and the development and implementation of individual educational plans with the maximum involvement of pupils and their parents. Part of this support should also be the provision of additional specialised and related services from specialists.
b) Link the work of the school to tutoring programmes, to improve the educational achievement of Roma children from socio-culturally disadvantaged backgrounds The tutoring programme should operate intensively in particular for Roma children in the second level of elementary school where their achievement is demonstrably lower and the absence rate increases, but where success in the second level has a fundamental impact on the transfer of pupils into secondary education. An important part in this area is played by the non-profit sector which offers tutoring programmes at local level and links them into a whole series of supplementary development activities.
c) To apply a comprehensive approach to resolving the position of pupils from socio-culturally disadvantaged backgrounds.
  SITUATION IN THE SLOVAK REPUBLIC
 In the context of the on-going curriculum reform in the Slovak educational system, there is a need to introduce human rights-based multicultural education for all children both in primary and secondary schools.
  SITUATION IN HUNGARY
   The teachers often lack specialised training to teach individually integrated pupils “with special needs” in mainstream classes. Such training should be provided at a larger scale.
Methodology-based change and a change of attitudes in school environment are inevitable because these make the change sustainable.
Desegregation should remain a top priority as much as co-operation between experts in different fields (teachers, child protection service, health care, kindergarten teachers, etc.) for improving chances of disadvantaged children.
Involving parents and improving the relationship between the school and the family are also key aspects.
 53

CAHROM (2012)18
  SITUATION IN SLOVENIA
   One of the key factors is consultation with the Roma population, and in particular with Roma pupils, about their needs.
See in that respect the Roma Education Incubators, which is one of the actions of the Project “Increasing the Social and Cultural Capital in Areas Populated by Members of the Roma Community” (described under question 10 above).
In Slovenia, the project "Vocational information for the Roma" included an extensive survey on educational and professional interests of the Roma. The survey was carried out in October and November 2005, and the population surveyed was the active Roma population in Dolenjska, Bela Krajina, Posavje, Kočevsko and Grosupeljsko. The survey was carried out on a sample of 774 Roma aged between 15 and 45. The survey showed that 80% of respondents did not finish elementary school, more than 90% were unemployed, and 45% expressed the wish to be included in vocational training programmes, but anticipated hindrances and difficulties.
  SITUATION IN THE UNITED KINGDOM
   One prepares regular elementary schools to be able to educate disadvantaged children
• through Continuous Professional Development (CPD) and training for all staff;
• through improving teaching and learning and pedagogy. Again through training, lesson observations and school to school support.
It is the schools responsibility to removing barriers to learning.
If the child comes from a dysfunctional or troubled family a CAF – Common Assessment Framework - may be called. This is in agreement from the parents. Professionals working with the family will all be involved – this could include teachers, doctors, hospital staff, educational psychologists, speak therapists, 3rd sector, social care, etc.
SEAL – Social and emotional aspects of learning - is another tool.
 54

Question 17:
• Is compulsory pre-school an option?
CAHROM (2012)18
   SITUATION IN THE CZECH REPUBLIC
   Compulsory pre-school education is a valid option in theory. The last year of pre-school if free of charge and the school is obliged to enrol any children in this last preschool year.
However, this is not systematically implemented because Czech parents (and Roma parents too) consider the decision whether to send the child to pre-school or not as their own right. Many parents prefer to prolong the last pre-school year to two years (the child then starts compulsory education at the age of 7 instead of 6). There is a rather strong opposition in the Czech society, including at the level of the political spectrum, for enrolling children too early in pre-school. Among the Czech Roma population, 48% of individuals over 5 have never attended pre-school facilities (kindergarten or preparatory years). If one specifically looks at Roma children from socially excluded localities, approximately 52% of them have no pre-school preparation.
Unlike in other countries involved in the thematic group, the question of pre-school facilities is not considered as a critical issue in the Czech Republic. As a whole the number of children enrolled in pre-school is 94%. However, the distribution of facilities is highly unequal. Bigger towns and cities experience lack of places in public kindergartens and parents therefore have to pay substantial amounts to place the child into private kindergarten. Roma families are nearly completely excluded from pre-school education.
Under the framework of the Roma Integration Concept of the Czech Government for 2010–2013, the Government has proposed the development of a network of early care services to prevent the educational failure of Roma children from socio-culturally disadvantaged backgrounds.
The Government’ aim is to make available early care activities to families living in socio-culturally disadvantaged environments. Measures targeted at Roma children of pre-school age are based on the Concept of In-Time Care for Children from Socio-Culturally Disadvantaged Environments prepared by the Ministry of Education. One of the envisaged actions is to increase the accessibility and interlinking of early care services at local level in all required socially excluded Roma localities. For children from 0 to 6, there should be social activation services for families with children, whose activity should be linked to the activities of schools advisory centres. By means of these services there should be development of parental skills so that the parents are able to successfully arrange for the development of their children's potential, thus easing their entry into compulsory school attendance.
  SITUATION IN THE SLOVAK REPUBLIC
   Among the Slovak Roma population, 48% of individuals over 5 have never attended pre-school facilities.
According to the UNDP 2011 Regional Survey on Marginalized Roma, 18 % of Roma children aged 3-6 were enrolled in pre-primary education (boys – 20 %; girls 14 %) in the school year 2010/2011. As a point of comparison, the average for the general population was 72 % (school year 2008/2009). According to the latest figures, 28% of Roma children aged 3-6 are enrolled in pre-school, which is still far below the average for the general population.
The main obstacle for a higher enrolment rate of the Roma children in kindergartens are the missing personal and infrastructural capacities – pre-school education is financed almost exclusively (with the exception of last grade before entering the primary education) through municipalities and parent fees.
Even if the children, whose parents are in material/social need, do not have to pay these fees (which can amount to more than 50€ monthly for a child), the kindergarten is not even for them completely for free - kindergarten trips, additional leisure activities, like kindergarten clubs, fruit days, hygienic materials, kindergarten courses are paid extra.
Besides infrastructural and financial obstacles, low enrolment rates among Roma kinds are to a high degree caused by distance issues and lack of information on the side of Roma parents – this could be diminished by providing more jobs for (Roma) teaching assistants and creating positions for Roma mediators.
There is a need for a significant investment and a massive increase of SDE children aged 3 years and over in pre-school facilities/pre-primary education, along with supporting early childhood care-programmes.
 55

CAHROM (2012)18
  SITUATION IN HUNGARY
   In Hungary families that send their children to school receive additional social benefits (incentives) called “pre-school benefits”. A problem encountered in Hungary in the implementation of this measure is the lack of pre-school infrastructure.
In practice, Roma children have limited access to pre-school education (kindergarten level) due to a lack of kindergarten in areas with large Roma population and restrictive enrolment policies by a number of kindergartens. Many Roma pupils consequently start school later (8 and beyond) than children from the majority population (6 or 7).
Among the Hungarian Roma population, 30% of individuals over 5 have never attended pre-school facilities.
  SITUATION IN SLOVENIA
   In Slovenia, as a whole, 75% of children attend pre-school. The Government has now for objective to enrol as many children as possible from 1 to 3 years old. An incentive was introduced for families with multiple children. Pre-school education was supposed to be provided for free for the 2nd child. It resulted in a baby boom. However, due to the economic crisis, this measure can no longer be implemented and parents have to cover partly the costs.
One of the main goals of both the National Programme of Measures for Roma of the Government of the Republic of Slovenia for the Period 2010–2015 and the Strategy for Education of the Roma in Slovenia is to increase the inclusion and attendance of Roma children in pre-school educational programmes (kindergartens or other forms of pre- school education) at least two years before the beginning of elementary school, i.e. at the age of 4 at the latest.
The idea behind this early inclusion is enhancing language skills (of both Roma and Slovenian languages) and socialisation of Roma children within an educational institution capable of providing experiences and patterns that will enable easier inclusion in the school environment.
The measure is implemented by the Ministry of Education and Sport under the project “Increasing the Social and Cultural Capital in Areas Populated by Members of the Roma Community”. It has been financed since 2010 by the European Social Fund (3,562,000 Euros).
Again in the context of the Project “Increasing the Social and Cultural Capital in Areas Populated by Members of the Roma Community” another activity consists of the establishment of day centres (Roma Education Incubators) where the following activities are carried out: social activities and workshops for pre-school and school children and their parents; homework and study help; workshops for parents in social topics of interest.
Two projects dealing with Roma Education in Slovenia are called “Successful integration of Roma children into education” (I and II). They concern the integration of Roma children into the education and training system of Slovenia and the elimination of segregation and discrimination. The projects strive to enhance the efficiency of the on-going integration process through educating and training Roma teachers’ assistants, school teachers and staff, as well as educating and encouraging Roma parents to assume responsibility and to promote training of Roma by themselves, to acknowledge their potential to manage the project on their own, and to qualify Roma to make use of EU funds.
The first project (June 2008-August 2011) was co-ordinated by the Roma Union of Slovenia and the Ministry of Education and Sport and received 1,593,100 Euros from the European Social Fund. The second project builds on the results of the project of the Roma Union of Slovenia, on the current project conducted by the Institute for Ethnic Studies, as well as on the solutions from the Strategy and its supplement from 2011. The project-Phase II will last from 1 September 2011 until 31 August 2014. The contract value is 1,675,680 Euros. The project co-ordinator is the Adult Education Institute of Kočevje
  SITUATION IN THE UNITED KINGDOM
   Pre-school education should be an option. In England pupils are entitled to 15 hours free pre-school education from the age of 3. This can be in nursery schools attached to mainstream schools or in Children’s Centres. For pupils from a disadvantaged background pupils can access this 15 hours free from aged 2 and a half. All children can start mainstream school from the month of September of the academic year in which they reach the age of 5. Furthermore, schooling is compulsory from the term they turn 5.
 56

Questions 18 & 19:
CAHROM (2012)18
 · How to allocate (financial, human) resources for the transformation from a segregated education system into an inclusive one?
· How European Funds are being used for Roma education and/or for desegregation policies?
  SITUATION IN THE CZECH REPUBLIC
   On 20 September 2012, the Ombudsman, the Human Rights Commissioner of the Government and the Minister of Education took part in a meeting on equal opportunities for Roma pupils in education. They inter alia discussed the need for a reform of the system of funding of schools and for providing additional financial support for children in need of support in mainstream schools, including at pre-school level.
However, any progress in the financial aspects lies in the negotiation between the Ministry of Education and the Ministry of Finance about budgetary measures and in the overall consensus obtained at the level of the government on how to invest the state budget and how inclusive education is a priority.
  SITUATION IN THE SLOVAK REPUBLIC
 See the positive example of the project "Education of teaching staff for the inclusion of marginalised Roma communities" developed by the Methodology-Pedagogical Centre in Prešov, as described in reply to question 9 above.
  SITUATION IN HUNGARY
   Measures adopted in Hungary include:
- per capita support after socially disadvantaged students – for services, tools, training and also as a supplementary income for the teachers in return for their extra work;
- allocating more resources to socially disadvantaged regions.
- Integrative Pedagogical System- gives the ratio of students in the classroom, the school the settlement – only the
schools fulfilling these requirements can apply for the extra support.
- Schools can only run in tenders if they apply the Equal Chances Programmes;
- Making inclusive education an important part of teacher training.
Legislation defines “skills development preparation” in the Framework Integrative Pedagogical System- in which education compensates for the child’s disadvantages. The school has to organise the education in a way that helps the child manifest his/her best skills and talent and promotes his/her development and learning skills to allow him/her to continue his/her studies.
  SITUATION IN SLOVENIA
   Slovenia provides a very good example within the European Union of using EU funds for Roma, and the education of Roma in particular.
As an example, see the description of the project “Successful integration of Roma children into education” in replies to questions 12 and 17 above.
Tasks that have been defined in the National Programme of Measures for Roma of the Government of the Republic of Slovenia for the Period 2010–2015 are also being implemented within the framework of the new financial perspective of the European Social Fund (ESF) Operational Programme for Development of Human Resources for the period 2007–2013, Priority 4: Equal opportunities and reinforcing social inclusion: equal opportunities and social inclusion among the young, in particular in education and training systems.
These tasks include for instance:
- providing for employment of Roma assistants in educational facilities;
- preparing didactic materials;
- carrying out activities aimed at overcoming stereotypes;
- in-service teachers’ training.
 57

CAHROM (2012)18
   Other measures to enhance Roma cultural and social potential have been co-financed from the ESF, for instance the development of various methods of pre-school education and inclusion of children in different forms of pre-school education, carried out by the project “The Increase in Social and Cultural Capital in Areas with Roma Population”, co-ordinated by the Institute for Ethnic Studies.
The National Education Institute of the Republic of Slovenia has set up a group of teachers specialised in teaching Roma children.
In addition, in the area of education and training there are a large number of very active NGOs and other professional and educational institutions.
An extensive survey on educational and professional interests of the Roma has also been carried out under the above Operational Programme. The population surveyed was the active Roma population in Dolenjska, Bela Krajina, Posavje, Kočevsko and Grosupeljsko. The survey was carried out on a sample of 774 Roma aged between 15 and 45.
A good practice in the Municipality of Murska Sobota: at the initiative of the Roma representatives, the municipality organised a school bus for the settlement of Pušča. In the long run, this helped to raise overall school achievement and attendance. The school bus is completely financed from the municipal budget. The bus is free for Roma children, although under the Basic School Act they would not be eligible for free rides (the Act provides for free rides in cases when the ride is longer than 4 km, while in this case the Roma settlement is 1 to 3 km from various schools).
  SITUATION IN THE UNITED KINGDOM
   Training is needed.
The Government provides additional finances for the most disadvantaged pupils who are on free school meals through Pupil Premium in mainstream schools.
This money to be spent on additional adults and resources.
Role models needed from the Roma community who speak the home language and who are managed well.
 58

Question 20:
CAHROM (2012)18
 · How do you define “inclusive education”?
  SITUATION IN THE CZECH REPUBLIC
   There is no definition of “inclusive education” in the Czech Republic. One of the school masters, whom the CAHROM team of experts met in Prague, called for national definitions of “quality education” and “inclusive education”. The Ministry of Education, however, responded to the CAHROM team of experts that there is no need for such a definition.
At policy level and in the political discourse, there has been a slight terminological move from “inclusive education” towards “equal opportunities” which does not create such a huge dissent among teachers. A slight inflation of the term “inclusive education” has been noticed since both the media and some lobby groups use the term in the way they want (either to support inclusive education or to oppose it).
  SITUATION IN THE SLOVAK REPUBLIC
   Under the previous government of the Slovak Republic (before the 2010 election), a Committee for Inclusive Education, consisting of experts from state institutions, local and regional authorities and from NGOs, was created by the Vice- Premier for Human Rights and National Minorities. The Committee developed some documents which included some definitions. One of possible definitions of inclusive education should be how to overcome the obstacles faced by disabled/vulnerable children to get quality education in mainstream schools. Three categories of vulnerable groups were identified: people with health disabilities, people who belong to a minority and socially-excluded people.
  SITUATION IN HUNGARY
   There is no specific definition of inclusive education. A contrario, Article 10 (2) of the 2003 Act on the Promotion of Equal Treatment and Equal Opportunities defines segregation in education and prohibits it as a form of discrimination55:
Decree 11/1994 (VI.8.) on the operation of educational institutions defines skills development preparation (key activity of the Integrative Pedagogical System) as an activity that the educational institution (school or kindergarten) pursues in order to compensate for the child’s disadvantages following from their social background and development level. The institution takes action to deploy the children’s individual skills and gift, help the child’s development and boost their learning chances. In the framework of skills development preparation the school does
a) help the personality development of children, community development
b) execute a programme which helps the development of children exposed to learning setbacks c) pedagogical work that compensates or social disadvantages
Students taking part in skills development preparation are educated together in a class with students not taking part in skills development preparation. The education and evaluation of students taking part in the preparatory program is carried out according to a programme issued by the Minister responsible for education.
Socially multiply disadvantaged students can take part in the programme and also up to 10 %, socially disadvantaged students. Students are developed according to individual development plans prepared by the teachers.
The students’ development is evaluated at least every 3 months. The child’s teachers and the head of the class are present at the evaluation and they have to invite the child, the parents, staff in the school responsible for child protection. If necessary representatives of the child welfare services or the counselling services are also invited.
  SITUATION IN SLOVENIA
 The concept of inclusive education is understood as a possibility for children with special needs to be educated together with their peers in the same age groups, in their school districts, with a guaranteed additional expert assistance and support services.
55 “Unlawful segregation is a conduct that separates individuals or groups of individuals from others on the basis of their characteristics as defined in Article 8 without a reasonable explanation resulting from objective consideration”.
  SITUATION IN THE UNITED KINGDOM
   Inclusive education aims at providing educational support to respond to possible specific needs of the Roma children with a view to helping them overcome difficulties in the context of mainstream education.
Story of a Roma family now living in England: Older children went to a special school in the Czech and did not learn much - according to their dad. But a young child of 5 who has only been in school for 6 months can already speak English and is doing well. Dad said that he was told that his children cannot learn and are not clever but now he realises they are.
  59

IV. LESSONS LEARNT AND GOOD PRACTICES IDENTIFIED
4.1 Systemic desegregation measures and legislation envisaged by the authorities of the two requesting countries
4.1.1 Changes proposed in the Czech Republic
Mr Jakub Stárek, Director of the Department of Education System in the Ministry of Education recalled that the new Czech Government was trying to offer inclusive education to all children according to Article 2 of the Education Act adopted in 2004. The new approach aims at providing equal chances, controlling the system to avoid abuses and integrating children from an individualised perspective. As a consequence of the ECtHR judgment D.H and Others v. The Czech Republic, some positive measures had been undertaken. The number of Roma in “practical” schools had declined for the past five years. Today the number of Roma enrolled in special schools is around 25%. The objective is to make sure that in 2017 children will not be any longer wrongly enrolled in special schools.
Mr Stárek also orally presented to the CAHROM thematic group of experts the main measures foreseen in the consolidated action plan that is currently being prepared for submission to the Committee of Ministers in the context of their supervision of the implementation of the ECtHR judgement in D.H. and Others v. the Czech Republic during the period 2013-2017:
1. To find out how many Roma children are educated inside and outside the mainstream schooling system and how many are educated under the Annex for pupils with mild mental disability:
- An annual survey will be conducted starting from September 2013 in cooperation with the Statistical
Office. Class teachers from all type of schools (practical, as well as mainstream schools, including the so-called “Roma schools”) will be requested to provide information about the number of children enrolled as mild mental disabled and to specify if they are Czech Roma citizens.
- The full cooperation from the teaching staff is expected. In case the Czech Government does not see any result in collecting this data, it will enforce data collection by law.
2. To introduce exams in Czech language, English and Maths at the end of the 5th and 9th grade.
3. To modify the Education Act so as to generalize pre-school education for Roma children as from the age of three and to have it financed through the regions. So far the only last year of preschool can be funded by local authorities (it is an obligation). Preparatory classes or nursery school, however,
should not be established in practical schools as it could serve as a recruitment factor for such schools.
4. To modify Decree NO. 73/2005 Coll. which so far provides the possibility to enrol in a class for pupils with health disabilities up to 25% of pupils with health disadvantages or who are socially disadvantaged. The Ministry agrees that the tolerance of 25% of children without indication of mild
mental disabilities in classes for pupils diagnosed with MMD is not justified.
5. To give a new task to the Czech school inspectorates requesting them to supervise/monitor the
diagnostic (audit of the testing system). Voluntary enrolment of children without mental disability in schools for mentally disabled, including at the request of parents, should not be allowed. One of the obstacles might be the financial interest for schools that include children with mild mental disabilities.
6. To introduce regular annual check in order to attest of any progress made by the child. According to the new rules, pupils may only be assigned into the "practical primary schools" for one year at the very most. After that year, experts will have to verify whether the pupil enrolled in such a school still belongs there. In the case of pupils who are socially disadvantaged, the time in the "practical primary school" has been shortened to five months.
7. To revise the diagnostic tools. At the moment, children not exceeding 70 in the IQ test are directed to practical schools. In case a child is border-line, currently the Czech Republic foresees that the child goes to a practical school and that a reassessment is made towards the end of the first school year to take decision to leave him or not in the practical school. Mr Stárek personally believes that this system is wrong and the child should be enrolled in the mainstream school. Only if the child is not doing well enough during the first year, his case should be reviewed.
8. To standardize the methodological management.
CAHROM (2012)18
60

In July 2012, following the summary findings of an inspection carried out in a group of former special schools for 2009-2012 (1st term), the Czech School Inspectorate prepared a Thematic Report on the Transformation Progress of Former Special Schools in the School Year 2011/201256 which includes as an annex the following suggestions to transform former special schools in accordance with requirements set out in the Education Act, as per the latest amendments:
“To focus on the duty of schools to provide pupils without any minor mental disorders with education at common primary schools preferentially
•To specify the wording of the Education Act and implementing regulations in the matter of accepting pupils into the educational programmes for disabled pupils (MMD). It will not be possible to accept a pupil into such a programme without receiving a recommendation from an educational-psychological advisory centre and a doctor. Should this necessary condition be breached, it is considered material breach of the Act.
• To prepare the methodology and formulate practical recommendations for schools and teaching staff to implement the required forms and procedures for educating pupils at risk of failing school distinguishing the needs of socially disadvantaged pupils and pupils diagnosed with MMD.
• To provide teaching staff with further education, to focus preferentially on teaching staff in the excluded localities.
• To prepare a model school educational programme focusing on educating Roma pupils in cooperation with social partners.
• To reduce capacity at regional primary schools for pupils with MMD funded from the state budget and to offer particular support to municipal primary schools preferring the individual integration of pupils with special educational needs as part of their school educational programmes.
To provide the conditions for correct identification of socially disadvantaged pupils in accordance with the Education Act
• To create tools for timely identification of pupils threatened by social disadvantage linked to the national system of social benefits (below the poverty line) for educational needs.
• To start reforming the current system of advisory institutions, methods and procedures for identifying pupils who are not successful within the main educational stream for other reasons than MMD.
• To innovate the content and system of the advisory system, to unify the methodology for evaluation of unsuccessfulness of pupils, to add tools and methods for determining handicaps for groups of socially disadvantaged pupils.
• To change the practice of the system of identifying and to focus it more on supporting and equalling activities related to pupils and in cooperation with the catchment primary school.
• To limit the personal and institutional link between school advisory institutions and former special schools.
• To renew the obligation for a medical assessment to diagnose MMD, thus increasing the chances for pupil allocated within the margin zones in particular and specifying the definition of necessary support.
To create a system for funding the support of socially disadvantaged pupils
• To specify the principles for providing direct financial support to pupils with special educational needs, especially socially disadvantaged pupils, who are entitled to this in the Education Act.
• To use ESF development projects for changing schools and their educational programmes so that the objectives of the Education Act are met and transformation of the former special school is finished.
To ensure communication with legal representatives of pupils in the matter of informed consent of legal representatives before allocating a pupil to the MMD support programme
Following the recent creation by Decree of a legal framework for meeting the conditions for the informed consent of legal representatives:
• At the level of former special schools, to direct measures to enhance awareness of the public on offers by schools of the educational stream of the educational framework programme for primary education – annex adjusting education of pupils with MMD (RVP ZV LMP) and an educational framework programme for primary education (RVP ZV) for both legal representatives and teachers working with pupils.
56 See the PDF version of this report in the Addendum.
CAHROM (2012)18
  61

CAHROM (2012)18
• At the same time to support motivation among parents to give their consent to allocating a pupil to the RVP ZV LMP as an opportunity to prepare him/ her for relocation into the main educational stream and not perceiving this as the final solution.
To improve penetration of school educational programmes in accordance with the RVP ZV
To enhance the readiness of school educational programmes and thus to strengthen penetration of individual school educational programmes at primary schools. To implement diagnostic stays at specialized schools and school facilities in compliance with the respective decree consistently.
• At the primary schools of the educational stream of the RVP ZV, to definitely exclude the option of relocating pupils failing primary schools with the RVP ZV LMP without taking prior improvement measures.
• To use the possibility to establish preparatory classes for socially disadvantaged pupils more and to get an assistant support for their inclusion in the main education stream.
The Czech Ombudsman recommends in his 2012 report amendments to the Schools Act that unambiguously anchor the priority of integration of all pupils with "special educational needs", including pupils with disabilities, into mainstream elementary schools.
He also recommends that the discrepancy between the decrees on the education of pupils with "special educational needs" and the Schools Act be eliminated as one of the decrees still makes it possible to assign children into classes for disabled who are either not disabled at all or who suffer from a different type of disadvantage, i.e., children with difficulties at school or children who are socially disadvantaged. Both the School Act of 2005 and the Anti-discrimination Act of 2009 forbid any discrimination in access to education.
Additionally, the Ombudsman recommends that the Ministry of Education collect data on the number of pupils enrolled in remedial schools for children with light mental disabilities.
Over recent months, there has been a series of declarations from the Czech authorities indicating their willingness to reform the system and stop with the practice to send disproportionate numbers of Roma children into so-called “practical” schools, where they receive an inferior education that leaves them without meaningful qualifications.
On 24 October 2012, Mr Vladimir Galuŝka, Deputy Minister for Foreign Affairs declared before the UN Human Rights Council Universal Periodic Review (UPR) that the Czech Republic will end segregated schooling for children of its Roma minority. He told the Council that “even the temporary placements of socially disadvantaged children in practical schools as a last resort measure to improve their education chances will be abolished and individual integration in mainstream schools will be preferred”57.
On 20 September 2012, Czech Government Human Rights Commissioner Monika Šimůnková said that “the objective fact that [Romani children] are not prepared for school has been confused with mental disability. The enrolments into the "practical primary schools" occur because mainstream schools have an aversion to Romani pupils and are unwilling to enrol them because of pressure from majority-society parents - and sometimes even pressure from Romani parents who believe the "practical primary schools" are the best for their offspring. Greater involvement of teachers' aides and teaching assistants in the mainstream schools could help the situation.”58
4.1.2 Changes proposed in the Slovak Republic
The Slovak system of education needs a comprehensive reform. Measures foreseen by the Slovak authorities under their Roma national strategy mainly rely on:
57 Open Society Justice Initiative considers that the statement of the Czech Government to the UN Human Rights Council’s came without any solid commitments, such as a firm timeline for implementation, or measurable targets along the way to achieving zero school segregation. For more details, read this report by Katrine Thomasen.
58 Article translated into English and published by ROMEA.
  62

· ·
·
·
· · ·
·
CAHROM (2012)18
massivily increasing the enrolment of MRC/SDE59 children aged 3 years and over in pre-school facilities (this includes a significant investment into pre-primary education of MRC/SDE children along with supporting early childhood care programmes);
developing and implementing desegregation standards in schooling (along with indicators and subsequent monitoring of segregation), which should respect the principle of social interaction of Roma and non-Roma children while maintaining the highest possible quality of education and achieving best results (with the exception of Roma national schools, such as the school in Kremnica);
developing specific models of school integration (inclusion) for a whole portfolio of situations and target groups, with an ambition to establish a general model of an inclusive school (for that purpose a so called “school inclusive index” assessing both internally and externally the quality of the school would be added as one of the motivation tools for implementing programmes of inclusive education); In creating an inclusive educational environment a priority must be placed on the specifics of students coming from the environment of marginalized Roma communities, physically handicapped persons, members of national minorities, foreigners and immigrants;
improving access to quality education including education and care provided in the early childhood, but also elementary, secondary and university education with special emphasis on removing possible segregation at schools;
preventing premature termination of school attendance and ensuring a smooth transition from school to employment;
implementing policies that will bridge gaps in the educational level of Roma and the rest of the population;
increasing the participation of SDE/MRC children in pre-primary education from approximately 18 % (in 2010) to 50 % by 2020, subject to broadening the capacity of the network of kindergartens and programmes for education and upbringing of children of a pre-school age in regions where the number of Roma steadily increases, including the implementation of programmes targeting the improvement of co-operation with the parents, and the increase in the number of teacher’s assistants in pre-primary education.
improving motivation, school results and attendance of Roma children in elementary schools and ensuring that ISCED 2 is reached by 100 % of all school children (this means in regions with steadily increasing Roma population to:
o broaden the capacity network of elementary schools;
o ensure the availability of qualified and diverse educational programmes focused on
supporting the individualised needs of the student;
o increase the inclusiveness of the educational system;
o increase the effectiveness of the system of social support of education;
o re-evaluate the system of funding the SDE/MRC students;
o establish a permanent funding mechanism for supporting all-day educational and caretaking
system in elementary schools with more than 20 % SDE/MRC students;
o ensure conditions for supporting activities targeting work with families;
o apply comprehensive integration of gender sensitive and multicultural upbringing in
elementary schools;
o gradually establish conditions preventing teenage mothers to drop out of school prematurely.
 59 MRD stands for “marginalized Roma communities” and RDC for “socially disadvantaged environment”.
63

CAHROM (2012)18
· increasing the proportion of Roma students who reach ISCED 3B and ISCED 3C and ISCED 3A to the level of the general population of the Slovak Republic. This means to
o devote targeted attention to SDE/MRC children at the time of their transfer from elementary to secondary schools;
o support the improvement of grades at high schools;
o set up adequate financial support;
o eliminate barriers in the transition to high schools by increasing the permeability of the
schooling system;
o link secondary education with the needs of the labour market (labour market prognosis, links
to employers) and supporting the extension of targeted career consultancy services to children endangered with the transmission of generation poverty (e.g. long-term unemployed).
· improving the care of pedagogical staff and specialists and increase the proportion of teachers and specialists fluent in Romani (local community dialect).
· exercising the right to education in a Romani language or to learning the Romani language, and supporting further development of identity using support for the use of Romani language on all levels of education; providing education for teachers of Romani language and literature and supporting further education of teachers teaching in the Romani language; preventing all forms of discrimination, racism, xenophobia, homophobia, anti-Semitism and other manifestations of intolerance; support for inter-ethnical and intercultural dialogue and understanding.
· addressing problematic issues of education and upbringing in special schools and school facilities, including school consultancy and prevention services; improve the process of diagnostics and placement of children into the system of special education and remove the reason for unjust placement of children into this system (methodology of diagnostic exams must take into reasonable account the abilities of children from SZP/MRK); gradually eliminate the process of placing children educated under variant A to special schools and special classes in elementary schools, provide their mainstream education while increasing the number of teacher’s assistants fluent in the Romani language. Create specific models of school inclusion for all types of disadvantaged children.
4.1.3 Conclusions of the team of experts and lessons learnt as regards the Czech Republic
The CAHROM thematic group of experts took note of the intentions of the authorities to undertake speedy measures and legal reforms to decrease the number of Roma children enrolled in practical schools in response to the ECtHR Judgment in D.H. and Others v. The Czech Republic.
The team was informed by the Ministry of Education – and this was confirmed during the meeting with NGOs and a representative of the Czech Ombudsman’s office on 3 October 2012, that regular consultation is held between Czech Education Minister Petr Fiala, Czech Government Human Rights Commissioner Monika Šimůnková and Czech Ombudsman Pavel Varvařovský with a view to find the best solutions to eliminate discrimination against children and the creation of an education system that guarantees equal access to education for all. These measures proposed by the Ministry of Education are, generally speaking, considered to go in the right direction.
The team of experts wishes to stress that, apart from the obvious need to reduce the number of Roma children who follow the curriculum for mild mental disabilities (whether in practical or regular elementary schools), there is also a complementary need to develop inclusive education.
The team of experts considers that complementary measures to develop inclusive education are important in order to avoid possible unwanted side effects in practice of the envisaged policy measures on the placement of Roma pupils in mainstream education. One side effect might be the shift from Roma pupils from “practical elementary schools” into schools where Roma children are already, or become, over-represented (the so-called
64

CAHROM (2012)18 “Roma schools”), which could lead to, or reinforce, de facto segregation. As an example of the side effect of desegregation policy and measures in Hungary, the authorities stated in 2011 in their National Social Inclusion Strategy –Extreme Poverty, Child Poverty, the Roma, 2011-2020 that the number of Roma-majority schools (so-called «Roma schools») had increased by 34% since 2004. In addition, practice in several member states shows that schools with predominantly or exclusively Roma children end up being low priority schools
with poor quality education.
Among the complementary measures, the team of experts suggests that the authorities consider increasing capacity (infrastructure, human and financial resources) of mainstream schools, increasing mixed classes in mainstream schools (e.g. through redrawing catchment areas) and assisting current so-called “Roma schools” with additional financial and human resources to help them provide quality education and innovative activities to attract non Roma children/parents. The schools themselves, using the example of the inclusive elementary school of Spišský Hrvov in Slovakia, should actively engage in diversifying their activities and submit projects to donors to provide children and their parents with attractive activities.
Under previous governments, there has been a lack of co-operation with the NGO sector and that a general mistrust has installed between the authorities and civil society organisations, in particular as regards the topic of school segregation. The team took note of the intention of the Ministry of Education to improve dialogue with the NGOs.
As far as testing is concerned, the existing legislation might need to be amended to specify which mechanisms will determine, in a non-discriminatory way, the educational support needed by children with a “social disadvantage” and whether such support will be assessed through testing. It is suggested to amend the Education Act so as to include a principle saying that pupils with MMD shall be educated in ordinary elementary schools with individual integration measures except if it is impossible to meet their MMD in such a way.
Additionally, funding should be made available for providing specific support to meet the needs of the children concerned in the mainstream education.
4.1.4 Conclusions of the team of experts and lessons learnt as regards the Slovak Republic
The team of experts considers that a change is needed in the Slovak legislation as regards the philosophy of the School Act in relation to MRC pupils because the current system is pro special education oriented. As a consequence of the 2.7 higher regular normative sum, teachers in special school are better paid than in mainstream schools. There are two sorts of Centres for pedagogy-psychological prevention (regular and special), but Special Centres for pedagogy-psychological prevention have stronger competencies and are mostly located in the same buildings with special schools and under the same administration board. The team of experts considers that it would be more useful, including for parents, to have united centres.
Due to the number of Roma living in Slovakia and the fact that they are concentrated in certain geographical (mainly rural) areas, the team of experts believes that the Hungarian experience on desegregation and recent measures proposed by the current Czech Ministry of Education might be a relevant for source of inspiration for the Slovak authorities.
Unlike the recent proposal from the Czech Ministry of Education to foster dialogue with NGOs, such a dialogue seems completely lacking in the current Slovak context, according to information received from NGO representatives at a meeting in Košice on 3 October 2012. NGOs leaders indicated that they feel considered as second class citizens, are not consulted, including for the drafting of Roma-related projects and not involved in any sort of monitoring or decision-making.
  65

CAHROM (2012)18 In Slovakia, there is a need for a significant investment and a massive increase of SDE children aged 3 years and over in pre-school facilities/pre-primary education, alongside with supporting early childhood care
programmes.
When it comes to Roma education, the present system of no pre-school education combined with streaming Roma children to special schools or classes is a “lose-lose proposition”. Failing to invest in Roma education dooms large numbers of Roma to unemployment or extremely low-paying jobs and deprives the Government of substantial fiscal revenues.
The team of experts recommends that the Slovak Ministry of Education launches a reform with regard to a) the content and the form of psychological-diagnostic tests; b) the system of pedagogical-psychological consulting; c) prevention mechanisms; and d) the funding and functioning of the special schools.
4.1.5 General conclusions, good practices and follow-up proposals
The CAHROM thematic group of experts, following the visits and meetings organised in both the Czech Republic and Slovakia, came up with the additional following conclusions, good practices and proposals for follow-up:
As regards the educational policy:
• the system of “elementary practical schools” should be radically downsized and children with special
educational needs should in principle be enrolled in mainstream education (good practices in various member states, including the United Kingdom). This principle could be enshrined in legislation
• higher normative rules for socially excluded children should be defined by law;
• external and internal monitoring regarding school enrolment of Roma children should be improved.
• greater input from the Government and in particular the Ministry of Education and common rules are
needed. At the moment, it is up to schools to decide about their inclusion policy. If not all the schools in the same municipality/capital district follow the same rules, the ones who do not impose any sorts of barriers will end up as totally «Roma or migrants schools», whilst others will become totally «white schools».
As regards testing:
• Testing of children should be limited and should be replaced by testing of the schools’ outcomes;
• if tests are applied by state authorities and school professionals to assess the academic suitability of
(Roma) pupils for mainstream education, these tests should not be limited to IQ tests but include
skills testing;
• tests should meet a legitimate, educational need;
• tests should not serve the purpose to distort evaluation scores and favour the inclusion of specific
groups in schools for mentally disabled;
• tests should be based on clear criteria unrelated to ethnic origin;
• tests should differentiate between children with intellectual impairment and children whose
knowledge required for school was hindered by their (social) environment but are otherwise fully
capable;
• tests should be linguistically and culturally sensitive;
• tests should not be superficially conducted and be impartial (good practice in Hungary with the
involvement of an equal opportunities officer).
• proper pedagogical and psychological counselling and assessment should take place prior to any placement of a child in a special class.
As regards incentives:
• Incentives for Roma families and/or to schools for enrolling children in “practical schools” should be redirected towards promoting enrolment into mainstream education;
66

As regards pre-school:
• pre-school education as an important factor for success should be promoted;
• where needed, infrastructure and facilities should be increased;
• develop teaching plans and programmes for the primary “zero/preparatory class” in order to speed up
the children’s development for one year so that they could join the first primary class at the end of this preliminary year (see good practice of the State Pedagogical Institute (SPU) in Bratislava between January 2000 and June 2003 in the Council of Europe database on policies and good practices60);
• develop a network of early care services to prevent the educational failure of Roma children from socio-culturally disadvantaged backgrounds (good practice in the Czech Republic);
As regards quality education:
• define quality education in the Law;
• develop quality education, not just by limiting the number of SEN children per school/class but by
being innovative and developing projects (using the positive example in Spišský Hrhov, Slovakia, which with 51% of Roma children still manages to attract both Roma and non Roma children due to a great variety of projects);
• introduce school performance, ensure regular inspection on school performance and shift the burden of school attendance from Roma parents to the schools (good practice in the United Kingdom: OFSTED inspect the school on behalf of the government. OFSTED inspect the way children are learning not the way they are being taught. For a school to pass OFSTED they must show they are improving outcomes for all the children in the school. It is the school’s responsibility to educate);
As regards the training of teachers and teaching methods:
• increase school support and pedagogical/teachers’ training (using the Pestalozzi programme);
• redefine curriculum for teachers;
• train future teachers in pedagogical universities how to teach to minority groups, in particular Roma;
• provide training to teachers already in post on inclusive class environment;
As regards school, pupils/students and family support:
• expand the use of (Roma) teacher’s assistants and/or (Roma) mediators;
• establish Roma day centres (Roma educational incubators) using the good practice in Slovenia;
• define job profiles, institutionalize their positions, organise training [using both the ROMED
programme and Council of Europe Committee of Ministers’ Recommendation CM/Rec(2012)9 on mediation as and effective tool for promoting respect for human rights and social inclusion of Roma];
As regards extra-curricular activities:
• extra-curricular activities for Roma children should be promoted (good practice in Hungary);
• establish Roma day centres (Roma educational incubators) using the good practice in Slovenia;
As regards awareness-raising activities:
• develop arguments to combat the lobby of schools/teachers/parents for the special schools system;
As regards the use of European funds and any additional financial means:
• European structural/social funds should be used for Roma mainstream education (good practices
identified in Slovenia, in Hungary, as well as in the Elementary School in Spišský Hrhov in Slovakia);
• fund projects favouring the development of inclusive policies;
As regards the involvement of (Roma) parents, including as regards their decision to enrol children in mainstream schools:
60 http://goodpracticeroma.ppa.coe.int/en/.
CAHROM (2012)18
  67

CAHROM (2012)18
• work on empowerment and awareness-raising of Roma, and promote Roma role models;
• involve Roma in the design and implementation of projects (good practice in Slovenia with the project Successful integration of Roma children into education – designed and implemented with the Roma Union of Slovenia – that contributes to the elimination of segregation and discrimination and to make Roma parents responsible);
As regards actions towards non-Roma parents to convince them to accept Roma pupils/students in regular/mainstream schools61:
• communicate through media, forums, school websites, local newspapers, etc. about success stories;
• involve Roma and non-Roma parents in joint school activities;
As regards the involvement of local and regional authorities in school desegregation practices:
• Good examples should be promoted at national level but also at international level (e.g. in the
framework of the European Alliance of Cities and Regions for Roma Inclusion) such as:
o Free bus transport in Babington (United Kingdom) or Murska Sobota (Slovenia);
o Support to inclusive schooling in Spišský Hrhov (Slovakia);
o Catchment areas that show good results in terms of balancing the number of Roma per
school/class in Krnov (Czech Republic) and Hódmezővásárhely (Hungary); As regards ensuring proper co-ordination:
• To ensure better co-ordination (good practice in Hungary with the Ministerial Commissioner with Responsibility for Integration of Disadvantaged and Roma Children who ensures better coordination between national, regional and local administrative bodies);
As regards mutual learning and possible follow-up events:
• Exchange of experience regarding the use of European funds (could be provided by Slovenia);
• Exchange of experience in desegregation legislation and measures (could be provided by Hungary);
• Networking between schools at national level to share experience and good practices (good practices
identified in Hungary (School-Net programme) and Slovenia (schools network);
• Peer-to-peer school support and exchange of experience involving not only teachers but also heads of
schools (good practice between the Czech Republic and the United Kingdom)
• Networking and provision of capacity-building to local authorities, as well as support to schools, Roma children and their families (the positive role played in the Czech Republic by the Agency for Social Inclusion should be shared with other member states (e.g. in the framework of the European
Alliance of Cities and Regions for Roma Inclusion);
• On 21-24 November 2012, the Youth Directorate of the Council of Europe will organise in Strasbourg a Seminar for youth workers and actors in formal education on “The Role of Youth Work in Combating Segregation in School Environments”. This will be an occasion for the CAHROM Secretariat to present the main conclusions of the present thematic report to (Roma) youth organisations.
• On 17 December 2012, an International Seminar on Examples of Inclusive Education for Roma and on Roma Minority Schools will be organised in Budapest under the European Alliance of Cities and Regions for Roma Inclusion. A number of municipalities quoted in this thematic report will be invited to further exchange experience on inclusive education and/or minority school education.
61 The more drastic proposal to reform the educational system by obliging the families to send their children to the nearest school does not seem to be a short term option in the Czech Republic due to a historical approach of school competitiveness and due to the fact that such a freedom to choose one’s school is a result of the fall of communism. For those reasons, the Czech society is not willing to change the system, according to the Ministry of Education. It was observed that in other Council of Europe member states, including France, Slovenia, Spain and the United Kingdom, parents should in principle send their children to the nearest school. If they do not want this, they must provide concrete arguments to the School Inspectorate for choosing another school (e.g. having all children of a same family in one school, choosing a school which is closer to the parents’ workplace). Some sort of limitations to the total freedom of choice of parents should probably be considered in the Czech Republic and Slovakia to reduce de facto school segregation as one cannot expect in the near future a move from the society itself towards mixed education.
 68

*******
Appendix 1: Formal invitation letters from the Czech Republic and the Slovak Republic
******
Appendix 2: Programme of the thematic visits to the Czech Republic (1-3 October 2012) and to the Slovak Republic (3-5 October 2012)
it to Cze i0t1t2o.Sdlocvak Rep_3-5 October 2012.doc
******
Appendix 3: List of participants of the thematic visits to the Czech Republic and to Slovakia
ematic vi a2k0ia1_21.-p5 2012 .pdf
Profile of the CAHROM team of experts
Ms Zsófia Pillár (Hungary) works for the Hungarian Ministry of Human Resources as Deputy of Social Inclusion in the field of education. She participates in planning and managing programmes for equal chances in education financed by the domestic budget and by EU Funds as well. For instance, she works on a Scholarship and Mentorship Programme designed to improve the chances of socially disadvantaged students in public education from the age of 13 to the first year of university. Prior to working in the Ministry Ms Pillár spent half a year at the Budapest Office of the Roma Education Fund (REF) as an intern. At REF she had the chance to get to know several grassroots programmes initiated and/or or implemented by NGOs.
Mag. Erika Rustja (Slovenia) has been working at the Ministry of Education, Science, Culture and Sport as a Senior Advisor and Under-secretary in the Education Development Office since 2005. She works particularly on Human Rights Education, Social and Civic Competences, History, Civic Education, and Education for Sustainable Development. She often takes part as a member of the Slovenian delegation to hearings at United Nations and the Council of Europe authorities where Roma education is emphasized. She is also part of a team that visits Roma in schools and controls the implementation of education projects co-financed by her Ministry. She was invited by the Slovak UNESCO Commission to present Roma education in Slovenia at the 2011 International Conference “Respecting Cultural Diversities in Quality Education of Socially and Differently Disadvantaged Children -with special focus on Roma Children”.
Ms Claire Lockwood (Leeds, United Kingdom) has visited Brno in the Czech Republic several times over the last two years working on a Comenius region programme funded by the British Council entitled “Roma Inclusion through Culture and Education – RICE”. She has therefore been working with three schools in Brno and six in Leeds as well as with voluntary organisations in both cities and the Roma Museum in Brno. She is well aware of the Educational system in the Czech Republic and works with schools in Leeds who have a growing number of Roma in roll. She has also experience working with Gypsy and Travellers in the UK, as a joint President of the National Association of Teachers of Traveller and other professional – NATT+, an organisation that works nationally to improve the education of Gypsy, Roma and Travellers. Ms Lockwood is also involved in a NATT+ group of people who work on improving outcomes for Roma.
CAHROM (2012)18
     Czech invitation to CAHROM.pdf
Slovak invitation to CAHROM.pdf
     Final agenda CZ CAHROM thematic vis
Final agenda SK cChARHeRpO_M1-t3hOemctaotbicevr i2s
       List of CAHROM experts _CAHROM th
Participants_themati scitvtisoitC_PzeracghuRee1p-3Solocvt
Participants_themati dcOfvcitsi2t_0K1o2s.idcoec3-5 oct
      69

CAHROM (2012)18 Mr Igor André (Slovak Republic) has recently joined as Education Officer the Office of the Plenipotentiary of the
Slovak Republic Government for Roma Communities, which has been recently placed under the Ministry of Interior.
Mr Ján Hero (Slovak Republic) was a member of the Council of Europe Committee of Experts on Roma and Travellers (MG-S-ROM) during the period 2000-2010. He is now a member of the Council of Europe Ad Hoc Committee of Experts on Roma Issues (CAHROM) established in 2011. In 1991, when Roma in Slovakia received the status of national minority, Mr Hero became the first officer responsible for the Education of Roma Children and Youth at the Department for Minority Mixed Education of the Ministry of Education of the Slovak Republic. Later, he has been working as General Director for Primary and Secondary Education at the Ministry of Education of the Slovak Republic. Mr Hero used to work at the State Pedagogical Institute in Bratislava at the Department for Roma National Minority Education. Since 2010, he has been a Board member of the European Roma Information Office (ERIO) in Brussels.
Mr Viktor Piorecký (Czech Republic) works as an expert for education in the Agency for Social Inclusion which is part of the Office of the Government. Previously he worked in several projects providing support to schools educating Roma children, as well as support to children and their families. He is one of the authors of the Education chapter of the “National Strategy to Combat Social Exclusion".
Mr Ondřej Klípa (Czech Republic) is the Head of the Secretariat of the Council for Roma Minority Affairs and the Council for National Minorities at the Office of the Government of the Czech Republic. He is also a member of the Council of Europe Ad Hoc Committee of Experts on Roma Issues (CAHROM) established in 2011.
******
Appendix 4: National, European and International reference texts and reports
The right to education for all children, and for Roma children in particular, including the issue of segregation/special schools, has been extensively addressed and documented by European and international governmental and non-governmental organisations through conventions, recommendations, case-law, reports and specific projects. References to a number of those and specific quotations are made in footnotes of this thematic report or in the Addendum.
For additional research, it was felt; however, useful to recall the titles of the most relevant texts and documents of reference in this chapter.
• Council of Europe standards, reference texts, case-law and reports
As far as the Council of Europe is concerned, special attention should be given to:
- the 1950 Council of Europe Convention for the Protection of Human Rights and Fundamental Freedoms (ETS
No. 5), in particular in Article 14 (Prohibition of discrimination), in Protocol No. 1 thereto (ETS No. 9), in
particular in its Article 2 (Right to education), and in Protocol No. 12 thereto (ETS No. 177);
- the 1995 Framework Convention for the Protection of National Minorities (ETS No. 157)62;
- the 1992 European Charter of Regional or Minority Languages (ETS No. 148)63;
- the 1961 European Social Charter (ETS No. 35)64;
- the Recommendation CM/Rec(2012)9 of the Committee of Ministers on mediation as an effective tool for
promoting respect of human rights and social inclusion of Roma;
- the Recommendation CM/Rec(2009)4 of the Committee of Ministers on the education of Roma and Travellers
in Europe;
- the Recommendation CM/Rec(2008)5 of the Committee of Ministers to member states on policies for Roma
and/or Travellers in Europe;
- the Recommendation No. R (2000) 4 of the Committee of Ministers on the education of Roma/Gypsy children
in Europe;
62 http://www.coe.int/t/dghl/monitoring/minorities/default_en.asp. 63 http://www.coe.int/t/dg4/education/minlang/.
64 http://www.coe.int/T/DGHL/Monitoring/SocialCharter/.
               70

CAHROM (2012)18
- the Recommendation 1924 (2010) and Resolution 1740 (2010) of the Parliamentary Assembly on The
Situation of Roma in Europe and relevant activities of the Council of Europe”;
- the Congress Recommendation 315 (2011) and Resolution 333 (2011) on the situation of Roma in Europe: a
challenge for local and regional authorities;
- ECRI General Policy Recommendations No. 3 on combating racism and intolerance against Roma/Gypsies
(1998), No. 7 on national legislation to combat racism and racial discrimination (2002), No. 10 on combating racism and racial discrimination in and through school education (2006) and No. 13 on combating anti- Gypsyism and discrimination against Roma;
- the Final Declaration of the 22nd session of the Standing Conference of the Ministers of Education, on “Building a more humane and inclusive Europe: role of education policies” (Istanbul, 4-5 May 2007);
- Recommendations and policy orientations included in the White Paper on Intercultural Dialogue “Living together as equals in dignity”, launched at the 118th Session of the Committee of Ministers (Strasbourg, 7 May 2008);
- the Strasbourg Declaration on Roma adopted at the High Level Meeting on Roma (Strasbourg, 20 Oct. 2010);
- the Declaration adopted at the Summit of Mayors on Roma (Strasbourg, 22 September 2011), which inter alia calls for the support of the ROMED programme and the setting-up of a European Alliance of Cities and
Regions for Roma Inclusion65;
- the Roma Youth Action Plan based on guidelines proposed by the participants of the Roma Youth Conference
(September 2011, updated in May 2012)66;
- the CM Declaration on the rise of anti-Gypsyism and racist violence against Roma in Europe (Febr. 2012)67.
Additionally, apart from the reports of the relevant Council of Europe monitoring bodies (the Commissioner for Human Rights, the Advisory Committee of the Framework Convention for the Protection of National Minorities, the Committee of Experts of the European Charter for Regional or Minority Languages and the European Commission against Racism and Intolerance (ECRI), the case law of the European Court of Human Rights regarding education of Roma, in particular D.H. and Others v. The Czech Republic, Sampanis and Others v. Greece, and Oršuš and Others v. Croatia68, and the conclusions and decisions of the European Committee of Social Rights, the following Council of Europe reports and publications were used as sources of inspiration for this thematic report:
- Report by Thomas Hammarberg, Commissioner for Human Rights, following his visit to Slovakia from 26 to 27 September 2011, doc. CommDH(2011)42;
- Follow-up report on the Slovak Republic (2001-2005): Assessment on the progress made following the recommendations of the Commissioner for Human Rights, for the attention of the Committee of Ministers and of the Parliamentary Assembly, doc. CommDH(2006)5.
- The Commissioner for Human Rights’ Viewpoint “The key to the promotion of Roma rights: early and inclusive education”69 (31 March 2008);
- The Commissioner for Human Rights’ publication “Human Rights of Roma and Travellers in Europe”, Council of Europe Publishing (February 2012);
- Jean-Pierre Liégeois “Roma in Europe”, Council of Europe Publishing (2009);
- Jean-Pierre Liégeois “The Council of Europe and Roma: 40 years of action”, Council of Europe Publishing
(2010 for the French edition; 2012 for the English one);
- The 2nd Thematic Commentary on Education and the 3rd Thematic Commentary on the Language Rights of
Persons belonging to national minorities published by the Advisory Committee on the Framework Convention for the Protection of National Minorities (in March 2006 and July 2012 respectively)70;
65 If not specified in footnotes, these documents are electronically accessible at http://www.coe.int/web/coe-portal/roma_reference- texts.
66 http://www.coe.int/t/dg4/youth/Source/News&Calls/2012_Roma_Youth_Action_Plan_en.pdf.
67 https://wcd.coe.int/ViewDoc.jsp?id=1902151&Site=CM.
68 Supervision of the execution of the ECtHR judgments in the case of Oršuš v Croatia prepared by the Department for the Execution of Judgments of the European Court of Human Rights (DG-HL): https://wcd.coe.int/ViewDoc.jsp?Ref=CM/Inf/DH%282011%2946&Language=lanEnglish&Ver=original&Site=CM&BackColorInter net=C3C3C3&BackColorIntranet=EDB021&BackColorLogged=F5D383; Documents submitted by the authorities/civil society - http://www.coe.int/t/dghl/monitoring/execution/Themes/Add_info/CRO-ai2_en.asp
69 http://www.coe.int/t/commissioner/Viewpoints/080331_en.asp. 70http://www.coe.int/t/dghl/monitoring/minorities/3_FCNMdocs/Thematic_Intro_en.asp.
           71

CAHROM (2012)18
- The project “Education of Roma children in Europe” (2002-2009)”71 and its publications;
- The current joint CoE/EU ROMED programme “Intercultural mediation for Roma”)72.
• Other international organisations’ reference texts and reports
Other relevant European and international reference texts and documents include:
- United Nations Convention on the Rights of the Child (into force since 1990)73;
- OSCE Action Plan on Improving the Situation of Roma and Sinti within the OSCE Area (Dec. 2003)74;
- European Monitoring Centre on Racism and Xenophobia (EUMC) Overview of the situation of Roma
and Travellers in Public Education in EU Member States (May 2006)75;
- Roma Education Fund (REF) Country Assessment: “Advancing Education of Roma in the Czech
Republic” (2007)76;
- Open Society Institute (OSI) Report “Equal Access to Quality Education for Roma – Vol. 1: Bulgaria,
Hungary, Romania, Serbia” (2007)77;
- Open Society Institute (OSI) Report “Equal Access to Quality Education for Roma – Vol. 2: Croatia,
Macedonia, Montenegro, Slovakia” (2007)78;
- OSCE-ODIHR Status Report on the Implementation of the Action Plan on Improving the Situation of
Roma and Sinti within the OSCE Area (2008)79;
- European Union Fundamental Rights Agency (FRA) “European Union Minorities and Discrimination -
EU-MIDIS - Survey - Data in focus: The Roma” (April 2009)80;
- Roma Education Fund (REF) “School as ghetto: systemic overrepresentation of Roma in special
education in Slovakia” (September 2009);
- OSCE-ODIHR Mapping of participation of Roma and Sinti children in early education processes within
the OSCE Region81 (November 2010);
- European Parliament Resolution on the EU Strategy on Roma Inclusion (March 2011);
- European Union Council conclusions on an EU Framework for National Roma Integration Strategies up
to 2020 (19 May 2011);
- Open Society Foundation (OSF) publication “Answers to Questions on (de)segregation of Roma students
in Slovak education system” (2011);
- UNICEF Position Paper “The Right of Roma Children to Education” (2011)82;
- European Commission PROGRESS Report “Improving the tools for the social inclusion and non-
discrimination of Roma in the EU”83 (2011);
- Roma Education Fund (REF) Country Assessment: “Advancing Education of Roma in Slovakia”
(2011)84;
- Roma Education Fund/Equality Pilot Research “From segregation to Inclusion: Roma pupils in the
United Kingdom” (November 2011)85;
- Roma Education Fund (REF) Publication “Pitfalls and bias: entry testing and the overrepresentation of
Romani children in special education” (April 2012);
- FRA/UNDP Report on “The situation of Roma in 11 EU Member States and in neighbouring countries”
(May 2012)86;
71 http://www.coe.int/t/dg4/education/roma/histoCulture_en.asp.
72 http://www.coe-romed.org/.
73Full text of the UN Convention at http://www2.ohchr.org/english/law/crc.htm.
74 Full text of the OSCE Action Plan on Roma and Sinti at: http://www.osce.org/odihr/17554.
75 EUMC Study available on FRA website at: http://fra.europa.eu/fraWebsite/attachments/roma_report.pdf.
76 http://www.romaeducationfund.hu/sites/default/files/publications/czech_report.pdf.
77 http://www.soros.org/sites/default/files/2roma_20070329_0.pdf.
78 http://www.soros.org/sites/default/files/equal_20071218.pdf
79 http://www.osce.org/odihr/33500?download=true.
80 http://fra.europa.eu/sites/default/files/fra_uploads/413-EU-MIDIS_ROMA_EN.pdf.
81 See this OSCE-ODIHR mapping published in Warsaw in November 2010 at http://www.osce.org/odihr/73874. 82 http://www.unicef.org/ceecis/UNICEF_ROE_Roma_Position_Paper_Web.pdf.
83 Available on Internet in English in pdf format.
84 http://www.romaeducationfund.hu/sites/default/files/publications/ref_ca_2011_sk_english_screen.pdf.
85 http://equality.uk.com/Education.html.
               72

CAHROM (2012)18
- UNDP/World Bank/EC Regional 2011 Roma Survey “Toward an Equal Start: Closing the Learning Gap
for Roma Children in Eastern Europe” (published on 4 June 2012)87;
- UNDP Issue 19 “Opportunities for Roma Inclusion” (June 2012);
- UNICEF/OSF/REF Overview Report “Roma Early childhood Inclusion” (August 2012)88;
- Roma Education Fund (REF) Publication Ten years After: a History of School Desegregation in Central
and Eastern Europe (2012)89.
• National reference texts and reports
Czech Republic
- Act No. 561/2004 Coll., on Pre-school, Elementary, Secondary, Tertiary Professional and Other Education (the Education Act), as amended.
- Decree No. 72/2005 Coll. on Providing Advisory Services in Schools and School Advisory Centres, as amended in 2011;
- Decree No. 73/2005 Coll. on. Education of Children, Pupils and Students with Special Educational Needs and Exceptionally Gifted Children, Pupils and Students, as amended by Decree No. 147/2011);
- Decree No. 364/2005 Coll. on Maintaining School and School Facility Documentation and the School Vital Registers and on Forwarding the Data from Schools and School Facilities and from School Vital Registers (the Decree on Documentation of Schools and School Facilities), as amended;
- Anti-discrimination Act of 2009;
- National Action Plan for Inclusive Education (NAPIE) (adopted by Government Resolution No. 206 of 15
March 2010);
- Czech School Inspection Thematic Report, “Compendium of results from the thematic control activity in
practical elementary schools” (March 2010);
- Opinion of the Czech Ombudsman concerning suspected discrimination of Roma children and pupils – findings from the Thematic Report of the Czech School Inspectorate’s Inspection in Elementary Practical Schools of 20th April 2010;
- Roma Integration Concept of the Czech Government for 2010–201390;
- National Strategy for the Fight against Social Exclusion (2011-2015);
- “Promoting Social Inclusion of Roma in the Czech Republic, a study of national policies” by Tomáš
Sirovátka, Masaryk University (July 2011);
- Publication “The Education System in the Czech Republic” published by the Ministry of Education, Youth
and Sport of the Czech Republic” (November 2011);
- Thematic Report on “Progress in Transformation of Former Special Schools in the School Year
2011/2012” (in accordance with requirements set out in the Education Act, as per the latest amendments)
published by the Czech School Inspectorate in July 2012;
- Principles of the Long-Term Czech Strategy for Roma Integration to 202591;
- Concept of In-Time Care for Children from Socio-Culturally Disadvantaged Environments.
Hungary
- 1993 Act on the Rights of National and Ethnic Minorities, as amended in 2011;
- 1993 Public Education Act, as amended in 199, 2003 and 2007;
- 2003 Act on the Promotion of Equal Treatment and Equal Opportunities;
- Child Protection Act;
- Decree on kindergarten education of national and ethnic minorities;
- Decree on school education of national and ethnic minorities;
- Decree on Completion of Studies at High Schools, as amended;
86 http://fra.europa.eu/sites/default/files/fra_uploads/2099-FRA-2012-Roma-at-a-glance_EN.pdf. 87 http://siteresources.worldbank.org/EXTROMA/Resources/RomaECD_FinalReport.pdf.
88 http://www.soros.org/sites/default/files/Roma-Early-Childhood-Inclusion-Report-20120813.pdf.
89
90 http://ec.europa.eu/justice/discrimination/files/roma_czech_republic_strategy_en.pdf. 91 http://ec.europa.eu/justice/discrimination/files/roma_cz_strategy_perspectives_en.pdf.
      http://www.romaeducationfund.hu/news/ref/news-and-events/ten-years-after-history-roma-school-desegregation-central-and- eastern-europ.
    73

CAHROM (2012)18
- Decree No. 4/2010. (I.19.) OKM on relevant procedure and professional requirements for the tests and
examinations.
- National Social Inclusion Strategy of Hungary – extreme poverty, child poverty, the Roma (2011-2020).
Slovak Republic
- Act No. 596/2003 Coll. on the State Administration in Schools and School Administration and on amending and supplementing certain legislation as amended by later regulation;
- Act No. 597/2003 Coll. on Financing Elementary Schools, Secondary Schools and Facilities as amended by later regulation;
- 2004 Anti-Discrimination Act;
- Act No. 108/2006 Coll. on walk-in social activation services for children;
- Act No. 245/2008 Coll. on Education and Upbringing (School Act) and on amending and supplementing
certain legislation as amended by later regulation (new School Act prohibiting discrimination and
segregation in education);
- Act No. 184/2009 Coll. on Professional Education and Training and on amending and supplementing
certain legislation;
- Act No. 317/2009 Coll. on Pedagogical Staff and Specialists and on amending and supplementing certain
legislation;
- National Strategy of the Slovak Government for the integration of Roma communities up to 2020 (adopted
in January 2012);
- Act on Socially Excluded Communities (under preparation);
- Alexander Mušinka “The things that worked – Examples of successful activities on the level of local
administration aimed at improving the situation of the Roma” (University of Prešov, 2012).
Slovenia
  - - - -
- -
- - - - -
-
-
The Constitution (in particular Art. 65);
The 2007 Roma Community Act in the Republic of Slovenia
The Strategy of Education of Roma in the Republic of Slovenia (2004, amended in 2011);
The National Programme of measures for Roma of the Government of the Republic of Slovenia for the period 2010-2015;
The Placement of Children with Special Needs Act;
The Rules on the organisation and methods of work of commissions for the placement of children with special needs and on criteria for determining the type and degree of disadvantages, impairments and disabilities of children with special needs;
The Kindergarten Act;
The Basic School Act;
The Gymnasium Act;
The Vocational Education Act;
The Organisation and Financing of Education Act;
TheAsylumSeekersAct;
The Act Regulating the Exercise of the Special Rights of Members of the Italian and Hungarian Ethnic Communities in the Field of Education.
      United Kingdom
- UK government response to the EU Council Conclusions of an EU Framework Strategy for Roma Integration up to 2020;
- UK Progress report by the ministerial working group on tackling inequalities experienced by Gypsies and Travellers (2012)92;
- Equalities Act 2010;
- Special Educational Needs and Disability Act 2001;
- Race Relation Amendment Act 2000;
  92 http://www.communities.gov.uk/publications/planningandbuilding/mwgreporttravellers.
 74

- Education Act 1996, as amended in 2001.
CAHROM (2012)18
75

 Version of the report endorsed by the CAHROM at its 5th meeting
CAHROM (2013)5
Strasbourg, 22 April 2013
AD HOC COMMITTEE OF EXPERTS ON ROMA1 ISSUES (CAHROM)
__________
THEMATIC REPORT ON SCHOOL ATTENDANCE OF ROMA CHILDREN, IN PARTICULAR ROMA GIRLS
(following the CAHROM thematic visit to Helsinki, Finland, on 24-26 October 2012) __________
Experts from FINLAND, requesting country:
Mrs Susanna Rajala, Senior Adviser, Finnish National Board of Education, Roma Education Group
Mrs Hannele Syrjä, Senior Adviser, Ministry of Social Affairs and Health, Advisory Board on Romani Affairs
Experts from LATVIA, NORWAY and SWEDEN, partner countries:
Latvia:
Mrs Sarmīte Joma, Main specialist of Preschool Education Department, Jelgava Municipality
Norway:
Mr Morten Tandberg, Leader of the Department of Roma Measures in Oslo Municipal Centre of Adult Education for Roma People
Sweden:
Mr Mats Wennerholm, Director of Education, Swedish National Agency for Education
    1 The term “Roma” used at the Council of Europe refers to Roma, Sinti, Kale and related groups in Europe, including Travellers and the Eastern groups (Dom and Lom), and covers the wide diversity of the groups concerned, including persons who identify themselves as Gypsies.

TABLE OF CONTENTS __________
I. INTRODUCTION
1.1 Background
1.2 Composition of the thematic group of experts
1.3 Agenda of the thematic visit
II. CONTEXT AND EXPECTATIONS
2.1 Context of the CAHROM thematic report and visit
2.2 Expectations and items for discussion
2.3 Size and composition of the Roma groups in the participating countries
2.3.1 Finland 2.3.2 Latvia 2.3.3 Norway 2.3.4 Sweden
2.4 Educational situation of Roma and main problems encountered 2.4.1 Finland
2.4.2 Latvia 2.4.3 Norway 2.4.4 Sweden
III. EUROPEAN AND INTERNATIONAL STANDARDS AND REFERENCE TEXTS
IV. LEGISLATION, POLICIES, STRUCTURES AND SPECIFIC MEASURES
4.1 Finland
4.2 Latvia
4.3 Norway
4.4 Sweden
V. CONCLUSIONS, LESSONS LEARNT AND GOOD PRACTICES IDENTIFIED
5.1 Conclusions and lessons learnt
5.1.1 Conclusions regarding the situation in Finland 5.1.2 Lessons learnt by the Finnish experts
5.1.3 Conclusions concerning partner countries
5.2 Good practices identified
5.3 Immediate follow-up
page 3
page 3 page 3 page 3
page 3
page 3 page 4 page 4 page 4 page 4 page 5 page 6 page 6 page 6 page 7 page 8 page 9
page 9
page 9
page 9 page 14 page 17 page 20
page 23
page 23 page 23 page 24 page 25 page 26 page 27
page 28
page 28 page 29 page 29 page 29
page 31
APPENDICES:
Appendix 1: Appendix 2: Appendix 3: Appendix 4: Appendix 5:
Formal invitation to CAHROM
Agenda of the thematic visit
List of participants of the thematic visit
European and international standards and reference texts Proposals of the Basic Education of Roma Pupils in Finland (2010-2011 Review)
Note: An ADDENDUM TO THE THEMATIC REPORT including all presentations collected during the CAHROM thematic visit is available to the Secretariat upon request.
2
CAHROM (2013)5

I. INTRODUCTION
1.1. Background
A thematic group on school drop-out/absenteeism of Roma children, with a special focus on Roma girls, was set up at the request of Finland, Norway and Sweden, during the 3rd CAHROM meeting in Ohrid, “the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia” on 22-25 May 2012. These countries, inspired by the CAHROM thematic group on school drop-out and absenteeism of Roma children with the Netherlands as a requesting country and Hungary, Spain and Sweden as partner countries [see document CAHROM (2012)6], wished to conduct a similar exercise among Nordic countries and to include a stronger focus on the gender aspect. Latvia was later contacted and accepted to join this thematic group to share its experience.
Initial contacts with Mrs Susanna Rajala from the Finnish National Board of Education and Mrs Hannele Syrjä, CAHROM member on behalf of Finland, were followed by a written invitation received by the Secretariat on 4 September 2012 from the Finnish National Board of Education which formally invited the experts of the CAHROM thematic group and the Council of Europe Secretariat to visit Helsinki on 24-26 October 2012 (see Appendix 1).
During the 4th CAHROM meeting (Strasbourg, 28-30 October 2012), following a preliminary discussion about the main outcomes of the thematic visit, the Committee agreed to rename this report as follows: “report on school attendance of Roma children, in particular Roma girls”2.
With a view to preparing the thematic report and visit, each expert from the thematic group was asked to provide background information about the situation of Roma, the legislative framework pertinent to the topic, and measures and policies towards Roma education, including financial means. Written background documents submitted by the requesting and partner countries and presentations made during the visit appear in an Addendum to this report.
1.2 Composition of the thematic group of experts
The thematic group of experts was composed of experts appointed by respective CAHROM members for their concrete experience in the field of Roma education: Mrs Susanna Rajala, Senior Adviser in the Finnish National Board of Education, Romani Education Group; Mrs Sarmīte Joma, main specialist of the Preschool Education Department at Jelgava Municipality, Latvia; Mr Morten Tandberg, Leader of the Department of Roma Measures in the Oslo Municipal Centre of Adult Education for Roma People; and Mr Mats Wennerholm, Director of Education in the Swedish National Agency for Education. Two of these experts (Latvia, Norway) work at municipal level. The Finnish CAHROM member, Mrs Hannele Syrjä, who works as Senior Adviser at the Ministry of Social Affairs and Health, Advisory Board on Romani Affairs, accompanied the group of experts during the thematic visit in Helsinki.
1.3 Agenda of the thematic visit
The agenda of the thematic visit was organised by the Finnish Advisory Board on Romani Affairs in cooperation with the Finnish National Board of Education. The agenda and the list of participants appear in Appendices 2 and 3 respectively.
II. CONTEXT AND EXPECTATIONS
2.1 Context of the CAHROM thematic report and visit
Finland and Latvia have a relatively comparable size of Roma population (6,500 and 10,000 respectively), whilst Sweden has a larger Roma population (50,000 approximately). Norway, on the other hand has a very small Roma population (700). All of them encounter similar problems in terms of school attendance of Roma children, especially in terms of school enrolment in secondary schools. Roma pursuing higher education remain an exception.
2 See para. 25 of the Abridged report of the 4th CAHROM meeting [document CAHROM (2012)21].
CAHROM (2013)5
  3

They share a common minority policy approach and Roma are recognised as a national minority3. None of these four countries participate in the Decade of Roma Inclusion4. Sweden, and to a lesser extent Finland, participate in the EU Roma Network.
2.2 Expectations and items for discussion
Prior to the CAHROM thematic visit to Helsinki, the following issues were identified by the requesting country as items to be addressed in the thematic report and during the thematic visit:
• Main challenges regarding schooling of Roma children and girls in particular;
• Main obstacles for Roma children’s education and Roma girls’ education in particular;
• Specific cultural aspects that need to be taken into consideration;
• Inclusive education policies;
• Gender equality and gender sensitive approach in the field of education;
• Basic education offered to Roma children;
• General, intensified and special support in the education system for Roma pupils/students,
and Roma girls in particular;
• Guidance provided to Roma students to help them pursue their education;
• Motivation/incentives for Roma children, and for Roma girls in particular, to pursue their
education;
• Incentives for Roma parents to send their children, and girls in particular, to school and to let
them finish their studies;
• Teaching of the Romani language;
• Role of mediators and teachers’ assistants with Roma background in building bridges
between the Roma community and school environment.
2.3. Size and composition of the Roma groups in the participating countries 2.3.1 Finland
According to official estimates, the Finnish Roma (called Kaale) living in Finland are about 10,000 people, i.e. about 0.20% of the total population5. As highlighted by the research conducted for the publication of the Finnish Roma History Book, which was launched during the visit of the CAHROM thematic group of experts in Helsinki, Finnish Roma settled on the territory of Finland 500 years ago. All Finnish Roma are Finnish citizens. They are spread in different parts of the country and there are bigger populations in certain cities. Their mother tongue is mainly Finnish, but Kaale (Finnish Romani variant) and Swedish are also spoken. The Finnish Roma belong to the Lutheran religion or free sects.
During recent years, an increasing number of Roma have arrived in Finland, particularly from Bulgaria, Romania and Slovakia. The number of Roma migrants is unknown.
2.3.2 Latvia
The Roma are one of the oldest ethnic minorities in Latvia and have been an integral part of Latvia’s cultural diversity since the 16th century. The Roma community in Latvia is relatively small: according to the 2011 census from the Central Statistical Bureau of Latvia, 6,489 Roma were living in Latvia. In 2011, the total population in Latvia is 2,070,371, from which 62.1% are Latvian, 26.9% are Russian, 3.3% are Belarusian, 2.2% are Ukrainian, 1.2% are Lithuanian, and 0,3% are Roma. 5.07% of the population is made up of other nationalities6.
3 See in this respect the Opinions of the Advisory Committee of the Framework Convention for the Protection of National Minorities on the respective countries at http://www.coe.int/t/dghl/monitoring/minorities/3_FCNMdocs/Table_en.asp.
4 Observer status should be granted to Norway at the International Steering Committee meeting of the Decade for Roma Inclusion to be held in Zagreb, Croatia, on 19-20 June 2013. A similar status is under discussion with Sweden.
5 In addition, about 3,000 Finnish Roma (Kaale) live in Sweden.
6 Source: the Central Statistical Bureau of Latvia, 2011. At the same time, according to data from the population register of the Office for Citizenship and Migration Affairs, there were 8 517 Roma living in Latvia as at 1 July 2011, comprising 0.35% of the total population.
CAHROM (2013)5
  4

Of all the Roma that are registered officially, 93.6% are Latvian citizens, out of which approximately 70% speak Latvian. A large majority of Roma regard the Romani language as their mother tongue.
Latvia’s Roma is not an ethnically homogenous community. Two different groups of Roma have lived in Latvia since ancient times: the Latvian Roma (Loftitke Roma) and the Russian Roma (Xaladytka Roma), whose differences manifest themselves territorially, linguistically, culturally and in their traditional way of life.
Over the last century, Latvia’s Roma have mainly lived a settled way of life and are not characterised by extensive travel and wide-spread migration. Based on the data that is available, the majority of Roma live in the large towns of the Kurzeme and Zemgale regions, such as Jelgava and Ventspils, as well as in Riga. Prior to the active migration of Roma to foreign countries, the highest proportion of Roma were found in Talsi, Dobele, Tukums, Limbaži and Daugavpils districts.
In Latvia there is no ghettoisation of the Roma community or spatial segregation at the regional or local level: the Roma have formed a territorially heterogeneous group that communicates actively with the local community. Anti-Gypsyism is not as prominent as in other EU member states as shown by the results of the Eurobarometer data survey on discrimination in the EU conducted in 2009. According to this survey, 27% of the population of Latvia stated that they have Roma friends or acquaintances. This indicator has increased since 2008 when 26% of the population gave the same response. In other EU Member States where the Roma population is similar or even larger, this indicator is far lower and the overall average for the EU is 17%.
2.3.3 Norway
No statistics are currently kept in Norway on the basis of ethnic background. However, on the basis of information provided by the Roma and persons who have contact with the Roma, it is possible to estimate the total number of Norwegian Roma registered in the Norwegian National Population Register at approximately 700 persons. Of these, the large majority (over 600) reside in Oslo. Torbjørg Bay’s survey confirms that estimation.
The Norwegian Roma population is culturally and socially a part of the Vlach Roma sub-group present in Western Europe7.
Norwegian Roma are recognized as a national minority group together with four other groups, i.e. Kvens (Kvener), Romani/Travellers (romani/tatere), Forest Finns (skogfinner) and Jews (jøder). Norwegian Roma have been present in today’s Norway since the 18th century at least.
The group of about 10,000 Romani/Travellers (romani/tatere) is now mostly sedentary following past assimilation policies. Their language is called Romani as opposed to the language spoken by Roma called Romanes in Norway. As stated above, Romani/Travellers are recognised in Norway as a distinct minority though both would fall under the general definition of Roma used at the Council of Europe. There is a certain agreement among experts that Roma and Romani/Travellers share a common linage originated in India. In Norway however they represent two distinct groups with different culture and history and they face different challenges when it comes to deal with the majority population and the authorities. This is why the situation of Romani/Travellers is not, however, addressed in this particular report8.
7 Source: Ada Engebrigtsen, 2010.
8 For further information regarding schooling and education of Romani/Traveller children, please consult the three state reports submitted by Norway pursuant to Article 25, paragraph 2 of the Framework Convention for the Protection of National Minorities and the respective opinions of the Advisory Committee of the Framework Convention.
CAHROM (2013)5
 According to the results of this last census, the population of Roma in Latvia has decreased by about 21 % since 2000. The reason of this decrease can be explained by the intense level of Roma emigration to other European States over the last years. However, the Roma community is the only ethnic group in Latvia that maintains a positive natural growth: Roma have the highest birth rates and one of the lowest death rates of all ethnic groups.
 5

During recent years, an increasing number of Roma have arrived in Norway, particularly from Romania9. The number of Roma migrants is unknown.
2.3.4 Sweden
The Roma population in Sweden, estimated at around 50,000 (0.53% of the total population), is culturally, linguistically, and religiously heterogeneous, made up of different groups such as Kalderash, Lovari, Churari, Kaale, Travellers, Sinti, Arli and Gurbeti.
The earliest Roma groups arrived on the territory of what is now Sweden in the 16th century. Different Roma groups have been arriving in the country over a prolonged period of time, from recent migrant workers and refugees in the 1960s to the latest arrivals of citizens from new EU countries, particularly from Romania and Bulgaria. Most Roma in Sweden are Swedish citizens or have permanent residence in the country, with the same social rights as provided to other citizens. Nearly all Roma in Sweden speak Swedish.
2.4. Educational situation of Roma and main problems encountered 2.4.1 Finland
School attendance of Roma children does not differ according to gender at preschool level (voluntary, age of 6) and for basic education e.g. grades 1-6. A difference is noted as from grades 7- 9 and this difference of behaviour as regards school attendance is often explained by cultural factors.
In Finland the percentage of Roma children who not complete compulsory education is 19%, for both boys and girls. It is estimated that 4,7 % of all Roma pupils dropped out altogether. No difference between girls and boys has been noticed in terms of complete drop-out.
As regards further education of Roma pupils, of all Roma pupils who complete their basic education, 50 % are seeking further education (46 % are girls and 54 % are boys); of all Roma pupils who pursue studies, 95 % opt for vocational studies, whilst 5 % choose upper secondary school.
Roma pupils have discovered vocational studies. Over the last ten years, seeking vocational education has more than doubled. Enrolment rates in upper secondary schools continue to be very low among Roma pupils. Specific Roma pupils' career guidance counselling has produced some positive results.
Absence at school remains problematic. Development-oriented and other municipalities (see below the chapter “education policies” for this distinction) have compared school presence of pupils. To the question “how many Roma pupils at your school were adversely affected in their schooling by a high number of absences in the school year 2010-2011”, school principals reported that a high number of absences adversely affected approximately one third of all Roma pupils. Surprisingly, the development-oriented municipalities included a larger number of schools where at least one Roma pupil had adversely affecting absences. However, the results in these two types of municipalities are not totally comparable since development-oriented municipalities count more Roma pupils than other municipalities and the absence of Roma pupils may be more closely monitored.
The main reasons for absence usually given are
• Illness (overprotectiveness of Roma children by their parents);
• Family reasons (funerals, festivities and other cultural traditions);
• Multi-disciplinary problems within the Roma families;
• Unauthorised absences, including as a result of bullying and demotivation.
9 The Norwegian authorities have informed the Council of Europe that no special measures have been established in relation to this group beyond those that apply to all other foreign nationals residing in Norway. The situation of this group of people, who support themselves, among other ways, by means of begging and busking, has been raised by the Equality and Anti- Discrimination Ombudsman, inter alia, with regard to the right to free food in connection with food distribution and the possibility of selling the magazine Oslo.
CAHROM (2013)5
 6

According to information provided by school principals to a survey conducted for the school year 2010-2011, at least three or four in every five Roma children take part in pre-primary education. Participation has significantly increased during the last ten years. Pre-primary education is associated with irregular attendance. According to the school principals, repeating pre-primary education is therefore common among Roma pupils.
In terms of general school performance, 2/3 of all Roma pupils perform as well as other pupils in development-oriented municipalities which have been able to support the less capable pupils. Throughout all municipalities, there were almost equal numbers of Roma pupils doing well or excellently, i.e. one third.
Multi-disciplinary problems within the Roma families require early guidance for the Roma pupils and dialogue with Roma parents. Cooperation between Roma families and the schools is effective and has increased over recent decades: according to a survey of all the school principals, 94% considered the level of cooperation between Roma households and the schools to be very good, good or satisfactory. Ten years ago, the corresponding figure was 67%.
Bullying is a phenomenon of concern at school, though studies conducted do not reveal that Roma children are more bullied than any other ethnic groups. The most common form of bullying is ethnic name-calling. According to the school principals, addressing the issue of bullying has usually helped.
2.4.2 Latvia
The results of several studies show that the Roma community is the most disadvantaged ethnic group, with the lowest level of education.
The level of education of Roma community is as follows10:
CAHROM (2013)5
   Level of education
Tertiary education
Specialized secondary
General secondary
Elementary school
(including primary school) (1–9)
Lower than Elementary school (including cases when level of education is not specified)
Illiterate persons
All Romani people aged 15 and above:
2000
0.4 % 1.2 % 6.7 %
42.1% 50.4%
5 985
2011
0.8%
3.5% 10.3% 36.5%
45.3 %
3.5% 4 901
                       According to some research,
• more than a third - about 39% - of Roma pupils leave school early, because of poor financial
circumstances within their families;
• 13% do not continue studies because they have their own family to take care of;
• 13% of Roma children do not continue studying because their parents do not allow it for
different reasons;
• 80% of Roma believe that their children should have at least 9 years of mandatory schooling.
At the last years the number of Roma students attended secondary schools has grown-up. According to statistic data from 2008 only 3 Roma children were educated in general secondary school, but in 2012 there were 20% of Roma children pursuing their education after elementary school.
The main obstacles and problems in Roma children’s education are:
• Unpreparedness of Roma children for starting primary school compared with other children
(very few Roma children attend pre-school); 10 Source: the Central Statistical Bureau of Latvia, 2012.
 7

CAHROM (2013)5
• Language difficulties at the beginning of school studies - Roma children are able to communicate only in their own language (Romani);
• Ethnic background and cultural values of the Roma community;
• Deep social problems of many Roma families;
• Teachers are not professionally prepared to work with Roma students;
• Lack of adequate training materials;
• Lack of summaries of best practices/ experiences in the educational area;
• Non-Roma children’s parents’ and local community’s biased attitudes against the Roma. For
example, according to Eurobarometer data on discrimination in EU in 2012, 26 % of Latvian citizens would feel totally uncomfortable about their children having Roma schoolmates11.
2.4.3 Norway
Of the 700 Norwegian Roma, approximately 200 are assumed to have permanent residence abroad. Many Roma in Norway indeed define travelling as part of their culture and way of life, and feel travelling to be closely bound up with their identity. In 2008 scientist Torbjørg Bay mapped over 600 Roma individuals in Oslo. Similar mappings were conducted in 2009 and 2012. Results show that:
• out of 120 Roma children between the ages of 6 and 15 (compulsory education), just 71 were registered in a class12;
• approximately 116 children are of pre-school age, of which 35 are abroad;
• approximately 105 children are of primary school age, of which 31 are abroad;
• approximately 73 teenagers are between 14 to 19 years old, of which approximately 40 are
abroad.
Roma children are often absent from school. For those who attend school, the parents often choose to take them out of school in favour of travelling. There is little common understanding from the parents that the decision to take them out of school prevents their children from integrating into society and jeopardises their professional future. Many children leave school in the 10th grade without an approved diploma. Just two Roma students have been able to complete high school. Three others are in progress now in the school year 2012-2013.
Most parents want their children to attend school, but are anxious of what might happen to them and fear that they may be bullied. The Roma point out that they often experience discrimination at school and that it is difficult to combine travelling with the children’s schooling. Roma have responded positively to the adult education project for Roma that has been established in Oslo.
There is a considerable degree of functional illiteracy in all age groups. Roma have expressed a wish for Norwegian reading and writing training for adult Roma13. Roma otherwise communicate orally in their own language (Romanes). There is limited contact between the Norwegian society and the Roma population and scepticism is high among Roma people when it comes to interact with the majority.
Some of the Roma lack reading and writing skills; they need a support framework or support persons they can talk to. Torbjørg Bay’s report of 2009 states that Roma would like schooling and education to be available to both children and adults. As yet, there has been no request from adult Roma for reading and writing training in Romanes.
On 22 October 2008, the Ministry of Education and Research invited Oslo schools with Roma pupils, the Ombudsman for Children and the Ministry of Labour and Social Inclusion to a discussion of challenges affecting the conditions for education of Roma children and to gain the best possible insights into improvements that can be made.
The schools informed that there is a tendency for girls to drop out of school earlier than boys.
11 http://ec.europa.eu/public_opinion/archives/ebs/ebs_393_fact_lv_en.pdf .
12 Source: Torbjørg Bay to NRK 13.03.2012.
13 See Measure no. 11 of the 2009 Action Plan for the Integration of Roma developed by the Oslo municipality.
  8

CAHROM (2013)5
The representatives of the schools adopt different approaches to the organisation of instruction for Roma pupils. Some stress the parents’ responsibility for ensuring the children’s attendance. Emphasis is placed on pupils using computers and the virtual learning environment, ClassFronter, while they are out travelling.
There is uncertainty among school professionals as to whether Roma children should be placed in separate schools/classes or if they should attend the school closest to where they live. There are also differing views as regards to whether guidelines for absence and home schooling should be the same as those that apply to other pupils. The possibility of providing Romanes instruction should nevertheless be considered, but it is difficult to find teachers with the necessary competence.
The head teachers proposed no specific approaches to improving attendance and completion of schooling for Roma children, but highlighted a number of challenges that should be given further consideration by both state and municipal authorities.
According to the head teachers, the obstacles to Roma children’s attendance are many and complex. Conditions for attendance include satisfactory housing, parents’ confidence in the school and a support framework to ensure that the children are brought to school and followed up. Many Roma find the Norwegian rules difficult to understand. Furthermore, the schools have no way of knowing where the children are at any given time.
In addition, the head teachers consider that instruction must often be specially adapted for Roma children. Emphasis is placed on instruction in basic skills, particularly reading and writing. This applies to instruction in Norwegian, not in Romanes. It is also important that there are funds available for a support framework to ensure that children come to school.
2.4.4 Sweden
In 2011 around 83% of all children between one and five years of age in Sweden attended pre- school. However, there are indications that very few Roma children attend pre-school, which places them at a disadvantage in later school years.
Teachers in Sweden tend to have lower expectations about Roma children attending school, which also sometimes results in insufficient efforts to address school absence.
III. EUROPEAN AND INTERNATIONAL STANDARDS AND REFERENCE TEXTS
The right to education for all children, and for Roma children in particular, including the issues of school drop-out and absenteeism, has been extensively addressed and documented by European and international governmental and non-governmental organisations through conventions, recommendations, case-law, reports and projects. Relevant texts can be found in Appendix 4.
IV. LEGISLATION, POLICIES, STRUCTURES AND SPECIFIC MEASURES
4.1 Finland
The Finnish National Board of Education (FNBE) is a national agency subordinated to the Ministry of Education and Culture. The FNBE has a wide range of tasks related to the development of education all through pre-primary and basic education, general and vocational upper secondary education and training, liberal adult education and basic education in the arts. The FNBE is responsible for drawing up the national core curricula.
A reform of general education in terms of objectives, lesson-hour distribution, and national core curricula and local curricula has started and will be carried out as a whole until 2016/2017.
Several core curriculum documents will be drawn up concurrently, based on involving broad-based co-operation with stakeholders and experts, as well as support for local curriculum development efforts in many different ways. The preparation of general guidelines for basic education outlined that it would be important to take into account:
 9

• The basic values;
• The role and structure of education, school culture;
• The future competence;
• The integrating role;
• The conception of learning;
• Teaching methods;
• Learning environments;
• Pupil assessment;
• Support and guidance.
A sub-group for support to learning and school attendance has been created to focus on comprehensive literacy skills and a linguistically and culturally conscious school; comprehensive reading and writing skills as part of future competence; and linguistic and cultural awareness as part of school culture and teaching.
Rationale of the educational reform: the world surrounding school has changed essentially since the beginning of the 21st century. This is due to the effects of globalisation and the challenges of sustainable future changes in children’s and young people’s growth environment, in the nature and amount of information, in production and communication of information, in technologies, in the nature of work, in the complexity of society, in demographics, in natural environments, etc. Therefore new skills to build a sustainable future are needed. In that context, it is necessary to examine educational contents, pedagogy and schools’ working practices and reform these in relation to changes.
Principles for the preparation of the core curricula: The following aspects must be taken into account when drawing up the core curricula in all of their sectors (targets, contents and practices):
• strengthening the continuum of education and teaching and the consistency of teaching;
• consistency from early childhood to pre-primary and basic education and between various
sectors of the curriculum, in basic education especially between various subjects;
• promoting extensive literacy skills, media literacy skills and ICT skills as a task that
permeates all teaching sectors;
• identifying change in literacy skills and promoting these skills as a task that is shared by all
teachers, consciously taking the role of the media and ICT into account in all learning;
• promoting equality;
• strengthening safety, promoting inclusion and participation, reducing inequality and
preventing discrimination, taking gender-related needs into account;
• supporting the pupils’ growth and development, improving well-being and other prerequisites
for learning, strengthening early childhood education and care partnership;
• taking the pupils’ age groups and various development stages into account, increasing
experiences of success, taking individual needs into account (the need for support, the need for further challenges), developing the quality and sense of community in learning environments;
• promoting language and cultural awareness;
• strengthening pupils’ identity, taking their language and cultural roots into account, valuing
diversity and conscious inclusion of pupils with different backgrounds, recognising the
significance of languages and cultures in the world;
• working with knowledge, technological change, especially the impacts of the constantly
growing volume and complexity of information and technology on schoolwork, strengthening
skills in knowledge work;
• internationality/globality, i.e. ability to think and act globally and to examine local and global
needs and their possibilities in relation to one another;
• promoting a sustainable future: aspects of social and sociological, cultural, ecological and
economical sustainability, education for responsibility.
State subsidy for supporting basic education for the Roma children in Finland: the main goal of this development programme is to establish methods created in the development programmes as part of the everyday activities in schools and municipalities.
10
CAHROM (2013)5

Between 2008 and 2012, a total of 35 municipal authorities received state subsidy for this need – totalling 2.1 million €. Despite the small number of municipal authorities assisted, subsidy is effectively targeted at those with a high number of Roma within their jurisdiction. It is estimated that at least 80% of all Roma pupils of basic education age come within the scope of the aid. Every subsidised municipality has to create a plan for supporting Roma pupils in basic education.
Development programmes for supporting the Roma pupils in basic education include measures for:
• interacting with the Roma pupils, developing the cooperation between the Roma family and
the school;
• promoting tolerance and positive ethnic relations, as well as increasing awareness of the
Roma culture;
• promoting connections between the Roma minority and the majority population in the school;
• promoting the Roma identity of the Roma pupils and promoting acquisition of the Roma
language;
• contributing to enhancing the learning abilities of the Roma pupils;
• developing teaching methods for the Roma pupils requiring special support;
• developing pedagogy and materials taking into account the varying backgrounds of the
Roma pupils.
The Strategy of the Finnish National Board of Education 2011 stresses the characteristics of basic education in Finland (Roma children like any other children benefit from these advantages):
• Basic education is free of charge for pupils;
• Textbooks and other materials, tools etc. are free of charge;
• Pupils are offered a free daily meal;
• School health care and other welfare services are free to the pupils;
• Pupils in basic education living some distance from school (more than 5 km) or if the journey
is considered dangerous are entitled to free transport.
The first Finnish National Policy on Roma has been prepared in 2009 by a Special Working Group appointed by the Ministry of Social Affairs and Health.
The general objective is that Finland will be a forerunner among European countries in promoting the inclusion of Roma by 2017.
The specific objectives are to provide guidelines to all administrative sectors for the implementation of activities, as well as guidelines also to the activities of the National Board of Education and especially to the Roma Education Group.
The main key objectives in the Finnish National Policy on Roma as regards education are:
• Enhancing the participation of Roma children in early childhood and pre-primary education;
• Enhancing the social inclusion of Roma children and youth in basic education and upper
secondary education;
• Enhancing the participation in vocational education and training of adult Roma;
• Promoting the development of the Romani language and culture.
During the visit in Helsinki, the Finnish National Board of Education presented the new Strategy for Special Needs Education in Comprehensive Education, based on the support for learning and school attendance. This is a new long-term strategy for the development of pre-primary and basic special education that has required changes in the Basic Education Act14, as well as in the National Curricula for Pre-Primary and Basic Education. It has also established a large development programme and guidelines to help teachers to follow the new Act.
The Act, amending the Basic Education Act, has as its main aim to strengthen the pupil's right to early, preventive support in learning and growth. The support is intended to be intensified by stages: a) general support; b) intensified support and c) special support.
14 The Basic Education Act came into force on 1 January 2011.
CAHROM (2013)5
 11

A pupil has:
• the right to get instruction and guidance counselling in accordance with the curriculum and
sufficient support in learning and school attendance, as soon as the need arises15;
• the possibility to get support and counselling is a right every pupil has on every school day.
Part-time special needs education is provided to a pupil who has minor difficulties in learning or adjustment and needs special support to overcome learning difficulties. It is arranged, in general education, as team teaching; in small groups or individually.
Part time Special Needs Education in Finland
Speech difficulties
Reading and writing difficulties
Learning difficulties in mathematics Learning difficulties in foreign languages Emotional and social difficulties
Other special difficulties
Total
Pupils concerned
20 671 56 527 24 576 12 006
6 726
9 442
129 94816
The education support plan is a collaborative effort. The level of support is based on the pedagogical assessment involving all teachers, the pupil and his/her parent and pupil welfare personnel and other professionals.
The support goes from a medical approach to pedagogical assessment and involves multi- professional co-operation. New pedagogical methods, co-teaching, differentiation, flexible grouping, and minimizing the barriers to learning in a learning environment, as well as equal opportunities to get support in different schools and municipalities, are required. The goal is to support every pupil so that every pupil can fulfil his/her full potential.
The content of the local curriculum is determined in more detail in the core curriculum:
• Support to learning and the structure of the support;
• The principles underlying the provision of the support, the aims and the practical
arrangement of the different forms of support;
• The division of work and responsibilities in devising the personal learning plan and
conducting the pedagogical examination;
• Cooperation with the pupil and the parent/career/legal representative.
Implementation of the reform: for the time being, the evidence shows that the way of doing is being successful, through in-service education for teachers, locally organised networks, peer learning, benchmarking, supporting materials for teachers and good learning materials for students. Between 1999 and 2011, the number of special-needs schools has fallen by nearly 60% and the number of pupils in these schools by nearly 50%. Further information can be found in the Basic Education of Roma Pupils - Review 2010–201117 and its 11 proposals (see Appendix 5 of this report).
The Finnish Romani language is under serious threat and included in the UNESCO list of endangered languages. For the time being, there are Romani-speaking people in Finland, but their average age is rising rapidly. Language nests are meant for Roma people of all ages: children, young people and adults. Romani language nest activities are mainly verbal and activities may vary from one town to another. President Tarja Halonen is patron of the project.
According to the governmental statistics for the teaching of the Romani language, the actual number of pupils is 174 pupils, or 20.2%.
15 Amended Section 30.
16 i.e. 21.9% of the total amount of pupils in basic education which is 593,148.
17 An online publication and learning materials can be found at www.oph.fi/julkaisut (see Romanioppilaiden). The publication can also be ordered from the Roma Education Group at the Finnish National Board of Education: marita.korp@oph.fi.
CAHROM (2013)5
   12

CAHROM (2013)5
94% of the school principals (at schools with Roma pupils) were of the opinion that school staff had familiarised themselves with Romani culture only a little, to some extent or considerably. Of all school principals, 6% reported that staff had not familiarised themselves at all with Romany culture.
The teaching of the Romani language aims to activate the pupils’ skills and use of the Romani language so that Roma pupils are able, and have the courage, to use their own language as a tool of interaction and thinking both within the Roma community and outside it. Pupils are instructed in understanding the importance of their own language for the vitality and identity of their own culture and the position of the Romani language as a language next to all other languages. Teaching of the Romani language must help the pupils to understand that the spoken language learned at home and the standard language taught at school are elements that supplement one other. The task of teaching is to support the balanced development of pupils’ dual identity and their ability to integrate into both the Roma and the Finnish community.
The government has aids for arranging teaching of the Romani language for a maximum of two hours per week. The group must have at least two pupils at the beginning of the term or, in course- based teaching, at the beginning of the course. The pupils may be from pre-primary education, from various grades in basic education and upper secondary school, from different municipalities18 and from private and state schools. Teaching takes place during the school day.
Summer courses in the Romani language and workshops for Roma parents in various parts of the country have also been developed.
School assistants, teacher’s assistants, mediators of Roma background: the adoption of enhanced support is very important for the Roma pupils. The school assistants’ tasks include identity support to Roma children (female-male) and contacts between teachers and assistants (intensive “working couples”, good companionship). It is important that teacher assistants of Roma background take care of all children, the majority children, as well as Roma children.
Supporting Roma girl students in basic education - Development project in Oulu municipality19: The Department of Education in the city of Oulu has been involved in the Supporting Roma Students’ Basic Education Project since August 2008. This project has received funds from the Finnish National Board of Education which have been essential in supporting several functions and actions targeted at Roma students. A Steering Group has monitored and guided the project in co-operation with a network consisting of schools, authorities and third sector organisations (Primary and Secondary Schools, Regional State Administrative Agency of North Ostrobothnia and Roma people of Northern Finland, a registered association).
The objectives and aims of the Oulu project are:
• To increase Roma students’ identity;
• To promote the use and learning of Roma language;
• To increase the facts and awareness of Roma culture amongst all students and teachers;
• To develop home-school co-operation;
• To enhance the Roma students’ possibilities in education
The main practical and concrete outputs of the Oulu project are:
• A development plan;
• Local curriculum for Roma language;
• Showcases and workshops presenting Roma culture and history (clothing, music,
handicrafts);
• In-service training for teachers;
• Weekend family camps for parents and children.
18 This teaching was available in 2011 in Espoo, Heinola, Helsinki, Iisalmi, Imatra, Jyväskylä, Kangasniemi, Kokkola, Kuopio, Lahti, Savonlinna, Tampere, Turku, Urjala, Vantaa, and Ähtäri.
19 For further information, please contact: katja.huusko-ahlgren@eduouka.fi or raimo.salo@ouka.fi.
   13

CAHROM (2013)5
The project emphasises the cultural awareness for teachers through training courses about Roma culture. The project has obtained positive outcomes as teachers have become more aware of the true factors of Roma girls’ culture, especially of their clothes.
Other practical and concrete outputs include:
• In-service training for staff members in Roma language;
• A theatre play filmed into a movie of Roma culture;
• Production of a Roma music CD;
• Supporting Roma teenagers in applying for further studies;
• Homework afternoon clubs for Roma students.
There is a large variety of measures supporting Roma girls’ education:
• Homework afternoon clubs have provided peaceful time and space for girls to discuss
matters worrying them (they feel the need to exchange ideas about with a Roma woman). Homework clubs are also useful to maintaining discussions about subjects such as education, traditions, cultural identity (e.g. clothes), and self-esteem;
• Supporting Roma students’ basic education. At the early stage, i.e. during primary school years, it is essential to make clear the importance of education and attending school daily so as to affect the students’ attitudes towards schooling in the long run;
• Homework and handicrafts;
• Supporting the application process for further studies by trial periods;
• Personal programme for 3-5 days;
• One-to-one counselling discussions: motivation, interests, need for support;
• Visits to vocational institutions (discussions and visits give a more realistic image and view of
the content of different professions which help students to find suitable training for themselves).
Among the positive outcomes of such measures, one can say that:
• Students do not fall behind;
• There is sharing of experiences of success and knowledge;
• There is a positive meaning among students which inspires better education and keeps them
motivated;
• They enhance students’ learning possibilities;
• They decrease the drop-outs.
All of those activities encourage girls to make their dreams come true and to find new perspectives to their study plans. The practices in working life combined with practical examples on how other Roma girls have solved similar problems give them courage and hope to continue on the path of their own choice. It is necessary for Roma girls to see and hear from true examples and cases of successful Roma women who have been trained for a profession and are doing well in working life.
Young Roma people recognise the necessity of vocational studies which would improve their quality of life and well-being. Nevertheless, still today, girls’ lives are aimed at finding the spouse of their dreams and starting a family of their own. Girls experience that further education prevents moving on and discover the world which is the only way to find a partner unless there are any suitable candidates in their hometown.
4.2 Latvia
The main legislation of education in Latvia includes the Education Law from 1998 and the General Education Law from 1999. The 1998 Law of Education forbids the differential treatment to education. It means that Roma people have the same rights and obligations with regard to education as the general Latvian population.
More specific guarantees, aims and goals are regulated by the normative acts of the Cabinet of Ministers of the Republic of Latvia. For example, the amendments to the Cabinet Regulation No. 461 of 18 May 2010 “Regulations Regarding the Classification of Occupations, the Basic Tasks Appropriate to the Occupation and the Basic Qualification Requirements, and the
14

CAHROM (2013)5
Procedures for the Use and Updating of the Classification of Occupations” allow municipalities to provide their pre-schools and elementary schools with a teachers’ assistant of Roma background in order to promote school attending especially among Roma children. The general secondary education level is the minimal grade to work as teachers’ assistant of Roma background, but in the same time the tertiary pedagogical education is necessary to be employed as non-Roma teacher assistant.
Given the specific national situation and conditions, such as the small Roma population, Latvia has developed a series of national Roma integration policy measures (hereafter “Measures”). These Measures have been included in the development planning document: National Identity, Civil Society and Integration Policy Guidelines 2012-2018 (hereinafter “Guidelines”). There are concrete actions and projects will be formulated to implement the Measures in every two years in close cooperation with the representatives of the Roma community.
In 2012 the Council supervising the implementation of Roma integration policy measures (thereafter - Council) has been established by the Ministry of Culture. The Council includes representatives from state bodies (co-responsible ministries, the Office of the Ombudsman, local authorities, and educational authorities), Roma and non-Roma NGOs that work in the area of protecting the interests of the Roma, as well as experts in Roma integration issues. Totally 8 Roma representatives are involved in the Council: 6 representatives of Roma NGOs, one representative from the Office of Ombudsman and one expert. The main aim of the Council is to assess and foster the policy for Roma integration, as well as to promote civil participation of the Roma community and to strengthen cooperation between the Roma community and national authorities, in accordance with the National identity, civil society and integration policy guidelines for 2012-2018. The main tasks of the Council are ensuring an effective implementation and evaluation of results of the policy for Roma integration and particular the set of national Roma integration policy measures; providing recommendation to the authorities to improve the implementation of the policy for Roma integration especially in field of education, employment, health care and housing; fostering the cooperation between Roma community, authorities, stakeholders, social partners, NGO and experts; evaluating the possibility of effective use of EU structural funds to implementation of the set of national Roma integration policy measures.
Roma representatives are also members of the Consulting Council in Ethnic Minority Education Affairs of the Ministry of Education and Science.
The Measures of the national Roma integration policy have been developed in accordance with the European Union, Council of Europe and other international instruments and legislative acts binding on Latvia. These have also been inspired by Recommendations of the study “Roma rights to education: implementing the situation in Latvia”. According to this study, the main challenges for Roma integration in the area of education are as follows:
• To continue the good practice of preparing and facilitating the inclusion of teaching assistants of Roma background in schools by providing for the further professional education of these teaching assistants. To acknowledge, collate and disseminate other examples of good practice in Roma education;
• To develop and improve intercultural competencies in order to facilitate the integration of Roma school children in general education;
• To implement teacher training and continuing education by ensuring a link with practice in classes where Roma children study together with other children;
• To regularly analyse the situation in the work of educational establishments where Roma school children study, such as teachers’ professional qualifications for classroom work with children of different ethnic origins;
• To support projects to foster Roma education implemented by non-governmental organisations (or representatives of the Roma community) together with educational establishments or other nongovernmental organisations;
• To develop a mechanism for recording the educational age of Roma in order to reduce the risk of school absenteeism and to foster Roma children’s regular attendance at school. To collate data on preparing Roma children for pre-school education, mandatory five-year and six-year education, educational results and completing basic education;
15

CAHROM (2013)5
• To develop and publish methodological materials for teaching 5-7 year old children the Romani language (with translation into Latvian), with the content representing the traditional key elements of Roma culture;
• To maintain a dialogue with the parents of Roma children, to support and involve them in the education process by explaining the importance of education;
• To foster the improvement of socio-economic conditions for Roma children in preparation for primary school;
• To include experts from the Roma community in the work of the consultative board on issues of minority education of the Ministry of Education and Science.
The Guidelines define the following policy results to be achieved and result indicators which have a targeted approach to Roma. The main policy areas set out in the Reform Programme for reducing the proportion of young people who do not finish school are as follows:
• ensuring access to primary and secondary education;
• implementing modern teaching methods.
Given that the Roma are one of the social groups with one of the lowest levels of education, and the fact that a large number of Roma children drop out of the education process before completing their education, the tasks set out in the Reform Programme for reducing the proportion of young people who do not finish school also apply to the Roma population.
Preschool education is under the responsibility of municipalities. Since 2002, education of 5-6 year old children is obligatory. Every child has the right to equal and quality education.
Solutions:
• Creating multicultural, inclusive groups/classes and involving children in early education;
• Teacher trainings for work in multicultural, inclusive groups/classes;
• Parent support centres in schools;
• Teacher’s assistants with Roma background as intermediary between school and family.
Teacher's assistants of Roma background were prepared to work in the school environment during the following projects of the Centre for Education Initiatives (CEI):
• « Roma Child in a Welcoming School » (2004 CEI project): One of them obtained a Bachelor degree and works as a preschool teacher, two of them continue their work as teachers assistants with salaries from the municipality budget;
• « Teachers assistants of Roma Background» (2006-2009 CEI project): In the 2007/2008 and 2008/2009 school years, eight teachers’ assistants of Roma background were working in schools in several regions. In 2009/2010, there were eight teachers’ assistants, two of which were paid from the municipality budget. These measures are implemented in the framework of the State Programme “Roma in Latvia”.
• «School and Community for Inclusion of Roma Children» (2011 CEI project): In the 2011/2012 school year, five teacher’s assistants of Roma background were working in schools in several regions. In 2012/2013, three teachers’ assistants receive salaries from the municipality budget.
Other examples of projects run by the Centre for Education Initiatives (CEI) include20:
• 2011/2012: research on "financing and governance of education for children with learning
difficulties: focus on effectiveness, efficiency and equity";
• 2011/2012: "training of pedagogues for inclusion of Roma children";
• 2011/2012: "creation of the support system for work with Roma children";
• 2011/2012: "inclusive family, pre-school, school and society";
• 2011/2012: "school and community for inclusion of Roma children";
• 2008/2010: "integration's suitcase" for children with special needs;
• 2009/2011:"quality inclusive education for children with disabilities”.
20 For older CEI projects, see information provided by Latvia in the Addendum of this thematic report.
 16

CAHROM (2013)5
Roma children's inclusion and integration into mainstream education and the integration of their families, especially senior Roma, into society, is promoted through cooperation and intercultural dialogue in order to reduce social disparity.
In that respect, parental support centres and adult education - through cooperation with teachers, school administrators, local government representatives and parents - lead to more educated Roma adults who are more inclined to send their children to school.
New projects are being initiated under the “Social rehabilitation programme for Roma families with preschool or school age children” for the 2012-2013 school year in Jelgava and Jurmala.
4.3 Norway
According to Sections 1-3 and 2-1 of the Act relating to Primary and Secondary Education (Education Act), all children have the right and obligation to attend primary and lower secondary education, and the school owner must ensure that they receive schooling adapted to their abilities and learning needs. The obligation may be met by means of publicly maintained primary and lower secondary schools or through other equivalent education. Experience indicates that it can be difficult to find satisfactory solutions for safeguarding Roma children’s right to education while also enabling them to develop their cultural identity and way of life, of which travelling is a major feature.
In addition, young people and adults who have completed primary education are entitled to upper secondary education. Section 2-1 of the Education Act regulates the right and obligation to attend primary and lower secondary education, while section 3-1 regulates young people’s right to upper secondary education. Section 2-1, fifth paragraph, of the Education Act states the consequences of failure to attend compulsory schooling.
Pupils attending private primary and upper secondary schools have a corresponding entitlement pursuant to section 3-5 of the Private Education Act. This arrangement also applies to Roma. According the Primary and Lower Secondary School Information System (GSI), no Roma pupils have received education in accordance with this provision. However, the GSI’s census is taken on 1 October each year, when many Roma are still travelling.
Pupils attending primary, lower and upper secondary education and training whose mother tongue is neither Norwegian nor Sami “have the right to adapted education in Norwegian until they are sufficiently proficient in Norwegian to follow the normal instruction of the school. If necessary, such pupils are also entitled to mother tongue instruction, bilingual subject teaching, or both” (Section 3-12 of the Education Act).
Bearing in mind that the Roma are one of five national minorities in Norway, the Norwegian authorities therefore have a particular responsibility for ensuring that the Roma, as a national minority, are given a genuine opportunity to take part in Norwegian society on the same terms and with the same potential as other people. On the basis of the Government’s social and welfare policy, all people, including the Roma, should have the opportunity for inclusion in the Norwegian community and be able to take part in education and working life.
In January 1973, due to the media’s focus on, and criticism of the marginalisation and unfavourable living conditions of Roma in Oslo, the Ministry of Health and Social Affairs submitted the White Paper Report No. 37 (1972-73) to the Storting On Measures for the Norwegian Gypsies (Om tiltak for de norske sigøynere). In the White Paper, the responsibility and work on ensuring improved living conditions for the Roma were divided between the Municipality of Oslo and the Ministry of Health and Social Affairs.
 There are also many special activities regarding Roma inclusion, including Roma education, that are implemented in the framework of PROGRESS 2007-2013 project “Different people. Various
 experiences. One Latvia”. For example, Roma NGO leaders and representatives, specialists of municipalities and local governments, as well pedagogical staff of schools, are involved in activities to raise awareness of Roma and supporting their integration. These activities are implemented in 2012-2013 by the Social Integration Fund and the Ministry of Culture.
17

On the basis of the White Paper, an official with responsibility for Gypsy affairs was appointed at the Ministry of Health and Social Affairs in 1973. An agreement was concluded between the Ministry of Health and Social Affairs and the Municipality of Oslo concerning full reimbursement of the cost of the municipality’s services for Roma. The Department for Gypsy Matters (“Gypsy Office”) was established in the municipality of Oslo. In compliance with the intentions of the White Paper, the Gypsy Office was to coordinate all services for Roma which, in the case of the population at large, were divided between various different agencies and institutions.
The tasks of the “Gypsy Office” were as follows:
• providing advice and guidance and making recommendations and decisions pursuant to the
Social Welfare Act and the Child Welfare Act;
• carrying out settlement work among Gypsies (neighbourhood work, residential training, site
procurement, planning of accommodation with the extended families concerned;
• coordinating work on health issues among Gypsies in cooperation with Sagene Health Clinic;
• cooperating with other bodies/agencies;
• foreign language teaching for primary and lower secondary school;
• adult education for Gypsies;
• Gaustadbekkdalen day care institution for Gypsy children;
• a youth club for Gypsies;
• County Employment Office (with responsibility for labour market measures for Gypsies);
• providing advice and guidance to other municipalities and agencies, and assisting foreign
Gypsies travelling in Norway.
Special teaching arrangements for Roma were established in 1973 in the form of special classes for Roma in certain schools in Oslo. Roma women were periodically attached to these classes as mother tongue assistants. A number of teaching aids were developed in Romanes.
At the end of the 1980s and beginning of the 1990s, the teaching arrangements for Roma children were changed from special classes to attendance of normal classes with mainly the same rights as minority language children21.
In 1990, Oslo City Council decided that special measures for “Gypsies” were to be abolished completely on the grounds that “Norwegian Gypsies should as far as possible be treated in the same way as any other inhabitant of Norway”22. The Labour Party and the Socialist Left Party referred at that time to reports from experts and argued against completely abolishing the measures, which they said would have negative consequences for the Gypsies’ school attendance, housing situation and implemented employment measures.
In 2009, an Action Plan for Roma – primarily designed for Roma in Oslo - was established by the then Ministry of Labour and Social Inclusion (subject to follow-up by the present Ministry of Government Administration, Reform and Church Affairs). The task of the Department of Roma measures (Skullerud VO) is to carry out parts of this plan in cooperation with the Board and the authorities. Coordination among various actors is ensured through the Skullerud board, namely:
• the leader of the Department of municipality board of culture and business/industry;
• a representative from the Agency of Knowledge and Pre-School Education (Kindergarten);
• a representative from the Agency of Social Services;
• a representative from the Agency of Substance Abuse Problems;
• a representative from the Agency of Education;
• a representative from the Department of Roma Measures (Skullerud Vo);
• representatives from official agencies and departments;
• representatives from the Roma group;
• School rector/principal;
• Teachers and supervisors.
21 Source: Lars Gjerde: Rom i Norge - en historikk [Roma in Norway - a historical account. 22 Case No. 585/90:1017.
CAHROM (2013)5
 18

CAHROM (2013)5
The main goals of the Action Plan for Roma include the following:
• To teach parents basic skills in reading, writing, mathematics, data and social science;
• To help out each individual and family in contact with the authorities.
From 2007 until today, the authorities have tried out different methods and approaches to meeting participants needs, such as:
• Ordinary lessons in classrooms;
• Projects;
• One-to-one education;
• Focusing on special subjects to motivate the participants to achieve their goals;
• Role plays;
• Vocational training.
Since 1991, the Municipality of Oslo has taken responsibility for measures for Roma in day care
institutions, primary and lower secondary schools and adult education.
Day care institutions: In 1978, a day care institution for Roma children was established in Gaustadbekkdalen in Oslo. This was operated as an experimental day care institution until 1988, and was then approved as a permanent day care institution by the former Ministry of Consumer Affairs and Government Administration. The day care institution was owned by the Municipality of Oslo. The state covered 25% of the operating deficit of the day care institution until it was closed down in 1991. It was then intended that Roma children would be integrated in the municipality’s ordinary day care institutions. Since then, no day care institution projects/measures have been specially designed for Roma.
Primary and lower secondary education through stimulating funds: in 2007, the Municipality of Oslo provided stimulating funds to improve follow-up of, and counteract dropout among, Roma pupils in Oslo schools. Schools were allocated funds on the basis of pupil numbers and action plans.
The action plans emphasised strengthening of the contact between home and school, building of mutual trust, individual follow-up, reinforcing the contact teacher function, surveying skills, providing suitable materials for better adapted instruction and implementing routines and clear agreements in connection with travelling. Schools mainly used these funds for increased staffing and for purchasing materials for monitored instruction, PCs, food and books about the Roma. The results indicated the necessity for close and personal contact between parents and the school, which improves the basis for communication, not least concerning agreements in connection with travelling.
The increased staffing enabled certain improvement of individual follow-up including the use of a “reading assessment form” which proved to have a positive effect on the pupils’ skills. All schools stressed the importance of increased staffing as a condition for progress. The use of contracts in connection with travelling has had positive effects in some cases. The stimulating funds were provided for autumn 2007, but a number of schools followed this up by allocating funds from their own budgets. Stimulating funds were also provided to schools in autumn 2008. Seventy-one Roma pupils have been registered, divided between 22 schools, each of which has from one to eleven Roma pupils.
Adult education for Roma: adaptive training for adult Roma began in 1973 in order to provide Roma with elementary reading and writing skills and to provide social and vocational training. Attendees were paid daily cash benefits. The main reason for transferring the responsibility for education of Roma from the state to the municipalities in 1991 was that the instruction provided should be as consistent as possible with the provision for other social groups.
During the transitional phase, it was sometimes proposed that Roma should be offered instruction in the Norwegian language and civic life similar to that provided to immigrants and refugees. However, Roma have different learning needs, along-established connection with Norway and knowledge of Norwegian society, although they may be said to live outside of it. Considerable illiteracy has also been revealed among Norwegian Roma.
19

CAHROM (2013)5
Remedying this is in many cases dependent on specially adapted educational provision. Within the existing arrangements, there is no reason why literacy training, for example, should not be offered. Such instruction is already part of statutory primary education and is required to be adapted to the learning needs of the participants. Additional educational adaptations needed by the Roma population may involve further expense. Indeed, the Roma have themselves expressed a need for subsistence support while attending courses.
In 2007 Oslo Municipality decided to organise adult education for Roma people (in line with the OSCE recommendation for better integration of the Roma people). The idea behind this was that the children’s ability to complete school depended on the parents’ living conditions.
The Norwegian authorities focus on education as a key element for the Roma to help themselves to become a greater part of society and to successfully integrate into society.
The main stakeholders and actors of Roma adult education include:
• Ministry of Government Administration, Reform and Church Affairs;
• Ministry of Education and Research;
• Oslo Municipality Department of Culture and Education;
• Oslo Municipality Centre of Adult Education Oslo.
Adults are entitled to primary and lower secondary education if they require it (section 4A-1 of the Education Act). They are entitled to upper secondary education from the year they reach 25 years of age if they have completed primary and lower secondary education but have not completed upper secondary education (section 4A-3).
The Ministry of Labour and Social Inclusion provides support for educational provision at the Oslo Adult Education Centre at Skullerud. Since December 2007, the Centre has held regular ICT courses in word processing using Microsoft Word, searching the Internet and using e-mail. The focus on e-learning is continually being developed, and efforts are now being made to make more active use of the virtual learning environment ClassFronter with a view to closer cooperation with primary and lower secondary schools.
In the view of the Government, educational provision for adult Roma should as far as possible comply with current guidelines, mainly providing adapted instruction within these arrangements, with the cost of the instruction covered within the existing grant schemes. However, measures for Roma sometimes require additional resources and the State has, for example, contributed to the funding of the adult education project under the auspices of the Municipality of Oslo.
Adult Roma have the same right to education as other Norwegian citizens, and no state funds are currently specifically allocated to measures for Roma (apart from the adult education project for young adult Roma).
The policy development regarding national minorities concerns, among other things, defining the content of, and clarifying the relationship, between the various human rights conventions that Norway has undertaken to follow up. Article 27 of the UN International Covenant on Civil and Political Rights of 1966 and Article 5 of the Council of Europe’s Framework Convention for the Protection of National Minorities guarantee the Roma, as a national minority, a special right with regard to the safeguarding and development of their own language, their own culture and their own identity.
4.4 Sweden
The Swedish Education Act stipulates that all children and young people must have access to education of equal value, irrespective of gender, place of residence and social and financial circumstances. In Sweden, compulsory schooling lasts for nine years and children have a right to education from the age of seven. The aim of compulsory school education is to provide all pupils with the knowledge and skills they need to participate in social life and in continued education. Special support is given to pupils who have difficulties with school work. Attending school is free of charge, although minor amounts may be charged for one-off activities. Educational content is determined by
20

CAHROM (2013)5
the curriculum and subject syllabuses. Individual development plans and written assessments are to be provided every school year and grades are given from year 8 onwards.
 The new Schools Act reinforces the pupils’ right to support and improves the monitoring of pupils in need of special support by way of written assessments, earlier formal qualifications and more national tests. In its reform work, the Government has focused on the earlier school years, since these lay the foundations for a subsequent successful education. The Government is also making efforts to develop pupils’ skills in reading, writing and arithmetic.
The responsibility for the student to fulfil their compulsory schooling relies with several parties. The municipality should ensure that the students in primary education and with basic learning disabilities attend school. Anyone with custody of a child of school age shall ensure that the child fulfils their
compulsory schooling. If a student does not attend school because the pupil's guardian has not done what he is required to ensure this, the municipality shall oblige the pupil's guardian to fulfil their obligations. A compliance order may be combined with a penalty.
 In Sweden, the pre-school system is intended for children from the age of one until they start compulsory education. The purpose of pre-school is to stimulate children's development and learning in a secure and caring environment. Pre-school takes a holistic view of children and their needs and is designed so that care, development and learning come together to form a whole.
The pre-school class is a voluntary form of school within the state school system. Municipalities are required to offer children places in pre-school classes from the autumn term of the year in which a child turns six until the child starts his/her compulsory schooling. Today approximately 96 per cent of all six-year-olds go to pre-school classes. The aim of education in pre-school classes is to stimulate pupils’ development and learning and to prepare them for their future school career.
On 16 February 2012, the Swedish Government adopted a coordinated and long term Strategy for Roma Inclusion for the period 2012–203223.
The twenty-year Roma inclusion strategy is to be regarded as a strengthening of the already existing minority policy that applies to all the five national minorities in Sweden24.
The Swedish strategy for Roma inclusion, which was already planned, also serves as a response to the call of the European Commission on Member States to adopt national Roma integration strategies or further develop existing strategies. The strategy is based on human rights, with particular emphasis on the principle of non-discrimination. This means that the Government emphasises that the Roma, like all others, are entitled to enjoy all human rights.
The target group is above all those Roma who are living in social and economic exclusion and are subject to discrimination. Women and children are a special priority.
The overall goal of the twenty-year Roma strategy is for a Roma who turns twenty years of age in 2032 to have the same opportunities in life as a non-Roma. The rights of Roma who are then twenty should be safeguarded within ordinary structures and areas of activity to the same extent as are the rights for twenty-year-olds in the rest of the population.
The Swedish strategy contains goals and measures within six specific areas of activity: a) education, b) employment, c) housing, d) health, social care and security, e) culture and language and f) the organisation of civil society. The Swedish Roma Strategy is based on human rights, with particular emphasis on the principle of non-discrimination.
23 See Official Communication 2011/12:56. The text of the Swedish Roma Strategy (available in Swedish only) is available at: http://ec.europa.eu/justice/discrimination/files/roma_sweden_strategy_sv.pdf. Further information about the Government’s Official communication 2011/12:56 about national minorities, minority policy, minority conventions, and the Government bill 2008/09:158 “From recognition to empowerment” are available on the Government’s websites www.manskligarattigheter.se and www.regeringen.se/romastrategin.
24 Minority groups recognised in Sweden are Sami, Sweden Finns, Jews, Roma and Tornedalians. These groups respond to the following criteria. They have inhabited Sweden for a long time and are explicitly connected in communities; they have unique linguistic, religious or cultural signifiers; and they have a desire to keep their identity.
    21

The Government has allocated SEK 46 million for the period 2012–2015 to measures for the Roma. This sum is in addition to the ordinary means allocations for national minorities.
The Government offices have the overall responsibility for coordinating and monitoring the strategy. Implementation as a whole is aimed at reinforced implementation and continuous follow-up of Roma people’s access to human rights at the local, regional and national level. To achieve results, authorities and municipalities must participate and take active responsibility, within their ordinary activity, for drawing attention to and guaranteeing Roma people’s access to their rights. Follow-up will be done in relation to the six goals for the various areas of activity. Progress reports on the implementation of the strategy will be presented annually to the Riksdag in the budget proposal.
The Roma Strategy foresees measures at the local level, in particular a pilot project at municipal level for the period 2012–2015. In order to speed up developments at local level, the Government will arrange a special pilot project in a number of municipalities in which county councils will also be involved. The Stockholm County Administrative Board will be responsible for monitoring and coordinating the project. The National Agency for Education, the Public Employment Service and the Equality Ombudsman will be involved, with the Swedish Association of Local Authorities and Regions will also be invited to participate. State measures in the pilot project include training of bridge builders, testing the use of health communicators, and increased knowledge of the extent to which support is given to Roma children in school in accordance with the law. It is envisaged that a number of these municipalities join the European Alliance of Cities and Regions for Roma Inclusion set up by the Council of Europe.
In Sweden, Roma children have the possibility to be taught in their own language. However, there is a belief that many Roma children choose not to study their mother tongue. They may not tell people that they are Roma because they fear harassment or discrimination, and thus do not obtain the extra tuition in their mother tongue to which they are entitled25. Mother tongue teaching does not always work as much as one might hope either. There is a lack of teachers of Romani, few Roma pupils choose to study their mother tongue and there is a lack of educational material/textbooks in Romani.
There is a possibility for special classes with bilingual tuition. A municipality or an independent school can arrange bilingual tuition in years 1-6 for a group of pupils entitled to mother-tongue tuition. A maximum of half of the time may be used for teaching in the mother tongue. Bilingual tuition for Finnish pupils is allowed in years 1-9.
Involvement of Roma: In Sweden, all Roma-related questions and problems must, as far as possible, be approached and handled in close co-operation with Roma themselves. As an example, the Swedish Roma strategy is based on proposals from the Delegation for Roma Issues, which was active between 2006 and 2010. The Delegation’s final report26 has been circulated for comment and a number of meetings have been held with Roma representatives in drafting the proposals to the strategy.
Dialogue with Roma pupils and families: in Sweden, schools need to be flexible and find ways to adapt their teaching as far as possible to the needs of each pupil. At least once a term, the pupil, teacher and the pupil's guardian meet to discuss progress in school and how the pupil is feeling. This is called development dialogue. The dialogue should give an all-round view of the pupil's learning
25 Sweden ratified the European Charter for Regional or Minority Languages in 2000. The Romani language (Romani ćhib) is protected under Part II of the Charter, as a non-territorial language.
26 Report’ s reference: SOU 2010:55.
CAHROM (2013)5
 Teaching of the Romani language and culture: the Roma strategy developed by Sweden focuses on the rights of Roma as both a minority with special cultural and language rights and a target group for improving their socio-economic situation. The current minority policy, the objectives of which are to protect national minorities, increase their power and influence and support the historical minority languages in order to promote and preserve them, was adopted in 2000, in conjunction with Sweden’s ratification of the Framework Convention for the Protection of National Minorities and the European Charter for Regional and Minority Languages.
 22

CAHROM (2013)5
and social development. During the dialogue, discussion can cover how the school can support and stimulate the pupil's development. The dialogue gives the pupil and guardian the opportunity to influence, and take responsibility for, the pupil's schooling.
Sweden has developed the system of bridge-builders who act as mediators: they mainly work to increase the participation of the Roma population in society and to influence the structures in the Roma cultural code that constitute obstacles to participation. They also increase knowledge in schools about Roma customs. Malmö and Göteborg, among other cities, use bridge builders from Roma NGOs.
V. CONCLUSIONS, LESSONS LEARNT AND GOOD PRACTICES IDENTIFIED
5.1 Conclusions and lessons learnt
The working methods of the thematic meeting were new to Finnish participants. The idea of a very small, almost intimate, forum for cross-country discussion and exchange of experience was considered as a positive method. During the whole meeting, Finnish experts felt strong trust towards other members of the thematic group. The discussion was very open.
The thematic group, as originally proposed by Finland, Norway and Sweden (joined later by Latvia), was supposed to have a stronger gender component. It was based on the general assumption that girls drop out earlier and are more absent from school than boys (which seems to be the case in Norway and Sweden, but not in the requesting country, Finland). Indeed, when the experts met in Helsinki, they were told that in Finland the difference in terms of school attendance or school drop- out is not that big between Roma boys and Roma girls and that, to a certain extent, Finnish schools have bigger problems with Roma boys’ school attendance than Roma girls’. After analysing data in more detail, the Finnish experts however realised that there still might be some gender differences that they had not thought of. For instance, out of the Roma boys and girls who finish their compulsory education, the number of Roma students pursuing their studies is higher among boys than girls.
Countries participating in this thematic group are usually known to be particularly attentive to the gender approach and to have strong equal gender policies. However, when it comes to Roma girls specifically, it seems that the gender dimension is not sufficiently articulated. There was little information provided in writing or during the discussion in Helsinki, at the exception of the presentation by the Oulu Municipality about their Development Project “Supporting Roma girl students in basic education”.
5.1.1 Conclusions regarding the situation in Finland
Partner experts were presented with a long-lasting and strong integration process of Roma inclusion in Finland. The education of Roma in the requesting country can be summarised as follows:
• The majority of Roma pupils perform at school as well as other pupils, including some gifted or very gifted pupils;
• The general Roma attitude to education has become more positive;
• Bullying is not today a big problem for Roma pupils – however, ethnic name-calling exists;
• The school system retains a positive attitude when taking into account the Roma culture;
• The development work for the basic education of Roma pupils has produced good practices
that can be used as models.
Still, the partner countries’ experts identified structural difficulties in the Finnish system: one in five young Roma do not complete compulsory school education, only 50% of those who complete compulsory education enter secondary education and almost all of them enter vocational secondary education.
 23

CAHROM (2013)5
The provision of Romani language and culture education from preschool, through the compulsory and secondary school, is rather weak. There is a strong legal right for children and pupils in order to develop Romani (Kaale) as a mother tongue in the school system. However, there are only a limited number of teachers in Romani language. On the other hand, new guidelines are being drafted and since recently there is the possibility to study Romani at the Helsinki University.
The fact that the Finnish State provides funding to municipalities that apply for development measures was seen as an interesting experience.
Although some Roma assistants have been permanently employed by municipalities, there is a need to formalise the cultural bridge-building of the mediators’ programmes.
Early recognition of pupils that need extra assistance and the large resources provided at an early stage are impressive. The fact that this extra assistance is provided to more than 20% of all pupils in their first years of school makes this provision less stigmatising. The Finnish school system is successful judging from the results of PISA studies but there is still a substantial group of teenage Roma pupils (19% of all Roma pupils) who do not fit into the education system.
The Oulu Municipality example of family, school, social and labour market support is an interesting local example of minority and majority collaboration.
5.1.2 Lessons learnt by the Finnish experts
According to the Finnish experts, it was rather difficult to handle the thematic discussion from the Roma girls’ perspective only. Nordic countries are used to thinking that boys and girls are totally equal as pupils with the same kind of challenges and same kind of possibilities. One of the Finnish experts indicated that her own prejudice was very strong in that respect: she thought initially that there might be no differences at all between Roma girls and boys. However, when preparing documentation for the thematic report and visit, she realised that there still might be some gender differences that they had not yet thought of.
A year ago the Finnish National Board of Education carried out a review on the situation of Finnish Roma pupils in basic education. It collected a large amount of data from Roma families and the school principals (1,500 principals – 50% of the total number - answered the online questionnaire). The results were surprisingly good. According to the principals, about 70% of all Roma pupils are doing as well as majority children. However, the Finnish National Board of Education figured out, looking into more detail, that there was a slight difference between Roma girls’ and boys’ further studies. 54% of all Roma boys are continuing their studies after basic education, whist the figure for girls is only 46%. The challenge is naturally to get higher participation figures in further education for both girls and boys.
Finland is paying much attention to how to prevent Roma pupils’ drop-out and absenteeism. It is easier to prevent absenteeism by education of both teachers and Roma parents. Preventing school drop-out is much more difficult. It has many links to the general marginalisation of the families, and the whole field of problems is thus very difficult to solve. A lot can be done for those Roma children who are still at school, even if they are sometimes absent; as soon as the Roma children drop out completely, remedies and solutions are not that numerous.
The Finnish expert highlighted that the first National Policy on Roma in Finland is an important tool for the Finnish National Board of Education which has accepted to fulfil the educational goals of the policy paper. She recalled that since 2008 the National Board of Education has been working to improve the quality of the basic education of Roma children. However, a remaining challenge is to ensure that the national programme is implemented at the local level for concrete results.
In this respect, the thematic group of experts noted that the Oulu Municipality project gave good results: the national seminars had a positive influence; local working group meetings have brought people together, making the invisible more visible. The project raised awareness and knowledge about Roma living in the municipality, with facts and figures.
24

5.1.3 Conclusions concerning partner countries
Experts from Finland, Norway and Sweden – which are used to cooperating in the Nordic Council - found it interesting to have Latvia participating in this thematic group. They noted some of the concrete results and conclusions of the (CEI) projects in Latvia, such as
• An early start at school gives the best results: more Roma children attend and remain longer in school;
• Parent Support Centres and adults’ education - through cooperation with teachers, school administrators, local government representative, and parents - lead to more educated Roma adults who are more inclined to send their children to school;
• Teachers assistants with Roma background: several of them are employed by municipalities;
• Multicultural education environment for 5-7 year olds is provided;
• Children's books in the Romani and Latvian languages are published.
The experts of the thematic group were however concerned that some measures targeting only Roma pupils could de facto lead to segregation of those Roma pupils from the rest of children.
As regards Norway, the group of experts found the data collected by the Primary School Information System (GSI) interesting. However this census takes place on 1 October each year, when many Roma are still travelling. Regard could be paid to the issue of travelling in the development of certain state measures, when making provision for the safeguarding and development of culture and identity and in data collection on school attendance. The group of experts would also support the idea that the Day Care Institutions Act and the Education Act in Norway be practised in such a way that Roma children receive the educational provision to which they are entitled.
The training of bridge-builders (mediators) in Sweden and the fact that all students are given opportunities to have in-depth learning and positive learning experiences through the use of a new learning environment and inclusive methods was positively assessed by other experts of the thematic group.
Sweden is seriously looking for practical examples of initiatives that support both girls and boys in their double cultural identity and their choices, especially in the school system. There is also a need for training for all, to allow the majority and minority to meet each other. There are good examples of pragmatic local work often connected with educated Roma personalities.
The group noted that in all participating countries, some Roma families are more concerned by immediate socio-economic challenges than education.
It was also recalled that EU member states should make use of structural funds to develop regional and local programmes for Roma and that the Council of Europe Member States should share experiences and ideas at the regional and local levels, using in particular the newly-launched European Alliance of Cities and Regions for Roma Inclusion. The Municipality of Oulu showed a strong interest in being an active participant of the Alliance.
The success of special measures is dependent on a change of attitude in the broader population regarding Roma. Achieving this is partly made difficult by the negative media focus on Roma. Establishing a common understanding by the general public of the need to implement measures for the Roma is therefore a particular pedagogical challenge for all participating countries. The group of experts felt that it is also important that the Roma themselves take responsibility for the development of constructive measures to improve their situation.
The group of experts considers that building trust between the school and the Roma is crucial for ensuring that the children come to school and that they feel secure. Once this trust is in place, pupils and parents often contact teachers and other school employees when they need help and support.
CAHROM (2013)5
  25

5.2 Good practices identified
Four Roma-related good practices (three from Finland and one from Latvia) were introduced in the Council of Europe database on Roma-related policies and good practices:
1) Practice no 13 (Finland): The Advisory Board on Romani Affairs which is an administrative and inclusive structure which ensures the participation of Roma in Roma inclusion policies and co-operation between Roma and authorities, as well as the Roma Education Group within the National Board on Education which provides educational services for the Roma;
2) Practice n°15 (Latvia): school assistants of Roma origin;
3) Practice no 19 (Finland): the project “Roma into working life” carried out by the
Municipality of Jyväskylä to improve the employment opportunities of the Roma population;
4) Practice no 32 (Finland): the promotion of equality and non-discrimination including towards
Roma developed through the RASMUS network.
The experts of the thematic group highlighted the following good practices:
• Support for Roma children’s education: different kind of workshops or afternoon clubs
organised for the Roma pupils and/or their families; direct support for homework (maths,
mother tongue, etc.); free snacks or meals; plays, sports, arts, etc.;
• Roma parent seminars and other forms of support (often during the weekends) with a view to creating confidence towards the education system and its actors, teachers etc.; to
informing parents about school practices, the child’s development and importance of education; to creating cooperation between home and school; to providing advice for preparing healthy meals; to addressing issues relating to life management and parenthood;
• Support for further studies to get acquainted with regional possibilities to study in vocational institutions or general upper secondary schools;
• Further education of teachers and other staff: lectures in cooperation with the municipality/education regional department and Roma community;
• Study trips organised for Roma families;
• School assistants with a Roma background (Latvia) / bridge-builders (Sweden) who
have a positive impact to the Roma pupils on the level of identity and are important to connect Roma and non-Roma adults. Experts highlighted the need that such assistants take also care of the majority children; they should be ”cultural bridges” for both Roma children and majority children;
• Home/school cooperation tools, such as parent evenings, face to face meetings, parent- teacher discussions, meetings at the pupil’s home, telephone, electronic journal, school website, paper-based journal, e-mail, letters, written notifications, are all effective and bring results. The Roma parents use all standard cooperation tools. Ten years ago, written contacts were rare;
• Combating discrimination and bullying of children at school: the Finnish Programme “No bullying in KiVa school” raised a great deal of interest among experts as it provides an interesting approach on addressing bullying for all schools and for different age groups. It had been implemented in 90% of the Finnish schools, partially or entirely. However, experts of this thematic group would recommend including a section on bullying specifically targeted at Roma pupils and giving teachers tools for reacting to ethnic discrimination towards Roma;
• Using Roma role models: interviews or articles about Roma acting as role models and who are good examples of successful integration are found in the local Swedish press. The example of Stockholm Municipality which speaks and promotes Roma in its municipal publications is a positive one. Positive articles concerning Roma published in publications and national press (Finland, Latvia, Sweden) help to promote a better image of Roma;
• Teaching of Roma history and culture: Sweden provides a good example having translated the Council of Europe factsheets on Roma history into Swedish. In school curricula, one of the overall knowledge goals is that students must get acquainted with national minorities’ culture, language and history. The recent publication of the first comprehensive book on Finnish Roma in Finland is another good example27;
27 During their visit to Helsinki, the CAHROM group of experts had the possibility to join a large celebration of the first book on Finnish Roma published by the Finnish Society of Literature. The celebration took place at the House of Nobility in Helsinki,
CAHROM (2013)5
 26

CAHROM (2013)5
• Teaching of the Romani language: as undertaken by Latvia, Finland and Sweden. The teaching of Romani language and Romani culture at Helsinki University28, including by teachers from abroad, was a positive example. Experts of the thematic group would encourage further efforts to teach Kaale at university so as to attract Finnish Roma students;
• Financial State support such as the one provided in Finland to municipalities that apply for development measures is an interesting practice.
5.3 Immediate follow-up
Shortly after the CAHROM thematic visit, the expert from the Finnish National Board of Education started working at the Swedish National Agency for Education in Stockholm, under the supervision of the Swedish expert from the CAHROM thematic visit. This kind of exchange of governmental officials is possible under the cooperation framework between Nordic countries. It was suggested that the Nordic Council of Ministers29 should use the results of the thematic report when addressing in particular Roma education issues.
Bearing in mind that most Norwegian Roma speak Swedish, the Norwegian and Swedish experts indicated that they would further exchange teaching material in Romani which is available in Sweden. In addition, both experts highlighted that there are international collaborative possibilities within higher education for sharing and production of teaching materials for all ages. They would also further explore the sharing of experiences and material through new media and Internet. Norway has already entered into cooperation with Sweden on Internet resources for mother tongue instruction for linguistic minorities and resources have been developed for Roma pupils too.
Norway, having difficulties to find young educated Roma to be employed as mediators, could possibly envisage collaboration with Sweden as regards an exchange of mediators (bridge-builders) between the two countries.
One of the most important objectives of the Finnish National Board of Education for 2013 is to produce a national report on the education of Finnish adult Roma. The Board will contact different kinds of vocational and other institutions by electronic survey means and will interview a significant group of adult Roma asking about their current education and their current needs for education. A national report with many new data on Roma adults will be ready in March 2014. Information could be shared at one of next year’s CAHROM plenary meetings.
 In Latvia, there are many activities regarding the improvement of the level of education of Roma which will be implemented in the national framework of the European Social Fund programme for next planning period 2014-2020. For example, training activities for new teacher's assistants of Roma background where necessary, activities that provide better inclusion of teacher’s assistants of Roma background in local schools (including financial support); activities providing training materials and schoolbooks for every Roma pupil.
 and many of those people who had historically struggled for the rights of Roma people were also there, including Finnish former President Tarja Halonen.
28 The expert group visited Helsinki University where it met Mr Henry Hedman and Dr Kimmo Granqvist who informed the group about their first year’s experience teaching Romani language and Romani culture.
29 The Nordic Council of Ministers is the forum for Nordic governmental co-operation. Denmark, Finland, Iceland, Norway and Sweden have been members of the Nordic Council of Ministers since 1971. The Prime Ministers have the overall responsibility for Nordic Co-operation.
27

Appendix 1: Formal invitation letter from Finland
CAHROM (2013)5
  ******
28

CAHROM (2013)5
Appendix 2: Programme of the thematic visit to Helsinki, Finland, 24-26 October 2012
Programme of
CAHROM visit to Finland 24-26 Oct 2012.doc
******
Appendix 3: List of participants of the thematic visit to Helsinki, Finland, 24-26 October 2012
Final list of
participants _CAHROM thematic visit to Finland 24-26 Oct 2012.doc
******
Appendix 4: European and international standards and reference texts
As far as the Council of Europe is concerned, special attention should be given to:
- the 1950 Council of Europe Convention for the Protection of Human Rights and Fundamental Freedoms (ETS No. 5), in particular in Article 14 (Prohibition of discrimination), in the 1952 Protocol thereto (ETS No. 9), in particular in its Article 2 (Right to education), and in the 2000 Protocol No. 12 thereto (ETS No. 177);
- the 1995 Framework Convention for the Protection of National Minorities (ETS No. 157)30;
- the 1992 European Charter of Regional or Minority Languages (ETS No. 148)31;
- the 1961 European Social Charter (ETS No. 35)32;
- the Recommendation CM/Rec(2009)4 of the Committee of Ministers on the education of Roma
and Travellers;
- the Recommendation CM/Rec(2008)5 of the Committee of Ministers to member states on
policies for Roma and/or Travellers in Europe;
- the Recommendation No. R (2000) 4 of the Committee of Ministers on the education of
Roma/Gypsy children in Europe;
- the Recommendation 1924 (2010) and Resolution 1740 (2010) of the Parliamentary Assembly on The Situation of Roma in Europe and relevant activities of the Council of Europe”;
- the Congress Recommendation 315 (2011) and Resolution 333 (2011) on the situation of Roma in Europe: a challenge for local and regional authorities;
- ECRI General Policy Recommendations No. 3 on combating racism and intolerance against Roma/Gypsies (1998), No. 7 on national legislation to combat racism and racial discrimination (2002), No. 10 on combating racism and racial discrimination in and through school education (2006) and No. 13 on combating anti-Gypsyism and discrimination against Roma;
- the Final Declaration of the 22nd session of the Standing Conference of the Ministers of Education, on “Building a more humane and inclusive Europe: role of education policies” (Istanbul, 4-5 May 2007);
- recommendations and policy orientations included in the White Paper on Intercultural Dialogue “Living together as equals in dignity”, launched at the 118th Session of the Committee of Ministers (Strasbourg, 7 May 2008);
- the Strasbourg Declaration on Roma adopted at the High Level Meeting on Roma (Strasbourg, 20 October 2010);
30 http://www.coe.int/t/dghl/monitoring/minorities/default_en.asp. 31 http://www.coe.int/t/dg4/education/minlang/.
32 http://www.coe.int/T/DGHL/Monitoring/SocialCharter/.
         29

CAHROM (2013)5
- the Declaration adopted at the Summit of Mayors on Roma (Strasbourg, 22 September 2011), which inter alia calls for the support of the ROMED programme and the setting-up of a European Alliance of Cities and Regions for Roma Inclusion33;
- the Roma Youth Action Plan based on guidelines proposed by the participants of the Roma Youth Conference (September 2011).
Additionally, apart from the reports of the relevant Council of Europe monitoring bodies (the Commissioner for Human Rights, the Advisory Committee of the Framework Convention for the Protection of National Minorities, the Committee of Experts of the European Charter for Regional or Minority Languages and the European Commission against Racism and Intolerance (ECRI), as well as the case law of the European Court of Human Rights34, and the conclusions and decisions of the European Committee of Social Rights, the following Council of Europe reports, publications and initiatives are relevant for this thematic report:
- the Commissioner for Human Rights’ Viewpoint “The key to the promotion of Roma rights: early and inclusive education”35;
- the Commissioner for Human Rights’ publication “Human Rights of Roma and Travellers in Europe”, Council of Europe Publishing (February 2012);
- Jean-Pierre Liégeois “Roma in Europe”, Council of Europe Publishing (2009);
- Jean-Pierre Liégeois “The Council of Europe and Roma: 40 years of action”, Council of Europe
Publishing (2010 for the French edition; 2012 for the English one);
- the Commentary of the Advisory Committee on Education under the Framework Convention for
the Protection of National Minorities36;
- the project “Education of Roma children in Europe” (2002-2009)”37 and its publications;
- the joint CoE/EU ROMED programme “Intercultural mediation for Roma”38;
- the European Alliance of Cities and Regions for Roma Inclusion launched in Strasbourg on 20
March 2013;
- the CAHROM thematic report on school drop-out and absenteeism of Roma children (with the
Netherlands as a requesting country; Hungary, Spain and Sweden as partner countries);
- the CAHROM thematic report on inclusive education of Roma children as opposed to special
schools (with the Czech Republic and Slovakia as requesting countries; Hungary, Slovenia and the United Kingdom as partner countries).
As far as the European Union is concerned, relevant references include:
- Communication from the Commission “Europe 2020: A strategy for smart, sustainable and inclusive growth”;
- Common Basic Principles on Roma Inclusion;
- Communication from the Commission: An EU Framework for National Roma Integration
Strategies up to 2020 (5 April 2011);
- Council conclusions on an EU Framework for National Roma Integration Strategies up to
2020 adopted in Brussels on 19 May 2011;
- Council Directive 2000/43/EC of 29 June 2000 implementing the principle of equal treatment
between persons irrespective of racial or ethnic origin;
- Council Directive 2000/78/EC of 27 November 2000 establishing a general framework for
equal treatment in employment and occupation;
- the European Union Fundamental Rights Agency (FRA) Overview of the situation of Roma
and Travellers in Public Education in EU Member States39 (published by EUMC, May 2006);
- the European Parliament Resolution on the EU Strategy on Roma Inclusion (March 2011).
33 Most of these documents are electronically accessible at http://www.coe.int/web/coe-portal/roma_reference-texts.
34 In particular D.H. and Others v. The Czech Republic, Sampanis and Others v. Greece, and Orsus and Others v. Croatia. 35 http://www.coe.int/t/commissioner/Viewpoints/080331_en.asp. 36http://www.coe.int/t/dghl/monitoring/minorities/3_FCNMdocs/PDF_CommentaryEducation_en.pdf.
37 http://www.coe.int/t/dg4/education/roma/histoCulture_en.asp.
38 http://www.coe-romed.org/.
39 EUMC Study available on FRA website at: http://fra.europa.eu/fraWebsite/attachments/roma_report.pdf.
       30

Other relevant international reference texts and documents include:
- the United Nations Convention on the Rights of the Child40;
- the 2003 Action Plan on Improving the Situation of Roma and Sinti within the OSCE Area41;
- the ODIHR Status Report on the Implementation of the Action Plan on Improving the Situation of
Roma and Sinti within the OSCE Area (Warsaw, 2008);
- the ODIHR Mapping of participation of Roma and Sinti children in early education processes
within the OSCE Region42 (Warsaw, November 2010);
- the joint UNICEF/OSI/REF Overview report “Roma Early childhood Education” (2012).
******
Appendix 5: Proposals of the Basic Education of Roma Pupils in Finland (2010-2011 Review)
Proposal 1/11: Participation of Roma children in pre-primary education
• Roma pupils and their parents or carers should be offered support in issues related to children’s
early childhood and pre-primary education, so that starting school could be made easier;
• The importance of the regularity of attending pre-primary education should be continually
emphasised to Roma families;
• The competencies of Roma pupils in pre-primary education, particularly language and
mathematical skills, should be practised. Exercises could be offered, for example, in a booklet distributed to Roma parents.
Proposal 2/11: General school performance level of Roma pupils
• The state of the basic education of Roma pupils and effectiveness of the measures should be
regularly monitored;
• Roma pupils’ possible need for support should be assessed especially in the lower grades and
at the time of moving on to grades 7-9 of basic education;
• Necessary support measures should be employed to ensure that Roma pupils complete their
basic education.
Proposal 3/11: Cooperation between Roma homes and the school
• Roma parents or carers participate in general parents’ evenings organised by the school, in
addition to which separate Roma parents’ evenings should be arranged for them, if the need
arises;
• Intercultural understanding and interaction should be further emphasised;
• More information should be passed on to the entire school community concerning Roma culture.
Proposal 4/11: Bullying and exclusion
• All school bullying, ethnic name-calling and exclusion should trigger immediate intervention;
• The KiVaKoulu programme should include a section specifically on bullying targeted at Roma
pupils and giving teachers tools for reacting to ethnic discrimination.
Proposal 5/11: Absences, change of schools and dropping out
• It should be ensured that monitoring of, and intervention in, Roma pupils’ absences follow the
same procedures as with other pupils;
• Teachers and other educational staff should tighten up their investigations into the reasons for
absences;
• Roma parents and carers should be informed about the adverse effects of even short-term
absences and the changing of schools based on school performance;
• Support for the Roma pupil, especially at transition stages, should be ensured, for example with
the help of a support person or special needs assistant with a Roma background.
40Full text of the UN Convention at http://www2.ohchr.org/english/law/crc.htm.
41 Full text of the OSCE Action Plan on Roma and Sinti at: http://www.osce.org/odihr/17554.
42 See this OSCE-ODIHR mapping published in Warsaw in November 2010 at http://www.osce.org/odihr/73874.
CAHROM (2013)5
     31

CAHROM (2013)5
Proposal 6/11: General, enhanced and special support
• Roma parents and carers should be informed of the possibilities of general, enhanced and
special support;
• Roma pupils experiencing significant problems in their schooling, or who are in danger of
dropping out, should be offered more effective forms of support at an early stage;
• If Roma parents and carers wish to remove their children from school in order to be tutored at
home, the consequences of this alternative schooling method should be made clear to them. The progress of home-tutored children of compulsory education age should be monitored.
Proposal 7/11: Completion of basic education and seeking further education
• Roma pupils should be given intensive guidance counselling as early as grades 1-6 of basic
education;
• In grades 7-9 of basic education, Roma pupils should receive educational guidance aimed
specifically at the Roma and supporting their own hopes for the future, while also addressing the
practical challenges viewed from the Roma’s own perspectives;
• Mentoring should be organised for Roma pupils where the pupils would regularly meet with a
(Roma) adult who would act as a role model and be able to advise and encourage Roma youth in their school careers as well as the seeking of further education. Career guidance training should be organised for special needs assistants with Roma backgrounds.
Proposal 8/11: Completion of basic education and seeking further education, continued
• Roma parents and carers should be informed at the stage of grades 7-9 of their children’s
education about application processes, selection criteria, study practices, and benefits and aid provided by society and available to students. A guide in simple language should be prepared for the Finnish National Board of Education website, which schools could print off for Roma pupils and their parents.
Proposal 9/11: Completion of basic education and seeking further education, continued
• Educational guidance should stress the importance of upper secondary school for further
education and encourage Roma pupils who have done well at comprehensive school to go on to upper secondary level. Information should also be provided on the alternatives to daytime upper secondary school, such as upper secondary school for adults and taking upper secondary courses alongside vocational education;
• Preparatory education for general upper secondary school should also be aimed at Roma youth. Supplementary teaching should be utilised more in order to equip better the Roma youth for further education.
Proposal 10/11: Romani language and culture
• Schools should inform Roma families more effectively of the possibility of receiving Romani
language teaching;
• The Ministry of Education and Culture decree should be amended so that the education provider
must organise teaching of the Romani language, if the parents or carers of two or more pupils
request it.
• Teaching of the Romani language via distance learning methods should be used when a
teacher of the Romani language is not available locally. In such cases, the teacher of the Romani language should be provided with support in teaching via distance learning methods.
Proposal 11/11: Romani language and culture, continued
• There should be more special needs assistants with Roma backgrounds. They serve as role
models and support for Roma pupils, as well as familiarising other pupils with the Roma and
Romani culture.
• The Roma are experts of their own culture, so the school should make use of members of the
Roma community (including volunteers) as a resource in the effort to improve the study
motivation of Roma pupils;
• Different language and cultural groups, including the Roma, should be more extensively
addressed in basic and continuing teacher training;
• As a Finnish national minority group, the Roma should be given more consideration when
setting the curriculum and in teaching materials.
32

 Strasbourg, 23 October 2014
AD HOC COMMITTEE OF EXPERTS ON ROMA1 ISSUES (CAHROM) __________
CONCLUSIONS
THEMATIC REPORT ON ROMA WOMEN EMPOWERMENT AND GENDER DIMENSION OF
ROMA INCLUSION POLICIES/STRATEGIES
(further to the CAHROM thematic visit to Vilnius, Lithuania, on 3-6 June 2014) __________
Expert from LITHUANIA, requesting country:
Mrs Gražina SLUŠKO, Responsible for Roma issues, Division of National Minority Issues, Ministry of Culture
Experts from FINLAND, ITALY, THE REPUBLIC OF MOLDOVA, AND SPAIN, partner countries:
Finland
Ms Sarita FRIMAN-KORPELA, Senior Adviser, General Secretary of the Advisory Board on Romani Affairs, Ministry of Social Affairs and Health
Italy:
Ms Maja BOVA, Expert on non-discrimination-related policies and Roma inclusion, Department for Rights and Equal Opportunities, National Office against Racial Discrimination (UNAR), Presidency of the Council of Ministers
Republic of Moldova:
Ms Cristina RADUCAN, Human Resources Director, ICS Dopomoga Group representative SRL
Spain:
Ms Beatriz DOMÍNGUEZ LÓPEZ, Spanish Women ́s Institute, Technician of European Programmes, Ministry of Health, Social Services and Equality
1 The term “Roma” used at the Council of Europe refers to Roma, Sinti, Kale and related groups in Europe, including Travellers and the Eastern groups (Dom and Lom), and covers the wide diversity of the groups concerned, including persons who identify themselves as Gypsies.
CAHROM (2014)11
   1

TABLE OF CONTENTS __________
I. INTRODUCTION page
1.1 Background page
1.2 Composition of the thematic group of experts page
1.3 Agenda of the thematic visit page
II. CONTEXT AND EXPECTATIONS page
2.1 Context of the CAHROM thematic report and visit page
2.2 Expectations and items for discussion page
2.3 Size and composition of the Roma groups in the participating countries page
2.3.1 Finland page 2.3.2 Italy
2.3.3 Lithuania page 2.3.4 Republic of Moldova page 2.3.5 Spain page
2.4 Situation of Roma women and girls and main problems encountered page 2.4.1 Finland page 2.4.2 Italy
2.4.3 Lithuania page 2.4.4 Republic of Moldova page 2.4.5 Spain page
III. EUROPEAN AND INTERNATIONAL STANDARDS AND REFERENCE TEXTS page
IV. LEGISLATION, POLICIES, STRUCTURES AND SPECIFIC MEASURES page
4.1 Finland page
4.2 Italy
4.3 Lithuania page
4.4 Republic of Moldova page
4.5 Spain page
V. CONCLUSIONS, LESSONS LEARNT AND GOOD PRACTICES IDENTIFIED page
5.1 Conclusions, good practices and lessons learnt page 5.1 As regards the preparation and organisation of the thematic visit page 5.2 Overall conclusions (for participating countries and beyond) page 5.3 As regards Lithuania page 5.4 As regards Finland page 5.5 As regards Italy page 5.6 As regards the Republic of Moldova page 5.7 As regards Spain page 5.8 Immediate and mid-term follow-up page
APPENDICES:
Appendix 1: Appendix 2: Appendix 3: Appendix 4:
page
Formal invitation to CAHROM page Agenda of the thematic visit page List of participants of the thematic visit page European and international standards and reference texts page
Note: An ADDENDUM TO THE THEMATIC REPORT including all presentations collected during the CAHROM thematic visit is available to the Secretariat upon request.
2
CAHROM (2014)11

V. CONCLUSIONS, LESSONS LEARNT AND GOOD PRACTICES IDENTIFIED
5.1 Conclusions and lessons learnt
5.1 Conclusions as regards the preparation and organisation of the thematic visit
Positive aspects:
- An official invitation letter and a draft agenda were sent on time;
- The possibility was given to the CAHROM Secretariat and to partner countries’
experts to provide comments on the draft agenda;
- The agenda of both the round table and the field visits to Kirtimai settlement in
Vilnius and to Panevėžys focused on the topic;
- All partner countries’ experts had a chance to present their experience;
- The group of experts had an opportunity to meet with various key interlocutors (state
officials, Roma women activists, leaders and members of the community (both male and female), the Equal Opportunities Ombudsman, EIGE, directors of day care and Roma community/integration centres, civil society actors, etc.);
- Local transport and excellent interpretation were provided by the hosting authorities.
Shortcomings:
- During the round table, there was a limited exchange with and interventions by
Lithuanian interlocutors (apart from a few representatives from the Equal
Opportunities Ombudsman and civil society);
- Some crucial relevant actors from line ministries and Vilnius municipality were not
present and/or active in the discussions;
- The numerous and lengthy presentations at the European Institute for Gender
Equality headquarters about EIGE activities and projects on women and Roma women, as relevant, whilst providing a lot of information, did not leave enough time for an exchange of views with experts of the thematic group and with representatives of the Office of the Equal Opportunities Ombudsperson2 present at that meeting.
5.2 Overall conclusions (applicable to participating countries and beyond)
The thematic visit proposed by the Lithuanian Ministry of Culture was seen as a very positive experience both by the Lithuanian experts and the partner country experts. The CAHROM thematic visit to Lithuania confirmed that the situation of Roma women and girls deserves increased attention by policy makers and should be more reflected in national policies/strategies/action plans for Roma. In that respect, the experts made the following general conclusions:
- They found that the Helsinki report of the 4th International Roma Women’s Conference in 2013 along with the Phenjalipe Strategy for the Advancement of Roma women and Girls (2014-2020) are critical documents that should be used by member States when revising their national strategies and action plans on Roma from a gender perspective;
- There is an immediate need for national assessment studies on the situation of Romani women and girls not just in the four countries of the thematic group but across the Council of Europe member States. The experts proposed as a model the Study on the situation of Romani women and girls in the Republic of Moldova, published by the UN Women, the UNDP and the OHCHR in March 20143;
- There is a critical lack of technical expertise on Romani women and girls both at local and national levels. The group of experts recommended providing human
2 During the time of the visit, the Equal Opportunities Ombudsperson was acting as the Ombudsperson on Children’s Rights. 3 Report available at: http://www.google.fr/url?sa=t&rct=j&q=&esrc=s&source=web&cd=2&ved=0CC4QFjAB&url=http%3A%2F%2Fwww.un.md%2F publicdocget%2F126%2F&ei=w_U6VJuIBcyBadHzgNAF&usg=AFQjCNG8AchHqwD- GixVHvZwEXu5z_lROA&sig2=UUGLpYHtRsmdz4w0RAm_4A&bvm=bv.77161500,d.d2s
    3

CAHROM (2014)11
rights education and training to public administration staff, school teachers and civil servants in general in order to improve understanding of the challenges and needs of Romani women and girls and provide them with tools to develop relevant policies and programmes to the benefit of all;
- Roma women and girls should be empowered, e.g. through traineeship and scholarships;
- Roma women’s speaking-out efforts (which is not necessarily an easy role within patriarchal communities) could be enhanced by supporting the creation of national umbrella Roma women’s organisations, where possible; if not, by supporting the few active Roma women in countries with a relatively small Roma population (e.g. in Lithuania);
- Support should be given to increase self-confidence and motivation of Roma women (e.g. through the participation of Roma women as mediators under the ROMED programme or through the active participation of Roma women under the proposed European Roma Institute, etc.);
- Roma women’s entrepreneurship should be supported, e.g. by micro-credits;
- Human rights institutions, such as Gender Equality and Children’s Rights Ombudspersons, at national and international levels should pay more attention through their monitoring mechanisms to the situation of Roma women and girls, ensuring e.g. that children’s rights are respected and law is enforced when it comes to compulsory education, combating early marriages, fighting drug trafficking/addiction, etc., using inter alia the relevant Council of Europe Conventions (e.g. Istanbul and Lanzarote Conventions), its Strategy for the Rights of the Child
and its transversal Programme “Building a Europe for and with Children”.
- The European Institute for Gender Equality (EIGE) should support and encourage targeted research and studies on gender equality within certain communities,
including Roma communities;
- The Dosta! campaign does not focus enough on gender equality and should include
a gender dimension. Its national implementation should include gender-focused awareness-raising on the rights and needs of Roma women and girls, whilst moving beyond the purely cultural, romanticized approach (dancing, folklore, etc.).
- National authorities responsible for Roma inclusion policies/strategies/action plans should strengthen their inter-ministerial co-operation with a view inter alia to better promoting and supporting the rights of Romani women and girls.
- The Council of Europe should consider engaging closer co-operation at international level with Roma women’s groups, particularly Phenjalipe Network of Roma women, the European Commission, European Parliament, FRA, EIGE, OSCE-ODIHR, UNICEF, UNDP, EEA/Norway Grants, OHCHR, UN WOMEN, etc. with a view to developing a coordinated approach towards Roma women and girls. In this regard, international cooperation could be sought by encouraging joint initiatives benefiting Roma women and girls and making use of financial instruments.
- The 5th anniversary International Conference of Roma Women to be held in Skopje (“The former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia”) in September 2015 should be an opportunity to assess progress made by the Council of Europe, member States and civil society organisations in advancing the situation of Roma women and girls in Europe. The group of experts believes that more accountability for achieving gender equality for Roma communities is vital. In this respect the International Women’s Conferences should become and be viewed as review platforms of members States and international organisations’ commitments, pledges and achievements on Roma women and girls.
The experts of the thematic group noted with great interest the greater role taken by the CAHROM in addressing the situation of Roma women and girls in Council of Europe member States through the inclusion of a gender-based approach in various thematic reports (e.g. those related to education) and through the appointment of a Committee rapporteur on gender equality.4
4 The Finnish expert participating in the thematic group is occupying the position of CAHROM Rapporteur on gender equality.
 4

5.3 Conclusions, good practices and lessons learnt concerning Lithuania
Partner countries’ experts found very positive the initiative from the Lithuanian Ministry of Culture to request the thematic visit on Roma women empowerment and gender dimension of Roma inclusion policies and its intention to pay particular attention to gender mainstreaming and to Romani women and girls as a way to address gender inequalities during the revision of its National Action Plan on Roma Integration into the Lithuanian Society 2012-2014.
During the field visits to Kirtimai settlement in Vilnius and to Panevėžys, it was obvious for partner countries’ experts that Ms Gražina Sluško in charge of Roma issues in the Ministry of Culture was well known by the local actors and the Roma community who trusts her. However, they had the impression that the Ministry of Culture, which has directly responsible for the Roma portfolio, would need stronger involvement from other line ministries since obviously the Ministry of Culture has a limited scope of action when it comes to issues related to housing, employment, education, health, justice, etc. A coordinated approach through an inter-ministerial cooperation with other line ministries would be strongly advisable so as to provide integrated solutions.
The group of experts realized during the visit that Lithuanian Roma, being a relatively small Roma population (not exceeding 3,000) was not receiving enough political attention by national or local authorities, nor could they benefit from many European programmes which too often target countries with bigger Roma populations.
Roma women in Lithuania do not have sufficient skills to be able to produce regular income. During the field visit in Kirtimai settlement, Roma women presented a business and entrepreneurship initiative (based on traditional crafts) which is financially supported by the Ministry of Culture. The latter has unfortunately not financial and technical capacity to follow-up on such initiatives in the longer term. Among various suggestions to improve the socio-economic situation of Roma, and women in particular, the group of experts mentioned a stronger focus on vocational training and socio-economic empowerment with a particular emphasis on Roma women (as practiced e.g. in Spain), as well as the development of a micro-credit scheme for entrepreneurship projects. Since Roma women in Lithuania are largely engaged with taking care of children at home, parents’/mothers’ centres could also be envisaged as a way to promote and support Roma women’s autonomy and opportunity to get employment.
In the field of education, the group of experts highlighted the importance of increasing self- confidence and motivation of Lithuanian Roma, women and girls in particular. The provision of pre- school and day care services, the promotion of Roma children’s attendance in primary and secondary education, the introduction of English courses and adult education could help preventing school drop outs, combating illiteracy, as well as socio-economic dependence from the state subsidies or from drug-trafficking in the worst scenario. Experts considered that Roma school teaching assistants supported under PROGRESS programme and Roma mediators trained under the ROMED programme should be institutionalised by the Ministry of Education.
The Lithuanian expert from the Lithuanian Institute for Ethnic Studies indicated that there was limited data available on Roma education and employment, and agreed that more data collection is needed, including in the health area, and that data collection should include a stronger gender perspective.
During the field visit, the experts found that early marriage was frequently present among Roma communities living in Lithuania. In the Kirtimai settlement, the average marriage age within the Kalderash Roma is 14-16 in comparison with 16-18 within the Lithuanian Roma group. Early marriage was strongly supported by Roma male leaders met during the visit. Although two Roma women activists expressed disagreement about this practice, their voice is hardly heard beyond some families. The group of experts is of the opinion that early/child marriage poses critical obstacles to personal development, education and health status. The Lithuanian authorities, the Ministry of Education in particular, should support early and primary education as a way to combat illiteracy both among Roma children and adults. The Ombudsperson on Children’s Rights in Lithuania could raise the issue of early/child marriage and take action with relevant state and local authorities so as
5

CAHROM (2014)11
to ensure that the rights of Roma children are being protected. Organising a public (TV) debate on early marriage between Lithuanian Roma sharing either traditional or modern views was also suggested and was in principle accepted by Roma male and women activists met in Kirtimai, as well as the participation of a Lithuanian expert in a proposed CAHROM thematic group on addressing early marriage within Roma communities.
The poor housing status of Roma living in the Kirtimai settlement in Vilnius has already been largely documented by the Council of Europe (e.g. ECRI and the Commissioner for Human Rights) and international organisations. Having in mind that Kirtimai is the only informal settlement in Lithuania and that Roma families are living there since 1956, the group of experts was surprised that no solution had been found so far to eradicate this settlement and no alternative solutions provided for these families (Spain has a different approach for example). The land where the “houses”5 are built on belongs to the Ministry of Environment and thus Roma do not have property rights over the “houses”. In order to have a secure housing situation and avoid being constantly under the fear of a possible eviction, Roma living in Kirtimai would need to have their “houses” legalised and obtain property rights through an agreement between the municipality of Vilnius and the Ministry of Environment.
The experts understood that there was a big issue concerning illicit trafficking in drugs and drug addiction among a number of Roma living in Kirtimai which might appear as an obstacle. However, pursuing with this tolerated approach does not seem for the experts of the thematic group to be sustainable in the long run. On the other hand, the Ministry of Health could organise awareness- raising activities on the risks of drug addiction in Kirtimai settlement and together with the Ministry of Justice develop joint actions to combat drug trafficking, using for example the experience of the Pompidou Group6.
The group of experts took note that the Dosta! campaign was launched in Lithuania at the initiative of the Ministry of Culture and the Ministry of Education on 8 April 2013 and together with the “Sare Roma” and the “Roma Integration House” associations. The Lithuanian expert expressed the wish to develop additional awareness-raising activities on gender aspects, cautioning against the romanticised and folkloristic approach Roma are sometimes presented by. The examples of Roma women activists that the experts have met during their visit to Lithuania could be promoted as role models within the Roma communities under the Dosta! campaign. Roma women outside the Lithuanian borders who succeeded in their professional career (e.g. the Moldovan and the Finnish experts of the thematic group) could be also promoted as role models in Lithuania to provoke an internal reflexion among Roma women.
In addition, the experts have indicated that Lithuanian public administrations, school teachers and civil servants in general might benefit from anti-discrimination training in order to improve their tools and methodology in working with minority communities, such as the Roma.
The isolation of Lithuanian Roma, both men and women, and their lack of participation at local, national or international level, were underlined by the experts as key obstacles to their empowerment and accountability, and reinforce the cycle of poverty and marginalisation in which Lithuanian Roma find themselves. In turn, making Roma part of development policies and decision-making (e.g. in Finland) will provide the space for making Roma part of the solutions, which are more likely therefore to be effective, sustainable, inclusive and equitable. Roma could also be trained in exercising their voters’ rights.
5.4 Conclusions, good practices and lessons learnt concerning Finland
As regards the general policy approach towards Roma7 in Finland, the group of experts identified as good practices the following:
5 Apart from a couple of brick-houses, most of the Roma in the Kirtimai settlement live in shacks. 6 See Pompidou Group website: http://www.coe.int/t/dg3/pompidou/aboutus/default_EN.asp?
7 Finnish Roma (called Kaalés) are estimated to be between 10,000 and 12,000.
  6

- A strong and longstanding political will and support towards Finnish Roma;
- A recognition of the right of Roma to maintain and develop their language and culture
guaranteed by the Constitution;
- Roma, and in particular Roma women, are well represented in public administrative, advisory
structures (e.g. National and Regional Advisory Boards on Romani Affairs) and even in mainstream political parties, which offer the possibility for Roma to participate in decision- making processes at all levels;
- Roma civil society is well organised, with an umbrella Roma network and numerous associations, including a Roma woman NGO. Within these Roma associations, Roma women occupy roles of executive directors, board members and presidents, trustees, etc.
- Finland has carried out numerous studies, surveys and reports addressing Roma women from discrimination and other angles, including a recent study on secondary education of Roma children and studies addressing taboo issues8;
- The promotion of a positive image of Finnish Roma;
- The existence of a strong network of gender equality bodies and organisations.
As regards the gender dimension of its Roma policy, the group of experts noticed that, whilst Finland is well known in Europe for its gender sensitive approach9, it is taken as granted that this gender approach will be applied to its Roma policy. However, when analysing the Finnish National Roma Policy adopted in 2009, the gender dimension is poorly emphasised which, in budgetary terms, results in a lack of funding for Roma women empowerment activities in the National Roma Policy10. There is a need for Finland to use more European Structural Funds for this purpose and recruit experts having a gender-oriented background to monitor the gender dimension of its Roma policy. Additional gender training might therefore be needed in public administration.
The Finnish expert underlined that this thematic visit took place at the right momentum since Finland will need to revise its National Roma Policy in the near future and because equality bodies/ombudsmen (on gender, minorities, etc.) are currently going through a reforming process. The group of experts also noted that the Monitoring Steering Group of the Finnish National Policy, in its report from May 2014 proposed that a gender perspective be included in a Revised National Roma Strategy and to include a more accurate monitoring of the situation of Roma women in the future. Should there be a need for additional support for the introduction of a gender perspective in the revised Strategy, Phenjalipe could be invited to Finland.
In the field of education, the group of experts noted that the situation concerning pre-school education (kindergartens) is particularly good (unlike e.g. in the Republic of Moldova). Roma children’s attendance in pre-school increased from 2 to 60% between 2001 and 2011 and the number is expected to rise even more due to the planned introduction of compulsory pre-school education. Looking at the education from a gender perspective, contrary to the situation in most of European countries, there is no big difference between Roma boys and girls in terms of school attendance in primary education11. However, more efforts are required in secondary education and at university (this may disproportionately affect Roma girls if they decide to wear a traditional dress). School assistants exist in Finland but are not just for Roma pupils to avoid a stigmatization of Roma children. Mediators and school assistants require certain qualification to be respected and accepted within the school environment. They can benefit from training and therefore obtain certificates and instructor diploma even if they do not have basic school education (skills recognition). A mechanism of assessing school instructors and assistants will be soon put in place.
Housing and health are not major issues for Roma in Finland; however, access to employment is. The group of experts underlined that Finland would need to increase its focus on socio-economic environment and access to employment using for example the Spanish experience or replicating the ACCEDER programme as Italy did.
8 See the Study on Intimate Partner and Domestic Violence experienced by Roma Women (2013) and the report of Roma women prisoners (2013).
9 See in that respect the results of EIGE studies.
10 Activities targeted to Roma women are often religious by nature or concentrated in children’s upbringig, which underline a conservative approach. The empowerment of Roma women is often seen as providing a break from household duties.
11 The difference is less than 2%. For further information, consult the CAHROM thematic report on school attendance of Roma children (with Finland as a requesting country) at http://hub.coe.int/web/coe-portal/cahrom1.
  7

5.5 Conclusions, good practices and lessons learnt concerning Italy
The group of experts took note that the National Strategy for the Inclusion of Roma, Sinti and Caminanti Communities12 in Italy 2012-202013 was inspired by both a human rights-based approach and a gender perspective (as cross-cutting issues) and that the National Office against Racial Discrimination (UNAR) established, in June 2012, an ad hoc Task Force which involves the Italian National Statistical Institute (ISTAT), the National Association of Italian Municipalities (ANCI) and the European Commission’s Fundamental Rights Agency (FRA) in order to collect relevant data, and when feasible gender-disaggregated data.
The group also noted that some integrated local action plans have started to be developed after regional working groups consultations.
In the context of the implementation of the abovementioned Strategy, several examples were shared with other experts concerning measures and projects targeting Roma women, such as a project supported by UNAR aimed at enhancing youth and women’s participation implemented in Milan and Bolzano in 2012.
Other good practices identified included the replication of the ACCEDER projects in the field of socio-economic empowerment (already successfully implemented in Spain) and the translation of the EU-ROMA Network guide on the use of EU structural funds.
Generally-speaking, the group of experts considered that Italy has developed an interesting gender- sensitive approach in the health sector. For example, the group of experts was informed about close co-operation between UNAR, the Ministry of Health and the National Institute on Prevention of Poverty-related diseases with the aim to contribute to developing specific initiatives on Roma women’s health, including a specific focus on relevant training modules for health care providers approaching Roma women, and similar guidance for hospitals in Rome. In addition, the National Office of Statistics committed itself to launch a specific survey on violence against foreign women, which might eventually include a chapter on Roma women14.
In comparison with Finland, Italy should strengthen its political commitment for the implementation of the National Strategy for Roma Inclusion. Roma women in Italy are negatively impacted, inter alia due to the unsolved problems of informal settlements, unclear legal status or statelessness15. Other weak points include the lack of representation and involvement of Roma in political life, in particular Roma women (with very few exceptions), and the absence of Roma women’s organisations, with the exception of one association being constantly threatened by male organisations.
Generally-speaking, the group of experts was of an opinion that Roma women would benefit from the inclusion of a stronger Roma gender perspective into the mainstreamed gender equality approach followed by the Italian authorities.
5.6 Conclusions, good practices and lessons learnt concerning the Republic of Moldova
The group of experts noted with great satisfaction that the 2011-2015 National Action Plan to support Roma Ethnic Group in the Republic of Moldova16 includes gender dimension which is mainstreamed throughout the Action Plan.
12 The term “Nomadi” is no longer officially used. Roma, Sinti and Caminanti are estimated to be around 140,000 in Italy; half of them are Italian citizens.
13 For the European Commission’s approval of this Strategy, see EC Communication Memo, No 226 of 21 May 2012.
14 The results of this study - which was announced at a CEDAW debate in New York in July 2011 - are expected to be delivered in June 2015.
15 For further information, consult the CAHROM thematic report on solving the legal status of Roma from ex-Yugoslavia and their lack of personal documents (with Italy as a requesting country) at http://hub.coe.int/web/coe-portal/cahrom1.
16 There are no exact figures regarding the number of Roma living in the Republic of Moldova. The official data of 2004 is very low (12,271). Data collected in 2001 by the Bureau of Interethnic relations suggest that the figure is closer to 20,000. Roma leaders claim that there could be up to 250,000 Roma living in the Republic of Moldova.
CAHROM (2014)11
  8

The experts also took note of the publication in March 2014 of a Study on the situation of Romani women and girls in the Republic of Moldova, which can be considered as a good practice. This study was supported by UN Women/UNDP/OHCHR.
In comparison with Lithuania, the Republic of Moldova seems to benefit from a stronger involvement of international actors in the field of Roma. The Roma civil society is also more developed and active (an informal national network of Moldovan Roma women was recently established).
Generally-speaking, the Republic of Moldova benefits from a relatively good equality legislation framework though there is no burden of proof switch which is a shortcoming of existing legislation. Equality bodies can make recommendations to Parliament but they cannot give sanctions. Generally- speaking, equality bodies in the Republic of Moldova would need more awareness on anti- discrimination towards the Roma community.
In the field of education, Roma children may still encounter problems in accessing education and some examples of segregated schools (due to spatial segregation) exist. The republic of Moldova could benefit from the Finnish and Spanish experience in providing pre-school facilities for children in general, and Roma children in particular. The Finnish and Lithuanian experiences of day-care centres and after-school catch-up classes are also relevant for the Moldovan context. There is indeed a problem of enrolment of Roma children in classes that do not correspond to their school age. The group of experts was also interested in a possible assessment of the implementation of the scholarship programme for Roma university students which should be generalised to all faculties.
Lithuania could take inspiration from the implementation of the ROMED programme and the institutionalisation and financing of Roma mediators in the Republic of Moldova.
In the Republic of Moldova there are some examples of empowered Roma women who occupy jobs with responsibilities (such as the Moldovan expert). However, more socio-economic empowerment of Roma women is needed to extend this practice.
In the political sphere, the group of experts noted that a Roma political party has recently been established (though without any Roma women). The Spanish and Finnish examples of participation of Roma women in decision-making and consultation processes were of interest for the Moldovan expert.
5.7 Conclusions, good practices and lessons learnt concerning Spain
Gender is mainstreamed both in the National Roma Integration Strategy 2012-2020 and in its Operation Plan 2014-2016. There might be a need, however, to prioritize gender in the implementation of the National Roma Inclusion Strategy and in the work of line ministries, such as the Ministry of Education.
Spain has developed strong public policies on social and labour inclusion of its Roma population17. The group of experts noted in particular the Spanish positive examples of socio-economic empowerment through the ACCEDER projects, programmes and campaigns, some of them being more specifically designed to address Roma women involvement in the labour sector. The positive outcome of these projects has been documented by several studies conducted by the Fundación Secretariado Gitano (FSG). The surveys on education, employment, health, housing, etc. include data desegregated by gender, which is a positive example. However, the Spanish expert felt that there was still a need for additional assessment through the prism of gender of projects and policies implemented, especially in the education and employment sectors.
Like in Finland, there is longstanding political will and financial support at all levels (state, regional, local) for Roma inclusion. Nevertheless, there seems to be a need to improve governance and coordination between the various levels of administration in a highly decentralised administrative structure such as the one existing in Spain.
17 Spanish Roma (called Gitanos) are estimated to be approximately 725,000-750,000. 9
 
In Spain, this long term and sustainable approach has been successfully combined with the use of European Structural Funds. The group of experts noted that there has been an intentional and persistent increase of the amount of grants awarded to Roma Women NGOs in the last years, namely by the call of grants (regimen general) that supports the administrative capacity of NGOs. Roma Women organisations benefit also largely from the call for grants coming from the 0.7 % of the Personal Income tax (convocatoria de subvenciones con cargo al IRPF). Within the latter call of grants, a special attention is paid to the programmes specifically aimed at the Roma population with a Roam women emphasis, e.g. to the role of Roma women in programmes related to health promotion and education; training programmes for Roma women as health workers in the areas of child care, hygiene, nutrition and prevention of diseases and addictions, as well as the appropriate use of health resources; comprehensive programmes for Roma women, including literacy activities and basic social skills training.
The consultation of Roma civil society on policy measures is ensured through the State Council for the Roma People set up in 2005 where Roma women are represented. Roma women’s interests are also mainstreamed in the Spanish Women’s Institute.
The group of experts took note of the large number of Roma and pro-Roma organisations active in Spain, some of them being internationally recognised (such as the FSG). There are two big federations of Roma women associations (Kamira, a national federation of Roma women organisations and Fakali, a federation of Roma women associations from Andalusia). Roma women’s organisations are active but tend to act individually therefore losing impact. Their capacity and institutional support might be reinforced. The lack of foreign language skills, in particular English, is an additional obstacle for participation in international events and networking.
In the field of education, it was indicated that there is not a big difference between Roma girls and boys in the early school drop-out (65.4% and 63% respectively)18. In fact, this is opposite to the situation of the majority population where male students have a higher rate of early school leaving. The challenge lies more in addressing the reasons for school drop-outs which differ between Roma boys and Roma girls.
In the context of discussion about Roma migration from Eastern Europe, it was suggested to use the presence of Romani speaking so-called “migrants” from Romania and other EU countries (women in particular) to initiate and support classes of Romani for Spanish Roma who would like to learn the language.
5.8 Immediate and mid-term follow-up For participating countries of this thematic group:
- To translate wherever needed and distribute the thematic report or at least its conclusions to relevant national and local stakeholders;
- To envisage sending an expert to the International Seminar on mainstreaming gender in the National Roma Strategies and Action Plans to be held in Kyiv, Ukraine, on 24-25 November 2014 and as a follow-up to the Helsinki Roma Women’s International Conference and to the CAHROM thematic visit to Lithuania;
- To envisage sending an expert to proposed CAHROM thematic visits scheduled for 2015 on a) addressing early marriage and domestic violence within Roma communities (proposed by Romania);
b) addressing and combating trafficking within Roma communities (proposed by Albania);
c) promoting vocational training and socio-economic empowerment (proposed by Poland); d) fostering Roma participation in politics and decision-making process (proposed by Spain).
18 Source: http://gitanos.org/upload/92/20/EstudioSecundaria.pdf. 10
CAHROM (2014)11
 A gender-based approach could be further developed in the Dosta! campaign launched in Spain in 2013, whilst going beyond romantic and folkloric approaches when dealing with Roma women.
  
For the Finnish and Italian experts:
- To lobby for the inclusion of Roma women’s rights in UN for Women’s Rights meetings in Geneva and New York, and raise on that occasion the issue of inter-sectionality.
For the Finnish expert/Gender Rapporteur:
- To prepare and present at the 8th CAHROM meeting in Sarajevo (28-31 October 2014), in her capacity of Committee Rapporteur on gender equality, some proposals and general recommendations on Roma women and gender mainstreaming as a follow-up to the Roma Women’s Helsinki Conference from September 2013 and to the thematic visit to Lithuania;
- To present the main conclusions of the thematic report at the Helsinki Conference on combating discrimination against Roma (3 December 2014) in coordination with the CAHROM Rapporteur on anti-Gypsyism who will also be invited to the conference;
- To provide other experts of the thematic group with further information about instructors’ qualification requirements used for school assistants;
- To include the Roma topic (and Roma women in particular) in the Baltic Sea Region Cooperation and create an informal network, as well as revive the Roma agenda of Nordic countries multilateral cooperation;
- To transmit to EIGE the numerous studies and reports addressing Roma women;
- To liaise with the CAHROM member of “the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia” regarding the organisation and the agenda of the 5th International Roma Women’s
Conference scheduled for September 2015;
- To remained attuned about relevant developments on the status of Roma women and girls
within the Council of Europe and at European level and report back to the Committee as relevant.
For the Italian expert:
- To lobby for the inclusion of Roma women agenda in the priorities of the Italian EU presidency and forthcoming Latvia and Luxembourg presidencies in 2015.
- To follow-up with EIGE on prioritizing Roma women under gender mainstreaming in the context of the EU Italian presidency in line with Beijing Declaration relevant provisions.
For the Lithuanian expert:
- To discuss with relevant authorities and stakeholders the conclusions and suggestions made by the group of experts and report back about any developments at one of the next CAHROM meeting.
For the Moldovan expert:
- To liaise with the Finnish Embassy in the Republic of Moldova to explore the funding possibilities of Roma women empowerment activities under the MFA budget line for non EU countries;
- To follow-up on the issue of Roma women’s participation in political life by establishing close contacts with the UN-Women and OHCHR/WIP programme on strengthening effective participation of Romani women in elections in the Republic of Moldova 2014-2015.
For the Spanish expert:
- To send an expert (from the Spanish government or NGO) to the Peer Review Conference “From Practices with Potential to Good Practices in the area of Women’s Entrepreneurship” organised by EIGE in Vilnius on 19-20 June 201419.
19 Spain could not send an expert due to very short notice; instead, Mr Marcos Andrade from the Council of Europe ROMED Secretariat made a presentation at this Conference.
 11

For the CAHROM Secretariat:
- To address the thematic report with an accompanying letter to the Deputy Minister of Culture of Lithuania, to the Municipality of Vilnius and to relevant authorities of each participating country once the thematic report has been endorsed by the CAHROM;
- To check with the Special Representative of the Secretary General on Roma Issues and the Gender Equality Division whether a hearing on Roma women issues could be organised at the level of the Committee of Ministers on the occasion of which Ms Soraya Post, recently elected MEP in Sweden could be invited;
- To check with the Council of Europe Development Bank and other possible partners (DG Employment of the European Commission, OSF, Decade Trust Fund, etc.) the possibility to develop a European Fund for micro-credit to develop Roma entrepreneurship and foster Roma socio-economic empowerment;
- To discuss with the Special Representative of the Secretary General on Roma Issues the possibility to initiate international cooperation on Roma women with relevant partner organisations;
- To further cooperate with EIGE in the area of gender equality and more specifically on the economic empowerment of Roma women and contribute to the online forum set up by EIGE on challenges faced by Roma women in Lithuania and beyond;
- To promote the inclusion of data desegregated by gender in the proposed template for National Roma Inclusion Strategies’ indicators at the next FRA meetings of the Working Party on Roma Integration indicators.
For international actors:20
- To explore the possibility to include countries with a relatively small Roma population (e.g. Lithuania) in various funded programmes for Roma women and girls;
- To support national assessment surveys on the situation of Roma women and girls;
- To support mobilisation and visibility of Roma women’s networks and initiatives.
CAHROM (2014)11
 20 CoE, EC, OSF, EEA/Norway Grants, REF, UNDP, UNICEF, OHCHR, UN Women, OSCE, FRA, EIGE, Roma Decade, etc.
12

Appendix: agenda of the CAHROM thematic visit
   PROGRAMME OF THE VISIT
OF THE CAHROM THEMATIC GROUP OF EXPERTS IN LITHUANIA
ON THE EMPOWERMENT OF ROMA WOMEN AND GENDER DIMENSION OF ROMA POLICIES (VILNIUS, LITHUANIA, 4-6 JUNE 2014)
Wednesday, 4 June 2014
Venue: Ministry of Culture, address: J. Basanavičiaus 5, Vilnius
 9.15-9.30 9.30-9.45
9.45-12.30 9.45-10.30
- -
Registration and coffee
Opening words and presentation of the purpose of the CAHROM thematic visit
Mr Edvard Trusevič, Deputy Minister of Culture
Mr Michaël Guet, Head of the ”I-Care” Unit, Secretary of CAHROM, Support Team of the SRSG for Roma issues, Council of Europe
EXCHANGE OF VIEWS AND EXPERIENCES ON “THE EMPOWERMENT OF ROMA WOMEN AND GENDER DIMENSION OF ROMA INCLUSION POLICIES”
Introduction to the topic:
- Ms Isabela Michalache, Project manager, I-CARE Unit, Support Team of the SRSG for Roma Issues, Council of Europe
Introductory presentations by the host country on the situation of Roma community in Lithuania:
- Ms Vita Petrušauskaitė, Research fellow, Institute for Ethnic Studies
- Ms Gražina Sluško, Division of National Minority Issues, Ministry of Culture
According to 2011 population and housing census, conducted by Statistics Lithuania, currently there are 2,115 Roma residing in the Republic of Lithuania (in 2001: 2,571); 81 per cent of Roma were living in the cities, 19 per cent in countryside; 29 per cent of all Lithuanian Roma were living in Vilnius city. 49 per cent of Roma are children and youngsters up to age 20 (country average is 22 per cent), while people over 60 years old constituted only 6 per cent (country average – 23 per cent).
Lithuania does not have a gender mainstreaming approach, nor a focus on Romani women, but we would like to address this issue in our Roma integration action plan for 2015-2020, which we are planning to adopt by the end of this year.
  Discussion, questions and answers
10.30-12.30 Empowerment of Roma women and gender dimension of Roma inclusion policies: experience from Finland, Italy, the Republic of Moldova, and Spain
13

CAHROM (2014)11
- Ms Sarita Friman-Korpela, Senior Adviser, Ministry of Social Affairs and Health Advisory Board on Roma Affairs, Finland
- Ms Kristina Raducan, Human Rights Director, ICS Dopomoga Group representative SRL, Republic of Moldova
- Ms Maja Bova, National Office against Racial Discrimination (UNAR), Italy - Ms Margarita Beatriz Dominguez López, Spanish Women’s Institute, Spain
Partner countries’ experts could focus on a specific perspectives regarding Romani women’s empowerment (e.g. participation in political and public life, economic and human rights empowerment). They could also present other types of national or local initiatives that might be relevant to the discussion, including challenges in mainstreaming Romani women’s concerns and priorities in gender equality and social inclusion (Roma) policies, as well in designing/implementing Roma women related programmes and projects in the absence of an active, well established civil society and Roma women’s organisations. The panel can also share best practices and positive experiences in empowering Romani women at local, national and international level, and in establishing Romani women’s networks or umbrella organisations.
Discussion, questions and answers
12.30–14.00
14.00 Departure to the Roma community centre in Kirtimai settlement (Parubanka), Vilnius
  14.30-16.30
14.30-16.30
-
-
Lunch
FIELD VISIT
Field visit to Kirtimai settlement, Vilnius
Ms Svetlana Novopolskaja, Director of Roma Community Centre, presentation of the activities of the Roma Community Centre
Ms Božena Karvėlienė, Roma Integration House, presentation of the projects for Roma women empowerment
Discussion with the local Roma community
18.00 Welcome dinner in Trakai and debriefing of the first day during the dinner Thursday, 5 June 2014
 9.00-11.00
Meeting with the European Institute for Gender Equality (EIGE), the Office of the Equal Opportunities Ombudsman and civil society representatives
This meeting will include short interventions from the European Institute for Gender Equality and the Office of the Equal Opportunities Ombudsman on their work on women and Roma women, as relevant, and from Roma and non Roma civil society representatives on the challenges of Roma women and girls in Lithuania, as well as suggestions for improving their situation.
Discussion should also focus on ways to build a stronger Romani women’s movement at national level and on the role of and support needed from civil society and institutions.
  14

11.00 Departure to Panevėžys
13.00 Lunch in Panevėžys
14.00-16.30 Field visit to Panevėžys (130 km from Vilnius)
Venue: Children day care centre, Panevėžys
- Ms Daiva Tumasonytė, Director of Day care centre, presentation of the activities; - Konsuela Maciulevičiūtė, Roma integration centre, presentation of the activities.
Discussion with the local Roma community and partner countries’ experts
16.30 Departure to Vilnius
Friday, 6 July 2014
Venue: Hotel or Ministry of Culture
 9.30-11.30
Debriefing meeting between the experts of the CAHROM thematic group (from the host and partner countries) and the Secretariat of the Council of Europe
Main conclusions as regards the way forward;
Main issues and conclusions to be highlighted in the thematic report;
Lessons learnt regarding the topic and the organisation of the thematic visit;
Good practices identified in the requesting/partner countries to be highlighted in the thematic report;
Possible follow-up envisaged to the CAHROM thematic visit, including joint initiatives and projects, as well as bilateral/multilateral cooperation;
Information about the preparation and presentation of the CAHROM thematic report;
Additional information and documents to be provided by requesting/partner countries;
Timeframe for the preparation of the thematic report and input desirable from each requesting/partner countries’ expert.
  11.30 Checking-out from the hotel.
12.00-13.00 Lunch at the hotel / Departure from the hotel to Vilnius airport.
15

Thematic report endorsed by the CAHROM at its 9th CAHROM meeting
Strasbourg, 9 July 2015
AD HOC COMMITTEE OF EXPERTS ON ROMA1 ISSUES (CAHROM)
__________
THEMATIC REPORT OF THE GROUP OF EXPERTS ON
INCLUSIVE PRE-SCHOOL EDUCATION FOR ROMA CHILDREN
(following the CAHROM thematic visit to Prague, Czech Republic on 19-21 November 2014) __________
Czech Republic, requesting country:
- Mr Martin Martínek, Head of Unit, Office of the Government Council for Roma Minority Affairs and Secretariat of the Government Council for National Minorities, Office of the Government of the Czech Republic (CAHROM member)
- Ms Eliška Perevorska, Office of the Government Council for Roma Minority Affairs and Secretariat of the Government Council for National Minorities, Office of the Government of the Czech Republic
Hungary, Latvia, Poland and "the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia", partner countries:
- Mr Ivan Sörös, Head of Department for Child Chance, State Secretariat for Social Inclusion, Ministry of Human Resources, Hungary
- Ms Sarmīte Joma, Main specialist of Pre-school Education Department, Jelgava Municipality, Latvia
- Ms Agnieszka Gajewska, Ministry of the Interior and Administration, Department for Denominations and National and Ethnic Minorities, National and Ethnic Minorities Division, Poland
- Ms Mabera Kamberi, Head of the Sector for Coordination and Technical Assistance, Ministry of Labour and Social Policy (CAHROM Vice-Chair), "The former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia":
European Commission:
- Ms Jana Balažová, Policy Officer, Roma Co-Ordination Unit, DG Justice
Council of Europe:
- Mr Michaël Guet, Head of the I-CARE Unit, CAHROM Secretary, Support Team of the Special Representative of the Secretary General for Roma issues
- Ms Daniela Gheorghe, Programme Adviser, Seconded by the Romanian Government, Children's Rights Division, Directorate of Human Dignity and Equality
1 The term “Roma” used at the Council of Europe refers to Roma, Sinti, Kale and related groups in Europe, including Travellers and the Eastern groups (Dom and Lom), and covers the wide diversity of the groups concerned, including persons who identify themselves as Gypsies.
 CAHROM (2015)6
 
1.
1.1 1.2. 1.3 1.4
2.
2.1
INTRODUCTION
page 03
page 03 page 03 page 04 page 04
page 04
page 04 page 04 page 07 page 10 page 12 page 13 page 15 page 15 page 16
page 20
page 20 page 23 page 29 page 32 page 33
page 35
page 35 page 36 page 36
page 42 page 44 page 45 page 45 page 46
page 48
page 48 page 48 page 49
2.1.5 "The former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia"
2.2. National and international context, timing, and expectations of the thematic visit
TABLE OF CONTENTS
__________
Background of the thematic report and visit Composition of the thematic group of experts Agenda of the thematic visit
Terminology
ROMA AND THEIR (PRE-SCHOOL) EDUCATION AND MAIN CHALLENGES
Information about Roma groups and their (pre-school) education
2.1.1 Czech Republic
2.1.2 Hungary
2.1.3 Latvia
2.1.4 Poland
2.2.1 Context, timing and expectation as regards the Czech Republic
2.2.2 Context, timing at the international level
POLICY ANDLEGAL FRAMEWORK IN THE FIELD OF (PRE-SCHOOL) EDUCATION AND MEASURES AND PROJECTS UNDERTAKEN
Czech Republic Hungary
Latvia
Poland
"The former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia"
CONCLUSIONS, LESSONS LEARNT AND GOOD PRACTICES IDENTIFIED
Conclusions concerning the preparation and organisation of the thematic visit Specific conclusions and lessons learnt
4.2.1 Concerning the Czech Republic, requesting country
4.2.2 Concerning partner countries (Hungary, Latvia, Poland and "the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia"
Good practices identified Follow-up
3.
3.1 3.2 3.3 3.4 3.5
4.
4.1 4.2
4.3 4.4
APPENDICES:
Appendix 1: Appendix 2: Appendix 3:
4.4.1 4.4.2
Immediate follow-up at the level of the Council of Europe Mid-term follow-up and future exchanges of experience
Formal invitation received from the Czech Republic List of experts and participants of the thematic visit Agenda of the thematic visit
2
CAHROM (2015)6

1. INTRODUCTION
1.1 Background of the thematic report and visit
A thematic group on pre-school education of Roma children was set up at the request of the Czech member of CAHROM at the 7th CAHROM meeting (Strasbourg, 14-16 May 2014)2. During that meeting, CAHROM representatives from Latvia, Poland and "the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia" confirmed their interest to be partner countries. Hungary confirmed its interest to join this thematic group at a later stage.
An official letter inviting the CAHROM's group of experts to visit Prague on 19-21 November 2014 was received from the Czech authorities on 5 November 2014 (see Appendix 1).
1.2 Composition of the thematic group of experts
The composition of the thematic group of experts included state officials from ministries or offices that coordinate Roma inclusion policies and a specialist in the field of education from a municipality.
The Hungarian expert, Mr Ivan Sörös, leads the Department for Child Chance at the State Secretariat for Social Inclusion within the Ministry of Human Resources and had taken part in a previous CAHROM thematic visit on combating school drop-out and absenteeism of Roma children in the Netherlands (with Hungary, Spain, Sweden as partner countries)3.
Poland participated for the first time in a CAHROM thematic visit. Ms Agnieszka Gajewska works for the National and Ethnic Minorities Division of the Ministry of the Interior and Administration, which coordinates Roma inclusion policies and serves as EU National Contact Point on Roma.
“The former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia” was represented by its CAHROM member (and Vice-Chair of the Committee), Ms Mabera Kamberi, who works in the Ministry of Labour and Social Policy and coordinates the Roma integration strategy. Support to pre-school education is part of this ministry’s competence.
After consultation with the Latvian Ministry of Education and Science, as well as NGO experts, Ms Sarmīte Joma, who is the main specialist of Pre-school Education Department of Jelgava Municipality and has professional experience in the field of Roma education, including Roma pre-school education, was appointed to participate as Latvian expert for the thematic group. She had participated in a previous CAHROM thematic visit on Roma children's school attendance in Finland (with Latvia, Norway and Sweden as partner countries)4. The Jelgava municipality has good experience in the field of Roma children’s inclusion in mainstreaming education at local level.
The Czech CAHROM member, Mr Martin Martínek and one of his colleague, Ms Eliška Perevorska, from the Office of the Government Council for Roma Minority Affairs and Secretariat of the Government Council for National Minorities - the main co-ordination body on Roma issues in the Czech Republic - organised and accompanied partner countries' experts throughout the thematic visit. Ms Andrea Baršová, the Director of the Department for Human Rights and Minority Protection, who could not attend the meetings, paid a courtesy visit to the partner countries' experts during the debriefing session.
Ms Jana Balažová, Policy Officer, Roma Co-Ordination Unit, DG Justice, attended parts of the agenda of the CAHROM thematic visit. This first participation of a representative of the European Commission in a CAHROM thematic visit was considered as a positive development to the request expressed by some CAHROM members who are also EU National Roma Contact Points to create stronger working synergies between the two organisations.
2 See paragraph 25 of document CAHROM (2014)8 Report of the 7h CAHROM meeting, available on the CAHROM website (htto://hub.coe.int/web/coe-portalicahrom1).
3 See this thematic report at: http://www.coe.int/en/web/portal/cahrom.
4 Ibid.
CAHROM (2015)6
  3

CAHROM (2015)6
This thematic visit was also innovative since the CAHROM Secretariat was accompanied by a colleague from a different CoE sector, namely, Ms Daniela Gheorghe, Programme Adviser in the Children's Rights Division, Directorate of Human Dignity and Equality, who brought her own expertise and the children rights’ perspective in the discussions.
The full list of participants, including the Czech interlocutors met during the thematic visit, can be found in Appendix 2.
1.3 Agenda of the thematic visit
The agenda of the thematic visit was jointly prepared by the Secretariat of the Council for Roma Minority Affairs of the Office of the Government of the Czech Republic in consultation with the CAHROM Secretariat and the Children’s Rights Department. The programme included visits to Lyčkovo náměstí Elementary School (Prague 8) and to People in Need pre-school club in Prague, as well as a bilateral meeting with Deputy Minister, Mr Jaroslav Fidrmuc, at the Ministry of Education, Youth and Sports. A round table was also organised and included among its participants representatives from the Ministry of Education, Youth and Sports, the Czech School Inspectorate, the Ministry of Labour and Social Affairs, representatives of the Minister for Human Rights, Equal Opportunities and Legislation, the Agency for Social Inclusion, the Czech Society for Inclusive Education, the League for Human Rights and Romodrom o.p.s. The agenda appears in Appendix 3.
1.4 Terminology
During the preparation of the thematic visit and the visit itself, it became obvious that terminology differs from one country to another to designate for example "groups at risk" or "vulnerable groups". Also the terminology "special schools", as it was already raised in 2012 in the context of a previous CAHROM thematic visit on combating school drop-out and absenteeism of Roma children in the Netherlands, has not the same meaning in member states. In addition, the education system differs from a country to another and therefore the pre-school age and as an example the system of pre-school education or zero/preparatory classes can be different.
Therefore, the group of experts wishes to underline that these terms and systems should be understood in the present report from their respective national context.
2. ROMA GROUPS, THEIR (PRE-SCHOOL) EDUCATION SITUATION AND MAIN CHALLENGES 2.1 Information on Roma groups and their (pre-school) education
2.1.1 CzechRepublic
Size and composition of the Roma groups
According to the 2011 census, 13,150 persons declared themselves of Roma nationality: 5,199 declared the Roma nationality alone and 7,951 declared Roma nationality in combination with Czech, Moravian or Slovak nationality. This was slightly more than in the previous 2001 census figure (12,500, 11,716, 784 respectively) but far less than in the 1991 census when 32,903 persons declared themselves of Roma nationality. The decline in the number of self-declared Roma can have a number of causes. In the past census counts of Roma were associated with a series of anti-Roma measures which has brought about mistrust on the part of Roma towards any state activities targeted at identifying people of Roma nationality. Over the last two decades, many Czech Roma families have either migrated (e.g. to the United Kingdom) or asked for asylum (e.g. in Canada where some of them obtained the refugee status).
The 2011 census results concerning the speakers of Romani provide a higher figure: 40,370 (they were only 16,630 Czech citizens as having Romani as their mother tongue in the 2001 census)5.
5 Romani variants spoken in the Czech Republic include Northern Central Romani and Lovari.
  4

CAHROM (2015)6
Experts’ estimates of the number of members of Roma communities - which depend rather on identification of members of Roma communities by another person or group (most often by experts or staff of public institutions) - put the number between 150,000 to 350,000 Roma in the Czech Republic6. The average estimate of 200,000 is being used by the Council of Europe. This represents slightly less than 2% of the entire population in the Czech Republic.
Roma and education
According to the 2011 Study by Tomáš Sirovátka, the age structure of Roma is much ‘younger’ when compared to the overall population: 30% of the Roma are below 15 years of age; only 5% are over 60. The low level of education of the Roma is considered to be a key factor (in addition to other factors) of their labour market disadvantage, which is apparent in their low participation rate (61% for men and 30% for women) and high unemployment rates. Specifically, 74% of the Roma have primary education at most, while in the overall population it is 20%. Their educational structure has improved within the past two generations in the sense that the share of those with no education dropped significantly; however, only to the extent of primary education (Census 2001). One of the problems is the persistent segregation of Roma children into special schools and recently into ‘practical’ schools. There are about 330 socially excluded Roma localities in the country (most of them in areas of high unemployment) where about 60-80 thousand Roma are living and where unemployment is estimated at 90-100%. About one-fourth of these localities are spatially segregated (Gabal 2006) and their numbers seem to be growing. According to the 2010 Gabal and Víšek report - which estimated the number of Roma in the Czech Republic to be 250,000 - 32% (80,000) were designated as “socially excluded”.
Roma and pre-school education
So far, and until the forthcoming adoption of the pre-school reform, the last year of pre-school if free of charge and the school is obliged to enrol any children in this last pre-school year. However, this is not so far systematically implemented because Czech parents (and Roma parents too) consider the decision whether to send the child to pre-school or not as their own right. Many parents prefer to prolong the last pre-school year to two years (the child then starts compulsory education at the age of 7 instead of 6). There is a rather strong opposition in the Czech society, including at the level of the political spectrum, for enrolling children too early in pre-school. The Hungarian model of introducing compulsory pre-school education as from the age of 3 would be difficult to implement at this stage in the Czech Republic.
According to the Ministry of Education, Youth and Sports, above 90% of children receive pre-school education and the remaining 10% (including many Roma children) will be included in the kindergartens/day- care centres created with structural funds in the future and a result of the new legislation that requires compulsory pre-school education. According to information provided in the May 2012 CAHROM thematic report on combating school drop outs and absenteeism, 48% of individuals over 5 among the Czech Roma population have never attended pre-school facilities (kindergarten or preparatory years). If one specifically looks at Roma children from socially excluded localities, approximately 52% of them have no pre-school preparation. In November 2014, Open Society Fund-Prague estimated that 40% of Roma children were not attending pre-school7.
Unlike in other countries involved in the thematic group, the question of pre-school facilities is not considered as a critical issue in the Czech Republic. However, the distribution of facilities is highly unequal. Bigger towns and cities experience lack of places in public kindergartens and parents therefore have to pay substantial amounts to place the child into private kindergarten. Roma families are nearly completely excluded from pre- school education.
6 The number of Roma has been estimated by the Office of the Government Inter-departmental Commission for Roma Community Affairs at 150,000 to 200,000. The European Roma Rights Centre (ERRC) estimate ranges from 150,000 to 350,000. According to the study “Promoting social inclusion of Roma in the Czech Republic: a study of national policies” published by Tomáš Sirovátka from Masaryk University in July 2011, the share of Roma in the Czech population is usually estimated at 200,000.
7 See the article from Open Society Fund-Prague on pre-school attendance by Romani children published by the news server ROMEA.CZ on 14 November 2014.
 5

CAHROM (2015)6
An amendment to the Act on Pre-school is envisaged in the course of 2015 so as to introduce one year compulsory pre-school education for all children. The last year compulsory pre-school education should become effective most probably as from the 2017/2018 school year.
Main challenges in relation to (pre-school) education of Roma
According to the Czech Ombudsman’s 2012 report, the crucial causes of the school failure of Roma pupils at elementary schools include:
- the lack of pre-school education;
- inadequate involvement of the parents of children from socio-culturally disadvantaged
backgrounds in the education process
- the language barrier (use of the Romani language at home);
- the process of diagnosing (“testing”) the special educational needs of pupils.
Despite some overall progress, unjustified school segregation and enrolment of Roma children in “special schools” (so-called now ‘practical” schools) and programmes intended for pupils with learning disabilities under programmes for the education of children with mild mental disabilities remain issues of serious concern seven years after the milestone judgement of the European Court of Human Rights (ECtHR) in D.H. and Others vs The Czech Republic. When this case was brought to the attention of the ECtHR in 2007, Roma children in the Czech Republic were 27 times more likely to be placed in "special schools" for the mentally disabled than non-Roma children. Today statistics show a constant, annual decrease in the total number of pupils (Roma and non-Roma) in special schools or classes from 17,755 in 2008 to 10,695 in 2014. But progress remains slow and questionable when it comes to Roma children. In fact, despite this overall decrease, the proportion of Roma pupils in special schools or classes increased from 28.2% (2013/2014 school year) to 32.4% (2014/2015 school year). Furthermore, the percentage of Roma children in mainstream classes decreased from 10.3% (2013/2014 school year) to 9.5% (2014/2015 school year).8
In its February 2012 report, he Council of Europe Commissioner for Human Rights pointed out that an estimated 30% of Roma children in the Czech Republic were educated in schools designed for pupils with mild mental disabilities, compared to 2% of their non-Roma counterparts. In November 2014, Open Society Fund-Prague said that “according to the report on the State of the Romani Minority in the Czech Republic for 2013 (...), more than 28% of the pupils in the “practical schools” are Romani, and in the Moravian- Silesian Region that number is as high as 36%. Those schools are intended exclusively for children with mild mental disability”.9
In the case of Roma pupils educated according to the (standard) Framework Education Programme, more than 30% went on to study for their school leaving certificate. A 2011 UNDP/World Bank survey showed the great likelihood that if a pupil completes elementary education conducted under the Framework Educational Programme for Elementary Education with an Annex for the education of children with mild mental disabilities (hereafter MMD), he or she will attain only secondary education without a school leaving certificate.10. The status of the "Mild Mental Disabilities (MMD) Annex" is not clear. It is supposed to be only a methodological tool for education pupils who score in IQ tests below certain line. Instead of this, the MMD Annex works as a separate educational programme according to which groups of pupils are educated in separate classes. Moreover, the whole separate schools work according to this "mere" Annex, which explains how "segregated schooling" is established in the Czech Republic. Many intellectually able Roma children in the Czech Republic are still being enrolled into the "practical primary schools" intended for children who are "mild mentally disabled”.
In its 2012 report, the Czech School Inspectorate had identified the following problems within the Czech schooling system:
8 Source: Statement of the Special Representative of the Secretary General for Roma Issues published on the Council of Europe Roma portal on 12 March 2015 (http://www.coe.int/en/web/portal/roma) based on the Memorandum prepared by the Department for the Execution of Judgments of the European Court of Human Rights – doc. H/Exec(2015)8 D.H. and Others against Czech Republic (No.57325/00) General measures for the execution of judgment of the European Court from 3 March 2015.
9 Interview with Robert Basch from the Open Society Fund-Prague published by news server Romea.CZ on 14 November 2014.
10 See UNDP/World Bank/EC Regional 2011 Roma Survey “Toward an Equal Start: Closing the Learning Gap for Roma Children in Eastern Europe” (published on 4 June 2012).
   6

a) There is a need to reduce the proportion of the Roma ethnic group at former special schools not offering education in compliance with the Educational Framework Programme for Primary Education. For the time being, at such schools the proportion of the Roma ethnic group is still significantly higher than corresponds to its representation in the regional demographic structure, out of which 26.4 % have been diagnosed with a mild mental disability (MMD) at the nation-wide level. A material breach of the Education Act was ascertained in 110 cases during the school year 2009/2010; these schools used to allocate pupils to the MMD programmes without undergoing any diagnostic assessment; measures to remove these deficiencies were taken within the specified periods, a follow-up inspection was carried out at four schools last year. The regional practical primary schools are competing in vain with municipal schools which have the duty to provide all pupils with equal access to education in accordance with the Act and which also have sufficient capacity available in terms of space.
b) Specific needs for supporting socially disadvantaged pupils and pupils with minor mental disorders are not distinguished. It is necessary to identify pupils’ needs correctly, to show them properly and allocate them to programmes of support of MMD at the school level. To remove risks of breaching the right to equal treatment and provision of corresponding education and, at the same time, also the unauthorized drawing of financial means from the state budget by this.
c) Systemic funding of special needs of the group of socially disadvantaged pupils has not yet been resolved. The situation when institutional support of pupils with MMD is most convenient in economic terms for schools is to be changed. Any targeted means of a comparable amount are not aimed at forms of the group and individual integration at common schools and specific support in accordance with the needs for socially disadvantaged pupils and Roma pupils. The means to offer economic provision implicitly supports continuous unwanted attitudes at former special schools. It is necessary to provide systematic support for teaching assistants, preparatory classes, individualized educational plans and other specific measures for education of socially disadvantaged pupils within the state budget.
Another challenge concerns the lack of data. Due to the Act on the Protection of Personal Data, it is impossible to collect data on ethnic affiliation even though it would be an advantage for the Roma. Despite the fact that European and EU legislation allows the collection of ethnic data under some conditions, Czech public administration often misuses the Act on the Protection of Personal Data to justify their inability to show progress with respect to Roma, in particular in the field of education.
The attitude and living conditions of Roma parents constitute another obstacle. A number of testimonies indicate that there is a need for stronger efforts and more dialogue with Roma parents to convince them to send their children to mainstream schools and make them understand the benefit for their children to attend regular schools and finish their studies. A number of obstacles to this process have been identified during the visit:
a) High level of illiteracy among the parents;
b) Mistrust towards the education system viewed as an instrument of assimilation;
c) Roma parents asking for flexibility and not ready to receive any form of pressure from schools.
There are some other factors that prevent Roma children and youth to take advantage of the educational system; most common constraints are the lack of appropriate clothes, lack of financial resources, lack of electricity and drinking water. Such factors are not predominant, but they do exist and all mentioned goals should be therefore taken into account when dealing with Roma education.
2.1.2 Hungary
Size and composition of the Roma groups
According to the data of the census conducted in 2011, based on ethnic affiliation, 315,583 persons declared themselves to be Roma (which is a higher figure compared to the 2001 census with 205,720 self- declared Roma). Researchers estimate the Roma population to be between 450,000 and 1,000,000. The average estimate used by the Council of Europe is 700,000, which represents approximately 7% of the entire population of the country.
7
CAHROM (2015)6

CAHROM (2015)6
Three linguistic sub-groups are identified: the Romungros (Hungarian-speaking Roma), the Vlach Roma (bilingual, speaking both Romani and Hungarian) and the Beaś (Boyash) Roma group (who speak Hungarian and Beaś, a dialect of Romanian).
The Roma population has an uneven geographical distribution in the territory of the country. In certain counties, Roma can reach 15%. Additionally, territorial differences are extreme at the level of smaller territorial units; in a number of localities and locality groups, the Roma constitute the majority of the population. More than 60% of Roma live in the countryside, in a rural environment, mostly in segregated residential zones, in rather poor housing conditions, whilst only 6% of Roma live in the capital (and the rest in other urban environments)11.
There are some one hundred localities in Hungary which have definitively turned into poor Roma ghettos, while in another two hundred localities, this situation will emerge in the near future as a result of seemingly irreversible processes. Most of the segregated localities and localities on their way to micro-regional ghettoisation are situated in the country’s economically depressed north-eastern and south-western regions which are typically characterised by a structure of small localities.
The age composition of the Roma population is substantially younger than that of the non-Roma population. In 2010, the rate of children aged between 0 and 14 amongst Roma was 36.8%, while this proportion within the non-Roma population was 15.4%12.
Roma and education
The educational integration of the Roma population came to a halt in the years preceding the changes of 1989. While in the decades before the 1990s, the Roma significantly caught up with the national average in terms of the completion of their elementary studies and there was an increase in the ratio of Roma individuals with vocational qualifications, their ratio in secondary schools providing final examinations remained negligible and consequently so did their participation in higher education. Their relative situation regarding studies at a higher educational level has since further deteriorated. While their integration in elementary schools continued, their ratio in secondary schools providing final examinations remained below 15%, in contrast to the national average in excess of 80%14. Additionally, most of the few Roma who do continue their studies tend to seek admission to vocational schools. They have a much higher drop-out rate than their non-Roma counterparts. In vocational schools, every fourth student on average is required to repeat at least one year during the course of his/her studies (the ratio of students required to repeat a year in grammar schools is 5% in relation to the total number of students), many of them indeed never complete their studies and depart the educational system without qualifications. This phenomenon, which has been on the rise in recent years, greatly contributes to youth unemployment and a rise in poverty and plays a major role in the regeneration of a population with low educational qualifications.
Roma and pre-school education
In Hungary families that send their children to pre-school receive additional social benefits (incentives) called “pre-school benefits”. In practice, Roma children have limited access to pre-school education (kindergarten level) due to a lack of kindergarten and pre-school infrastructure in areas with large Roma population and restrictive enrolment policies by a number of kindergartens. Many Roma pupils consequently start school later (8 and beyond) than children from the majority population (6 or 7).
11 Source: Labour Plus research, PowerPoint presentation delivered by Dr. Ivo Kostov at Nagykallo 4th SC meeting, on7-8 November 2013 “Comparison between Hungarian and Bulgarian National Roma Integration Strategies (NRISs)”.
12 Roma Decade Progress report 2011, page 1.
13 According to data of the Life Course Survey (http://www.econ.core.hu/file/download/bwp/bwp1407.pdf); 20 years before it was 1%.
14 Roma Decade Progress report 2011, page 6.
  The general socio-economic situation of Roma in Hungary is worse than that of the majority population, specifically in the areas of unemployment, health and education. Most of the Roma suffer from a low educational level (24% of them reach secondary final examinations13).
  8

CAHROM (2015)6
Among the Hungarian Roma population, 30% of individuals over 5 have never attended pre-school facilities15.
Surveys looking into the kindergarten attendance of disadvantaged children demonstrate that, in the event of a shortage of kindergarten capacity, primarily children having completed the age of five and children with both parents actively working gain admission. The children of uneducated, unemployed or disabled pensioner parents are the most likely not to gain admission to kindergarten. Among Roma children, there are a substantially larger proportion of children who only start going to kindergarten at the age of 5, in contrast to non-Roma children, the majority of whom start kindergarten at the age of 3. The measure of the Government which renders kindergarten attendance compulsory as of the age of 3 effective as of 1 September 2015 is designed to tackle this situation.
Main challenges in relation to (pre-school) education of Roma
International organisations and human rights defenders had expressed over the last 20 years their deep concern about school segregation of Roma pupils and enrolment of children in remedial schools that do not exist any longer in Hungary.
As a result of the adoption and implementation in recent years16of new education legislation, there has been a decrease in the number of pupils classified as having special educational needs due to a mild mental disability. This could be a source of inspiration for other countries concerned by the misplacement of Roma children in such schools or programmes.
According to human rights monitoring bodies’ reports, segregation could and, to a lesser extent, still does take various forms. It started with limited access for Roma children to pre-school education (kindergarten level) due to a lack of kindergarten in areas with large Roma population and restrictive enrolment policies by a number of kindergartens. Many Roma pupils consequently started school later (age 8 and beyond) than children from the majority population (age 6 or 7). They were then often channelled to remedial school based on tests for school readiness carried out before entry to primary education. The curriculum in special schools/classes was significantly lighter and teachers were reportedly often not adequately trained to work with Roma pupils17.
Segregation also happened through Roma-only classes in mainstream schools, often as a means for schools to increase their school population (and funding provided accordingly) with a view to avoiding any “white flight” (majority pupils leaving the school). These classes could often be found in separate and lower quality buildings18. Physical separation of pupils within a school could at times be extreme, with different entry doors, separated meals and separate end-of-year ceremonies.
Additionally, a growing number of Roma children were not attending school at all, as a result of becoming “private pupils” in line with the Public Education Act, which foresees the possibility for children to be exempted from class attendance while having to pass end-of-year exams in order to progress to the next grade. The decision of exempting a child from school attendance could be made by parents, but could also be recommended by the educational counselling services. The latter reportedly pressured Roma parents to request private pupil status for their children. Those facing special educational needs or disability could benefit from financial and academic assistance, including private lessons. However, in practice, it appeared that neither financial nor teacher assistance was available. This practice represented another form of segregation of Roma children and it often resulted in non-completion of compulsory education. Lastly, Roma having completed primary remedial education were often pushed into short-term vocational education, which trained pupils for low-skilled work and was usually disconnected from the employers’ needs.
15 CAHROM (2012)18 Thematic report on inclusive education as opposed to special schools, page 56.
16 In particular, the extraordinary reviews conducted as part of the “From the desk at the back” programme, the amendment of the relevant legal rules, including measures related to the establishment of the diagnosis of pupils with mild mental or intellectual disabilities.
17 See National Social Inclusion Strategy –Extreme Poverty, Child Poverty, the Roma, 2011-2020.
18 Roma Education Fund: Pitfalls and bias: entry testing and the overrepresentation of Romani children in special education, (2012).
    9

CAHROM (2015)6
Although this is not the main focus of this thematic report and issues of school segregation and classification and enrolment of Roma children in schools for disabled should be treated separately and require different types of measures19, one could mention that the proportion of Roma children in special schools remains an issue. Although school segregation is banned by the Act on Public Education of 1993 and the Equal Treatment Act of 2003, the proportion of Roma children studying in segregated schools or classes has steadily increased in Hungary since 1990. While in 1992 7.1% of Roma pupils studied in a school attended mainly by Roma, this proportion rose to 20-25% in 2004. In 2007, schools were segregated in 170 villages and towns throughout the country and separate Roma-only classes existed in 700 communities20. The Ministry of Social Inclusion estimated in 2011 that approximately one third of primary schools were applying some form of segregation. The authorities also stated in 2011 in their National Social Inclusion Strategy- Extreme Poverty, Child Poverty, the Roma, 2011-2020 that the number of Roma-majority schools had increased by 34% since 2004.
2.1.3 Latvia
Size and composition of the Roma groups
According to the data of the census conducted in 2011, based on ethnic affiliation, 6,489 persons declared themselves to be Roma, i.e. 0.3% of the total population21.
According to the results of this last census, the population of Roma in Latvia has decreased by about 21% since 2000 when 8,205 people had declared Roma ethnicity. An estimated figure for 2014 indicates 5,594 Roma presently living in Latvia. The reason of this decrease can be explained by the intense level of Roma emigration to other European States over the last years, primarily in the United Kingdom. However, the Roma community is the only ethnic group in Latvia that maintains a positive natural growth: Roma have the highest birth rates and one of the lowest death rates of all ethnic groups.
The Roma are one of the oldest ethnic minorities in Latvia and have been an integral part of Latvia’s cultural diversity since the 16th century. Of all the Roma that are registered officially, 93.6% are Latvian citizens, out of which approximately 70% speak Latvian. A large majority of Roma regard the Romani language as their mother tongue.
Latvia’s Roma is not an ethnically homogenous community. Two different groups of Roma have lived in Latvia since ancient times: the Latvian Roma (Loftitke Roma) and the Russian Roma (Xaladytka Roma), whose differences manifest themselves territorially, linguistically, culturally and in their traditional way of life. Over the last century, Latvia’s Roma have mainly lived a settled way of life. Based on the data that is available, the majority of Roma live in the large towns of the Kurzeme and Zemgale regions, such as Jelgava (2.3% of the city population) and Ventspils, as well as in Riga. Prior to the active migration of Roma to foreign countries, the highest proportion of Roma were found in Talsi, Dobele, Tukums, Limbaži and Daugavpils districts. In Latvia there is no ghettoisation of the Roma community or spatial segregation at the regional or local level: the Roma have formed a territorially heterogeneous group that communicates actively with the local community.22
Roma and education
The results of several studies show that the Roma community in Latvia is the most disadvantaged ethnic group, with the lowest level of education. The level of education of Roma community is as follows23:
19 In Hungary, measures have been taken in the field of unjustified qualification of persons as disabled (development of the diagnostic test-system, development of a protocol). As a positive result, there has been a decrease in the number of children classified as a mild mental and intellectual disabled.
20 See Open Society Justice Initiative, EU Monitoring and Advocacy Programme: Equal access to quality education for Roma, Hungary, 2007.
21 Source: the Central Statistical Bureau of Latvia, 2011. At the same time, according to data from the population register of the Office for Citizenship and Migration Affairs, there were 8 517 Roma living in Latvia as at 1 July 2011, comprising 0.35% of the total population.
22 Anti-Gypsyism is not as prominent as in other EU member states as shown by the results of the Eurobarometer data survey on discrimination in the EU conducted in 2009. According to this survey, 27% of the population of Latvia stated that they have Roma friends or acquaintances. This indicator has increased since 2008 when 26% of the population gave the same response. In other EU member States where the Roma population is similar or even larger, this indicator is far lower. The overall average for the EU is 17%. 23 Source: the Central Statistical Bureau of Latvia, 2012.
  10

CAHROM (2015)6
  Level of education
  2000
  2011
  Tertiary education
   0.4 %
   0.8%
  Specialized secondary
 1.2 %
 3.5%
  General secondary
   6.7 %
   10.3%
  Elementary school
(including primary school) (1–9)
  42.1%
  36.5%
  Lower than Elementary school
(including cases when level of education is not specified)
 50.4%
 45.3 %
   Illiterate persons
   3.5%
  All Romani people aged 15 and above
   5 985
   4 901
 According to some research:
· more than a third - about 39% - of Roma pupils leave school early, because of poor financial circumstances within their families;
· 13% do not continue studies because they have their own family to take care of;
· 13% of Roma children do not continue studying because their parents do not allow it for different
reasons;
· 80% of Roma believe that their children should have at least 9 years of mandatory schooling.
Over the last years the number of Roma students attended secondary schools has grown-up. According to statistic data from 2008 only 3 Roma children were educated in general secondary school, but in 2012 there were 20% of Roma children pursuing their education after elementary school.
Roma and pre-school education
Since 2002 education of 5-6 years old children is compulsory. Pre-school education is not compulsory for the children aged between 1.5 and 5.
Main challenges in relation to (pre-school) education of Roma
The main obstacles and problems in Roma children’s education are:
· Unpreparedness of Roma children for starting primary school compared with other children (very few Roma children attend pre-school);
· Language difficulties at the beginning of school studies - Roma children are able to communicate only in their own language (Romani);
· Ethnic background and cultural values of the Roma community;
· Deep social problems of many Roma families;
· Teachers are not professionally prepared to work with Roma students;
· Lack of adequate training materials;
· Lack of summaries of best practices/ experiences in the educational area;
· Non-Roma children’s parents’ and local community’s biased attitudes against the Roma. For example, according to Eurobarometer data on discrimination in EU in 2012, 26 % of Latvian citizens would feel totally uncomfortable about their children having Roma schoolmates24.
While efforts have been made by state and local authorities to promote the school attendance and achievement of Roma pupils, their integration in general schools remains a challenge, despite the employment of qualified teaching assistants to accompany Roma children throughout their studies,
24 http://ec.europa.eu/public_opinion/archives/ebs/ebs_393_fact_lv_en.pdf . 11
   
CAHROM (2015)6
including at pre-school level and despite the provision of guidance material to teachers on how to integrate better Roma children into mainstream classes25.
The high representation of Roma children in special needs’ schools remains an area of particular concern26. In 2011, 10.6% of all Roma children attended special needs schools. According to the latest information provided by the Latvian authorities, this figure has even increased to 16.1% during the academic year 2013/2014.
The Latvian Ombudsman usefully recommended in 2013 to teach the language or culture of Roma, or other national/ethnic minorities, in addition to the general school curriculum and not to use this as a reason for segregating Roma children in separate classes (and argument used by the local education authorities in Ventspils). Many local authorities, for example in the Kuldīga region, have taken into account the Ombudsman’s recommendations and discontinued separate Roma classes from the academic year 2013/14 September 2013 onwards; however, others, like the local education authorities in Ventspils, have not. Negotiations are currently underway to change this situation.
The lack of reporting of discrimination faced by Roma is another subject of concern. Despite ample reports of ethnically based hostilities and discrimination experienced by some groups such as Roma, only few cases are brought to the attention of the Ombudsman and even less to the courts, as awareness of and trust in the available remedies is limited27.
2.1.4 Poland
Size and composition of the Roma groups
According to the 2011 census, 16,723 persons declared themselves of Roma nationality: 9,622 declared the Roma nationality alone. This was more than in the previous 2002 census figure (12,731 in total). Estimations from the realisation of governmental programmes on Roma estimate Roma in Poland to be approximately. 20,000-25,000, close to the CoE estimate of 30,000 (0.1% of the total population).
Roma are divided into several groups: Polish Roma, Bergitka (Mountain, Carpathian Roma), Lovara, Kelderari, Sinti, Chaladytka (Russian) Roma. Lovara, Kelderari, Polish and Russian Roma were nomads until the half of 60s.
During the communist regime there was a Romani migration from Poland: the main destinations were Germany and Sweden but there is no reliable data on the scale of that migration. Next migration wave was connected with Poland joining the EU in 2004. The main destination countries were (and still are) the United Kingdom and the Republic of Ireland.
Roma and education
The level of education of most Polish Roma should still be identified as low. According to data from the National Census of Population and Housing 2002, almost 51% of people over 13 years of age who have declared themselves to belong to the Roma minority, remained without education and unfinished primary school. In the available studies relating to the census data from 2011 a similar category is no longer available, however it was pointed out that 82% of Roma declaring education, chose education category "lower than secondary education". During the two censuses respondents were asked for secondary education: in 2002, 247 Polish citizens of Roma origin declared having secondary education; in 2011 they were 934. As for the higher education, 13 declared to have it in 2002; they were 272 in 2011.
Exact figures on the number of Roma children and youth covered with compulsory education are difficult to determine. However, the data from annual reports submitted by voivodeship offices shows that this figure is
25 See this report and ECRI Conclusions on the implementation of the recommendations in respect of Latvia subject to interim follow- up (adopted on 9 December 2014 and published on 24 February 2015) at http://www.coe.int/t/dghl/monitoring/ecri/Country-by- country/Latvia/Latvia_CBC_en.asp
26 See ECRI report on Latvia (fourth monitoring cycle), and
27 Source: Resolution CM/ResCMN(2014)9 on the implementation of the Framework Convention for the Protection of National Minorities by Latvia (adopted by the Committee of Ministers on 9 July 2014 at the 1205th meeting of the Ministers’ Deputies).
   12

CAHROM (2015)6
steadily increasing (in the school year 2004/2005 it amounted to 2,844 people, while in 2012/2013 it was 3,259). Data on the number of Roma children pursuing compulsory education are also estimated. In addition to information collected annually by voivodes - based on reporting by educational institutions in Education Information System - on the number of Roma pupils for whom schools undertake additional educational activities (2,547 pupils in 2013). Moreover, the Minister responsible for religious denominations and national and ethnic minorities collects annually information on the number of Roma pupils benefiting from support under the assistance programmes (monitoring the number of pupils for whom school starter kits, insurance were purchased, participating in the classes in community centres, etc.). Analysis of the above data, and reports on the implementation of the Roma Programme indicates that over 80% of children covered with compulsory education actually pursues this duty. Also worrying is the high proportion of Roma students in special education (the national average is 17%).
Roma and pre-school education
Despite the increase in the number of Roma children benefiting from early childhood education, sending children to kindergartens is still not widespread among Roma families. According to Education Information System in 2013, 338 Roma children attended kindergartens and kindergarten units. Since 2013, one year of compulsory pre-school education has been introduced for all children aged 5, which should improve the situation.
Main challenges in relation to (pre-school) education of Roma
In Poland, challenges exist both within the Roma communities and from an institutional perspective. Poverty and cultural patters, especially among traditional Roma groups, are obstacles to the enrolment of children in pre-school education and education at large: a number of Roma families face financial difficulties and education appears less a priority compared to daily economic survival although pre-school education is covered in the framework of governmental support. This is particularly true for Roma children dropping out of school before finishing secondary education. For very young children, there is a certain over- protectiveness on the side of mothers which plays in favour of keeping their children at home with the family rather than sending them to pre-school. Another factor is the lack of trust in the school system which is often linked to stereotypes, prejudice and negative attitude towards Roma children.
2.1.5 "TheformerYugoslavRepublicofMacedonia"
Size and composition of the Roma groups
According to the 2002 population census, the number of self-declared Roma is 53,879, i.e. 2.6% of the total population. In addition, 3,843 declared to be Egyptians. Researchers’ estimates of the Roma population vary from 80,000 to 260,000. The estimated figure used by the Council of Europe is close to 200,000 (Roma and Egyptians included), i.e. 9.5% of the total population. The country is also home to nearly 1,700 refugees, mostly Roma, who fled their homes as a result of the 1999 conflict in Kosovo*. Most of these persons are living in the municipality Šuto Orizari in Skopje. Most Roma speak Romani as their first language, others speak Albanian; most of them practice Islam.
Roma are recognised as a distinct ethnicity in the preamble of the Constitution. The Skopje neighbourhood of Shuto Orizari is Europe's first Roma municipality (led by a Roma mayor) and the only one in the world where the Romani language has been granted an official status.
Roma do not concentrate in a particular region of the country, but are instead spread all over the territory. According to the 2002 population census, 27 municipalities have a share of Roma exceeding 1%; 10 of them have a share of Roma exceeding 4%. Ethnic differences are less relevant than the way of life, costume and appearance that the members of this group share. Most of them still speak their own language, Romani, together with the language that dominates in the regions where they are located, i.e. Macedonian and/or Albanian. A number of Roma in “the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia” are Muslim, although some of them practise other religions too.
Roma and education
13

CAHROM (2015)6
There are several studies that indicate that the enrolment of Roma children in all levels of education is 20 to 30% lower than among non-Roma, and the drop-out rate of children is two times higher among Roma, in comparison to non-Roma children. Some of the positive measures aimed at promoting the inclusion of Roma in mainstream education have however borne results, such as a reduction of the drop-out rate between fifth and sixth grade among girls and the doubling of Roma enrolment in public universities in the past seven years (from 150 in 2005 to 300 in 2012).
The drop-out rate of Roma children is high. It is due to health problems because of bad weather conditions and outbreaks but also because of the lack of awareness among some Roma parents about the importance for their children to attend kindergarten.
Other challenges include the over-representation of Roma in special schools for children with disabilities, the need to secure participation of Roma children in mainstream pre-school education and to adequately inform Roma parents of all steps undertaken by the authorities relating to the inclusion of their children in mainstream education. The lack of personal identity document can also be an issue though birth certificates are no longer required to enrol children in public elementary schools.28
One of the major problems that contribute to the low level of education among the Roma population is poor socio-economic condition of the community. Official data from March 2014 indicate that 2% percent of all unemployed persons are Roma (based on official statistic from the people who are active in search for a job). Data from 2011 provide insight into the educational profile of the unemployed Romani population: 88% had complete or incomplete primary education, 4.14% had complete or incomplete secondary education and only 0.2% (40 persons) had completed tertiary education.29
Roma and pre-school education
Pre-school education is not compulsory. However, a project called «Inclusion of Roma children in pre- school education» implemented by the Ministry of Labour and Social Policy and supported by the Roma Education Fund, is implemented in 18 municipalities to provide pre-school education for Roma children.
One of the main problems identified in the field of education is the large percentage of Roma children who are not enrolled in pre-school education (and at the opposite spectrum, in higher levels of education). Although there are activities that directly contribute to the inclusion of Roma children in pre-school education, the number of Roma children aged 0-6 years who are not covered by any form of pre-school education is still high. The main reasons for the low level of inclusion of Roma children in kindergartens are:
a) The fact that children speak Romani at home and have little knowledge of the Macedonian language. In 80% of the 18 municipalities targeted by the REF-supported project for Roma inclusion, Roma people mostly speak the Romani language. This contributes to a low level of knowledge of the Macedonian language among the Roma community. The curriculum according to which the educational process is carried out is mostly in Macedonian language, which is why the Roma students have problems with learning and understanding the educational programme.
b) The low awareness of Roma families about the importance of enrolling their children in pre-school institutions. The parents still do not understand the importance and the need of inclusion of their children in pre-school education and up-bringing, have some percentage of children who did not succeed in completing the pre-school educational process.
c) Financial problem for the parents due to the fact that pre-school education being not compulsory, it is not free of charge (it costs 25 Euros per child per month).
d) Low capacities and poor conditions in the kindergartens, etc.
In the academic year 2009/2010, 20,317 children (of all nationalities) aged 0-6 years were enrolled in 52 kindergartens; 454 or 2.23% of them were Roma children. In the academic year 2010/2011, there were 23,503 children (of all nationalities); 551 or 2.34% of them were Roma children. In the academic year 2011/2012, there were 25,200 children (of all nationalities); about 600 or 2.38 % of them were Roma children. The above suggests that the percentage of inclusion of Roma children in pre-school education is slowly
28 Source: CommDH(2013)4 Report by Nils Muižnieks, Council of Europe Commissioner for Human Rights, following his visit to “the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia”, from 26 to 29 November 2012.
29 Source: Employment Service Agency and Ministry of Labour and Social Policy of «the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia».
 14

CAHROM (2015)6
increasing thanks in particular to the project “Inclusion of Roma children in public pre-school institutions” jointly conducted by the Roma Education Fund (REF) and the Ministry of Labour and Social Policy between 2009 and 2012 and to the implementation of the project A Good Start (AGS)30 in four Macedonian localities. Despite these efforts, the percentage of inclusion of Roma children in pre-school education remains particularly low.31
Main challenges in relation to (pre-school) education of Roma
According to several conducted studies on the educational status/needs of the Roma, few reasons have been stated as factors for the low educational status of the Roma:
a) Low socio-economic status of the Roma population;
b) High percentage of Roma children which are not enrolled in pre-school education;
c) The number of Roma children enrolled in primary education is lower than the number of children who are
required to attend primary school;
d) Low level of knowledge of the Macedonian language when entering primary education, thus causing
difficulties for Roma children to fully understanding the programme;
e) Low awareness of Roma parents regarding the importance of pre-school education of their children.
The 2011 UNDP/WB/EC regional Roma survey revealed disproportionate literacy levels between Romani communities and the general population, with around 17% of adult Roma being illiterate. The literacy gap among adult Roma and non-Roma is 13 percentage points, while this gap is even bigger among Romani and non-Romani women (20 percentage points).
There is among Roma children a lower attendance rate, as well as higher drop-out rates than in the non- Roma population. The problem of low enrolment is particularly critical in pre-school education which is of utmost importance for the further education of children, especially regarding the learning of the national language used in school.
Child begging is a widespread problem which affects Roma pupils’ attendance at school.
Despite the increase of enrolment, attendance rates of the Roma children in day-care programmes remain much lower than the rest of the population. The main reason is the high monthly fee for public kindergarten (€.25 while most of the families live below the poverty line of €.94 monthly income). Primary education and, since the 2008–2009 academic year, secondary education is compulsory in the country. Yet enforcement is weak, in large part because families living in poverty are not able to pay cash penalties from €.400 to 700. Only one out of ten Roma children complete the primary school cycle, approximately half as high as among Macedonian citizens. Moreover, it appears that only a fifth of Roma children attend the secondary cycle.
2.2 National and international timing, context and expectations of the thematic visit 2.2.1 Context, timing and expectations as regards the Czech Republic
The purpose of this thematic visit was to better understand and compare practices of pre-school education in requesting and partner countries, and to discuss the current education reforms. Particular attention was devoted to inclusive education as opposed to the enrolment and often misplacement of Roma children in segregated school institutions or in schools/programmes for mild mental disabled.
For the Children’s Right Division of the Council of Europe, the purpose of participating in this thematic visit was gaining more information on the practice of early education, pre-school segregation, children’s right respect in Czech Republic, at discussing measures undertaken or envisaged to combat misplacement of Roma children in practical schools, zero classes whilst at the same time looking at the situation and
30 A Good Start was funded by the European Union. Explicit but non-exclusive in its targeting, the project currently helps more than 4,000 Roma and non-Roma children from ages zero to six to access early childhood education and care (ECEC) services. With a mandate until June 2012, it operated in a total of 16 locations in Hungary, Romania, Slovakia and in the «the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia». Coordinated by the Roma Education Fund (REF), its three international partners were the International Step By Step Association (ISSA), Fundacíon Secretariado Gitano, the Slovak Governance Institute, and 12 local implementing partners.
31 Source: “Inclusion of Roma Children in Public Pre-school Institutions” project, Ministry of Labor and Social Policy
 15

CAHROM (2015)6
experience in partner countries, in particular inclusive, multicultural education and parenting support or desegregation policies and measures.
The proposal from Czech authorities to be a requesting country and host a CAHROM thematic visit of partner countries' experts on pre-school education was much welcome by the CAHROM and timely from a national perspective. Indeed, the Czech Republic has been going through a reform of its education policy and discussions are still on-going concerning proposed amendments to pre-school education-related legislation which will have a direct impact on the pre-school and primary education of Roma children. Recent developments in the Czech Republic in the field of education include the following:
• A new Act for Children's Groups was approved by the Czech Lower House on 23 September 2014 and adopted by the Government in November 2014. This legislation, which is supposed to come into effect as from 2015, provides new conditions for children's groups’ education (e.g. infrastructure, security, sanitary conditions, etc.). It has already been criticized by several NGO interlocutors, including representatives of the People in Need pre-school club. They considered that this new piece of legislation would make it more complicated for them to provide informal education assistance groups of children who are often of Roma ethnic origin.
• The Czech Government modified its School Act. A number of amendments to the School Act were discussed a few days before the thematic visit in a working group involving the Ministry of Education, Youth and Sports and other stakeholders. Other meetings of this working group were scheduled on 7 and 22 January 2015.
• An amendment to the Act on Pre-school is envisaged in the course of 2015 so as to introduce one year compulsory pre-school education for all children. The last year compulsory pre-school education should become effective most probably as from the 2017/2018 school year.
• An amendment to the Higher Education Act is also awaiting a vote in the Lower House.32
• In addition, a Memorandum of Co-operation between the Czech School Inspectorate and the Minister for Human Rights, Equal Opportunities and Legislation was signed on 23 October 2014. It was presented to the group of experts during the thematic visit.
The Office of the Czech Government Council for Roma Minority Affairs and Secretariat of the Government Council for National Minorities was therefore keen to hear partner countries’ experience not only in their pre-school offers for Roma children but also the education acts in place and affirmative measures taken for increasing Roma children’s education. The Education Deputy Minister was interested in particular to hear more from partner countries about accompanying affirmative measures such as free meals, free transport, free textbooks, etc.
The thematic visit was also timely from the point of view of the international context as it took place in a context of great attention towards the education situation of Roma children.
2.2.2 Context and timing at the international level
At the level of the Council of Europe
• On 12 September 2014, the Complementary Report of the Czech Republic on the execution of the European Court of Human Rights judgment in D. H and Others v. The Czech Republic which condemned the country seven years ago for school segregation of Roma children33, was submitted to the Council of Europe and the results of data collection on the enrolment of Roma
32 Source: Article published by the news server Romea.CZ on 15 May 2015.
33 According to that judgment, the enrollment of the Romani children into what were then called "special schools" violated their right to education and was discriminatory. Today many Romani children still continue to end up in the "practical schools", which are intended for pupils with mild mental disability.
 16

CAHROM (2015)6
children in mainstreamed and practical schools were expected by the Department of the Execution
of ECtHR Judgements by December 201434.
• From 24 to 28 November 2014, a delegation of the European Commission against Racism and
Intolerance (ECRI) visited the Czech Republic, i.e. the week after the CAHROM's visit, as the first
step in the preparation of its next country monitoring report35.
• On 12 March 2015, the Committee of Ministers requested the Government of the Czech Republic
to fully execute the final judgment of the European Court of Human Rights in D.H. and Others vs The Czech Republic, so that the unjustified enrolment of Roma children in “special” (so-called now ‘practical”) schools and programmes intended for pupils with learning disabilities ends. The Czech authorities were also requested to provide, no later than by 1 September 2015, information on the strategy they envisage to implement a new legislative framework, and, by 5 February 2016, an update with the most recent statistics concerning the education of Roma pupils in groups/classes for pupils with “mild mental disability” and information responding to the other concerns.
The situation of Roma education, whether it concerns school segregation of Roma children, their over- representation in programmes for mild mental disabilities or early school drop-outs, especially between primary and secondary levels, have been raised as a subject of concern in member States of the Council of Europe whether by the Council of Europe Commissioner for Human Rights36, the European Commission against Racism and Intolerance or the Advisory Committee of the Framework Convention for the Protection of National Minorities37. As an example, in November 2012 the Council of Europe Commissioner for Human Rights, Mr Nils Muižnieks, published a Human Rights Comment on segregation of Roma children in education38. On 12-16 November 2012, the Council of Europe Commissioner for Human Rights visited the Czech Republic to address measures undertaken by the Czech authorities to comply with the ECtHR judgment D.H. and Others v. The Czech Republic. The Commissioner raised also concerns about the school segregation of Roma children and their education in special institutions or classes in “the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia”, following his visit to Skopje in November 2012.39
At the level of the European Union
• In March 2014, EU Commissioner for Employment, Social Affairs and Inclusion, László Andor told the Czech News Agency during a visit to Prague that «the Czech Government should not ignore the issues of the position of the Romani minority, pre-school education and youth employment». He also emphasized the potential of EU funds for establishing pre-school facilities and expanding their services.40
• On 25 September 2014, the European Commission adopted the decision to send a letter of formal notice to the Czech Republic due to "alleged" discrimination of Romani children in the education system, namely the high number of Romani children enrolled in special education. This was the first time that the European Commission was threatening to sue an EU Member State over discrimination against Roma using the infringement proceedings under the Race Equality
34 In June 2012, the Council of Europe Committee of Ministers’ Deputies adopted conclusions on the implementation of the ECtHR Judgment concerning D.H. and Others v. The Czech Republic. See latest Committee of Ministers Deputies’ decision on DH and others v. the Czech Republic at: http://www.coe.int/t/dghl/monitoring/execution/Reports/pendingCases_en.asp?CaseTitleOrNumber=&StateCode=CZE&SectionCode . See also the supervision of the execution of the judgments in the case of D.H. and others against Czech Republic, judgment of 13/11/2007 - Grand Chamber - prepared by the Department for the Execution of Judgments of the European Court of Human Rights (DG-HL) dated 24 November 2010 at https://wcd.coe.int/ViewDoc.jsp?id=1707993&Site=CM and documents submitted by the authorities/civil society at http://www.coe.int/t/dghl/monitoring/execution/Themes/Add_info/CZE-DH_en.asp.
35 See latest ECRI Conclusions on the implementation of the Recommendations in respect of the Czech Republic subject to interim follow-up (adopted on 23 March 2013) http://www.coe.int/t/dghl/monitoring/ecri/Country-by-country/Czech_Republic/CZE-IFU-IV-2012- 027-ENG.pdf.
36 See for example the report of the previous Council of Europe Commissioner for Human Rights, Mr Thomas Hammarberg, published in February 2012 “Human Rights of Roma and Travellers in Europe” in which he devoted a sub-chapter on school segregation of Roma children:http://www.coe.int/t/commissioner/source/prems/prems79611_GBR_CouvHumanRightsOfRoma_WEB.pdf
37 On 19 March 2012, the Advisory Committee on the Framework Convention for the Protection of National Minorities published its Opinion on the Czech Republic (which was adopted on 1 July 2011): http://www.coe.int/t/dghl/monitoring/minorities/3_FCNMdocs/PDF_3rd_OP_CzechRepublic_en.pdf. FCNM/AC Opinions on other
countries participating in the CAHROM thematic group can be consulted at: http://www.coe.int/t/dghl/monitoring/minorities/3_FCNMdocs/Table_en.asp.
38 See this Human Rights Comment at http://www.coe.int/t/commissioner/Activities/IPList_en.asp.
39 See document CommDH(2013)4 Report by Nils Muižnieks, Council of Europe Commissioner for Human Rights, following his visit to “the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia”, from 26 to 29 November 2012.
40 See article published by news server Romea.CZ on 20 March 2014.
           17

CAHROM (2015)6
Directive.41 The move was the first step in a proceeding that might end up before the EU Court of Justice and could result in significant financial sanctions. Prague was given two months to respond and the week of the CAHROM thematic visit the European Commission DG Justice was present in Prague to hold discussions with Czech authorities inter alia on this issue.
• In October 2014, the European Commission, DG Justice, published a report on discrimination of Roma children in education written by Ms Lilla Farkas from the European Network of Legal Experts in the Non-Discrimination Field;
• On 18-19 November 2014, i.e. the same week of the CAHROM thematic visit, the European Commission DG Justice Roma Co-ordination Unit was holding a series of meetings in Prague with authorities and civil society to address the Czech educational policy and the use of structural funds (hence the opportunity for DG Justice representative to participate in the meetings scheduled during the first day of the CAHROM thematic visit);
• On 15 May 2015, the European Commission recommended the Czech Republic to include more Romani children in the education system.42
At the level of OSCE-ODIHR
The OSCE-ODIHR also devoted special attention to the education of Roma children. From 21 to 25 May 2012, a team of nine experts from the OSCE Office for Democratic Institutions and Human Rights (ODIHR) visited the Czech Republic to assess educational opportunities for Roma children in the country. Advisers on Roma and Sinti issues from ODIHR, representatives of the Irish OSCE Chairmanship and the OSCE High Commissioner on National Minorities, as well as legal and academic experts on education and Roma issues travelled to six cities (Ostrava, Brno, Rumburk, Šluknov, Ústí nad Labem and Prague) to examine good practices and challenges in providing education for Roma children43. The report of this visit was released on 26 October 2012.
On 29 May 2014, a seminar on equal access to quality education for Roma children co-organised by the OSCE-ODIHR with the Minister for Human Rights, Equal Opportunities and Legislation and Slovo 21, a local NGO, brought together some 50 participants, including government officials, Roma parents, and representatives from civil society and the international community, to discuss the implementation of recommendations from ODIHR’s report following a 2012 field assessment visit to the Czech Republic.
At the level of international NGOs (AI, ERRC, ERTF, OSF, REF, etc.)
• On 25 September 2015, Amnesty International, Open Society Foundations and the European Roma Rights Centre welcomed the European Commission’s announcement that it would use its powers to initiate infringement proceedings against the Czech Republic for breaching European Union (EU) anti-discrimination legislation. The decision of the European Commission to begin infringement proceedings followed a complaint to the Commission filed almost two years ago by the Open Society Justice Initiative (OSJI), Amnesty International and the European Roma Rights Centre regarding discrimination against Romani children in their access to education. They had presented a petition with nearly 100,000 signatures gathered in under three months calling on the Commission to take stronger action against EU member states failing to implement EU anti- discrimination legislation to protect Roma. These calls were based on evidence, gathered over a
41 Infringement proceedings as established by Article 258 of the Treaty on the Functioning of the European Union provide the Commission with an effective legislative tool to engage with the 28 European EU member states to ensure compliance with EU law. Member states found to be in breach of EU law may be brought to the Court of Justice for the European Union. If the Court finds a member state has failed to fulfil an obligation under the Treaties, it will require the state to take the necessary measures to comply. The decision to launch the proceedings against the Czech Republic was announced on 25 September 2014, following a meeting of the College of Commissioners. The proceedings call into question the Czech Republic’s compliance with: Article 21 (1) of the Charter of Fundamental Rights of the EU, which prohibits discrimination based on any ground such as race or ethnic origin; and the Race Equality Directive (2000/43/EC (RED)) Articles 2.2a, 2.2b, 2.3, 3.1.g, which prohibit discrimination in access to education on the grounds of race or ethnicity.
The Commission sent a formal notice with its assessment of the situation to the Czech government which was given a deadline to submit its observations. On 24 November 2014, the Czech Government published its official response to Brussels, objecting to the European Commission's charges that the Czech state discriminates against Romani children in the schools. The Commission should now conclude whether the Czech Republic is indeed failing to comply with EU law. In case of an infringement, the Commission may bring the matter before the Court of Justice of the European Union.
42 See article published on Romea.CZ news server on 15 May 2015.
43 See OSCE-ODIHR press release following this visit at http://www.osce.org/odihr/90813.
  18

CAHROM (2015)6
decade, of widespread unlawful discrimination against Romani children in Czech education, notably through segregation into schools for pupils with ‘mild mental disabilities’ or Roma-only schools, or classes offering lower educational standards.44
• On 12 November 2014, the European Roma Rights Centre (ERRC) published an article "Czech Republic must put an end to unlawful segregation of Romani children". In July 2012, the European Roma Rights Centre (ERRC) had filed a lawsuit in the Czech Republic against four schools in Ostrava (two special schools and two mainstream schools with segregated classes).
• Throughout 2014, Amnesty International has continued to collect evidence of Roma-only mainstream schools in which the educational programmes followed differed very little from those of schools for pupils with ‘mild mental disabilities’;
• In March 2015, the European Roma and Travellers Forum (ERTF) published its factsheet on Roma in the Czech Republic. It raised concerns about the persistent segregation in “practical school”, the limited impact of public support programmes for Romani pupils and students and the lack of inclusion of Romani culture in curriculum. The ERTF, however, welcomed the amendment to the School Act concerning pupils with special educational needs which was passed on 13 February 2015. The Czech lower house managed to agree on the removal of a paragraph which posed a risk that children without mental disability would continue to be enrolled into practical schools. This bill is a first step towards the reform of Czech schools and inclusive education.
 44 Sources: articles published on News server Romea.cz on 25 and 27 September 2014. One of the articles recalls that of the Member States that joined the EU in 2004, the Czech Republic was the very last to transpose the Race Equality Directive.
 19

3. POLICY AND LEGAL FRAMEWORK IN THE FIELD OF (PRE-SCHOOL) EDUCATION AND MEASURES AND PROJECTS UNDERTAKEN
3.1 The Czech Republic
Legal and policy framework
The relevant legal framework includes:
- The Act No. 561/2004 Coll., on Pre-school, Elementary, Secondary, Tertiary Professional and Other
Education (the Education Act), as amended.
- The Decree No. 72/2005 Coll. on Providing Advisory Services in Schools and School Advisory Centres, as amended in 2011;
- The Decree No. 73/2005 Coll. on. Education of Children, Pupils and Students with Special Educational Needs and Exceptionally Gifted Children, Pupils and Students, as amended by Decree No. 147/2011);
- The Decree No. 364/2005 Coll. on Maintaining School and School Facility Documentation and the School Vital Registers and on Forwarding the Data from Schools and School Facilities and from School Vital Registers (the Decree on Documentation of Schools and School Facilities), as amended;
- The Anti-discrimination Act of 2009;
- The National Action Plan for Inclusive Education (NAPIE) (adopted by Government Resolution No. 206 of 15 March 2010);
- The Roma Integration Concept of the Czech Government for 2010–2013;
- The National Strategy for the Fight against Social Exclusion (2011-2015);
- The Principles of the Long-Term Czech Strategy for Roma Integration to 202545;
- The Concept of In-Time Care for Children from Socio-Culturally Disadvantaged Environments adopted
by the Ministry of Education, Youth and Sports.
The 2005 Education Act46 abolished the so-called special schools (renamed “practical schools”). Some of them were transformed into regular primary schools. Pupils are educated according to the relevant education programmes47.The framework education programme of the primary school also addresses education of pupils with special educational needs48 and pupils with light mental disability. Education of pupils according to individual programmes is performed on the basis of recommendations from the school counselling facility and with the previous consent from children’s legal representatives. Individual primary schools have prepared their school education programmes in accordance with framework education programmes, the process has been tested at pilot schools. Teaching according to school education programmes is started gradually – kindergartens, primary one to six, followed by additional years of primary schools in next years and other types of schools. School education programmes are assessed according to framework education programmes by the Czech School Inspection, in line with the Education Act, school councils have been established at schools which enable to parents, inter alia, to influence a school’s educational process. In order to increase protection and quality of care for non-governmental non-profit organisations, but also school facilities for special-interest education, the Ministry of Education, Youth and Sports has put in place the system of vocational training of staff working with children and youth according to the Instruction of the Minister of Education, Youth and Sports on testing of vocational training of staff working with children and youth in the area of leisure-time activities,49 the Guidance Notes of the Minister of Education, Youth and Sports on securing further education of pedagogical staff of facilities for special- interest training of 2 July 2003 and recognition of the so-called Organisations for work with children and youth for the period 2007–2010 by the decision of the Minister of Education, Youth and Sports.
45 http://ec.europa.eu/justice/discrimination/files/roma_cz_strategy_perspectives_en.pdf.
46Act No. 561/2004 Coll., on preschool, primary, secondary, higher vocational and other education (The Education Act).
47For each branch of education framework education programmes are issued. Framework education programmes define mandatory content, scope and conditions of education; they are mandatory for the development of school education programmes, evaluation of results of education of children and pupils, preparation and assessment of textbooks and teaching materials. Education at individual schools and school facilities is performed according to school education programmes.
48A child, pupil or student with special educational needs is a person with disability, health handicap or social handicap.
49Instruction of the Minister of Education, Youth and Sports No. 6/2003 of 1 July 2003, on testing of vocational training of staff working with children and youth in the area of leisure-time activities.
CAHROM (2015)6
 20

CAHROM (2015)6
Recent developments in the Czech Republic in the field of education include the following:
• A new Act for Children's Groups was approved by the Czech Lower House on 23 September 2014 and adopted by the Government in November 2014. This legislation, which is supposed to come into effect as from 2015, provides new conditions for children's groups’ education (e.g. infrastructure, security, sanitary conditions, etc.).
• The Czech Government modified its School (Education) Act.
• An amendment to the Act on Pre-school is envisaged in the course of 2015 so as to introduce one year compulsory pre-school education for all children. The last year compulsory pre- school education should become effective most probably as from the 2017/2018 school year.
• An amendment to the Higher Education Act is also awaiting a vote in the Lower House.50
• In addition, a Memorandum of Co-operation between the Czech School Inspectorate and the Minister for Human Rights, Equal Opportunities and Legislation was signed on 23 October 2014.
A number of proposed amendments to the School Act were controversial. The proposed initial wording of Section 16a § 5 of the School (Education) Act has been in particular the subject of debates between the Ministry of Education, Youth and Sports and some state institutions and civil society organisations.
According to the Czech Government, the proposed wording of Section 16a § 5 of the School (Education) Act is meant to ensure that diagnostics of mental disability is not based solely on IQ test results, which may be an insufficient basis for the placement of pupils with a social disadvantage including Roma pupils into a pertinent educational programme.
The Czech Government disagreed with the statement of NGOs (such as COSIV) that there are not enough standardised instruments and no methods for assessing the adaptive skills of pupils. The Government stated in its reply to those comments send to the Council of Europe that the Czech Republic has “endeavoured to set up a transparent environment in the counselling system in particular through:
▪ Equipping counselling facilities with relevant diagnostic instruments;
▪ Training staff of these facilities in administration of these instruments;
▪ Setting rules and working procedures in counselling facilities.
The Government underlined that in December 2012 an expert group on diagnostic instruments in the education system was established. The Ministry of Education, Youth and Sports subsequently launched a development programme for supporting the introduction of new or less available diagnostic instruments including training for their use in practice.
In 2013 the Czech adaptation of the IDS test was published and put into practice, containing 21 subtests. Standardisation of the CFT 20-R test was also completed in the same year, involving a large number of Roma pupils. A detailed test manual for the CFT 20-R test was prepared in 2014 and it will be available for psychologists in the course of 2015.
As regards the use of new tests, the Government pointed out that a total of 484 psychologists were trained in the administration of the Woodcock-Johnson test, which covers the needs of school counselling facilities in the Czech Republic. A total of 314 experts were trained in the use of the IDS test between 2013 and 2014. Besides, 205 experts were trained in the use of the MaTeRS test between 2013 and 2014.
50 Source: Article published by the news server Romea.CZ on 15 May 2015.
 21

CAHROM (2015)6
Thanks to support provided by the MEYS in 2014 the needs of counselling facilities were met evenly in the territory of the whole Czech Republic and as a result each facility now has relevant tests at its disposal as well as staff trained in their administration.
As for providing diagnostic instruments and training about their use, the MEYS will continue to take various steps with the aim of achieving further improvements (for details please refer to the Revised Action Plan); however, it needs to be highlighted that already the present situation makes it possible to objectively diagnose mental disability.
When it comes to the methodological guidance of counselling facilities, the Government notes that in the course of 2014 the National Institute for Education (NIE) in collaboration with an expert group for MMD diagnostics came up with a standard (methodology) for diagnosing cognitive skills of pupils with special educational needs. Among other things, the document describes current diagnostic criteria of mental disability, procedures governing rough assessment of social disadvantage, prerequisites of culturally appropriate diagnostics and modalities of using interventions and dynamic diagnostics. Besides, it also specifies certain approaches to modifying a diagnostic conclusion depending on specific living conditions of the pupil, for which sufficiently specific guidelines are not provided even by test manuals. The standard emphasizes the use of a broad range of information about a pupil. It also highlights the need for interventions (i.e. specific support for the pupil), the need for monitoring response to the intervention and the need for dynamic diagnostics in ambiguous cases and in cases of pupils with a major social disadvantage. A diagnosis should be made only when there is a sufficient certainty that a correct diagnostic conclusion has been arrived at. Between 2015 and 2016 the methodology will be introduced into practice and the NIE will provide methodological guidance in this respect. More detailed information is given in the Revised Action Plan“.
Mr Tomáš Sirovátka from Masaryk University, the author of a study on the Czech national policy for promoting social inclusion of Roma published in July 2011 concludes that, although the policy objectives in the above-mentioned documents cover all the important areas, the targets are formulated only at a general level (except for the new Strategy to Combat Social Exclusion 2011-2015). Social inclusion of Roma is not well mainstreamed or coordinated. Progress in key areas is minor, as indicated by the small increase in the numbers of pedagogical assistants, preparatory classes, kindergartens in Roma communities, field social workers, health assistants, social housing; employment programmes, etc.
This critical analysis has been echoed by other observers. The National Action Plan for Inclusive Education (NAPIE), adopted in 2010, was said to lack concrete actions for its implementation and fail to acknowledge racial discrimination as a main cause for segregation51. The European Commission, commenting the National Strategy for the Integration of Roma 2012-2020, equally reported a lack of concrete measures in the chapter on desegregation and a lack of focus on inclusive education52. The Strategy to Combat Social Exclusion (2011-2015), however, foresees a number of concrete measures to promote desegregation, including a progressive closing down of primary practical schools and increased access of Roma children to pre-school education.
In 2005 all remedial schools were renamed from “special schools” to “practical schools” It appears however that the content and methods of education applied in these schools have not changed much53. A report of the Czech School Inspectorate released in 2010 revealed that 83% of the now practical schools continued to function as “hidden special schools” just as before 2005.
Responsible bodies have been established as well, including the Inter-ministerial Commission for Roma Community Affairs and the Agency for Social Inclusion in Roma Localities. Several initiatives, such as pedagogical assistants, preparatory classes, programmes of community field work and others have been put in place.
51 See Joint Statement of the League of Human Rights and MDAC concerning the implementation of the ECtHR judgment D.H. and others v. Czech Republic, 29 May 2011.
52 See European Commission: National Roma Integration Strategies, a first step in the implementation of the EU framework, 2012.
53 See the report of the Czech School Inspectorate released in 2010 which revealed that 83% of the now practical schools continued to function as “hidden special schools” just as before 2005.
 22

3.2. Hungary
Legal and policy framework
The relevant legislation54 includes:
- The 1993 Act on the Rights of National and Ethnic Minorities, as amended in 2011;
- The 1993 Public Education Act LXXIX, as amended in 1996, 2003, 2007 and 2010 (Decree
No.4/2010);
- The 2003 Act on the Promotion of Equal Treatment and Equal Opportunities;
- The Child Protection Act;
- The Decree on kindergarten education of national and ethnic minorities;
- The Decree on school education of national and ethnic minorities;
- The Decree on Completion of Studies at High Schools, as amended;
- The Decree No. 4/2010. (I.19.) OKM on relevant procedure and professional requirements for the tests
and examinations.
- The National Social Inclusion Strategy – extreme poverty, child poverty, the Roma (2011-2020).
The forms, content and framework of the kindergarten and school education of the Roma minority are regulated in the Decrees on kindergarten education of national and ethnic minorities and on school education of national and ethnic minorities. The purpose of kindergarten education is to prepare
54 Not exhaustive list.
55 Hungary ratified the Framework Convention for the Protection of National Minorities in 1995. The extension of the European Charter for Regional and Minority Languages to the Romani and Beaś (boyash) languages spoken by the Roma in Hungary was promulgated by Act XLIII of 2008.
57 Cigány, the Hungarian term for “Gypsies” is not as derogatory and pejorative as in neighbouring countries of Central and South- Eastern Europe. The word “Roma” (Romák), however, is increasingly used in official documents since 2011.
CAHROM (2015)6
 In Hungary, the policy approach is somehow a mixed approach between mainstreaming and targeting, in accordance with the EU basic principle of explicit but not exclusive targeting. Since most of the Hungarian Roma, about 80% of them, live in extreme poverty in disadvantaged regions, a policy aimed at the inclusion of the Roma in Hungary cannot be separated from the general fight against poverty and the improvement of social and economic competitiveness. At the same time, the Hungarian government agrees that particular attention should be paid to the ethnic group of the Roma as experiences show that they are the poorest of
 the poor and have been least reached by the various inclusion programmes.
 Article 68 of the 1990 Hungarian Constitution provides minorities, including Roma, with the right to preserve their culture, language and history, allowing political collective participation in public life, as well as the rights to their own organisations and to establish regional and national self-governing bodies. The Romani language is recognised as an official minority language and the group is officially recognised as a minority55. The recognition of both individual and collective rights of minorities and members of minorities was granted through the 1993 Act on the Rights of National and Ethnic Minorities56 which granted 13 such
 groups, including Roma, the right to self-government and personal autonomy. All the 13 minorities listed in the Minorities Act of 1993 possess dual identity (Hungarian and ethnic minority) and have the right to elect their own local self-governments, parallel to the national one. This provided the path to Roma autonomy and the formation of the National Gypsy57 Minority Self-Government (National Roma Self-Government since 2011). The self-governing bodies act as advisory boards in co-operation with the national and local majority authority.
The National Roma Self-government and the Roma minority self-governments have the right to maintain and to establish schools and also operate schools of their own in the spirit of cultural and educational autonomy. Education in the school system enables Roma pupils to acquaint themselves with the cultural values of the Roma and provides information on the status, rights, organisations and institutions of the Roma. This form of education and teaching successfully operates in a number of localities. It is, however, necessary to provide further guarantees to prevent Roma minority education from becoming a
 means of segregation.
 56 The Act on the Rights of National and Ethnic Minorities was modified in 2011. According to the new Act, Roma are also recognised as a minority. In 1990 the Office for National Minorities was set up, including a Department on Roma issues.
 23

CAHROM (2015)6
children for a successful entry into the school system by consciously building on the differences and similarities between the Roma culture and the majority culture.
The State Secretariat for Social Inclusion plays a coordinative role between the various ministries and secretariats with the aim to promote social inclusion. It also closely co-operates with the National Roma Minority Self-government.
Both the Act on the Promotion of Equal Treatment and Equal Opportunities adopted in 2003 and the Civil Code provide general anti-discrimination legislation. Article 10 (2) of the 2003 Act on the Promotion of Equal Treatment and Equal Opportunities defines segregation in education and prohibits it as a form of discrimination: “unlawful segregation is a conduct that separates individuals or groups of individuals from others on the basis of their characteristics as defined in Article 8 without a reasonable explanation resulting from objective consideration”.
The target groups of educational equal opportunities programmes are, in every instance and regardless of ethnicity, groups of pupils/students qualifying as pupils/students with multiple disadvantages or as disadvantaged as defined in Section 121 Point 14 of Act LXXIX of 1993 on Public Education. Decree No. 4/2010. (I.19.)
As regards the separate topic of classification of pupils with mild disabilities, the Decree No. 4/2010. (I.19.) OKM on relevant procedure and professional requirements for the tests and examinations identifies the relevant procedure and the professional requirements of the tests and examinations serving as the basis of the subsequent expert opinion.
In Hungary, children/students with special education needs have the right to receive special education, adapted physical and conductive education within the framework of special treatment, after their eligibility was determined. The education of special treatment shall be provided for in line with the expert opinion of a committee of experts. The parent shall select the educational institution that provides appropriate education for pupils/students with special education needs on the basis of the expert opinion of the relevant committee of experts, in consideration of the needs and the possibilities of parents and children.
The pre-school education of children with special education needs, and of students in education institutions and halls of residence shall be conducted in an adapted physical education institution established for this purpose, in a conductive education institution, in a pre-school group or school class, partly or fully together with peers and students in the same pre-school group or school class (hereinafter: pre-schools and schools, hall of residence involved separately, jointly or partly in the education of children/students with special education needs together: educational institution involved in adapted physical education).
The education of children/students with special education needs require the prevalence of the following conditions:
a) the involvement of a special needs teacher, conductor with appropriate skills to educate children / students according to the type and the rate of their special education needs, special curricula, course books and other instruments;
b) in case of individual educational plans, integrated pre-school education, school education, developmental education and developmental teaching, a special needs teacher with special qualifications in line with the requirements set by the committee of experts, furthermore, special curricula, course books for the classes and special medical and technical equipment;
c) the committee of experts’ decision on the areas to be developed.
  Through Act LXXIX of 1993 on Public Education (amended in 1996 and in 2003), an action programme was elaborated in the field of education, which allowed the regional minority self-governing bodies the possibility of setting up educational institutions in the minority language, alongside the possibility to address educational desegregation.
24

CAHROM (2015)6
Provision for pupils with special educational needs (SEN) within mainstream education may contribute to their successful education and integration in their communities. Mainstream schools also teaching SEN pupils have to ensure that SEN pupils are fully integrated and are able to make progress together with other pupils. The Guideline for the kindergarten and school education of children and pupils with special educational needs supports inclusive education in mainstream schools and at the same time provides a framework for schools to develop their local curricula and practice. It also defines the amendments that may be made to the content of subjects to suit the needs of the various groups of SEN pupils. An individual development plan has to be prepared for SEN pupils requiring individual progress at school.
Mainstream schools also catering for SEN pupils are assisted by the services and mobile professionals of Integrated Special Education Methodology Institutions. These methodology institutions may also perform some of the tasks of the pedagogical assistance services as well as family support and school health care.
The Public Education Act provides for extra services and preferential treatment for SEN pupils:
· organisation, methods and tools applied by kindergartens are determined by the individual needs of
SEN children;
· local curricula of schools may allow SEN pupils to have longer time for meeting the requirements of
a school year;
· when calculating the headcount of kindergarten groups and school classes, SEN children/pupils
are taken into account as two or three children, depending on the type of disability;
· schools have to provide health and pedagogical rehabilitation activities for pupils in addition to the
obligatory number of classes (obligatory instruction time);
· in accordance with the expert opinion of the SEN diagnosis committee, school heads may exempt
SEN pupils from assessment in some subjects;
· at exams, SEN pupils are provided longer preparation time and all the tools they needed during
learning (e.g. computers, type writers) and may take an oral exam in writing or a written exam orally if needed.
Children/pupils with social, behaviour and learning difficulties are also given special support. They are provided differentiated teaching/activities and extra services such as educational counselling or speech therapy .
Physical, sensory, intellectual and speech disabilities are ascertained by national and county level expert committees. The expert and rehabilitation committee examining sight, hearing and speech operate at national level while those examining leaning ability operate in Budapest and in each county. The head of the committee is a special teacher with professional skills corresponding to the type of disability and its members are psychologists and specialists. They draw up an expert opinion on the children examined based on which they make a proposal for the institution providing kindergarten education or school education, as well as for the specific requirements for education and teaching of the child or student.
The expert committees may make a proposal not only for admission of children in special classes but also for their transferring from special classes into the classes of the integrating majority school. The parents of students with special education needs have the right to intervene in the choice of institution in which their children would be educated. Physical, sensory, intellectual and speech disabilities may only be established by expert and rehabilitation committees examining only learning abilities and by national committees engaged in expert and rehabilitation activities based on a complex (medical, teaching, special teaching and psychological) examination. The detailed rules of procedure are laid down in the Ministerial Decree. Examination starts at the request, with the agreement and in the presence of the parents.
The committees established for diagnosing physical, sensory (visual and hearing) and speech impairment operate at national level and expert and rehabilitation committees examining learning abilities operate in each county and in Budapest (to establish or exclude diagnoses classified as the collective category of intellectual disability and “permanent and severe disability of the education and learning process due to disorders of psychic development”). Based on the screening and examination of the disability, a proposal is drawn up for the child’s or student’s care in the framework of special education as well as for the way, form and place of care and for the pedagogical assistance service related to the care. The proposal for the type
25

CAHROM (2015)6
of education to be provided is made on the basis of the criteria underlying the classification of the individual types of disabilities.
The committee’s expert opinion has to:
· Establish or exclude disability and the substantiating facts;
· Establish that a child may participate in kindergarten and school education only in the education
institution established for this purpose and suitable for his/her type of disability or he/she may also do
so together with other children and students in integrated form.
· Establish, as the case may be, that he/she may attend compulsory education only as a private student;
· Establish, as the case may be, that compulsory education may be performed in the form of
developmental education;
· Include the specific requirements for education of the child;
· Make a proposal for the institution to provide education.
The institution is chosen by the parents from those complying with the conditions for education of the child or student concerned. If a child is disabled, the parents’ freedom of choice of institution is restricted to the choice between kindergartens and schools suggested by the committee. Parents’ co-operation is not only a right but also an obligation. The provisions of the Constitution stipulate that the parents have the right to choose the form of education to be given to their children but at the same time they are obliged to ensure the upbringing of their children, including educating them. Development of a child may not depend on the parents’ will or approval exclusively, therefor the notary of the place of residence may order the parents – in the framework of public administration procedure – to appear at the expert examination with their child and then to enrol him/her in the appropriate education institution.
A public administration procedure may be initiated, in the interest of the child or student, by:
· The public administration institution or the family protection institution if the parents do not accept the
necessity of the examination;
· The expert and rehabilitation committee if the parents fails to appear at or to co-operate at the
examination and/or the parents do not agree with the findings of the expert opinion or its forwarding;
· The head of the designated education institution if the child is not enrolled or taken to the institution.
Parents may file an appeal, in which case the local government authority makes a decision on the case.
The children and students who are not able to attend compulsory education at their place of residence participate in school education either by daily commuting – which is assisted by school buses only at some locations, so usually they have to use public transport – or by weekly accommodation in student hostels (from Monday to Friday). The family receives an aid for travelling in both cases.
Institutions available for mentally disabled children operate in the counties and those for children with physical or sensory disabilities operate in larger territorial units (individual regions) but, e.g., those for blind, partially sighted or students with physical disability operate at two or three places in the country.
Age groups and grouping of children and students
The public education of students with special education needs or disabilities starts from the day their disability was identified. From the age of 0 to 3 (or maximum 5) they participate in early intervention, from the age of 3 they attend kindergarten education and from the age of 6 or 7 they attend basic school education. The law also enables children with severe or multiple disabilities to participate in compulsory education.
Kindergarten and school education
Children with special education needs (disabilities) may participate in kindergarten education from age 3, and then continue in basic school until grade 8. After completing basic school, children with special education needs may continue their studies in a general secondary school, a vocational secondary school, a vocational school or a special vocational school. Children with special education needs must be accounted for as two or three children (depending on the type and severity of disability) in the average number of students per group or per class.
26

Early intervention
It starts when the child’s special education need (disability) is identified and it involves development activities for the child and consultation for parents. After age 3, the child may continue to participate in early intervention if he/she cannot join kindergarten. The task can be carried out in various forms: home-based provision, care in crèche, special needs counselling, early intervention centre etc.
Developmental education
In Hungary children with severe or multiple disabilities were granted complete exemption from compulsory education and received no school education until 1994. With the introduction of developmental preparation under the training obligation in 1994, children with severe or multiple disabilities received individual development in individual sessions at least three hours a week, or in case of group sessions, at least five hours a week.
In 2005, the Public Education Act defined developmental preparation as one form of accomplishing compulsory education and therefore provided a legal basis for children with severe or multiple disabilities to receive education, teaching and development in the form of developmental school education every day as appropriate to their condition. Developmental school education has been optionally organised since 2006 and mandatorily organised since 2010. Since 2012, developmental education can only be provided by special education institutions in principle. Developmental school units currently operating in welfare institutions are phased out until August 2014.
Developmental education is an integrated process organised not by grades but in accordance with developmental phases of students. It is based on the individual development plans determining the personalised development, education and rehabilitation programme. Similarly to mainstream education, it follows the schedule of the school year.
Curriculum, subjects
The National Core Curriculum is the basic document of school education of students with special education needs as well. When they elaborate their teaching programme, schools may apply the National Core Curriculum in accordance with their local features and taking the provisions of the Guideline for the education of students with special education needs into account. The contents of education, teaching and development outlined in the basic document are necessary for all children despite the differences between students.
Schools take the differences between students into account when they draw up their local teaching programmes. Disability is such a form of differences between children which necessitates higher differentiation than that applied usually to contents and procedures, use of special procedures and supplementary teaching services. The objectives, tasks, contents, activities and requirements relating to development (of the disability) need to be integrated in the teaching programme and quality management programme of the institution, in the local curriculum, in the learning-teaching programme related to the thematic units and plans, and in the individual development plan.
The schedule of the school year is the same as in mainstream education. Nevertheless, schools providing education for students with special education needs may determine a longer time than one school year for learning the content of one grade. The considerable majority of the institutions make use of this opportunity, usually in the first grade.
Teaching methods and materials
The Public Education Act defines the National Core Curriculum as the basic document intended for regulation of the content of school education. Irrespective of whether education and teaching are carried out in a special education institution or integrated, the Guideline should be taken into account when the teaching programme and local curriculum of the school are prepared. The document is aimed at enforcement of the rights of (disabled) children and students with special education needs for special care. The Guideline determines the main development fields intended for reducing and compensating the disadvantages resulting from disability, the basic principles, objectives and key tasks of development, as well as the tasks and forms of activities assisting teaching and health rehabilitation for all fields of the national disability categories.
27
CAHROM (2015)6

CAHROM (2015)6
The Individual schools and other special education institutions may decide of their own the methods they consider the most adequate and the procedures they use in the process of education. Such methods differ according to individual disabilities but in each case they obey the content requirements laid down in the National Core Curriculum. In the course of their application, school education is characterized by the subject-based approach. The Guideline defines the necessary modification of or supplement to the individual contents rather than including the contents specific to the impairment in separate subjects.
In each (mainstream or separate) school teaching students with special education needs mandatory health and education classes are integrated in the school curriculum. The rehabilitation time frame is 15-50% of the weekly compulsory number of lesson defined for the relevant grade, depending on the type of disability. Students participate in as many rehabilitation activities as required to reduce their disadvantage resulting from disability. In this time frame, such education activities (subjects) may be planned which are necessary for each student of the class and various individual therapeutic activities planned for individuals and small groups may be performed.
The Guideline defines the tasks of health and education rehabilitation in all fields of disability by designating the frames and objectives. The following are examples in the individual fields of disability:
· For physically handicapped students: elimination or reduction of the functional disorder caused by impairment (speech disorder, speech defect, sensorimotor disorder, loss of skills, decreased psychic and/or motor speed. Group and individual kinetic education designed depending on the type and severity of the form of disease and integrated in the curriculum.
· For visually impaired students: visual education, preservation and development of the remaining sight. Intensive kinetic development, including the development of touch and dexterity, design of the body culture, correction of gait defects (e.g. correction of hanging head, dyskinesia), application of the knowledge assisting transport and orientation in specific life situations (learning the technique of use of the white stick), use of special optical aids.
· For hearing impaired students: finger ABC and sign language can be used as specific tools of setting up language communication. Communication with hearing people, special education tasks supporting individual integration.
· For mentally impaired students: correction and compensation of the impaired functions; development of the knowledge of means; attainment of the learning techniques; development of social skills and (spatial and temporal) orientation skills; and formation of competence.
· For speech impaired students: complex speech and arts therapy; development of phonemic hearing; graphomotor and visiomotor coordination. Communication training courses. Puppet therapy. Drama therapy.
· For autistic students: design of an environment and toolkit of prosthetic character and of a special individual motivation system. Visually assisted communication system.
· In all fields of impairment: prevention of personality disorders (correct self-perception, self- acceptance, development of the adaptation ability, establishment of appropriate social relations).
The institution is responsible for filling rehabilitation classes with specific contents and forms of activities, which may be modified within the institution – as necessary – in compliance with the current development needs of the students concerned.
Competence-based programme packages suitable for promoting bothinclusive and separate special education have been developed. Each programme package is accompanied by recommendations taking into account the specific features of the various disabilities. These recommendations contain:
· description of the characteristics necessary for identification of the disability causing the special education need;
· key skills and requirements related to the competence area;
· topics;
· forms of learning management;
· forms of behaviour to be shown by teachers and non-impaired members of the class in mainstream
schools;
· devices;
· evaluation;
28

· other proposals.
Progression of pupils
The rules for progression of students participating in separate special education are the same as those relating to mainstream schools.
Evaluation of school performance and admission in further school grades are stipulated by and described in the requirements of the school’s local curriculum. In the event a student with special education needs changes schools/school types, an expert and rehabilitation committee has to examine whether the conditions necessary for the education of the student are met by the relevant institution.
Completion of grade 8 of the basic school gives entitlement to continuing studies in upper secondary schools. Most students with physical and sensory disabilities participate in secondary school education together with other students. Most intellectually disabled students perform secondary studies in special vocational schools.
Transfer from separate special education into mainstream education is possible on the basis of the proposal of an expert rehabilitation committee.
Certification
As a rule, (disabled) students participating in special education receive a final certificate equivalent to that of non-disabled students in mainstream schools. The marks entered in the certificate are based on the assessment of the performance of the student during the school year and are preceded normally by no special examination. An exception is when the student has performed compulsory education as a private student.
In the event the school allows a longer time than one school year for learning the curriculum of a grade, the mid-year school report and the end-of-year certificate are issued at the half and at the end of the increased teaching period, respectively.
Special vocational schools indicate in the final certificate – In the event a special school transfers knowledge required for commencement of employment or starting life - the field of activity in which the disabled student received theoretic and/or practical education in the final certificate.
3.3 Latvia
Legal and policy framework
The main legal texts that define the sphere of education in Latvia includes the Education Law from 1998 and the General Education Law from 1999. The 1998 Law of Education forbids the differential treatment to education. It means that Roma people have the same rights and obligations with regard to education as the general Latvian population. Every child has the right to equal and quality education.
Pre-school education is under the responsibility of municipalities. Since 2002, education of 5-6 year old children is compulsory.
More specific guarantees, aims and goals are regulated by the normative acts of the Cabinet of Ministers of the Republic of Latvia. For example, the amendments to the Cabinet Regulation No. 461 of 18 May 2010 “Regulations Regarding the Classification of Occupations, the Basic Tasks Appropriate to the Occupation and the Basic Qualification Requirements, and the Procedures for the Use and Updating of the Classification of Occupations” allow municipalities to provide their pre-schools and elementary schools with a teachers’ assistant of Roma background in order to promote school attending especially among Roma children. The general secondary education level is the minimal grade to work as teachers’ assistant of Roma background, but in the same time the tertiary pedagogical education is necessary to be employed as non-Roma teacher assistant.
Given the specific national situation and conditions, such as the small Roma population, Latvia has developed a series of national Roma integration policy measures (hereafter “Measures”). These Measures
29
CAHROM (2015)6

CAHROM (2015)6
have been included in the development planning document: National Identity, Civil Society and Integration Policy Guidelines 2012-2018 (hereinafter “Guidelines”). There are concrete actions and projects will be formulated to implement the Measures in every two years in close co-operation with the representatives of the Roma community.
In 2012 the Council supervising the implementation of Roma integration policy measures (thereafter - Council) has been established by the Ministry of Culture. The Council includes representatives from state bodies (co-responsible ministries, the Office of the Ombudsman, local authorities, and educational authorities), Roma and non-Roma NGOs that work in the area of protecting the interests of the Roma, as well as experts in Roma integration issues. Totally 8 Roma representatives are involved in the Council: 6 representatives of Roma NGOs, one representative from the Office of Ombudsman and one expert. The main aim of the Council is to assess and foster the policy for Roma integration, as well as to promote civil participation of the Roma community and to strengthen cooperation between the Roma community and national authorities, in accordance with the National identity, civil society and integration policy guidelines for 2012-2018. The main tasks of the Council are ensuring an effective implementation and evaluation of results of the policy for Roma integration and particular the set of national Roma integration policy measures; providing recommendation to the authorities to improve the implementation of the policy for Roma integration especially in field of education, employment, health care and housing; fostering the cooperation between Roma community, authorities, stakeholders, social partners, NGO and experts; evaluating the possibility of effective use of EU structural funds to implementation of the set of national Roma integration policy measures.
Roma representatives are also members of the Consulting Council in Ethnic Minority Education Affairs of the Ministry of Education and Science.
The Measures of the national Roma integration policy have been developed in accordance with the European Union, Council of Europe and other international instruments and legislative acts binding on Latvia. These have also been inspired by Recommendations of the study “Roma rights to education: implementing the situation in Latvia”. According to this study, the main challenges for Roma integration in the area of education are as follows:
· To continue the good practice of preparing and facilitating the inclusion of teaching assistants of Roma background in schools by providing for the further professional education of these teaching assistants. To acknowledge, collate and disseminate other examples of good practice in Roma education;
· To develop and improve intercultural competencies in order to facilitate the integration of Roma school children in general education;
· To implement teacher training and continuing education by ensuring a link with practice in classes where Roma children study together with other children;
· To regularly analyse the situation in the work of educational establishments where Roma school children study, such as teachers’ professional qualifications for classroom work with children of different ethnic origins;
· To support projects to foster Roma education implemented by non-governmental organisations (or representatives of the Roma community) together with educational establishments or other nongovernmental organisations;
· To develop a mechanism for recording the educational age of Roma in order to reduce the risk of school absenteeism and to foster Roma children’s regular attendance at school. To collate data on preparing Roma children for pre-school education, mandatory five-year and six-year education, educational results and completing basic education;
· To develop and publish methodological materials for teaching 5-7 year old children the Romani language (with translation into Latvian), with the content representing the traditional key elements of Roma culture;
· To maintain a dialogue with the parents of Roma children, to support and involve them in the education process by explaining the importance of education;
· To foster the improvement of socio-economic conditions for Roma children in preparation for primary school;
30

CAHROM (2015)6
· To include experts from the Roma community in the work of the consultative board on issues of minority education of the Ministry of Education and Science.
The Guidelines define the following policy results to be achieved and result indicators which have a targeted approach to Roma. The main policy areas set out in the Reform Programme for reducing the proportion of young people who do not finish school are as follows:
· ensuring access to primary and secondary education;
· implementing modern teaching methods.
Given that the Roma are one of the social groups with one of the lowest levels of education, and the fact that a large number of Roma children drop out of the education process before completing their education, the tasks set out in the Reform Programme for reducing the proportion of young people who do not finish school also apply to the Roma population.
Solutions provided:
· Creating multicultural, inclusive groups/classes and involving children in early education;
· Teacher trainings for work in multicultural, inclusive groups/classes;
· Parent support centres in schools;
· Teacher’s assistants with Roma background as intermediary between school and family.
Teacher's assistants of Roma background were prepared to work in the school environment during the following projects of the Centre for Education Initiatives (CEI):
· « Roma Child in a Welcoming School » (2004 CEI project): One of them obtained a Bachelor degree and works as a pre-school teacher, two of them continue their work as teachers assistants with salaries from the municipality budget;
· « Teachers assistants of Roma Background» (2006-2009 CEI project): In the 2007/2008 and 2008/2009 school years, eight teachers’ assistants of Roma background were working in schools in several regions. In 2009/2010, there were eight teachers’ assistants, two of which were paid from the municipality budget. These measures are implemented in the framework of the State Programme “Roma in Latvia”.
· «School and Community for Inclusion of Roma Children» (2011 CEI project): In the 2011/2012 school year, five teacher’s assistants of Roma background were working in schools in several regions. In 2012/2013, three teachers’ assistants receive salaries from the municipality budget.
Other examples of projects run by the Centre for Education Initiatives (CEI) include58:
· 2011/2012: research on "financing and governance of education for children with learning difficulties: focus on effectiveness, efficiency and equity";
· 2011/2012: "training of pedagogues for inclusion of Roma children";
· 2011/2012: "creation of the support system for work with Roma children";
· 2011/2012: "inclusive family, pre-school, school and society";
· 2011/2012: "school and community for inclusion of Roma children";
· 2008/2010: "integration's suitcase" for children with special needs;
· 2009/2011:"quality inclusive education for children with disabilities”.
Roma children's inclusion and integration into mainstream education and the integration of their families, especially senior Roma, into society, is promoted through cooperation and intercultural dialogue in order to reduce social disparity.
58 For older CEI projects, see information provided by Latvia in the Addendum of this thematic report.
 31

CAHROM (2015)6
In that respect, parental support centres and adult education - through cooperation with teachers, school administrators, local government representatives and parents - lead to more educated Roma adults who are more inclined to send their children to school.
New projects are being initiated under the “Social rehabilitation programme for Roma families with pre- school or school age children” for the 2012-2013 school year in Jelgava and Jurmala.
3.4 Poland
Legal and policy framework
It should be emphasised that the existing measures taken by the government of Poland in the area of promoting education among the Roma led to many systemic changes in the approach to education:
- § 11 of the Regulation of the Minister of National Education of November 14, 2007, on the conditions and manner the kindergartens, schools and public institutions perform tasks that allow the maintenance of a sense of national, ethnic and linguistic identity of pupils belonging to national and ethnic minorities, and communities using the regional language, gives the opportunity for schools to undertake - if necessary - additional educational tasks aimed at maintaining and developing a sense of ethnic identity of Roma pupils, and supporting the education of these pupils, in particular conducting remedial classes. This provision constitutes the basis for employment in school, as a help for teacher, Roma education assistant59. The amendment of this regulation of April 4, 201260 made possible to take such actions - in addition to schools - also for kindergartens.
Moreover:
- a new model of funding of additional measures for Roma pupils by local government units was
introduced;
- the so-called "Roma classes" were discontinued (since school year 2010/2011);
- scholarship schemes for gifted Roma pupils, high school students and higher education Roma
students were introduced;
- a subsidy mechanism for the financing of tasks consisting of ensuring school starter kits and
textbooks for pupils of Roma origin, insurance, remedial classes, summer camps, community
centres was introduced;
- by recognizing the special educational needs of pupils, including pupils of Roma origin, in
Regulation of the Minister of National Education of April 30, 2013 on the principles of providing and organizing psychological and pedagogical support in public kindergartens, schools and institutions (Journal of Laws of 2013, item 532) - Roma education assistant, beside the pupil, parent, teacher, educator of the educational group or specialist conducting classes with pupils, psychological and educational counselling centre, including specialist counselling centre, has been identified as one of the entities, which can initiate psychological and pedagogical assistance for a particular pupil in the given facility.
59 The position of Roma education assistant was introduced to the Polish school system in 2001. Roma Education Assistant provides assistance to Roma students in contacts with the school and works with the parents and the. The purpose of introduction of Roma assistants to the schools where Roma children learn was primarily to increase the low turnout of pupils, and to assist in the implementation of school obligations. Roma assistants should be Roma who have the trust of local Roma communities. The duties of the assistant should also include building a good contact between the parents and the school, informing parents about the progress at school, as well as monitoring attendance of pupils and progress at school. Assistants are responsible for providing comprehensive assistance for children and youth at school and beyond. To a large extent, it is their duty to cooperate with the parents of Roma pupils. In 2004 the profession of Roma education assistant was entered into the official catalogue of professions in Poland. Since 2006, a systematic change in the system of financing of Roma education assistants has taken place. Initially, their work was funded under the Roma Programme, which involved large pool of funds. Over time, the possibility was created to finance employment of Roma education assistants from the increased educational subsidy.
60 Journal of Laws of 2012, item 393.
 There are also many special activities regarding Roma inclusion, including Roma education, that are implemented in the framework of PROGRESS 2007-2013 project “Different people. Various experiences. One Latvia”. For example, Roma NGO leaders and representatives, specialists of municipalities and local governments, as well pedagogical staff of schools, are involved in activities to raise awareness of Roma and supporting their integration. These activities are implemented in 2012-2013 by the Social Integration Fund and the Ministry of Culture.
 32

The number of ad hoc measures was taken to promote awareness on the subject of diagnosis of Roma children and providing them with support adequate to the needs in the education system:
- In 2011: five regional consulting - information meetings with representatives of psychological- pedagogical counselling centre under the "Increasing the effectiveness of education of pupils with special educational needs" project”;
- In 2012: a seminar, and a conference devoted to the problems of the functioning of multilingual and culturally different children including Romani children within the education system;
- In 2012: two national conferences targeted at employees of psychological-pedagogical counselling centre, at which - among others - the problem of issuance of decisions and opinions, and culturally neutral diagnosis taking into account the needs of multilingual children was presented;
- In 2012 and 2013, the discussion on this subject was continued during the regional meetings in different voivodeships. Voivodes and school superintendents were among the organizers of these local conferences61;
- Summary of these activities was published and disseminated in 2013 in the form of methodological manual compiled by a team of psychologists of the Jagiellonian University, relating to the issue of psychological diagnosis of multilingual and culturally diverse children and youth, also provided was the training for psychological-pedagogical counselling centres in this field.
Changes in the approach to the school education and extracurricular of the part of Roma observed during the implementation of the aid programmes allow to put forward the thesis that to a large extent, the Roma community recognizes the benefits coming from education, and being educated, and the actions taken to date should be continued - as a priority support.
3.5 “The former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia”
Legal and policy framework
The Preamble of the Macedonian Constitution explicitly recognizes Roma as an ethnic community. The same applies for the Ohrid Framework Agreement signed in 2001.
The pre-school education in “the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia” is regulated by the Law on Child Protection. The implementation of the "Inclusion of Roma Children in Public Pre-school Institutions" REF-supported project in 18 municipalities and 18 kindergartens was realized in accordance with the Law on Child Protection. This Law regulates the rights and responsibilities of parents and of the kindergartens as institutions. The Law on Child Protection defines the prices for the services of pre-school institutions and the programmes for pre-school education. Child care in all kindergartens is implemented in accordance with this law. The Ministry of Labour and Social Policy is in the phase of developing amendments to the Law on Child Protection.
The National Strategy for Roma Inclusion (NRIS) is a policy document that was first adopted in 2005 and then reviewed in 2014 for a decade. A National Action Plan for Education was developed as part of this strategy. One of the measures to improve the educational structure of the Roma community is the increasing of the number of Roma children in pre-school institutions. The "Inclusion of Roma Children in Public Pre-school Institutions" project for the years 2009-2012 was created to assist fulfilling this measure. A similar project “Inclusion of Roma children in pre-school education” for the years 2014-2016 was recently approved by the Roma Education Fund (REF) and will be jointly conducted by the Roma Education Fund (REF) and the Ministry of Labour and Social Policy.
Positive measures have been taken to broaden the educational opportunities of Roma children. This included the adoption of positive discrimination measures in both pre-school education and the
61 The aim of these measures was to disseminate the issue related to the decisions issued for Roma children by the counselling centres, in particular attention was focused on the need to use non-verbal and free culture tests during examination of Roma children that take into account the degree of proficiency in Polish. The emphasis was also placed on developing and disseminating procedures for recognizing the needs and abilities of bilingual and culturally different pupils. Meetings were also showcase for examples of good practices and discussion on the activities that would contribute to the improvement of local strategies for multilingual and culturally diverse pupils, including Roma pupils and to present recommendations.
CAHROM (2015)6
   33

CAHROM (2015)6
following education cycles. Many projects are in place to include parents. In addition, special attention is paid to provide Roma children with the appropriate equipment. Affirmative action is also carried out to ensure that Roma students have access to universities.
Through direct inclusion of Roma children in pre-school education, the newly approved Roma Education Fund funded-project will contribute to increasing the participation of Roma children in kindergartens in “the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia”. The pre-school education programme is conducted in Macedonian language. This will allow Roma children included in the kindergartens to improve their knowledge of the language of the majority which will ensure their successful participation in primary education. The Roma teacher assistants are engaged on the project in order to help the project children to follow the curriculum which is on Macedonian language. Roma assistants have a crucial role in alleviating Roma children’s integration. Moreover, it will contribute to the increasing the number of Roma children who progress to higher levels of education, especially in elementary and secondary education. Additionally, the project will improve the socialization, and the intellectual, emotional and cognitive development of the children, as well as the adaptation of Roma children in the educational process. The project activities will contribute to raising the awareness of Roma parents to understand the importance of pre-school education for their children. Through all this, we expect increased support to education by the parents themselves in the long run. The increased level of education among the Roma population will contribute to increasing the competitiveness of the Roma in the labour market. Indirectly, the project will contribute to the improvement of the socio-economic situation of the Roma community.
The Ministry of Labour and Social Policy has developed and adopted standards for early childhood development. The Department for Child Protection, together with the UNICEF Office in Skopje, makes efforts for proper implementation of the standards within the pre-school institutions.
On February 12, 2013, the National Assembly adopted the new Law on Protection of Children, published in the “Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia” No. 23/13 on February 14, 2013. Via this Law, a system for provision of care and education to pre-school children was established aimed towards early childhood development, which provides support to the overall development and well-being of pre-school children. With the incorporation of the majority of the provisions of the Convention on the Rights of the Child, other relevant conventions, protocols, and of other documents, the protection of children has been raised to a higher level. The updated legal solutions created the need for inclusion of a larger number of children in the institutions for provision of care and education to pre-school children; to that end, the opportunity to open Early Childhood Development Centres for provision of care to children from rural areas aged 3–6 years arose.
In addition to the public institutions (kindergartens and early childhood development centres), state institutions can also be formed by the Macedonian Government. Private institutions can be established not only by domestic natural and legal persons, but also by foreign natural and legal persons.
With the purpose of raising the level of expertise and competence in the performance of work in this sector, a system for licensing by passing professional examinations and undergoing compulsory training as additional education was established, which has raised the quality level of service provision.
The Department for Protection of Children within the Ministry of Labour and Social Policy in collaboration with the UNICEF Office in Skopje continuously provides training to the professional staff of kindergartens in order to educate them on the proper application of the secondary regulations relating to pedagogical records and documentation.
The "Inclusion of Roma Children in Public Pre-school Institutions in the Republic of Macedonia" has been implemented since the academic year of 2006/07. The project is implemented by the Ministry of Labour and Social Policy within the Department for the Implementation of the Decade of Roma Inclusion 2005 - 2015 and the National Strategy for Roma Inclusion. The project is funded by the Ministry of Labour and Social Policy, the Roma Education Fund and 18 Local Self-Government Units in which the project is implemented. 18 Roma NGO’s are local partners in this project.
The Government intends to introduce compulsory and free of charge pre-school education (minimum 1 or 2 years before the child enter primary/elementary education, minimum for the
34

CAHROM (2015)6
children of social welfare beneficiary families). The analyses necessary for the implementation of this policy are currently in progress. The programme will be launched as a pilot programme to evaluate the effects of compulsory pre-school education. The introduction of compulsory pre-school education is particularly important for the successful continuation of the successful practices and the replication of project results.
The Government decided in May 2013 to employ the Roma teacher assistants who are permanently employed under the project as from January 2015 (the newest Government decision in this regard, initiated by REF and the Ministry of Labour and Social Policy, dates from June 2014). This will allow the regularly employment on project level of the Rоmа kindergarten teacher assistants within the kindergartens where they work.
4. LESSONS LEARNT AND GOOD PRACTICES IDENTIFIED
4.1 Conclusions concerning the preparation and organisation of the thematic visit
At the debriefing meeting, the group of experts agreed to rename the report "thematic report on inclusive pre-school education for Roma children" in order to better reflect the scope of discussions during the thematic visit and to highlight the need to develop inclusive education, including at pre-school level, particularly in the Czech Republic where “inclusive education” is not sufficiently defined, in line with international standards and recommendations addressed to Czech authorities.
Among the positive aspects identified by the partner countries’ experts:
- An official invitation letter and a draft agenda were circulated before the thematic visit;
- The possibility was given to the CAHROM Secretariat to provide comments on the draft agenda;
- The agenda of both the round table and the field visits focused on the topic and the thematic visit
was very well organised;
- Excellent interpretation was provided by the hosting authorities;
- The group of experts welcomed the fact that the Czech Government is currently engaged in a reform
of its education system which may hopefully line itself with the European Court of Human Rights judgement in D. H. and Others v. The Czech Republic. The thematic visit was timely to discuss with various stakeholders, including public institutions and civil society representatives, legal amendments and ways of promoting inclusive education of Roma pupils into mainstream (pre- school) education.
- The group of experts had an opportunity to meet with various key interlocutors (governmental officials, school director and teachers, staff members of pre-school projects, school inspectorate, representatives of civil society, etc.). The possibility to meet with the Deputy Minister for Education, Youth and Sports Mr Jaroslav Fidrmuc, was highly appreciated by the group of experts, as well as the presence throughout of the two days of at least one representative of the Ministry of Education, Youth and Sports;
- The presence of the representative of the European Commission/DG Justice during the first day of the CAHROM thematic visit - which had been proposed by the Czech hosting authorities and agreed upon by both the European Commission and the Council of Europe – was acknowledged as a positive way to reinforce synergies between the two organisations' Roma agenda. The participation of the European Commission during the 2nd day was announced but did not occur.
Among the shortcomings identified by the partner countries’ experts:
- The fact that the official in charge of pre-school within the Ministry of Education, Youth and Sports had to leave before the end of the agenda of the first day's meeting did not allow the partner countries' experts to present their country experience during that day as originally planned and obliged the Governmental Office and the group of experts to reshape the agenda of the second day. However, this was solved with the above mentioned participation of other representatives of the Ministry of Education, Youth and Sports during the 2nd day of the meeting;
- Civil society's participation was limited to the League of Human Rights and Romodrom o.p.s. Three other NGOs apologized. The Roma Education Fund did not attend as originally envisaged and Amnesty International-Prague could not be invited due to last minutes arrangements for the agenda
35

CAHROM (2015)6
and parallel meeting with NGOs organised by the European Commission on 20 November 2014.
The Ombudsman did not participate.
- The fact that no children were present ("all sick that day") at the People in Need pre-school club
which raised many doubts among the group of experts on this REF-funded project in Prague (similar projects in other Czech cities might be assessed more positively but only the one in Prague was visited).
The group of experts also regretted the lack of reciprocity between the European Commission and the Council of Europe: whilst the Council of Europe welcomed the participation of the European Commission representative in the CAHROM thematic visit, the Council of Europe representatives could not attend the EC meeting with the Czech authorities scheduled just before the thematic visit, on 18 November 2014.
4.2 Specific conclusions and lessons learnt
4.2.1 Concerning the Czech Republic (requesting country)
As a general remark, a more positive approach towards desegregation and inclusive education seems to gain ground among Czech policy makers, as it was noted by the CAHROM group of experts following discussion with various state officials and the Deputy Minister of Education, Youth and Sports during their visit in Prague. However, whilst a number of institutions such as the Czech School Inspectorate, the Ombudsman’s Office, the Agency for Social Inclusion, the Minister for Human Rights, the Office of the Government Council for Roma Minority Affairs and some political parties (e.g. The Greens62) seem to be clearly committed to achieve progress on Roma children’s inclusive education, some doubts seem to persist at the level of the entire Ministry of Education, Youth and Sports, and at the level of associations of teachers and staff of the Special Education Centres who lobby for the maintenance of practical schools and programmes.
As regards the implementation of the ECtHR Judgment in the case of D. H. and Others v. the Czech Republic
The group of experts took note that a Revised Action for the Execution of this ECtHR judgement was submitted on 10 February 2015 to the Council of Europe and that this Revised Action Plan, replacing the Consolidated Action Plan, which was submitted to the Council of Ministers of the Council of Europe on 16 November 2012, contains an overview of measures for the execution of the judgment that have been implemented to date as well as an overview of measures that will be implemented for the execution of the judgment63.
As regards the forthcoming reform of the Pre-school Act and the proposal to introduce the last year compulsory pre-school education
The group of experts believes that pre-school education as an important factor for success should be promoted. The group of experts believes that the present system of no compulsory pre-school education combined with streaming Roma children to so-called practical schools or programmes for mild mental disabilities is a "lose-lose combination". Failing to invest in Roma education dooms large numbers of Roma to unemployment or extremely low-paying jobs and deprives the Government of substantial fiscal revenues, as it was showed by World Bank and UNDP studies.
Therefore, experts of the thematic group took note with great interest and satisfaction the proposal to make compulsory the last year pre-school education compulsory for all children. It noted that in practice the proposed reform is aimed de facto at enrolling more Roma children in pre-school mainstream education since 90% of Czech children are already attending pre-school education. The group of experts also noted with satisfaction that pre-school facilities in the Czech Republic are not lacking compared to the opposite situation in many other member States.
62 See article published by Romea.CZ news server on 19 September 2014.
63 For more information on the Revised Action Plan of the Czech Government and enhanced supervision of this case, consult the Execution of Judgements webpage: http://www.coe.int/t/dghl/monitoring/execution/Reports/pendingCases_en.asp?CaseTitleOrNumber=D.H.+and+Others&StateCode=CZ E&SectionCode=
   36

Whilst welcoming the proposal of the Czech Government to introduce a last year compulsory pre-school year for all children, the group of experts underlined the following support measures that should accompany such development to make it more effective, especially for Roma children and families, in line with the Council of Europe Committee of Ministers’ Recommendation CM/Rec(2009)4 on the education of Roma and Travellers in Europe64:
▪ Free meals should be provided in mainstream inclusive pre-schools - if not for all Roma and non- Roma children - at least for children from vulnerable families65;
▪ Free transport should be organised for Roma and non Roma children, or at least from vulnerable families, especially if they live in segregated areas or districts where local transportation is insufficient or lacking;
▪ Existing pre-school facilities should be accessible to all Roma families. Where necessary, infrastructure facilities and human resources (including Roma school assistants) should be increased to welcome Roma children;
▪ Teachers and pedagogical staff working in existing pre-schools facilities should receive training on multi-cultural environment to prepare themselves for the arrival of Roma children in pre- schools (see the Latvian experience in this respect);
▪ Meetings between non-Roma and Roma parents should be organised, where necessary, and prior to the implementation of the reform, to avoid possible tensions;
▪ Roma school assistants should be enrolled in pre-school institutions to make the compulsory pre- school year as effective as possible;
▪ Roma families should be encouraged to enrol their children in pre-school education, not just for the last compulsory pre-school year (see awareness-raising campaigns below).
The group of experts discussed whether one year compulsory pre-school education was enough, having in mind that in Hungary compulsory pre-school education is compulsory as from the age of three for all children. The Hungarian expert, based on his experience, recommended that pre-school education for Roma children should be generalised as from the age of three and be financed by the regions66. The group came to the conclusion that, as a starting point, it might be sufficient to start with one year compulsory education, provided that there are enough infrastructure and facilities, human resources and free meals and/or transport. Following a monitoring of the results of the introduction of this measure, it could be later envisaged to increase the number of compulsory pre-school years if necessary. The group of experts indicated that the internal guidelines and instructions for school professionals that will follow the adoption of the revised Pre-school Act should provide clear and not biased guidelines for its proper implementation.
As regards the system of zero (preparatory) classes
Should the introduction of a compulsory pre-school year for all children be introduced in the Czech Republic with the aim to prepare children to primary education, the system of zero (preparatory) classes should be progressively stopped at primary school level. Indeed the group of experts considers that there is a certain incoherence and potential duplication between zero classes and the last year compulsory pre-school, both having the similar objective to prepare the child to primary education and feel comfortable in a mixed school environment. The experts believe that there is a potential risk that Roma pupils may end up doing a compulsory pre-school and still be asked to enrol zero classes in primary schools. Not only this potential risk would put into question the validity and efficiency of the introduction of a compulsory pre-school year, but it will also prolong for at least another year the enrolment of Roma children in primary school classes, creating an unnecessary age difference between Roma and non Roma pupils in subsequent classes from the start of the education process. The more Roma children repeat the first classes, the less educated they are and the less they finish compulsory education because many of them still drop out of school at an early stage for various reasons.
64 Paragraphe 10 of the Recommendation states: “Attendance of pre-school education for Roma and Traveller children should be encouraged, under equal conditions as for other children, and enrolment in pre-school education should be promoted if necessary by providing specific support measures.”
65 At the moment, the last pre-school year is free except 20 Euros which are being asked to each family per child for maintenance costs, plus meals taken at school.
66 So far in the Czech Republic, only the last year of pre-school education can be funded by local authorities, and this is not an obligation.
CAHROM (2015)6
 37

With the introduction of a last compulsory pre-school year, the group of experts considers that zero classes should be kept to the minimum and the decision to enrol children – Roma and non Roma –in zero classes should be decided not at the entrance in primary schools but after at least a trimester and following a thorough discussion and common agreement between relevant teachers, the school director, and the parents regarding the aptitudes of the child. When taking the decision, the best interest of the child should always be kept in mind.
Zero/preparatory classes in practical schools should be progressively abolished and compulsory pre-school education should be clearly dissociated from practical schools. Indeed the group of experts considers of utmost importance that zero classes or pre-school compulsory education are not misused for the further enrolment of Roma children in schools and programmes for mild mentally disabled.
In the meantime, the group of experts would encourage the Czech authorities to develop teaching plans and programmes for the primary “zero/preparatory class” in order to speed up the children’s development during the year spent in this zero class so that they could join the first primary class at the end of this preparatory year67.
As regards the testing of children and incentives
As this issue was raised in the more general context of school enrolment of Roma children, the group of experts would like to recall in that respect the conclusions of the 2012 CAHROM thematic visit on inclusive education of Roma children as opposed to special schools following a thematic visit to the Czech Republic68:
· Testing of children should be limited and should rather be replaced by testing of the schools’ outcomes;
· If tests are applied by state authorities and school professionals to assess the academic suitability of (Roma) pupils for mainstream education, these tests should not be limited to IQ tests but include skills testing;
· Tests should meet a legitimate educational need. Tests should not serve the purpose to distort evaluation scores and favour the inclusion of specific ethnic groups in schools for mentally disabled;
· Tests should be based on clear criteria unrelated to ethnic origin but take into account linguistically and culturally sensitiveness;
· Tests should differentiate between children with intellectual impairment and children whose knowledge required for school is hindered by their (social) environment but who are otherwise fully capable;
· Tests should not be superficially conducted and be impartial. The Czech Republic could introduce in that respect the Hungarian model of involving an equal opportunities officer;
· Proper pedagogical and psychological counselling and assessment should take place prior to any placement of a child in a special/practical class/programme;
· Incentives for Roma families and/or to schools for enrolling children in so-called practical schools should be redirected towards promoting the enrolment of Roma children by their parents into mainstream education.
As regards the duties of the Czech School Inspectorate
The group of experts welcomed the open and positive approach of the Czech School Inspectorate representative towards decreasing the enrolment of Roma children in practical schools and programmes and increasing the number of Roma children in inclusive mainstream education.
The group of experts believes that the role and duties of the Czech School Inspectorate should be broaden so as to include the supervision of the work of socio-pedagogical staff and psychological centres which conduct the testing of children.
67 In this respect, see the practice of the State Pedagogical Institute (SPU) in Bratislava implemented between January 2000 and June 2003 in the Council of Europe database on Roma-related good practices at http://goodpracticeroma.ppa.coe.int/en/node/45.
68 See this thematic report on CAHROM public website at: http://www.coe.int/en/web/portal/cahrom.
CAHROM (2015)6
   38

The Czech School Inspectorate should also be given the mandate to monitor the pre-school attendance of children (in particular Roma children) and collect data on how many of these children are, at the end of their compulsory pre-school year, directed to practical schools, directed to zero classes, or enrolled in mainstream primary schools (without going through zero classes).
As regards the Memorandum of Co-operation between the Minister for Human Rights, Equal Opportunities and Legislation and the Czech School Inspectorate
This memorandum of understanding signed on 23 October 2014 was presented during the round table. The group of experts welcomed the fact that Roma experts could, as a result of this memorandum of understanding, accompany school inspectors in their visits to schools attended by Roma children. However, it regretted that Roma experts are only invited to visit so-called practical schools and not mainstreamed/inclusive schools. In addition, the group of experts would consider advisable to introduce in the Czech Republic school inspectors of Roma ethnic origin (as it is the case e.g. in Romania). Roma experts participating in these visits should also receive training and establish close contacts with Roma school assistants and mediators, in particular those trained by the ROMED programme.
As regards the role and involvement of Roma parents
The group of experts believes that more trust in the school system should be built among Roma parents for the enrolment of their children in pre-school education. Awareness-raising campaign among Roma communities should be conducted by public authorities with the help of NGOs to convince Roma parents about the added value of pre-school education. At the same time, information should be provided to non- Roma parents to accept the inclusion of Roma children in mainstream pre-school education facilities. The Czech Republic could introduce the practice of Latvia regarding pre-school development programmes according to which each pre-school director meets every three months with Roma parents to exchange about the educational development of their children.
As regards Roma parents’ approach towards the education of their children
Roma parents are encouraged, for financial reasons due to their poor economic living conditions, to choose practical schools for their children. They also are encouraged to believe that in mainstreaming schools their children would be bullied by the other children. The group of experts believes that there is a need through awareness-raising activities, to explain to Roma parents the negative effects of the enrolment of their children into practical school and the consequences for the rest of their live: poor chances for social inclusion, weak chances to have a good job in the future etc.
As regards the financial approach to (pre-school) education
The group of experts considers that the financial approach of the Czech Republic to education should be changed. The focus of state funding for education should be on the child - in his/her best interest - not on the services and financial assistance should be directed to support the inclusion of roma children in mainstream education, and not at encouraging the maintenance and further enrolment of Roma children in segregated schools or in programmes for mild mental disabilities when there is not such a need. As long as money does not follow the child but is spent on the services, the State will encourage a vicious system and the children will be maintained in or encouraged to enter practical schools, instead of mainstream education.
EU funding should not be used to further promote school segregation of Roma children as it has been observed in some cases reported by NGOs.
The group of experts took note that mainstream schools are under the control of regional administration, whilst practical schools are subordinated to the municipality which results in different budget and different administration/management. It might be advisable to have both of them under the same jurisdiction.
As regards school institutions and non Roma parents’ attitude towards including Roma children in mainstream education
39
CAHROM (2015)6

The group of experts would suggest introducing awareness campaign activities for school institutions and the majority population to change their attitudes towards Roma children. Most of the schools directors and pedagogical centres use the majority attitudes and behaviours against Roma children as the best reason to put Roma children in practical schools or enrol them in zero classes. The Ministry of Education, Youth and Sports, together with the Ministry of Labour and Social Policy, the Minister for Human Rights and civil society representatives, could develop national awareness campaigns to promote Roma children’s rights and change the mentality and attitude towards Roma children and families.
As regards Roma school mediators and assistants
It was unclear for the group of experts how can a teacher benefit from an assistant for Roma children. It could not find out if there was a legal framework for this. The models developed by Latvia, Poland and “the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia” could be valuable sources of inspiration.
As regards the use of «socio-culturally disadvantaged» environments or backgrounds
The terminology «children from socio-culturally disadvantaged environments» (or backgrounds) is often being used by the Czech authorities to refer inter alia but primarily in practice to Roma children (e.g. in the Concept of In-Time Care for Children from Socio-Culturally Disadvantaged Environments prepared by the Ministry of Education, Youth and Sports). The group of experts expressed doubts about the use of this terminology which implies that certain culture combined with social background could be a disadvantage. No cultures can pretend to be considered as disadvantageous. The Hungarian expert highlighted that culture is not mixed up with social origin in Hungary. The Hungarian legislation has introduced a distinction between disadvantaged families/children and multi-disadvantaged families/children, both of them apply to Roma families/children but not exclusively.
According to the Child Protection Law (1997. XXXI. law), a disadvantaged child or child of full age is, who is entitled to regular child protection allowance and meets one of the following requirements:
a) The educational level of the parents or guardians is elementary at most;
b) Low employed parents or guardians;
c) Bad living conditions (for example living in segregations).
According to the Child Protection Law, the multi-disadvantaged child or child of full age is a child:
a) who is entitled to regular child protection allowance and meets at least two requirements from the
above mentioned paragraph a) to c);
b) who is in foster care;
c) who receives after-care allowance and has a student status.
As regards the lack of definition and indicators for inclusive education and other concepts
The terms “inclusive education”, “vulnerable children”, “practical schools” and “zero/preparatory classes” do not seem to be clearly defined in the Czech education system. The group of experts was surprised that the Czech School Inspectorate has no indicators for inclusive education. This lack of clarity results in lower quality standards with respect to the social and educational services provided to children. There are also no differences between the terms “special needs”, “mental disorders” and “social disorder” creating confusion regarding the diagnosis and the impact on children’s development. And this has long term effects. A child placed in a practical school can hardly integrate himself/herself in mainstreaming school in the future. The psychological evaluation is a vicious circle: the State pays the Pedagogical Education Centres to make the diagnosis and the psychologists working there are directly interested in maintaining the current system.
As it was already raised in the 2012 CAHROM thematic report on inclusive education of Roma children as opposed to special schools, the group of experts suggested a greater input and supervision from the part of the Czech Government and in particular the Ministry of Education, Youth and Sports because, at the moment, it is up to schools to decide about their inclusion policy. If not all the schools in the same municipality/district follow the same rules, the ones who do not impose any sorts of barriers will end up as totally “Roma or migrants schools”, whilst others will become totally “white schools”.
40
CAHROM (2015)6

As regards the lack of teacher’s evaluation and school and teachers’ performance
There is not national system for teachers’ evaluation. There are no indicators in the evaluation for inclusive performance of the teachers; the evaluation is based only on the school performance of the child. Criteria and the methodology are depending on the school’s director approaches. There is no proper legal framework to promote inclusive education and to support the teacher to use this approach for children. Inclusive education essentially depends of the school director’s decision to apply it. The teachers, both in mainstream and in practical schools, are not motivated for inclusive education. They have more than 25 children in a class but they do not benefit systematically from the help of an assistant for Roma children. Some teachers are forced to work extra time to integrate Roma children and they are not paid for these activities.
As regards the Law on Children’s Groups’ education
The group of experts took note that a new legislation adopted early November 2014 and supposed to enter into force in early 2015 provides new requirements and conditions for children’s groups’ education (e.g. related to necessary infrastructure, access to toilets, security measures, etc.). The Czech interlocutors of the People in Need pre-school club in Prague indicated that these new requirements would make it more complicated for NGOs to provide informal education and support for at-risk children. Whilst understanding the necessity to ensure full compliance with security and sanitary conditions, the group of experts believes that the new legislation should not be applied in a too restrictive way as it could jeopardize informal education provided by civil society organisations for children who could not otherwise access education at all. This being said, the group of experts believes that informal education should respect quality standards and be strict on compulsory and regular attendance of children which was not the case in the club that was visited in Prague.
As regards the recent amendments to the School Act (Education Act)69
During the thematic visit, the group of experts got familiar with proposed amendments to the School Act under discussion at the time of the visit. During the round table, the group of experts, the European Commission representative and various Czech interlocutors expressed their deep concern about initial Article 16a. § 5 concerning diagnostic method and its reference to children of “socio-culturally vulnerable backgrounds”. The experts of the thematic group were concerned that this type of terminology could lead to further enrolment of children in practical schools and would not be in conformity with the principles of the rights of the child. It believes that reference to socially-cultural groups should be generally avoided since there are no groups who are vulnerable on the ground of their culture. The national law on education is indeed not well connected with children’s rights. The group of experts would therefore encourage a better inclusion of children’s right throughout the legislative framework70.
Since the organisation of the thematic visit, the group of experts was informed that the Ministry of Education, Youth and Sports (MEYS) took seriously into consideration comments made by NGOs, institutions and international actors regarding the proposed wording of Article 16a § 5 of the School Act. In response to these comments the Ministry held roundtables on 12 November and 8 December 2014 where NGO representatives were invited and where arguments of all represented parties concerning the issue of diagnostic method were presented. Even though certain concerns were not fully dispelled, it was clearly stated that the purpose and aim of the draft provision is to ensure a proper diagnostic outcome of each individual client in accordance with current knowledge about diagnostic method in assessing mental disability.
Opponents to this Article, such as the Czech Society for Inclusive Education (COSIV) and other non- governmental organisations of 8 January 2015, pointed out two risks that they believe the proposed wording of the above provision might bring:
a) The proposed provision of Section 16a § 5 of the amendment to the Education Act was risky in relation
to the Roma children’s education.
69Act No. 561/2004 Coll., on pre-school, primary, secondary, higher vocational and other education (The Education Act).
70 See the Council of Europe legal standards, implementation tools and materials on children’s rights at the Children’s Rights Division website: http://www.coe.int/t/dg3/children/.
CAHROM (2015)6
  41

CAHROM (2015)6
b) There are not enough standardised instruments and no methods for assessing the adaptive skills of pupils.
On 22 January 2015 at another meeting between the MEYS and representatives of some NGOs, it was announced that specific method of diagnosing mental disability would be governed by means of a Decree and by means of a methodological guidance that will specify the interpretation of the above provision. The purpose of the above provision of the amendment to the School Act is, according to the Czech authorities, to set rules for the assessment of mental disability. The primary aims are to:
▪ Prevent the child from being placed into a specific educational programme solely on the basis of an assessment of his/her IQ regardless of an assessment of the stimulating nature of the family environment or rather a lack of it. A lack of such a stimulating nature does not cause mental disability but may distort the results of diagnostic tests in the counselling system. For this reason it is necessary to enshrine in legislation that a child has to be assessed in the whole range of his/her adaptive and cognitive skills in the context of his/her social and cultural development and not only on the basis of his/her IQ;
▪ Prevent unjustified placement especially of Roma children into practical primary schools;
▪ Set clear parameters for the assessment of mental disability: primarily, only such a mental disability
that has a direct link to the educational path of each child is relevant;
▪ Determine an approach to assessing mental disability so that the assessment may be subsequently
subject to review if need be. Possibility and modalities of the review will be enshrined in the pertinent provision of the Education Act aiming, inter alia, at preventing discrimination in the counselling system.
However, the Czech Ministry of Education, Youth and Sports in the reply it submitted to the Council of Europe on NGO comments was not convinced by arguments a) and b) abovementioned. It responded to the argument by saying that “individual variables that are typical for a pupil’s social disadvantage (or even his/her social exclusion) may have an impact on his/her performance in IQ tests. The more of these criteria can be found in a child, the more likely his/her performance in the test is to be lower”.71
In conclusion, the group of experts would like to encourage the Czech Government to take into consideration the above conclusions during the reform of its Pre-School Act and for the preparation of new Action Plans for Inclusive Education for 2016-2017 and 2018-2020 and for the future update of the Social Inclusion Strategy (2014-2015) by the Ministry of Labour and Social Affairs, in particular the chapter 3.4 on "Promoting equal access to education".
4.2.2 Concerning Hungary, Latvia, Poland and “the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia” (partner countries)
The practice of segregated schools and separate classes for Roma children should be stopped where they still exist (e.g. in Hungary and in “the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia”). The group of experts took note with satisfaction that Latvia almost completely abolished separate classes for Roma children (except in a few municipalities like Ventspils) and that this practice does not exist in Poland.
Building upon the project «Inclusion of Roma children in public pre-school institutions» between 2009 and 2012 and the similar project “Inclusion of Roma children in pre-school education” for the years 2014-2016 both jointly conducted by the Roma Education Fund (REF) and the Ministry of Labour and Social Policy, and the EU supported “A Good Start” (AGS) project, the authorities of “the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia” should envisage introducing compulsory education for all children and developing positive measures for Roma children so as to ensure sustainability of the slight progress observed through these projects in Roma children’s attendance of pre-school education.
71 For the full argumentation, consult the Czech Government response to NGO comments
71 For more information on the Revised Action Plan of the Czech Government and enhanced supervision of this case, consult the Execution of Judgements webpage: http://www.coe.int/t/dghl/monitoring/execution/Reports/pendingCases_en.asp?CaseTitleOrNumber=D.H.+and+Others&StateCode=CZ E&SectionCode
   42

CAHROM (2015)6
The role of Roma mediators and school assistants as key actors in promoting school attendance and increasing Roma children’s achievements at school - should be further promoted and institutionalised. In that respect, good progress was made in recent years in “the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia” through the implementation of the ROMED joint CoE/EU programme was welcome by the experts participating in the thematic group. Hungary is a less good example: ROMED training conclusions show that the middle level of decision makers and the executives (such as child care department leaders, representatives of Roma NGO or self-government, head teachers, etc.) are more active and touched by Roma mediators’ work than the main decision-makers. There is a need in Hungary for a long term political commitment, as well as for an organised logistical and professional help for the mediators, including through the introduction of an internal mentoring mechanism. The employment of qualified Roma teaching assistants to accompany Roma children throughout their studies should be extended and appropriately resourced. Funding for the employment of Roma school assistants and mediators, including at pre-school level, should be secured at state, regional or local level. The share of external funding of Roma school assistants and mediators, e.g. in “the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia” should progressively decrease to make the system sustainable in the long term.
Latvia and Poland are also good examples when it comes to using Roma school assistants. The Ministry of Education and Science of Latvia has developed comprehensive policy plans for the promotion of cohesion in education and is engaged in furthering the integration of Roma children through the employment of teaching assistants. The group of experts believes that employment of qualified teaching assistants to accompany Roma children throughout their studies should be extended and appropriately resourced. Poland has introduced Roma school assistants as a professional position in practice in 2001, and in law in 2005, as a kind of “cultural bridge” between schools and local Roma communities in order to improve the level of education, combating school drops out among Roma community and facilitate so called Roma education supportive teachers to recognize specific needs of Roma origin pupils. Training workshops for Roma school assistants and supporting teachers at the regional level were introduced to compensate the lack of professional experience.
In countries, such as in Hungary, where there is a lack of pre-school facilities (kindergarten) in areas inhabited by a large number of Roma families, efforts should be deployed by the state, regional and local (where relevant) to build new infrastructure for mainstream inclusive education. Restrictive enrolment policies by certain kindergarten should be condemned.
The group of experts expressed concerns about persisting practice of the enrolment of Roma children in special needs schools in the Czech Republic but also in all partner countries72, i.e. which are well above the European average of 2.5%73. The group of experts firmly believes that integration is not a two-step process and that the inclusion of disadvantaged Roma children in segregated schools with the hope that they will “catch up” with the requisite level of knowledge and skills before envisaging their insertion in the mainstream school system is a wrong approach.
There is an urgent need to address the issue of over-representation of Roma in special schools for children with disabilities and to rectify the shortcomings in the respective legal and regulatory framework pertaining to special education. It is crucial that the authorities’ undertakings in this context go beyond reforming the system of categorisation of children, and include more comprehensive measures aimed at providing access to adequate education in mainstream schools for all children without discrimination on any ground. Measures to secure participation of Roma children in mainstream pre-school education should be strengthened and the presence of teaching assistants in all schools where they are needed should be
72 In the Czech Republic, despite a constant, annual decrease in the total number of pupils (Roma and non-Roma) in special schools or classes from 17,755 in 2008 to 10,695 in 2014, the proportion of Roma pupils in special schools or classes increased from 28.2% (2013/2014 school year) to 32.4% (2014/2015 school year). Furthermore, the percentage of Roma children in mainstream classes decreased from 10.3% (2013/2014 school year) to 9.5% (2014/2015 school year). In Hungary, as an average, the enrolment of Roma children reaches over 20% (Pitfalls and bias - Entry Testing and the Overrepresentation of Romani Children in Special Education, Roma Education Fund study, April 2012). In Latvia, according to the European Commission against Racism and Intolerance (ECRI) the figure has increased from 10.6% in 2011 to 16.1% nowadays. In Poland, however, according to the Ministry of Education, the figure of Roma children enrolled in special needs schools has decreased to 7% compared to 17% in 2010. The Roma Early Childhood Education, OSF-REF-UNICEF 2011 report reveals that 32% of Roma children “in the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia” are enrolled in special schools; this average figure comprises special primary and secondary education for the 2008/2009 school year.
73 The European Academy of Childhood Disabilities considers a disabled children rate of at least 2.5% to be the ‘norm’ (with 1% having serious conditions).
 43

CAHROM (2015)6
ensured. Moreover, Roma parents should be included in and adequately informed of all steps undertaken by the authorities relating to the inclusion of their children in mainstream education.
Member States that have not yet joined the Dosta! campaign addressing stereotypes and prejudice towards Roma could envisage doing so. The Hungarian expert was interested to learn more about the Dosta! campaign.
4.3 Good practices identified
In the Czech Republic:
- Sufficient pre-school facilities, funding and human resources;
- Existing network of early-care services to prevent the educational failure of Roma children from “socio- culturally disadvantaged” backgrounds;
- Counter-petition of IQ Roma Servis in Brno calling non-Romani parents to take pictures of themselves with the message «We want our children to have Romani schoolmates»;74
- Fostering inclusive education of Roma children through the joint CoE/EU ROMED programme promotes Roma mediation as an effective tool to increase the number of Roma children in mainstream education and the recent adhesion of the Czech Republic to the joint CoE/EU ROMACT programme;75
- Training of Czech teachers on inclusive education provided by Babington Community College in Leicester, United Kingdom, in the framework of bilateral exchanges of experience between Czech and U.K. teachers;76
- The active participation of Czech teachers from Primary Schools Grafická in Prague, Trmice near Ústí nad Labem and Poběžovice in the Council of Europe supported (through a Finnish voluntary contribution) project “Every child matters: high quality education for all” which consists in bilateral exchange of teachers and the training of Czech teachers by UK teachers on inclusive education for Roma children77.
In Hungary:
- Desegregation legislation and policy measures;
- Involvement of an equal opportunities officer to ensure better impartiality for the testing of children and their enrolment in schools for children with mild disabilities;
- Extra-curricular activities for Roma children;
- The Integrative Pedagogical Programme;
- The School-net programme providing exchange of good practices in the field of education.
74 See article published in Romea.CZ news server on 19 February 2015.
75 See http://romed.coe-romact.org/.
76 The 2011 Research study by Lucie Fremlova and Heather Ureche ‘From segregation to inclusion: Roma pupils in the UK found that Roma primary and secondary pupils, some of whom had been sent to special schools in the Czech Republic, studying at UK schools performed just as well as their non-Roma peers or slightly below average. Many went on to study in higher education, including tertiary education. Mainstream/inclusive schooling had proven to be a key factor in the process of every pupil’s socialisation and social inclusion as Roma and non-Roma pupils grew up side by side. Babington Community College has built up experience in working with Roma pupils from eastern European countries for several years now. Many Roma pupils from the Czech Republic, Romania and Slovakia chose Babington as their preferred school even though there were several schools nearer to where they live because they appreciated the efforts Babington had made to engage with their community. At Babington Roma pupils attend 90% of the time even though most live 5 miles away and the most common reason for absence is the inability to pay the bus fare when money is short. Many Roma pupils achieve well. In 2012, 38.3% of year 11 Roma pupils left with 5A*-C with English and Maths and one Roma pupil passed maths GCSE at grade B at the end of year 9. Babington has also established a very good relationship with Roma parents who have come to trust the school. Babington successfully engages with the Roma parents who regularly attend a complementary school twice a week and are involved in their children’s education. Babington produced a handbook on delivering the secondary curriculum to pupils who do not speak English as a first language. Babington is a school with a proven track record of excellence in the field of inclusion. In 2011 Babington became the second secondary school in the UK to receive the Equalities award which is only given to schools who can demonstrate a commitment to all aspects of inclusion which goes beyond the average. Babington has a history of welcoming Czech and Slovak education professionals who have been coming there over the past two years to learn how to apply efficient inclusive education policies and strategies in practice. Based on their experience, Babington has been advising other schools in the UK, too, who have recently started to receive high numbers of Roma pupils.
77 More information on this bilateral exchange is available in the online database on Roma-related good practices: http://goodpracticeroma.ppa.coe.int/en/good-practice/every-child-matters-high-quality-education-all.
   44

In Latvia:
- Parenting support (e.g. regular meetings between pre-school directors and Roma parents);
- Inclusive education approach (e.g. closure of almost all separate classes for Roma children);
- Multicultural education (e.g. teacher training on multi-cultural environment; Romani culture and language
lessons);
- Positive measures (e.g. free meals for low income families or families with more than three children;
- Roma school assistants.
In Poland:
- Desegregation policy measures;
- Positive measures (e.g. free meals, free transportation, kindergarten fees covered by state and local
authorities);
- Scholarships system on all educational levels;
- System of additional governmental financial support of local authorities for national/ethnic minority pupils
(for additional lessons, excursions, textbooks, etc.);
- Roma school assistants.
In “the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia”:
- Parenting support;
- Inclusive education approach;
- Multicultural education (e.g. teacher training on multi-cultural environment);
- Development and institutionalisation of Roma school mediators, including at pre-school level;
- Monitoring of the work of NGOs and of Roma teacher assistants, as well as the monitoring of the school
children’s attendance and financial contribution of the Local Self-Governments Units under the REF- supported projects "Inclusion of Roma Children in Public Pre-school Institutions (2006/2007)” and “Inclusion of Roma children in pre-school education” (2014-2016);
- Awareness-raising among parents about the importance of pre-school education (under the same project).
4.4 Follow-up
4.4.1 Immediate follow-up at the level of the Council of Europe
The Czech CAHROM member and Rapporteur on Roma children was invited to participate at the 2nd meeting of the Committee of Experts on the Council of Europe Strategy for the Rights of the Child (DECS- ENF) in Strasbourg on 12-13 May 2015. He contributed to the reflection on future activities, projects and priority actions related to Roma children for the next Council of Europe Strategy for the Rights of the Child 2016-2019, especially as regards the priority to be given to Roma children’s inclusive early childhood education and the need to involve more Roma children and parents in participatory processes. He suggested that reference could be made in this Strategy to innovative programmes that Roma children could benefit from at the local and regional level, including exchange of experience between member States (e.g. teachers’ training on inclusive education). He also proposed that specific questions related to Roma children could be introduced in the questionnaire circulated to member States in view of drafting the next Council of Europe Strategy for the Rights of the Child 2016-2019.
Following his participation at the 2nd DECS-ENF meeting on behalf of CAHROM, the Czech CAHROM member and Rapporteur on Roma children commented the Roma children-related initiative of the Secretary General of the Council of Europe contained in the document SG/INF (2015)16rev “Updating the Council of Europe agenda on Roma inclusion 2015-2019” which was circulated to the CAHROM for its opinion. Whilst welcoming the inclusion of Roma children among the most vulnerable groups under priority no.2, the Czech CAHROM member and Rapporteur on Roma children proposed an amendment to the 2nd line of action so as to more precisely reflects priorities defined for the next Council of Europe Strategy for the Rights of the Child discussed at the 2nd DECS-ENF meeting.78
78 Czech Republic proposed to rephrase, under priority no.2, the second initiative Making children’s rights accessible to Romani families as follows: “A new initiative on children’s rights, empowering Roma parents and their children shall be developed, aimed at strengthening the awareness and the access to children’s rights, fighting the abuse of Roma children within and outside their own
CAHROM (2015)6
 45

The main conclusions of the present thematic report were presented by the Czech CAHROM member and Committee Rapporteur on Roma children at the 9th CAHROM meeting (Strasbourg, 27-29 May 2015). The report was also commented by CAHROM members from partner countries (Hungary, Latvia, Poland and “the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia”), and by Committee Rapporteurs on gender equality (Finland), on Roma youth (Croatia), and on anti-Gypsyism and hate crime (United Kingdom).
At the a)
b)
c)
d)
e) f)
g) h)
9th CAHROM plenary meeting, CAHROM participants discussed:
The added value of introducing compulsory pre-school education to better prepare Roma children for their education and social inter-action, including supportive measures such as fee exemptions, free meals and transport;
The need of non- biased and culturally neutral diagnosis methods during the recruitment process of children;
The need to further raise awareness among Roma parents, teachers’ unions and society at large on the negative consequences of school segregation, using the Dosta! campaign where relevant; The risk of duplication in maintaining zero/preparatory classes when compulsory pre-school education is introduced;
The need to reinforce the role of Roma mediators or school assistants in pre-schools;
The need to collect disaggregated data by ethnicity and gender at project/local level to better assess the impact of policy measures;
The crucial role of local authorities to ensure the inclusion of all children in compulsory education; The relevance of using official curricula in pre-school clubs managed by NGOs.
The Polish CAHROM expert who participated in the thematic visit underlined the misleading terminology of “practical” schools, including for Romani parents who might not be aware that these schools are often segregated schools or schools for children with mild mental disabilities. She highlighted the fact that the thematic group did not only focus on pre-school education for Roma children but also addressed the whole system of education, and in particular the possible relation between the limited enrolment of Roma children’s in mainstream pre-school education and their excessive enrolment in special education. She pointed out the importance of raising awareness among Roma parents on the consequences of special education and among the NGO sector on the problems connected with the access of Roma children to pre- school education. For example, even when community places like “pre-school clubs” have been set up, they seem not to base their work on official curriculum which has as a consequence insufficient results in making equal opportunities in the education system. Important steps forward would also be to strengthen the role of Roma assistants/mediators both within their communities and at school to ensure the most possible efficient bridge between Roma families and educational institutions and to develop clearer procedures to help children moving from practical schools to regular schools at any moment of the educational process. Finally, she highlighted the need for more regular exchanges of information between institutions responsible for Roma issues from the perspective of education, social affairs, access to the labour market, etc.
The Finnish CAHROM member and rapporteur on gender equality urged member States to develop disaggregated data by gender which were largely missing in the report. The CAHROM member on behalf of the Netherlands highlighted the need to clarify the meaning of “pre-school” since the enrolment of Roma children in compulsory education differs from one country to the next. The CAHROM member from the Republic of Moldova warned that, among some Roma families, it was considered shameful for Roma mothers to send their children at an early age to kindergarten, whilst they are, according to the Romani tradition, supposed to take care of their young children at home. He therefore recommended introducing pre-school education within primary education facilities.
Representatives from the Roma Education Fund (REF), the European Roma and Travellers Forum (ERTF) and Amnesty International called for a stronger political will to end school segregation and the persisting practice of enrolling Roma children in schools for pupils with special needs observed in many member
community, with a particular focus on child marriage and school segregation, and building capacity of professionals to develop child-friendly and discrimination-free public services in particular in the field of education, social, health and justice, making use of mediators.”
CAHROM (2015)6
  46

CAHROM (2015)6
States, whilst the OSCE-ODIHR representative underlined the need to involve Roma and non-Roma parents in the process.
4.4.2 Mid-term follow-up and future exchanges of experience
As a response to the latest Committee of Ministers’ Decision from its 122nd CM-DH meeting (11-12 March 2015) on supervising the implementation of the European Court’s judgment D.H. and Others v. The Czech Republic79, the Council of Europe Department for the Execution of ECTHR judgements proposed to set up a CAHROM thematic group on testing systems and diagnoses for pupils with allegedly mild mental disabilities, with a focus on Roma children. Noting the problems identified by the Committee of Ministers with the functioning of the testing system and the follow-up for Roma pupils recommended for transfer to mainstream education in the Czech Republic, it was proposed at the 9th CAHROM plenary meeting to envisage an exchange of experience between countries that have or had in place such a highly technical system of testing/diagnosing of pupils aimed at establishing whether children have “mild mental disabilities” so as to make an assessment of the functioning, efficiency and added value of those tests. The CAHROM expert from the Czech Republic indicated that he would be interested to visit Hungary to get more familiar with desegregation legislation and policy measures for preventing excessive enrolment of Roma children in schools for children with mild disabilities, and with the role of the equal opportunities officer in ensuring better impartiality for the testing of children.
The Council of Europe is considering further assisting financially (through a 2015 Finnish voluntary contribution) the project “Every child matters: high quality education for all” which consists in bilateral exchange of teachers and the training of Czech teachers by UK teachers on inclusive education for Roma children with the active participation of Czech teachers from Primary Schools Grafická in Prague, Trmice near Ústí nad Labem and Poběžovice. The project may be extended to Ostrava at their request.
*******
 79 In addition to D.H. v Czech Republic, the Committee of Ministers is currently supervising the cases of Horvárth and Kiss v Hungary and Sampanis v Greece which raise similar questions. For more information on the Committee of Ministers’ recent examination of the cases see the website of the Department of the Execution of judgments “pending cases”: http://www.coe.int/t/dghl/monitoring/execution/Reports/pendingCases_en.asp?CaseTitleOrNumber=d.h.&StateCode=&SectionCode ; http://www.coe.int/t/dghl/monitoring/execution/Reports/pendingCases_en.asp?CaseTitleOrNumber=HORVATH+and+KISS&StateCod e=&SectionCode; http://www.coe.int/t/dghl/monitoring/execution/Reports/pendingCases_en.asp?CaseTitleOrNumber=sampani&StateCode=GRC&Secti onCode.
    47

APPENDIX 1: Official invitation letter received from the Czech authorities
Invitation from
Czech Gvt to CAHROM thematic group on preschool.pdf
                                           ***************
APPENDIX 2: List of experts of the thematic group and Czech participants
CZECH REPUBLIC (requesting country)
• Office of the Government Council for Roma Minority Affairs and Secretariat of the Government Council for National Minorities, Office of the Government of the Czech Republic
- Mr Martin Martinek, Head of Unit (CAHROM member) - Ms Eliška Perevorska
- MS Margita Wagner
• Ministry of Education, Youth and Sports
- Mr Jaroslav Fidrmuc, Deputy Minister for Education
- Ms Pavla Ružková
- Ms Jaroslava Vatalová - Ms Anna Pechová
• Ministry of Labour and Social Affairs - Ms Radka Soukupová
- Ms Jitka Modlitbová
• Agency for Social Inclusion/ Czech Society for Roma Inclusion - Ms Lucie Macků
• Czech School Inspectorate
- Mr Ondrej Andrýs
• Lyokovo Namesti Elementary School (Prague 8) - Mr Jan Korda, School director
• People in Need (pre-school club)
• League of Human Rights
- Ms Olga Kusá
• Romodrom o.p.s.
- Ms Daniela Heczková
HUNGARY (partner country)
• Mr Iván Sörös, Head of Department of Strategic Planning and Administration, State Secretariat for Social Inclusion, Ministry of Human Resources
CAHROM (2015)6
   48

CAHROM (2015)6
LATVIA (partner country)
• Ms Sarmīte Joma, Main specialist of Pre-school Education Department, Jelgava Municipality
POLAND (partner country)
• Ms Agnieszka Gajewska, Ministry of the Interior and Administration, Department for Denominations and National and Ethnic Minorities, National and Ethnic Minorities Division
"THE FORMER YUGOSLAV REPUBLIC OF MACEDONIA" (partner country) •
Ms Mabera Kamberi, Head of the Sector for Coordination and Technical Assistance, Ministry of Labour and Social Policy (CAHROM Vice-Chair)
EUROPEAN COMMISSION
• Ms Jana Balažová, Policy Officer, Roma Co-Ordination Unit, DG Justice
COUNCIL OF EUROPE
• Mr Michaël Guet, Head of the I-CARE Unit (Inter-governmental Cooperation, Anti-Gypsyism and Roma Equality), Secretary of the Ad Hoc Committee of Experts on Roma issues (CAHROM), Support Team of the Special Representative of the Secretary General for Roma issues
• Ms Daniela Gheorghe, Programme Adviser, Seconded by the Romanian Government, Children's Rights Division, Directorate of Human Dignity and Dignity.
                                           ***************
APPENDIX 3: Agenda of the CAHROM thematic visit
AGENDA
CAHROM thematic visit on pre-school/early education of Roma children 19 – 21 November 2014, Prague, Czech Republic
19 November 2014
 Welcome at the hotel, transfer for the first field visit
Visit at the Elementary school and kindergarten at Lyčkovo square, Prague
8:30
9:00 – 11:00
11:30 – 13:00
Afternoon session at the Government Office building, Vladislavova 4, Prague 1
13:00 – 15:00
15:00 – 15:30 15:30 – 17:00
Presentations on pre-school/early education of Roma children in the Czech Republic and the CAHROM partner countries
Coffee break
Discussion with representatives of Ministry of Education, Youth and Sports and Ministry of Labour and Social Affairs
Lunch (organised)
49

20 November 2014 8:30 – 9:15
Meeting with the Deputy Minister (Ministry of Education, Youth and Sports – Karmelitská 15, Prague 1)
Visit at the pre-school club of the NGO People in Need Break
10:30 – 12:30
12:30 – 14:00
Afternoon session at the Government Office building, Vladislavová 4, Prague 1
14:00 – 14:30 14:30 – 15:00 15:00 – 15:30 15:30 – 17:00
21 November 2014 09:30 – 11:30
Cooperation between the Minister for Human Rights, Equal Opportunities and Legislation and the Czech School Inspectorate
Round table with civil society representatives
Coffee break
Round table with civil society representatives (continued)
Debriefing meeting between experts from the requesting and partner countries and the Council of Europe Secretariat
                     ***************
50
CAHROM (2015)6

 Conclusions of the report endorsed by the CAHROM at its 10th meeting; Final thematic report endorsed by the CAHROM at its 11th meeting.
AD HOC COMMITTEE OF EXPERTS ON ROMA1 ISSUES (CAHROM)
__________
THEMATIC REPORT
by the experts of the CAHROM thematic group on
CAHROM (2015)8
CHILD/EARLY AND FORCED MARRIAGES WITHIN ROMA COMMUNITIES IN THE CONTEXT OF THE PROMOTION OF GENDER EQUALITY
following the CAHROM thematic visit to Bucharest, Romania, on 27-29 April 2015 __________
Experts from ROMANIA, requesting country:
Ms Gabriela Jeni Panait, Secretary’s Councillor on Roma issues, Directorate Family Policies and Social
Assistance, Ministry of Labour, Family, Social Protection and Elderly Mr Eugen Crai, independent expert
Experts from ITALY, REPUBLIC OF MOLDOVA, NETHERLANDS, POLAND and UNITED KINGDOM, partner countries
Italy
Republic of Moldova
Netherlands Poland
United Kingdom
Ms Maja Bova, National Office against Racial Discrimination (UNAR)
Mr Ion Duminică, Head of Ethnic Minorities Unit, Academy of Science of
Moldova and Executive Director of the “Porojan” Association Ms Anuschka Veneman, National Police, Oost-Nederland Unit
Ms Wiesława Kostrzewa-Zorbas, Counsellor to the Head of the Prime Minister’ Chancellery, Office of the Government Plenipotentiary for Equal Treatment
Ms Sophie Lott, Specialist Case Worker/Designated Safeguarding Officer in the Forced Marriage Unit under the Foreign and Commonwealth Office
 1 The term “Roma” used at the Council of Europe refers to Roma, Sinti, Kale and related groups in Europe, including Travellers and the Eastern groups (Dom and Lom), and covers the wide diversity of the groups concerned, including persons who identify themselves as “Gypsies”.

2.1
Definitions and approaches 2.1.1 At international level
Gender equality
Violence against women and domestic violence Child
Child (early) marriage
Forced marriage
2.1.2 At domestic level
Age of sexual consent Matrimonial age Family
Forced marriage
2.1.3 From the perspective of (traditional) Roma communities
A “union” as opposed to a “marriage”
The importance of purity and virginity as opposed to age
Early marriage: a form of protection as opposed to an archaic arrangement between families
Dowry: a sign of respect of the bride’s purity as opposed to a commercial transaction
The role of the family/community as opposed to the individual
The myth of Roma women’s inferior position in the family
Some historical grounds for child/early marriage
The need to avoid stigmatization, stereotypes and generalization when
addressing the phenomenon of early/child marriage within Roma communities
2.2.1 Child/early marriage is a still a relatively wide-spread phenomenon in the world
2.2.2 Child/early marriage does not appear only within Roma communities
2.2.3 Child/early marriage is not a “Romani tradition” and is not related to Romani
culture as such
2.2.4 The phenomenon of child/early marriage is not limited to Romania and
to partner countries of this thematic group
2.2
TABLE OF CONTENTS
I. INTRODUCTION TO THE THEMATIC REPORT
1.1 Background information about the setting-up of the thematic group
1.2 Composition of the thematic group of experts
1.3 Agenda of the thematic visit
II. INTRODUCTION TO THE TOPICS OF CHILD AND FORCED MARRIAGE IN THE CONTEXT OF THE PROMOTION OF GENDER EQUALITY
page 4
page 4 page 5 page 5
page 6
page 6 page 6 page 6 page 6 page 7 page 7 page 8 page 8 page 8 page 10 page 11 page 11 page 12 page 12 page 12
page 13
page 13 page 13 page 14 page 14
page 14 page 14 page 15
page 16 page 17
page 19
page 19 page 22 page 24 page 25 page 26 page 27
page 29
page 29 page 31 page 33 page 33 page 33 page 36
III. SIZE AND COMPOSITION OF ROMA (AND TRAVELLER) GROUPS, WITH A FOCUS ON THE SITUATION REGARDING CHILD/EARLY MARRIAGES
3.1 Romania
3.2 Italy
3.3 Republic of Moldova 3.4 Netherlands
3.5 Poland
3.6 United Kingdom
IV. REVIEW OF RELEVANT LEGALISLATION AND POLICY FRAMEWORKS ADDRESSING (OR NOT) CHILD/EARLY AND/OR FORCED MARRIAGES
4.1 Romania
4.2 Italy
4.3 Republic of Moldova 4.4 Netherlands
4.5 Poland
4.6 United Kingdom
2
CAHROM (2015)8

CAHROM (2015)8
V. REVIEW OF POSITIONS OF RELEVANT ROMANIAN INTERLOCUTORS AND
MEASURES UNDERTAKEN as REGARDS CHILD/FORCED MARRIAGES
5.1 The position and the response of the National Authority for Child Rights Protection and Adoptions
5.2 The position and the response of the National Agency for Roma (NAR)
5.3 The position and the response of the Ministry of Education
5.4 The position and the response of the Ministry of Public Health
5.5 The position and the response of the Ministries of Internal Affairs and Justice
5.6 County Offices for Roma
VI. PENAL AND JUDICIAL RESPONSE TO CHILD AND FORCED MARRIAGES
6.1 General remarks
6.2 National responses and measures
6.2.1 Romania
6.2.2 Italy
6.2.3 Republic of Moldova 6.2.4 Netherlands
6.2.5 Poland
6.2.6 United Kingdom
VII. CONCRETE MEASURES AND TOOLS TO PREVENT CHILD/EARLY AND FORCED MARRIAGES, ASSIST AND PROTECT THEVICTIMS
7.1 Romania
7.2 Italy
7.3 Republic of Moldova
7.4 Netherlands
7.5 Poland
7.6 United Kingdom
VIII. CONCLUSIONS, LESSONS LEARNT, GOOD PRACTICES AND FOLLOW-UP
8.1. Conclusions as regards the organisation of the thematic visit
8.2 General conclusions on how to address the topics of child and forced marriages
8.3 General conclusions and lessons learnt concerning the approach
8.4 Conclusions and characteristics of an effective model of prevention
8.5 Negative consequences of child/early and forced marriages
8.6 Key conclusions of bilateral meetings of experts and Romanian authorities
8.7 Country specific conclusions and lessons learnt
8.7.1 Romania, hosting country
8.7.2 Partner countries
8.8 Good practices identified per country
8.9 Follow-up
page 38
page 38 page 38 page 39 page 40 page 40 page 40
page 42
page 42 page 42 page 42 page 42 page 42 page 42 page 43 page 43
page 44 page 44 page 44 page 45 page 45 page 45 page 45
page 48
page 48 page 48 page 49 page 51 page 52 page 53 page 54 page 54 page 55 page 55 page 56
page 59
page 59 page 59
page 59 page 60 page 62
APPENDICES
Appendix 1: Appendix 2: Appendix 3:
Appendix 4: ADDENDUM
Formal invitation addressed to the CAHROM experts Agenda of the thematic visit
Overview of the new Romanian Penal Code with potential application in cases of child/early marriage
Overview of selected crimes regulated in the Romanian Penal Code Forced and child/early marriages in Polish Criminal Law
Country experts’ presentations by country experts and Romanian authorities and background material
3

CAHROM (2015)8
I. INTRODUCTION TO THE THEMATIC REPORT
1.1 Background information about the setting-up of the thematic group
Addressing the topic of early marriage within Roma communities has long been a taboo. As an example, Recommendation Rec(2006)10 of the Committee of Ministers to member States on better access to health care for Roma and Travellers in Europe2 which had been prepared with a strong involvement of Roma and Traveller women did not address it, although the Recommendation has a specific chapter on sexual and reproductive health which states: “Governments of member states should pay particular attention to the health situation of Roma and Traveller women, by ensuring comprehensive sexual and reproductive health (SRH) services and information, particularly family planning. Such services should also be made accessible for Roma and Travellers adolescent and adult men”.
One of the first attempts to address early marriage within Roma communities in an international context was when this topic was chosen by Roma women as one the main issues to be on the agenda of the 2nd International Romani Women’s Conference held in Athens, Greece, in February 2010. One of the posters of this conference illustrated the topic with the title “Ban on early marriages, let the girls grow”.
The Ad hoc Committee of Experts on Roma Issues (CAHROM) meeting at its 5th meeting on 14-16 May 2013 agreed to address the issue of early and/or forced marriage, as well as its relation to human trafficking. This was followed-up by a questionnaire addressed to CAHROM members3 and exchanges of views with the Secretariat of the Group of Experts on Action against Trafficking in Human Beings (GRETA). In the context of the CAHROM discussion on trafficking within Roma communities and its links to child marriage, the European Roma and Travellers Forum (ERTF) and the Informal Platform of Romani Women “Phenjalipe” (Sisterhood) presented a joint paper “Making early marriage in Roma communities a global concern” at the 7th CAHROM meeting in Strasbourg on 14-16 May 20144.
The initial proposal for setting-up a CAHROM thematic group on addressing and combating early and/or forced marriages within Roma communities was put forward by Romania (as a requesting country) during this 7th CAHROM meeting in May 2014 (see Appendix 1 for the official invitation). Italy, the Republic of Moldova, the Netherlands and Poland expressed immediate interest to be partner countries. The United Kingdom confirmed its interest to be a partner country at the 8th CAHROM meeting in Sarajevo (28-31 October 2015) when this thematic group was reconfirmed and scheduled for spring 2015.
At the request of Romania during the Sarajevo CAHROM meeting, the title of the thematic group/visit was broaden to gender equality education within Roma communities with a focus on early and/or forced marriages so as to address the topics from a wider perspective and to link it to gender equality in general.
On 1-2 April 2015 a preparatory meeting for the CAHROM thematic visit took place in Bucharest, Romania. This meeting was attended by Roma representatives, academics and activists, as well as by the two Romanian experts of the thematic group and Ms Isabela Mihalache from the Support Team of the Special Representative of the Secretary General for Roma issues. The meeting helped clarifying the purpose of the CAHROM thematic visit and identifying the main challenges around it in Romania. A list of recommendations was adopted by participants and presented by Ms Panait during the round table of the thematic visit on 28 April 2015. A report on the early and forced marriages within Romanian Roma communities was written by Mr Eugen Crai and served as background for the thematic visit.
2 See paragraph 3.c of CM/Rec(2006)10 at:
https://wcd.coe.int/ViewDoc.jsp?id=1019695&Site=CM&BackColorInternet=C3C3C3&BackColorIntranet=EDB021&BackColo rLogged=F5D383
3 See CAHROM (2015)12 for the latest updated compilation of replies received from Croatia, Cyprus, Italy, the Netherlands, Norway, Poland, Spain, “the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia” and the United Kingdom.
4 See the September 2014 updated version of this paper at: http://www.ertf.org/index.php/documents/reports-position-papers. 4
    
1.2 Composition of the thematic group of experts
The Romanian experts of the thematic group included Ms Gabriela Jeni Panait, Councillor on Roma issues to Mr Codrin Scutaru, then State Secretary in the Family Policies and Social Assistance Directorate of the Ministry of Labour, Family, Social Protection and Elderly, who had initially put forward the proposal of such a thematic group in CAHROM, as well as Mr Eugen Crai, who has been working as an independent expert inter alia for UNICEF-Romania. Both of them took part in the April preparatory meeting.
The background of the five partner countries’ experts was wide enough to address the issue of early and/or forced marriages from various angles: Ms Maja Bova from the Italian National Office against Racial Discrimination (UNAR) approached the issue from the non-discrimination and gender equality perspectives; Ms Wiesława Kostrzewa-Zorbas working as Counsellor to the Head of the Chancellery of the Prime Minister in the Office of the Government Plenipotentiary for Equal Treatment did so from the angle of equal opportunities and equal treatment; Mr Ion Duminică, Head of Ethnic Minorities Unit of the Academy of Science of the Republic of Moldova and Executive Director of the “Porojan” Association addressed the issue of intra-community relations and the Roma women and girls’ perspective, whilst Ms Anuschka Veneman, Police officer at the Oost-Nederland Unit of the Dutch National Police brought the aspects of the role of law enforcement bodies in ensuring the protection of Roma teenagers, girls in particular, into the debate. Finally, Ms Sophie Lott, Specialist Case Worker/Designated Safeguarding Officer in the Forced Marriage Unit under the Foreign and Commonwealth Office of the United Kingdom brought the concrete experience of a specialised governmental body dedicated to forced marriages.
The diverse composition of the thematic group of experts proved to be quite relevant for addressing the topic from various perspectives during the discussions, although the diverse background of the experts did not facilitate an easy and equal country-based comparative analysis of the situation, policies and measures.
1.3 Agenda of the thematic visit
The agenda (see Appendix 2 of this report) prepared by the Family Policies and Social Assistance Directorate of the Ministry of Labour, Family, Social Protection and Elderly included during the first day a series of bilateral meetings with high level officials from key sectors, i.e. Mr Codrin Scutaru, then State Secretary in the Ministry of Labour, Family, Social Protection and Elderly who opened the visit; Ms Ioana Cazacu, State Secretary in the Department for Equal Opportunities between Women and Men; Mr Alin Tucmeanu, State Secretary in the Ministry of Health; Mr András György Király, State Secretary in the Ministry of Education; and Mr Daniel Vasile, President of the National Agency for Roma.
The second day was devoted to a round table discussion hosted by the Ministry of Foreign Affairs in which took part inter alia Ms Dana Varga, State Adviser in the Prime Minister’s Office, Mr Nicolae Păun, Deputy for the Roma minority in the Romanian Parliament, Mr Mădălin Voicu, Deputy in the Romanian Parliament, as well as Romanian experts from the Department for Equal Opportunities between Women and Men, from the National Authority for Protection Children’s Rights and Adoption, from the Ministry of Health and the Ministry of Education. Representatives of municipal authorities, Roma mediators, Roma academics or activists and some embassies were also present at the round table, many of whom actively took part in the afternoon debate. Discussions were sometimes very emotional highlighting the sensitivity of the topic. Interesting debates took place during the round table between “defenders” of early marriages and those who were in favour of abandoning this practice among members of the Roma community.
The choice was made by the Romanian authorities not to organise any field visit to Roma communities having in mind the sensitivity of the topic. However, a valuable effort was made by the organisers to bring at the roundtable representatives of Roma associations - both conservative and modernist - as well as Roma women anthropologists and activists (including Delia Grigore and Nora Costache), community leaders and representatives of traditional Roma communities who shared their own experience.
5
CAHROM (2015)8

II. INTRODUCTION TO THE TOPICS OF CHILD/EARLY AND FORCED MARRIAGES IN THE CONTEXT OF THE PROMOTION OF GENDER EQUALITY
Although the topic in itself stirs controversies, a rational and balanced approach for the identification of realistic solutions for the prevention of early and/or forced marriages at community, regional, national and international levels, is the only approach that can aspire to be effective and efficient.
2.1 Definitions and approaches
With a view to approaching the topic of this report, the group of experts felt necessary to provide clarification as regards definitions of terms and concepts from the perspective of international standards and from the perspective of each respective national context. It also reflects the views of (traditional) Roma communities as regards certain concepts.
2.1.1 At the international level  Gender equality
In its Recommendation CM/Rec(2007)17 on gender equality standards and mechanisms5, the Council of Europe’s Committee of Ministers recalls that gender equality is a principle of human rights and women’s human rights are an inalienable, integral and indivisible part of universal human rights. Gender equality is also a requirement for the achievement of social justice and a sine qua non of democracy6.
 Violence against women and domestic violence
The Council of Europe has undertaken a series of initiatives to promote the protection of women against violence since the 1990s. In particular, these initiatives have resulted in the adoption, in 2002, of the Council of Europe Recommendation Rec(2002)5 of the Committee of Ministers to member states on the protection of women against violence. The Parliamentary Assembly has also taken a firm political stance against all forms of violence against women. It has adopted a number of resolutions and recommendations calling for legally-binding standards on preventing, protecting against and prosecuting the most severe and widespread forms of gender-based violence. A Europe-wide campaign ran, from 2006-2008, to combat violence against women, including domestic violence. The campaign showed how much national responses to violence against women and domestic violence varied across Europe. The need for harmonised legal standards to ensure that victims benefit from the same level of protection everywhere in Europe was becoming apparent. The Council of Europe therefore decided it was necessary to set comprehensive standards to prevent and combat violence against women and domestic violence. In December 2008, the Committee of Ministers set up an expert group mandated to prepare a draft convention in this field. The Convention on preventing and combating violence against women and domestic violence (known as the Istanbul Convention) was adopted by the Council of Europe Committee of Ministers on 7 April 2011 and entered into force on 1 August 2014. Italy was among the first State Parties to this Convention. The Convention entered into force in Poland exactly one year later. The United Kingdom, the Netherlands and Romania have signed the Convention (on 8 June 2012, 14 November 2012 and 27 June 2014 respectively) but have not yet ratified this instrument. The Republic of Moldova has not even signed the Convention.
5 See CM/Rec(2007)17 at https://wcd.coe.int/ViewDoc.jsp?id=1215219&Site=CM. See also the Convention for the Protection of Human Rights and Fundamental Freedoms (ECHR) and its protocols, in particular Protocol No. 12 to the ECHR guarantees the enjoyment of any right set forth by law without discrimination on any ground such as sex. It is also worth recalling the rights set forth in the revised European Social Charter which must be secured without discrimination on any ground such as sex, and other instruments, such as the Council of Europe Convention on Action against Trafficking in Human Beings.
6 In its Declaration on equality of women and men adopted on 16 November 1988, the Committee of Ministers of the Council of Europe had already affirmed that equality of women and men was a principle of human rights, and a sine qua non of democracy and an imperative of social justice.
CAHROM (2015)8
  6

CAHROM (2015)8 The Istanbul Convention provides several definitions for the purpose of this particular Convention:
a. violence against women is understood as a violation of human rights and a form of discrimination against women and shall mean all acts of gender-based violence that result in, or are likely to result in, physical, sexual, psychological or economic harm or suffering to women, including threats of such acts, coercion or arbitrary deprivation of liberty, whether occurring in public or in private life;
b. domestic violence shall mean all acts of physical, sexual, psychological or economic violence that occur within the family or domestic unit or between former or current spouses or partners, whether or not the perpetrator shares or has shared the same residence with the victim;
c. gender shall mean the socially constructed roles, behaviours, activities and attributes that a given society considers appropriate for women and men;
d. gender-based violence against women shall mean violence that is directed against a woman because she is a woman or that affects women disproportionately.
 Child
The 1989 United Nations Convention on the Rights of the Child defines a child as “every human being
below the age of 18 years unless under the law applicable to the child, majority is attained earlier”.7  Child marriage (early marriage)
Resolution 1468(2005) of the Parliamentary Assembly of the Council of Europe on Forced marriages and child marriages defines child marriage as “the union of two persons at least one of whom is under 18 years of age”8. In this Resolution, the Parliamentary Assembly of the Council of Europe shows its deep concern about the violations of human rights and the rights of the child which are constituted by forced marriages and child marriages and draws attention on the fact that, under the cloak of respect for culture and traditions, there are authorities which tolerate forced marriages and child marriages, although they violate the fundamental rights of those involved.
In most of the reports, notably those from the United Nations Population Fund (UNFPA), which are covering child marriage in several South East European countries9, it is defined as the “union of two persons, officially or unofficially, at least one of whom is under eighteen years of age”.
“Early marriage” is commonly used in place of “child marriage”, for example in UNICEF documents10.
 In the opinion of the experts of the thematic group, the appropriate term to designate this practice is “child marriage” instead of “early marriage”; the first expression reflects accurately the gravity of the facts, i.e. a child is the victim of this practice.
 The group of experts has therefore decided to use “child/early marriage” in this report and to rename the full thematic report as follows: “Thematic report on promoting gender equality within Roma communities with a focus on child/early and forced marriages/unions”.
7 See the definition of a child according to the UN Convention of the Rights of the Child, Article 1 at
http://www.ohchr.org/en/professionalinterest/pages/crc.aspx. See also General Comment 4 of the Committee on the Rights of the Child: Adolescent Health and Development in the Context of the Convention on the Rights of the Child, 20, U.N. Doc. CRC/GC/2003/4 (2003); and General Recommendation 21 of the Committee on the Elimination of Discrimination against Women: Equality in Marriage and Family Relations, 36, U.N. Doc. HRI/ GEN/1/Rev.5 (2001).
8 Council of Europe Parliamentary Assembly Resolution (2005)1468 on Forced marriages and child marriages, available at
http://www.refworld.org/docid/43f5d5184.html.
9 See for instance UNFPA report “Child marriage in Kosovo - Overview” from November 2012 at http://eeca.unfpa.org/sites/default/files/pub-pdf/unfpa%20kosovo%20overview.pdf.
10 The state of the World’s children 2006, page on early marriage: http://www.unicef.org/sowc06/profiles/marriage.php.
       7

Although the minimum legal age for marriage varies across Europe (usually between 16 and 18), the UN Committee on the Elimination of Discrimination against Women (CEDAW) and the UN Committee on the Rights of the Child (CRC) recommend that governments set the minimum legal age for marriage to 1811. According to this standard, the results that follow consider all marriages between people below the age of 18 as early marriages.
 Forced marriage
Resolution 1468(2005) of the Parliamentary Assembly of the Council of Europe on Forced marriages and child marriages defines forced marriage as “the union of two persons at least one of whom has not given their full and free consent to the marriage. Since it infringes the fundamental human rights of the individual, forced marriage can in no way be justified”.12
Forced marriage can therefore be defined by the lack of consent – either as decided by an adult woman or by virtue of her being under the age of the legal consent (usually 18 but may vary pending national legislation) in the decision to enter a marriage with a particular spouse. Several parameters can however vary from a country to another such as the age of legal consent, the age of sexual consent, the matrimonial age, family, etc.
 The group of experts considers that the key parameter to define forced marriage is the lack of free consent of the person. Not every child marriage is a forced marriage, unless a third party (usually an adult) is involved. When two young people get “married” or decide to be in an official or unofficial union, it does not have to be considered as a forced marriage or union.
2.1.2 At the domestic level
A comparative summary analysis of the legal interpretation of these terms in each of the participating country of the thematic group was deemed necessary for the purpose of this thematic report:
 Age of sexual consent
The age of sexual consent vary across Europe. The ages of consent are currently set between 14 and 18. The vast majority of European countries set their ages in the range of 14 to 16; only five countries do not fit into this pattern: Ireland (17), Cyprus (17), Malta (18), Turkey (18) and the Holy See (18).
In Italy, the age of sexual consent is 14. A close-in-age exception allows those aged 13 to engage in sexual activity with partners who are less than 3 years older. The age of consent rises to 16 if one of the participants has some kind of influence on the other (e.g. teacher, tutor, adoptive parent, etc.). Not knowing that the victim is underage is not a legal defense, except when it was unavoidable ignorance. If the minor involved is under the age of 10, the crime can be punished even without a complaint and the punishment is aggravated.13
The age of sexual consent in Poland is 15, as specified by the Polish Criminal Code, Article 200 § 1, which reads: “Whoever subjects a minor under 15 years of age to sexual intercourse or makes him/her submit to another sexual act or to perform such an act shall be subject to the penalty of the deprivation of liberty for a term of between 2 and 12 years.”
11 “Protecting the girl child: Using the law to end child, early and forced marriage and related human rights violations”, Equality Now, January 2014, http://www.equalitynow.org/sites/default/files/Protecting_the_Girl_Child.pdf .
12See PACE Resolution 1468(2005) at http://www.refworld.org/docid/43f5d5184.html.
13 http://www.diritto.it/codici/titolo/75-codice-penale-dei-delitti-contro-la-persona.
CAHROM (2015)8
          8

CAHROM (2015)8
The new Criminal Code of Romania, which came into force on 1 February 2014, sets a general age of sexual consent of 15. However, sexual acts that do not include penetration may be performed from age 13. There is also a close-in-age exemption: the sexual acts are not punished if the age difference between the partners is less than 3 years. The law sets several other restrictions in regard to children under 13. In addition, it is illegal for an adult to engage in acts of sexual penetration with an adolescent under 18, if the adult abuses the authority or influence they have over the child in order to gain the sexual access. The relevant articles of the Criminal Code are Art. 220, Art. 221 and Art. 222. All these laws are gender neutral and apply regardless of the sexual orientation of those involved.14
The age of consent in the Netherlands is 16, as specified by the Dutch Criminal Code at Article 24515 and Article 24716 respectively:
"A person who, out of wedlock, with a person who has reached the age of twelve but has not reached sixteen, performs indecent acts comprising or including sexual penetration of the body is liable to a term of imprisonment of not more than eight years or a fine of the fifth category." (Art 245).
"A person who, with a person whom he knows to be unconscious or physically unable to resist or to be suffering from such a degree of mental defect or mental disease that he is incapable or not sufficiently capable of exercising or expressing his will in the matter or of offering resistance, performs indecent acts, or who, with a person who has not yet reached the age of sixteen (16) years, out of wedlock, performs indecent acts, or by whom the latter is enticed into performing, or submitting to such acts, out of wedlock, with a third party, is liable to a term of imprisonment of not more than six years or a fine of the fourth category." (Art 247).
Close-in-age exceptions (for consensual acts between adolescents close in age, within "social-ethical norms") are at the discretion of the prosecution. Acts such as a ménage-à-trois, or an unequal relationship, e.g. the perpetrator (17) was not in love while the victim (15) was, can also be considered outside "social- ethical norms".17
The age of consent in the Republic of Moldova is also 16, per Article 174- "Sexual intercourse with a person under 16", and Article 175- "Perverted Actions"18. Article 174 reads as follows:
(1) Sexual intercourse other than rape as well as any other acts of vaginal or anal penetration committed with a person certainly known to be under the age of 16 shall be punished by imprisonment for up to 5 years.
(2) The person who committed the act set forth in par. (1) shall not be subject to criminal liability if he/she is similar to the victim in terms of age and physical and mental development.19
Articles 171 and 172 provide harsher penalties for Rape and Violent Sexual Actions (including physical or mental coercion) against juveniles.
In the United Kingdom the age of sexual consent is now 16 in all four jurisdictions (England, Wales, Scotland and Northern Ireland) but it used to be different and still exceptions may vary from one jurisdiction to another. The age of consent in England and Wales is 16 regardless of sexual orientation or gender, as specified by the Sexual Offences Act 200320. However, if person A is over the age of 18 and is in a position of trust to person B who is under the age of 18, it is illegal for A to engage in sexual activity with B. Section 47 of the Sexual Offences Act 2003 makes it an offence to pay for or promise payment for
14 http://www.avocatura.com/ll491-noul-cod-penal.html
15 http://wetten.overheid.nl/cgi-bin/deeplink/law1/title=WETBOEK%20VAN%20STRAFRECHT/article=245/. 16 http://wetten.overheid.nl/cgi-bin/deeplink/law1/title=WETBOEK%20VAN%20STRAFRECHT/article=247/. 17 http://www.juridischkennisportaal.nl/wiki/strafrecht/ontucht-cq-feitelijke-aanranding/jurisprudentie-ontucht- leeftijdsverschil.htm.
18 See Criminal Code of the Republic of Moldova (2002, amended 2009) (English version).
19 Art.174 in version of Law No. 277-XVI dated 18.12.2008, in force as of 24.05.2009.
20 Sexual Offences Act 2003.
               9

CAHROM (2015)8
sexual services of a person under 18 where the 'client' does not reasonably believe that person is over 18, or in any event for a person under 13. Since 1 December 2010, the age of sexual consent in Scotland is also 16, regardless of regardless of sexual orientation or gender. Before that date, it was 16 for girls (under a statutory offence) and 14 for boys (the common law age of puberty). However, consensual sex with a girl aged between 13 and 16 is not rape, but a lesser offence; on 1 December 2010 this has been given the specific name of "having intercourse with an older child". The age of consent in Northern Ireland is 16, regardless of sexual orientation or gender, as specified by the Sexual Offences (Northern Ireland) Order 2008. The reason the age of consent was lowered from 17 to 16 in the 2008 Order was to bring it in line with the rest of the United Kingdom.
 Matrimonial age21
In Romania, according to the new Romanian Civil Code which entered into effect on 1 October 2011, and Article 4 of the Romanian Family Code, the age for marriage is legally established at the age of 18 for both men and women22. The second paragraph of Article 272 of the new Romanian Civil Code stipulates that for solid reasons, the minor who is already 16 years old can marry, on the basis of a medical certificate, with the approval of his/her parents, or of his/her legal guardian, if applicable, and with the authorization of the competent Guardianship Court or with the authorization of the general directorate for social assistance and child protection.
In 2007 the Law 288/2007 for the modification and completion of Law 4/1953 – Family Code23 provided for the first time a common legal minimum age for marriage for both men and women, set to the age of 18. However, the amended Article 4 of the Family Code stipulated that for solid reasons, the minor who is already 16 years old can marry, on the basis of a medical notice, with the approval of his/her parents, or if case be, with the approval of his/her legal guardian and with the authorization of the competent County General Directorate for Social Assistance and Child Protection.
Until 2007, the minimum age for marriage in Romania was different for men and women: men could marry at the age of 18 and women could marry at the age of 16. For solid reasons the Local Council could approve, based on the notice from an “official physician”, the marriage also if the woman was already 15 years old.
In Italy, capacity to marry requires the age of 18 for both men and women; in case of important reasons, an exception can be made by the juvenile court if the spouse has reached the age of 1624. From a strictly legal standpoint, minimum legal age for marriage in Italy is therefore 16 years old. In the Italian system, according to the Civil Code, an emancipated minor is whoever has attained the age of 16 - but not yet 18 -, and has been admitted by the juvenile court, to marry. In this case, upon application by the person concerned, the Court ascertains his/her mental and physical maturity and the validity of the reasons put forward in the instance after hearing the prosecutor, the parents or the guardian. The judicial decree can be challenged before the appellate court within a period of ten days from notice; but the court of appeal decision cannot be challenged before the Court of Cassation afterwards and the person concerned comes to emancipation. The emancipation occurs prior to marriage and remains valid even if the marriage contract is subsequently declared invalid.
21 For an overview of social policy and family law: marriage, divorce and parenthood in Council of Europe member States, see
http://www.coe.int/t/dg3/familypolicy/Source/4_1_i%20Legislation%20on%20marriage.pdf. 22 Article 272 (“Matrimonial Age”) paragraph 2 of the new Romanian Civil Code.
23 Legea 288/2007 pentru modificarea si completarea Legii 4/1953 – Codul Familiei.
24 Art. 84 par. 1 of the Italian Civil Code.
       10

CAHROM (2015)8
Also in the Netherlands, capacity to marry also begins at the age of 18 for both men and women 25. If the woman is pregnant, exceptions can be made if the spouses have reached the age of 1626 and have the consent of their parents27; where other important reasons are at stake, the Minister of Justice may grant an exemption from the age requirement28.
In Poland, capacity to marry requires the age of 18 for both men and women29; the court dealing with matters relating to guardianship can make exceptions if the female spouse has reached the age of 1630.
Article14 of the Family Code of the Republic of Moldova provides for the minimum marriage of 18 years old for men and 16 for women. For serious reasons a reduced marriage age for men, not more than with two years, may be admitted. Diminishing the marriage age should be permitted by a local public administrative authority in the residential area of the persons wishing to get married on the basis of their application and the agreement of teenager’s parents.
In the United Kingdom (England, Wales and Scotland), capacity to marry requires the age of 16 for both men and women. In England and Wales, minors need the consent of their parents.
 Family
In Romania, “family” is defined in the Constitution. Article 48 “Family” stipulates in paragraph 1 that “the family is founded on the freely consented marriage of the spouses, their full equality, as well as the right and duty of the parents to ensure the upbringing, education and instruction of their children”, and in paragraph 2 that “the terms for entering into marriage, dissolution and nullity of marriage shall be established by law. Religious wedding may be celebrated only after the civil marriage”31.
 Forced marriage
In the United Kingdom, early or child marriage is considered by law as a forced marriage. The Forced Marriage Unit (FMU) under the Foreign and Commonwealth Office defines forced marriage as follows: A forced marriage is where one or both people do not (or in case of people with learning disabilities, cannot) consent to the marriage and pressure or abuse is used”.32 In other words, a forced marriage is a “a marriage conducted without the valid consent of one or both parties and where duress is a factor”33. Adults who lack “capacity” as defined under the Mental Capacity Act 2005 are classed as not being able to consent and any marriage they enter into is classed as “forced”. The United Kingdom makes a distinction between “forced marriage” and “arranged marriage”. In an arranged marriage, the families take a leading role in choosing the marriage partner (or suitor), but both parties are free to choose whether to enter into the marriage or not, have the final say and can decline at any point. In the case of a forced marriage, the person has no choice/possibility to change his/her mind during the process due to the pressure put on people to marry against their will which can be physical (including threats, actual physical violence and sexual violence) or emotional and psychological (for example, when someone is made to feel like they are bringing shame on their family). Financial abuse (taking your wages or not giving you any money) and sexual abuse can also be a factor. In some case people may be taken abroad without knowing that they are to be married. When they arrive in that country, their passport/travel document may be taken to try to stop them from returning to their country.
25 Article 1:31, paragraphs 1of the Dutch Civil Code.
26 Article 1:31, paragraph 2 of the Dutch Civil Code.
27 Article1:35, paragraph 1 of the Dutch Civil Code.
28 Article 1:31, paragraph 3 of the Dutch Civil Code.
29 Art. 10 § 1 Polish Family and Guardianship Code.
30 Art. 10 § 1 S. 2 Polish Family and Guardianship Code.
31 Official translation of the Constitution: http://www.cdep.ro/pls/dic/site.page?den=act2_2&par1=2#t2c2s0sba48. 32 This definition is taken from the booklet “What is a forced marriage?” published by the Forced Marriage Unit. 33 Extract from Sophie Lott’s PowerPoint available in the Addendum to this report.
              11

2.1.3 From the perspective of (traditional) Roma communities
Although terms such as “legal consent”, “matrimonial age”, child marriage”, “forced marriage”, “family” are legally defined both at domestic and international levels as seen above, these terms do not have necessarily the same meaning from the perspective of (traditional) Roma communities. This perception gap and different understanding of a same word were obvious during some of the discussions that took place during the round table between representatives of traditional Roma families and Romanian officials or academics of Roma origin that were defending a “modernist” and “legalist” approach. Traditional Roma communities perceive early marriage as the norm and a custom. They also claim it as a mean to keep children inside the community and avoid mixed marriages.
CAHROM (2015)8
   A “union” as opposed to a “marriage”
  First of all, one too often abusively uses the term “marriage” to describe the practice according to which Roma families agree to formalize in the community the unofficial [meaning legally-speaking unregistered] union between their children as husband and wife and agree to their living as a couple outside the girl’s family home; both spouses or at least the girl is below the legal age of marriage.
   The experts of the thematic group consider that it would be more appropriate to speak about unions instead of marriages, in particular when there is not official record of the marriage. Some of these unions can be consensual or can be forced, namely under the pressure of adults or family members.
  Marriage is together with the birth of a child a crucial moment of celebration in the life of Roma. In the Roma context, “marriage” is generally described as an affinity between two families, sometimes between two communities. In traditional Roma communities, early marriage is still practiced and it is not perceived as a violation of the right of the child or as a violation of family law. This is a very well-prepared process of choosing the family with which one wishes to be affiliated; preserving the virginity of the girl is a sign of respect for the groom's family and is a prosperity issue for the wedding itself. This practice was common in traditional communities as a rule of honor at the individual development outside the family and the community did not come into play.
  The importance of purity and virginity as opposed to age
 Whilst the majority society focuses on the age to determine whether a “marriage” or “union” is legally feasible and morally acceptable, traditional families practicing early/child marriages put emphasis on the virginity, especially on the girl’s virginity. The importance of the virginity of the Roma girl at the time of her marriage finds its roots in the dual concept of pure and impure that marks the Romanipe(n) (Roma identity in Romani). The virginity of the bride symbolizes the immutable principle of reproductive ritual
cleanliness and an extreme respect for her family and the family of her fiancé34. The extreme importance given to the virginity (of the girls in particular) and also to inter-community unions explain why throughout Europe still many Roma parents decide to take out their children, and girls in particular, out of secondary schools when they reach the age of 13 or 14 and sometimes even earlier.35 36
  34 Source : Michaël Guet, Dosta! Voir les Roms autrement, Editions de l’Aube, avril 2014 (unofficial English translation).
35 See CAHROM thematic report (2012)6 on school drop-out and absenteeism of Roma children covering the Netherlands, Hungary, Spain and Sweden, as well CAHROM thematic report CAHROM (2013)5 on school attendance of Roma children, in particular girls covering Finland, Latvia, Norway and Sweden.
36 School drop-out generated by early marriages ranges from 4% (Duminica, Ivasiuc, 2010) to 6.6% (Surdu, Magyari-Vincze, Wamsiedel, 2011) in the investigated communities – source: Eugen Crai’s report “Early and force marriages in Roma communities in Romania” (April 2015) available in the Addendum.
12

CAHROM (2015)8
 Early marriage: a form of protection as opposed to an archaic arrangement between families
Considered in post-industrial modern societies as a sign of an archaic way of seeing marriage as an arrangement between two families, early marriage - from the point of view of families that still practice it - actually tries to shield the young from the difficulties and frequent trauma of seeking and changing partners and to free them from the enormous worry of looking for the proper match in life. Included in the receiving family from an early age, before the onset of the deceptive feeling of individual love, the girl will have enough time to adapt to the new way of life and to understand the new family. The result is a lifelong marriage, with fewer risks of break-ups than in modern marriages, which are based on the partners’ free choice. The traditional community wants to control and protect a fact, which is in any case seen to be happening in the modern lifestyle too, i.e. the early beginning of sexual life. The difference is that in modern society, this onset of sexuality is uncontrolled, mainly happening in secret, without family acceptance or blessing, and so it can be a potential danger both for the individual and for the community. In the traditional society, the sexual fact is protected and controlled, blessed by the family in a complicated customary system of rituals, meant to purify and support the couple. More than that, after marriage, both families continue to feel responsible for the good development of the new couple, they have the right and the duty to smooth the way for the new established family, to become involved whenever difficulties occur, and to help the husband and wife forward to reconciliation and mutual understanding. This is just another way of keeping the family united for a lifetime37.
 Dowry: a sign of respect of the bride’s purity as opposed to a commercial transaction
The girl’s family sells the girl as a bride and the boy’s family buys her. This is how it sounds from the outsider’s point of view on the Romani traditional marriage. Actually the process has nothing to do with what could be called a commercial transaction. Nobody is selling anybody. The price of the so-called bartered bride is a symbolic way of honouring the bride’s purity/virginity and her family. Traditionally expressed in gold, it is not a trade value, but, on the contrary, it is a value of representation and a symbol of honour. You cannot sell this gold and buy something else in its exchange, because this gold is not for sale; it is the pakiv (respect, honour, trust, honesty, faith) of the family. Another issue is that not all Roma groups practice this custom38.
 The role of the family/community as opposed to the individual
It should always be kept in mind that within Roma communities, the terms family and community are almost synonymous. A family does not resume itself to the parents (and often to a single parent) and their children, as often the case in modern societies; one speaks within Roma communities about extended families, i.e. endaj (in Romani) or vitsa (Romanian variant of Romani). Extended families imply a sense of belonging, solidarity and shared responsibility, manifested also by Roma customs of greetings and blessing rituals. There are associated with a number of values: self-respect and mutual respect; respect of the elderly; respect between the genders and the generations; respect of the Roma and respect of the non- Roma (gadgé, payos). For every Roma, the family- in its extended conception - is a fundamental value, and so is the child. The adult individual as such is therefore less important. A Roma person without family has less prestige leading to a different image within the community than a person with family. But this did not mean that persons without family are excluded from the community. On the contrary, such persons are usually taken care of by the others.39
37 Abstract of the intervention of Delia Grigore, PhD and anthropologist (Romania) entitled “Rromanipe – Rroma Identity Patters between Archetype and Stereotype”, contained in the report of the Seminar “Cultural identities of Roma, Gypsies, Travellers and related groups in Europe, organised by the Council of Europe in Strasbourg on 15-16 September 2003. The report was produced by Alexandra Raykova, General Rapporteur of the Seminar.
38 Ibid.
39 Abstracts of the interventions of Miranda Vuolasranta (Finland) and Angelina Dimitri-Taikon (Sweden) contained in Alexandra Raykova’s report of the 2003 Seminar “Cultural identities of Roma, Gypsies, Travellers and related groups in Europe.
 13

 The myth of Roma women’s inferior position in the family
A common stereotype says that the Roma woman has an inferior position in the traditional male-ruled families. Actually, the traditional community, being based on preserving the experienced pattern, its balance and harmony, ensures that the man and woman play specific complementary roles in the family, none of them inferior, but different. Becoming a mother - dai -, in other words becoming responsible for her children, the woman gains social status and power. Liberated from the impurity of sexual life and of giving birth, the old woman – i phuri -, becomes a real authority, possessing secret magic powers which allow her to see the future, to cure diseases and to protect the community against evil. At the individual level, the way how persons originating of mixed marriages (involving a Romani spouse and another from the majority) are perceived, varies considerably from one local context to another but in many cases the perception is negative, especially in Western countries, and would deserve a specific study40.
One of the members of a traditional Roma family said at the roundtable: “A good Rom is responsible for his family”. He explained the concept of the “Pativaly Romni” (the faithful, honoured and respected Roma woman). Monogamy as opposed to polygamy was highlighted as a cultural characteristic of the Roma conception of a family.
 Some historical grounds of child/early marriage
The practice of child/early marriage has been influenced by history, particularly in the Romanian context, when Roma were enslaved in the territory of the present Romania (principalities of Wallachia and Moldavia in the 13th and 14th centuries). Slavery was abolished in the two Romanian principalities only in the middle of the 19th century. During the five centuries of slavery, the slave status placed Roma outside the society and the human condition, because the owners considered them as goods. As slaves, the Roma were subject to violence and cruelty, including rape and torture. Roma children were separated from their parents and sold, given away or exchanged. Many stories also evoke a feudal right known as "ius primae noctis" (the right of the first night or droit de cuissage in French) when the lord could take the virginity of his serve during the night of her wedding. There is no actual written evidence of such practice but symbolic gestures used as signs of social superiority and coercive domination over slaves and peasants were developed by the aristocracy in the 15th century. As a result, Roma parents tended to marry their daughters at an early age to avoid smear and sometimes separation from their children.
An additional outcome of the time of slavery was a high number of children among Roma families since Roma women slaves increased the number of slaves by giving birth.41
2.2. The need to avoid stigmatization, stereotypes and generalization when addressing the phenomenon of early/child marriage within Roma communities
The group of experts wished to emphasize that any serious debate around the phenomenon of early marriage must start from the premises of the following conclusions:
2.2.1 Child/early marriage is a still a relatively wide-spread phenomenon in the world
During the thematic visit, several interlocutors recalled that early marriage is not a feature peculiar to the Romani culture; all traditional cultures share this custom. Indeed, child marriages were widespread in pre- industrial societies around the world and considered legitimate practices42. Early and forced marriages represented a social and cultural phenomenon that persisted until the early 20th century in Europe, in general, and even later than this in South East Europe.
40 Ibid.
41 Michaël Guet, Dosta! Voir les Roms autrement, Editions de l’Aube, avril 2014 (unofficial English translation).
42 See pp.27-28, Romani CRISS and UNICEF The case of early marriages in Roma communities in Romania. Are the rights of the child negotiable?, Alpha MDN Buzǎu, 2010, available at http://www.unicef.org/romania/Early_marriages_Romani_CRISS.pdf.
CAHROM (2015)8
  14

Despite the above remarks, a number of local interlocutors, experts of the thematic group and representatives of international organisations, noted that a strong focus was placed rather unequally on the Roma communities as a whole, generating a real labelling/stigmatisation risk43.
Moreover, at the European Union level, the only indicator which is systematically monitored is the adolescent fertility rate, which cannot be considered a proxy indicator since the adolescent pregnancies and births have a variety of causes and are not characteristic only to married adolescents.44
2.2.2 Child/early marriage does not appear only within Roma communities
Mr Nicolae Gheorghe, Romanian Sociologist and former Senior Adviser of the OSCE-ODIHR Contact Point for Roma and Sinti Issues, once said: “We cannot create a Roma problem, the early marriages, when they have been practiced for long in the other cultures too, we risk creating a stereotype out of this phenomenon”45.
Child marriages are still present in some non-Roma traditional rural communities in Romania46. The Romanian expert, Mr Eugen Crai, affirms in his report47 that adolescent girls aged 15-19 account for approximately 10% of the births annually in Romania.
During the thematic visit, the president of the National Agency for Roma provided the following data collected by the Romanian National Statistics Institute on women under the age of 18 that gave birth, which could be one indicator to identify child/early marriage, although, as pointed out by the Polish expert, it does not necessarily relate to the phenomenon of child/early marriage/union but rather to the phenomenon of under-aged motherhood of girls.
CAHROM (2015)8
     Romania 2013 Overall population
Ethnic Romanians
Ethnic Roma
Ethnic Hungarians
Ethnic Turks
Other 64
2012
2011
2010
     9,219 7,652 1,138
9,420 7,860 1,111
289 137 23
9,424 7,968 1,037
265 130 24
9,889 8,354 1,115
269 135 16
               242 123
               The above data show that the phenomenon of “early pregnancy” - which could be linked in some cases to early marriages - is not exclusively a Roma phenomenon but appears in the majority population, as well as in other ethnic minority groups. The general trend observed between 2010 and 2013 in Romania is towards a slight decrease of the number of birth by girls who are less than 18 years old, although from the above statistics the phenomenon does not seem to decrease among Roma ethnic girls48. In addition, as it was highlighted by the Council of Europe representative during the roundtable, the above data are based
43 Making Early Marriage In Roma Communities A Global Concern, European Roma And Travellers Forum & Romani Women Informal Platform “Phenjalipe”, 2014.
44 On the same line, see the Polish expert’s comment regarding the table appearing on the next page.
45 See page 2 of Romani Criss and Euroregional Centre for Public Initiatives joint submission addressed to the Committee on the Elimination of Discrimination against Women (CEDAW) and the Committee on the Rights of the Child to support the development of a General Comment/Recommendation on harmful practices at: http://www.ohchr.org/Documents/HRBodies/CEDAW/HarmfulPractices/RomaniCRISSandECPI.pdf.
46 See p.3. Centrul Educaţia 2000+ and UNICEF, Sarcina şi cǎsǎtoria timpurie în cazul tinerelor Roma [Early pregnancy and early marriage in the case of young Roma women], September 2004.
47 See his report “Early and force marriages in Roma communities in Romania” (April 2015) in the Addendum to this report.
48 A research conducted in Romania in 2002 indicated that “35% of Roma girls got married below the age of 16 years old” [ndlr: which was the legal age at that time]. “The percentage of Roma girls that got married below the age of 18 years old is rising from 44.6 for the generation of 25-29 years to 52.1 for the generation 20-24 years”. See Institutul pentru Cercetarea Calitǎţii Vieţii, Indicatori privind comunităţile de Romi din România, Editura Expert, Bucharest, 2002, p.8.
  15

CAHROM (2015)8
on self-declared ethnicity. Therefore, if one extrapolates the fact that there are three times more Roma living in Romania than the census results show (about 1,800,000 compared to 620,000), this could lead to the conclusion that half of the girls who give birth before the age of 18 in Romania are of Roma ethnic origin. Still, this indicates that early marriage is not a purely Roma phenomenon in Romania.
It is not a specific Roma phenomenon in other countries either. As an example, in the United Kingdom, the statistics collected by the Forced Marriage Unit in 2014 show a prevalence of early marriages within certain population groups originating from Pakistan, India and Bangladesh49. The British expert however underlined that the approach followed by the United Kingdom is not focusing on the religion in order to avoid putting the prejudice on one specific religion.
 The experts of the thematic group agreed that irrespective of the ethnic background of the communities where the early marriage phenomenon is manifest, a change in such practice is needed for the complete realisation of the human rights of each girl and boy, of each woman and man.
2.2.3 Child marriage is not a “Romani tradition” and not related to Romani culture as such
Already during discussions within CAHROM in 2014, the ERTF and Phenjalipe - through their joint paper - highlighted the danger of further stereotyping and victimising Roma communities by labelling early or child marriage in Roma communities as a cultural specificity. They considered that child and early marriages must be addressed in a comprehensive manner, taking into account the specific situations that exist, as well as the historic and socio-economic factors contributing to this practice and its perpetuation. In addition, the ERTF/Phenjalipe joint paper sought to deconstruct the view that state authorities bear no responsibility for early and child marriage, which is a widespread stance sustained by their labelling as so-called “internal Roma cultural practices”.50
Several Romanian interlocutors met by the experts during the thematic visit stressed indeed the fact that child marriage in Romania is not a cultural practice of the Roma community nor is exclusively practiced by Roma, although it occurs more often in traditional Roma communities compared to non-Roma ones.51 Today, many Roma families in Romania and other countries in Europe have abandoned this practice and have adopted the values of modern life. In the Roma communities Mr Eugen Crai investigated, an estimated 25-30% of Roma women aged 15-19 are married52. This means that 70% at least are not.
The anthropological research on early marriages realised in the context of the report Come closer - Inclusion and exclusion of Roma in Present-Day Romanian Society argues about the diversity of marital practices in Roma communities and that only in a few Roma communities early marriages may be associated with traditions, for the rest of the communities where it is manifest, the causes are rather related to poverty and poor education. Alexandra Oprea’s findings said the same: “one of the underlying rationales behind a family's arrangement of a child marriage is preservation of the girl's virginity and, by extension, the family's honour. Often, when a Romani girl is thought to be involved in prohibited activities (i.e., fraternising with boys), or if her body has developed rather quickly for her age, the parents' reaction may be to marry her off. However, these decisions always take place within a larger context where educational and employment opportunities are lacking for both parents and children. Parents' educational level correlates with when and whether they choose to arrange their daughters' marriages.”53
49 For more precise data per nationality, see the British expert PowerPoint in the Addendum to this report.
50
http://www.ertf.org/index.php/documents/reports-position-papers
51 Same reference as footnote 14.
52 See his report “Early and force marriages in Roma communities in Romania” (April 2015) in the Addendum to this report. 53 Idem
   See page 4 of the September 2014 updated version of ERTF/Phenjalipe paper available at:
 16

CAHROM (2015)8
The cultural diversity of the Roma communities and consequently the diversity of practices related to marriage is also highlighted in Alexandra Oprea’s article published by ERRC in 2005 Child Marriage a Cultural Problem, Educational Access a Race Issue? Deconstructing Uni-Dimensional Understanding of Romani Oppression. Within this Roma feminist critical analysis of early marriages in Roma communities it is explained that “it is imperative to note that arranged child marriages vary with the community in question: in Romania, arranged marriages are most common in Calderaş Romani communities, whereas they are seldom practiced by Caştale Roma. Apart from comprehending that only some Roma arrange the marriages of their children, it is also important to differentiate between arranged marriages and child marriages; not all arranged marriages involve underage actors. There are many variations of arranged marriages, aside from the textbook cases of parents arranging the marriages of their unsuspecting children, who meet for the first time on their wedding day.”54
In this ERRC article from 2005, it is also documented the various forms of resistance of Roma women and men to the practice of early marriage: “There are many different types of resistance. It does not always come in the extreme cookie-cutter "desert the community, never to return again" package, though some Romani women also "choose" this path. Obviously, these choices have to be looked at critically in their contexts and cannot be considered complete victories. The outcome can hardly be considered a triumph when one is forced to choose between disassociating herself from the people she loves (to face a racist and sexist world alone) and succumbing to virginity tests and early marriage. My point is to illustrate that Romani women are not passive ciphers. Whether by disassociating from community and family or by defiant participation, Romani women are actively resisting their subordination. Some young men also refuse to let family members dictate their marriage choices. One male in particular, whose parents were married during their teens, has been actively resisting his parents' attempts to arrange his marriage. As a result of seeing his mother endure immeasurable suffering at the hands of his father - a consequence he attributes to his parents' incompatibility in lieu of marrying at such a young age - he rebuffs his family's match-making efforts. When shown pictures of potential mates, his phrase of choice is: "What am I, shopping for a car?" He is perceived as an anomaly for being a twenty-eight-year old bachelor; sometimes he is even taunted as being gay. I should also mention here that I am often asked by fellow community members if I am a lesbian. Their logic is that since I am attractive and there appears to be nothing wrong with me, being twenty-four years old and unmarried must mean that I am gay.”55
2.2.4 The phenomenon of child/early marriage is not limited to Romania and to partner countries of this thematic group
In order to reassure some of the Romanian interlocutors during the thematic visit who expressed concerns that organising the thematic visit in Romania on such a sensitive topic might be misused as a way to single out Romania and contribute to a Romania-bashing which is sometimes quite present in Western media, the Council of Europe representative indicated that feedback from various CAHROM members and also various thematic visits showed that the phenomenon of early marriage within Roma communities was common throughout Europe, though at various degrees.
As an example, during the thematic visit on Roma women’s empowerment and gender dimension of Roma inclusion policies/strategies held in Lithuania on 3-6 June 2014, “the experts found that early marriage was frequently present among Roma communities living in Lithuania. In the Kirtimai settlement, the average marriage age within the Kalderash Roma is 14-16 in comparison with 16-18 within the Lithuanian Roma group. Early marriage was strongly supported by Roma male leaders met during the visit. Although two Roma women activists expressed disagreement about this practice, their voice is hardly heard beyond some families.” 56
54 Child Marriage a Cultural Problem, Educational Access a Race Issue? Deconstructing Uni-Dimensional Understanding of Romani Oppression, Alexandra Oprea, 2005, ERRC.
55 Idem
56 See CAHROM (2014)11. The conclusions of this thematic report are accessible on the CAHROM public website at: http://www.coe.int/en/web/portal/cahrom.
  17

During a recent CAHROM thematic visit to Ireland57, a Traveller family explained that early/child marriage is also a common practice among Irish Travellers as a way to prevent mixed marriages.
To give another example, the several times awarded 2009 documentary movie by Laura Halilović, a Roma woman and film director living in Italy, Io, la mia famiglia Rom e Woody Allen (Me, my Gypsy Family and Woody Allen) supported by the Dosta! campaign of the Council of Europe, illustrates inter alia the family pressure for early marriage.
CAHROM (2015)8
 57 See CAHROM (2016)9 thematic report on the empowerment and participation of Roma and Travellers in consultative mechanisms and advisory bodies, with a focus on Roma youth and women (visit to Dublin, Ireland, on 8-10 February 2016).
18

CAHROM (2015)8
III. SIZE, COMPOSITION AND SITUATION OF ROMA (AND TRAVELLER) GROUPS, WITH A FOCUS ON THE SITUATION REGARDING CHILD/EARLY MARRIAGES
3.1 Romania
According to the Romanian National Population Census from 201158, only 621,573 persons out of a total population of 20,121,641 declared themselves as being Roma, i.e. 3.08 % of the total population. It should be noted that the number of self-declared Roma increased compared to the previous censuses from 2001 (535,140) and 1992 (401,087).
During the thematic visit, the National Agency for Roma (NAR) gave an estimate of 1.5 to 2 million Roma living in Romania which is in line with the Council of Europe’s current estimate of 1.8 million59, therefore close to 9% of the total population. Romania has the second highest number of Roma population in Council of Europe’s member States, after Turkey.
According to above Agency, and based on the population census results, out of the self-declared approximate 620,000 Roma living in Romania, 230,000 are living in urban areas and 390,000 in rural areas. About one third of the self-declared Roma population in Romania (244,000) speaks the Romani language.
Roma is one of the 18 recognised national minorities in Romania. Though a part of the Roma community in Romania is socially integrated, educated and graduated and has access to the labour market (including in public administration), a majority of them remain socially excluded.
Sub-group affiliation is not unanimous: according to a research conducted in Romania in 200860, 56% of the Roma respondents did not identify with a sub-group, whilst 44% of the Roma respondents also identified with a sub-group.
From those respondents who also identify themselves as belonging to Roma sub-groups, one obtains the following distribution in Romania: Vătraşi (13.8%), Căldărari (5.9%), Rudari (4.5%), Spoitori (3.7%), Mătăsari (3.2%), Ursari (2.7%), Cărămidari (1.5%), Gabori (1.4%), Florari (1.2%)61. Other known Roma sub-groups are Horahai (Muslim Roma), Ciurari, Cortorari, Geambaşi, Lingurari and Rostaş.62
The Human Rights Report – Romania 2013 of the U.S. Department of State stated under “Forced and Early Marriage” that illegal child marriage was reportedly common within certain social groups, particularly the Roma. There were no statistical data regarding the extent of the practice, although the media occasionally reported on individual cases.63 There were no public policies to prevent child marriages or government institutions that dealt with the problem.”64
58 Source: http://www.insse.ro/cms/files/publicatii/pliante%20statistice/04-recensamantul%20populatiei.pdf
59 A decade ago, international estimated figure used to be comprised between 1,800,000 and 2,500,000 like in the European Union
document from 2003 “Support for Roma in Central and Eastern Europe”
(http://ec.europa.eu/enlargement/pdf/brochure_roma_oct2003_en.pdf) or in Jean-Pierre Liégeois “Roma in Europe” from 2007.
60 Idem, page 51.
61 Source: http://www.natgeo.ro/locuri-si-oameni/comunitati/9165-neamuri-tiganesti.
62 Come closer - Inclusion and exclusion of Roma in Present-Day Romanian Society, Gabor Fleck, Cosima Rughinis, National
Agency for Roma, 2008, page 50.
63 In 2003, Florin Cioaba, former “king” of Romanian Roma who was also a Pentecostal pastor, sparked controversy when he
married his 12-year-old daughter, Ana-Maria, to a boy aged 15. On 27 March 2014, his son and new self-proclaimed “king” said
that he and the Stabor (the unofficial Roma community courthouse made of clan elder leaders also known as Kriss) had agreed
that the tradition of Roma marrying under the age of 16 must stop and those defying the ruling would face exclusion from the
community. See more at http://www.turkishweekly.net/news/164965/romania-gypsy-king-bans-39-child-marriages-39.html.
     64 (http://www.state.gov/documents/organization/220533.pdf).
Romania 2013 Human Rights Report, United States Department of State, page 20 19
 
CAHROM (2015)8
As regards data on early and forced marriages within Roma communities in Romania, the Romanian experts underlined that numbers are completely irrelevant when dealing with human rights violations since each woman and each man, each girl and each boy should benefit of all human rights guaranteed by law. Numbers, however, are relevant for public policies since a government needs to assess first the situation correctly and to devise consequently effective and efficient operational action plans.
In Romania there are limited data on overall early or forced marriage as a social phenomenon in the general population. However, when it comes to Roma communities there is a growing number of collected evidence which results in unequally focusing on this particular ethnic community.
Data at national level for the general population65 provided by the National Institute for Public Health show that adolescent girls aged 15-19 account for approximately 10% of the births annually in Romania. The same 10% of the total annual number of abortions belong to the group of adolescent girls (11% in 2005 and 9.6% in 2010), while 4,000 abortions annually are performed on girls with an age below 15.
Moreover, a comparative study between Roma and non-Roma women concerning the age at first birth, conducted in 2008, showed that “there is a gap of around three years between the age at first birth of women in the Roma sample, compared to those in the comparative sample. A majority (55%) of women in the Roma sample carried their first pregnancies while minors of age, compared to 14% in the comparative sample. 16% of women in the comparative sample carried their first pregnancy after 25 years, compared to 5% of women in the Roma sample”66. This study actually claims, based on the qualitative analyses conducted in various communities, that “the non-Roma people living in poor conditions, in the segregated neighbourhoods with a high rate of Roma population, in ghettos or in poor rural areas, have similar marital/ family planning behaviour”67.
After 1989 the first exploration of early marriages in the Roma communities from Romania belonged to the Romanian Research Institute for the Quality of Life (RIQL). According to the RIQL study68 published in 2002 (with data collected in 1998) the statistics aspiring to be representative at national level related to early marriage were:
- 35% of Roma women were married before the age of 16;
- 31% of Roma women were married when they were 17-18 years old;
- 26% of Roma women were married at an age in between 19-22 years old;
- 8% of Roma women were married after being 22 years old.
A second exploration of early marriages in Roma communities was undertaken by UNICEF Office in Romania in 2004 when a survey69 was conducted in selected Roma communities from 11 counties within the Project “Let’s build together the images of our daughters”, a joint undertaking of UNICEF and Education 2000+ Centre. According to this survey the statistics related to early marriage showed that:
- 24.5% of Roma girls aged 12-18 were married;
- 13.3 % of Roma girls aged 12-18 had the experience of giving birth to a child while 10% of this
group had the experience of two births;
- 7% of Roma girls aged 12-18 underwent an abortion procedure.
65 Raport naţional de sănătate a copiilor şi tinerilor din românia 2014, Institutul Național de Sănătate Publică - Centrul Național de Evaluare și Promovare a Stării de Sănătate, 2014, pg. 7
66 Come closer - Inclusion and exclusion of Roma in Present-Day Romanian Society, Gabor Fleck, Cosima Rughinis, National Agency for Roma, 2008, pag. 91
67 Idem, pag. 34
68 Indicatori privind comunităţile de romi din România, Editura Expert, Bucureşti, 2002
69 Sarcina si căsătoria timpurie in cazul tinerelor rome, Mihai Surdu, UNICEF, CEDU 2000+, 2004
 20

CAHROM (2015)8
However, within this survey, when asked at what age would be appropriate for a girl to get married, the majority of the Roma respondents (67%) indicated that the appropriate age for marriage would be after the age of 18 (44.6% indicated the appropriate age as between 19 and 25 years old and 22.4% indicated the appropriate age for marriage at the age of 18). To complete the statistical data, 31.9% of the Roma respondents indicated that the appropriate age for girls’ marriage would be under the age of 18, while 1.1% indicated an age above 25. Also it is mentioned in this report that all girls who got married abandoned the school as a consequence.
A third undertaking to assess the dimensions and dynamics of early marriages in Roma communities represented a continuation of the joint efforts of UNICEF and Education 2000+ Centre within the Project “Roma girls go to school, too”. This third research70 brought in data from the census of Romania’s population of 2002 and made a step further in the analysis of the causes of early marriages in Roma communities using various methodologies and correlations. The data extracted from the population census of 2002 provided in this research showed that:
- 0.7% of the Roma female population below the age of 15 was married (unofficial marriage – consensual union);
- 29.5% of the Roma female population aged 15-19 was married (3.6% official marriage and 25.9% unofficial marriage – consensual union).
It is to be mentioned that the data of the 2002 census of the population of Romania is not really representative for the entire Roma population in Romania with only 535,250 persons declaring their ethnic identity as Roma at that time. The data of the research refers strictly to this population segment who declared their ethnicity as Roma. However, the data extracted from the 2002 census does not show huge variations as compared to the data collected via household surveys at national level (RIQL 2002) or in selected communities (UNICEF, CEDU 2000+, 2004).
This third study is also worth considering from two other perspectives, that of introducing a longitudinal (historical) analysis of the evolution of the early marriage phenomenon in Roma communities from early 20th century up to date and that of going into an in-depth analysis of the causes generating early marriage by combining quantitative and qualitative methods. The data shows that the age at first marriage for Roma women has decreased over time from the age of 19 for the cohorts of Roma women born before World War II to the age of 18 for the cohorts of Roma women born between 1969 and 1978. The same trend is noticed in the case of the age at first marriage for Roma men, as well as in the case of the age of the first birth (while the Roma women born before World War II the age when first gave birth was slightly above the age of 21, for the Roma women born between 1969-1978 the age when first gave birth decreased to slightly above 18.6. The age decreasing trends (at first marriage, at first birth) continue after 1991. This evolution is not characteristic only for the Roma population of Romania, but for the entire population of Romania (and the explanation given by the researchers reside in the aggressive pro-natal policies during the Communist regime).
One additional consideration emerging in this third analysis of the early marriage in Roma communities, based on the qualitative analysis, is that there are significant differences among the Roma traditional communities (Calderaş, Horahai and Spoitor Roma communities) and the non-traditional Roma communities. The self-declared age at first marriage is 10-12 in the case of Horahai Roma (Babadag), 14- 16 in the case of Calderaş Roma (Fetesti) and over 18 in the case of non-traditional (“modern”) Roma (Harsova)71.
70 Naşterea şi căsătoria la populaţia de romi, Mălina Voicu, Raluca Popescu, UNICEF, CEDU 2000+, 2006.
71 Naşterea şi căsătoria la populaţia de romi, Mălina Voicu, Raluca Popescu, UNICEF, CEDU 2000+, published in CALITATEA VIEŢII, XVII, nr. 3–4, 2006, p. 268.
 21

CAHROM (2015)8
In 2008 within the implementation by the General Secretariat of the Romanian Government of the EU PHARE Programme “Strengthening Capacity and Partnership Building to Improve Roma Condition and Perception”, more data are brought on the early and forced marriages. An extensive report is prepared within the above-mentioned Programme: Come closer - Inclusion and exclusion of Roma in Present-Day Romanian Society. One section of this report is entitles “The Marriage – What is Traditional and What is Not” and another section deals with the age at first birth.
Also in 2008, Romani CRISS in partnership with UNICEF, implemented the project “Early marriages in Roma communities”, with the aim to deepen the intra-community dialogue among Roma communities on the phenomena of early marriages. Within this project the report “The case of early marriages in Roma communities from Romania – Are child rights negotiable?” was launched. This report, as publicly assumed, did “not make an "x-ray" of the phenomenon or establishes its amplitude. It aimed at publishing a study making the inventory of different situations in the phenomenon of early marriages and defining them according to international norms, an analysis of isolated initiatives up to date. It considered that an inventory of international and national legislation regulating certain rights would contribute to the creation of a framework for well-informed discussion between actors in the Roma civil society, in order to produce a well-informed public stand, whichever it may be”72. The authors brought conceptual elaborations on arranged/ forced/ and early marriages.
In 2009-2010, UNICEF Office in Romania supported technically and financially two reference studies on Roma children participation to education: one in partnership with Community Development Agency Impreuna, “One school for all? Access to quality education for Roma children”73, and another in partnership with Romani CRISS - “Roma School Participation, Non-Attendance and Discrimination in Romania”74. When the school dropout is analysed in relation to early marriages the first research report finds that 4% of the school dropout among Roma children is attributable to early marriage phenomena, while the second finds a 6.6% of the school dropout among Roma children to be attributable to early marriages.
In 2010 another project Preventing Early/Forced Marriages is implemented in Bulgaria, Romania and Greece by Amalipe Center for Interethnic Dialogue and Tolerance (Bulgaria), Liga Pro Europa (Romania) and the Association for Social Support of Europe – ARSIS (Greece), with support from DG Justice of the European Commission (within the frames of the Daphne Programme 2009). The report published within this project did not bring new data on the dimensions of the early marriage phenomena but includes the most comprehensive analysis of the institutional mandates and actions related to early marriages in Romania.
3.2 Italy
The Roma, Sinti and Camminanti75 (hereafter RSC) living in Italy are characterized by their heterogeneity in terms of groups, dialects and specific linguistic varieties, and cultures. When considering RSC communities, we are referring to a) Italian citizens; b) citizens from other EU countries; c) Non-EU citizens; d) foreigners who were granted asylum or subsidiary protection; e) (de facto) stateless people, born in Italy from stateless parents.
72 The case of early marriages in Roma communities from Romania – Are child rights negotiable?, Nicoleta Bitu, Crina Morteanu, UNICEF, Romani CRISS, 2009
73 One school for all? Access to quality education for Roma children, Gelu Duminică, Ana Ivasiuc, Alpha MDN, 2010, ISBN 978-973-139-179-3
74 Roma School Participation, Non-Attendance and Discrimination in Romania, Vanemonde, Laura Surdu, Enikö Vincze, Marius Wamsiedel, Vanemonde, 2011, ISBN 978-973-1733-29-6
75 The Italian spelling was used for Camminanti (with double”m”), whilst in Sicilian it is written Caminanti (with one “m”).
 22

CAHROM (2015)8
It is estimated that nation-wide there are 100,000 to 200,000 Roma, Sinti and Camminanti present in Italy76: half of whom (about 70,000) are Italian citizens; and the other 50%, although made up of foreigners, is mostly in Italy, on a permanent basis.
The visibility of Roma settlements in the suburbs of large urban areas of North-Central and North of Italy leads to neglect sometimes the important presence of these communities in other areas of the country. In Scampia (Naples), there are over 1,500 Roma people from the former Yugoslavia whose presence dates back to the late eighties77 (the second generation of Roma people from the former Yugoslavia, though being born in Scampia, is made up of Italians). In Puglia, on the border between Molise and Abruzzo, the Roma community is largely located there on a permanent basis.
The North of Italy is characterized by a predominance of Sinti (estimated to be around 32,000). They had been traditionally involved in nomadic labour activities that required them to travel around the country (fairs or circus). Anyway, it is considered that just 3% of them are actually nomadic, because the majority of them have a permanent place where they come back when they do not work.
In Noto, Sicily, the Camminanti community has been living there since the late fifties (some of them are still "semi-nomadic"). The majority of Sicilian Camminanti of Noto travel through all Italy for around a semester, offering small manual services and coming back in the Province of Noto for the remaining part of the year.
Regarding the recently migrant Roma, mainly, the precarious conditions of settlements and evictions carried out by local authorities create a forced nomadic habit linked to their vulnerable condition of marginality.
No specific data were provided as concerns the specific situation of child/early or forced marriages within Roma communities living in Italy.
From a statistical standpoint, provided that there is not yet a specific project focused on the issue under reference, it should be mentioned the launch of the second edition, by mid-2015, of the violence against women’ survey from the National Office on Statistics (ISTAT), for the biennium 2013-2014. Italian women are interviewed by CATI technique (Computer assisted telephone interview), while migrant women will be interviewed by both CATI and CAPI (Computer assisted personal interview) technique. The survey covers different forms of sexual (rape, attempted rape, physical sexual harassment, to be forced to have sex because of fear of perpetrator’s reaction, to be forced to do humiliating and degrading sexual activity) and physical violence (7 forms of violence from threat to the attempt to be suffocated or strangulated), psychological and economic violence.
In this survey’s edition, specific attention is paid to stalking. Other data on sexual violence, human trafficking or householder/domestic violence are provided by registers statistics. These statistics concern the reports of violence to the police, crimes and proceedings from the Public Prosecutor Offices, persons charged with violence by the Public Prosecutors, persons convicted of violence and convictions on violence crimes (data from the Central Register Office of convicted people). Those data have proved to be useful from a judicial standpoint, with regard to the perpetrator’s characteristics, while are very poor with regard to victims’ characteristics - save Police statistics that have data on victims since 2004. Data can be provided by sex, age and place of birth of the perpetrators and only for police statistics, by sex, age and citizenship of the victims.
76 This coincides with the estimated figure used by the Council of Europe (140,000).
77 See the CAHROM (2014)10 Thematic report conclusions on solving the legal status of Roma from ex-Yugoslavia and their lack of personal identity documents covering Italy, Bosnia and Herzegovina, Croatia, Montenegro, Serbia and the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia” at http://www.coe.int/en/web/portal/cahrom.
  23

3.3 Republic of Moldova
There are no exact figures or estimates regarding the number of Roma living in the Republic of Moldova. There are different opinions regarding the total number of Roma and the variance of the estimated data is quite large, ranging from 20,000 to 100,00078or even 250,000 according to some Roma leaders.
The estimated number of Roma in the Republic of Moldova (without Transnistrian region) is between 12,000 and 27,000. The population census conducted by the National Bureau of Statistics in October 2004 registered 12,271 persons who declared themselves as belonging to the Roma (“Gypsy”) ethnicity (the census was not including the Transnistrian region and the city of Bender). This very low official figure of self-declared Roma may be explained by the reluctance of Roma to identify themselves as such by fear of discrimination or due to exclusion79.
A poll carried out in 2001 by the Association of Roma Women “Juvlia Romany” gave the figure of 20,040, and data collected by the Bureau of Interethnic Relations in 2002 suggested also a figure close to 20,000. The current estimate used by the Council of Europe is 60,000.
Roma are spread all over the country. Some communities are heavily populated by Roma-Otaci city (27.5% of the total Roma population), Soroca city (12.4%), Vulcanesti village, Nisporeni district (8.6%), Riscani city (4.6%), and Chisinau city (4.1%). At present, there are 50 Roma NGOs registered in the Republic of Moldova80.
As regards the situation of early marriages within Roma communities in the Republic of Moldova, according to the 2007 UNDP Report81, youngsters under 16 years old represent 28% of the Roma population. The number of children (0-18 years) is about one third of the total Roma population. One of the particular features of the Roma population is early marriage and represents a worrying phenomenon. Generally-speaking, Moldovan Roma marry at an earlier age. The minimum age of married persons registered among surveyed Roma is 15 years in comparison with 17 years in case of surveyed non-Roma. No significant gender differences in marriage ages are observed in the case of Roma, with both women and men having a minimum marriage age of 15 years. This contrasts with non-Roma population where the minimum marriage year for men is 20, whilst it is 17 for women. Another indicator of early marriages is the ratio of those who were married (including currently married, as well as separated and widows) in the age group 15-25 years. In the case of Roma, this ratio is significantly higher (40% for women and 30% for men) compared to non-Roma population (30% for women and 19% for men).
CAHROM (2015)8
   Republic of Moldova
Average age of married persons Minimum age at marriage
Share of married persons among 15-25 years old
Roma
Men Non-Roma
Women Non-Roma
          41.9 15 30%
46. 3 20 19%
Roma
40
15 40%
42. 8 17 30%
                78 According to data presented at International Roma Union from Foundation “ELIZABETA” (Roma NGO registered in Chisinau), on November 4, 2011 in the Republic of Moldova lived 102,356 Roma ethnic origin persons.
79 A 2007 UNDP study Roma in the Republic of Moldova, 2007 found that Roma faced a risk of poverty two times higher than the non-Roma: 59% of Roma live in absolute poverty and 50% in extreme poverty compared to the national averages of 24% and 19% respectively79. They have little access to health care; they often cannot register for the state health insurance policy because they lack the necessary documents. A 2010 UNICEF survey shows that 35% of the Roma are children. Roma children often do not attend school because they are needed to work to support the family; 43% of Roma children do not attend school, compared to 6% of non Roma (page 127 of UNICEF Survey).
80 https://www.academia.edu/7634195/Lista_50_ONG-uri_Rome_din_Republica_Moldova
81 Roma in the Republic of Moldova. Report. Chişinău: UNDP Moldova, 2007 accessible at: http://www.undp.md/publications/roma%20_report/Roma%20in%20the%20Republic%20of%20Moldova.pdf.
  24

CAHROM (2015)8
Roma women are one of the most vulnerable groups in the Republic of Moldova. Usually they have a lower level of education, much higher unemployment rates, lower level of income and bad plight of health than the other population Roma women face triple discrimination - as Romni, as women and as members of a disadvantaged social group. They are subject to higher risk of social exclusion and poverty than men in their community and most women representatives of other ethnicities. In traditional Roma families often girls are required to take more responsibility at household and fewer school activities than boys. As a result, Romani young women are particularly vulnerable to dropping out of school, having a low level of education, a very serious social exclusion and often negative impact on health. When young Roma girls are married, education and the entire process of their developing are finished. They are obliged to abandon childhood and become fully dependent on their husbands. Early marriage is accompanied with early pregnancy and the responsibility to be a parent. These women lose the chance to secure autonomy in making decisions on education, opportunities to access a well-paid job or their household needs. These factors, in turn, make them more vulnerable, forcing them to accept an abusive relationship, and to expose them to poverty and social isolation.82
3.4 The Netherlands
There are no exact figures regarding the number of people of Roma origin in the Netherlands as registration based on ethnicity is prohibited. Estimates vary from approximately 10,000 (if we exclude Dutch Travellers) to approximately 45,000 (Dutch Travellers included), which means that no more than 0.25% of the Dutch population is of Roma and Traveller origin. Roma (general term) in the Netherlands can be divided into five different groups according to their historical presence:
a) Roma, Sinti and Dutch Travellers traditionally residing in the Netherlands: this group concerns Sinti and a few Roma families present on the Dutch territory since the 15th century83 who, until the 1960s lived a nomadic lifestyle. This group of Dutch Sinti and Roma contains approximately 2,500 people. Dutch Travellers (woonwagenbewoners) are estimated to be 35,000 and have Dutch ethnicity. They do not have a language of their own and their history dates back to ‘only’ around 1850. A small number of Travellers, Sinti and Roma live in caravans or mobile homes (predominantly fixed in situ), situated in special centres or campsites.
b) About 1,500 Roma who came to the Netherlands as migrant workers and labourers around the late 1960s and 1970s and as refugees from Turkey in the 1980s.
c) Roma who were granted a residence permit in 1978: this third group, often referred to as the General Pardon group, concerns Roma who were legalised in the 1970s. Although most of them did not have any identity papers, it is assumed that the majority originates from the former Yugoslavia. In 1978, this group consisted of 520 individuals dispersed around eleven municipalities. In the meantime, this group increased to approximately 2,800-3,000 individuals.
d) Roma who came to the Netherlands in the 90s: this fourth group, about 1,000 people scattered throughout the Netherlands, is more a collection of individuals and families from the former Yugoslavia, the Czech Republic and the Slovak Republic.
e) Roma newcomers, arriving since the expansion of the European Union (as from 2000): this last group concerns essentially Bulgarian and Romanian Roma.
Within the Netherlands, approximately 55 municipalities house Roma residents from various backgrounds. In the 1980s, eleven municipalities welcomed Roma from group C above. Most municipalities represented in the Dutch Platform for Roma municipalities acting under the Association of Dutch Municipalities (VNG) accommodate Roma from the General Pardon group.
82 Studiu cu privire la situația femeilor și fetelor rome din Republica Moldova. Raport. Chișinău: UN Women, UNDP, OHCHR Moldova, 2014, accessible at: https://www.academia.edu/6491424/STUDIU_cu_privire_la_Situatia_Femeilor_si_Fetelor_Rome_din_Republica_Moldova_2014. 83 See e.g. Marko D. Knudsen, The history of the Roma, RomNews Society, Hamburg, Germany and Jean-Pierre Liégeois, Roma in Europe, Council of Europe Publishing, 2009.
  25

3.5 Poland
According to the last national population census from 2011, 16,723 Polish citizens self-declared their belonging to the Roma ethnic minority, which represent 0.04% of the total Polish population (38,511,824). However, estimated figures presented by the Polish expert range the Roma population between 20,000 and 25,000, the latter being closer to the Council of Europe estimated figure (0.06% of the total population).
Five groups of Roma live in Poland: Polish Roma, Carpathian Roma (also called Bergitka Roma or Mountain Roma), Kalderari, Lovari, as well as small group of Sinti. These groups differ in cultural, social and economic terms. 92% of Roma in Poland live in urban areas. Over recent years, there has been also a tiny Roma immigration from other EU member States, including Romania, Bulgaria and Hungary.
The majority of Roma groups living in Poland are in fact traditional and patriarchal. Women are therefore kept in the traditional role of wife, mother and care taker of the house. This leads to a general support/approval among most of Roma communities in Poland for early marriages and early motherhood. As in many other countries, Roma’s access to secondary and higher education and to the labour market is very low in Poland84 and discrimination against Roma exists as elsewhere in Europe. As a direct result of early marriage, Roma girls tend to drop out schools after primary level, have lower qualifications, which lead to a worsening situation of Roma women on the labour market, poverty and dependence on male family members. Multiple discrimination (both as a Romni and as a woman) is largely under-reported. There are only a few Roma women associations in Poland. Out of approximately 120 existing Roma NGOs, only five have a woman as president. Despite the above status within their community, Roma women when they are given a chance are quite active in policy measures.
As regards their marital status, only 35.74% of Roma in Poland are officially married (to be compared with 55.8% for the whole population). Traditional marriages still exist among Roma who often do not officially register marriages. The scale of the phenomenon of early and/or forced marriage within Roma communities in Poland is unknown due to both the lack of data and the lack of reporting. Among the scare sources of information, the EU Fundamental Rights Agency’s survey Discrimination against and living conditions of Roma women in 11 EU Member States (from 2014) shows that 2% of Roma girls aged 10 to 15 are “traditionally married” or “cohabiting” with a partner, whilst about 24% of 16 and 17 year old Roma are legally or traditionally married or “cohabiting”. The age of Roma entering into marriages is slowly rising: marriages of up to 12 year old girls are quite rare; the problem of 15 or 16 year old girls remains. The phenomenon of early marriage is widely (but not univocally) criticized by Roma themselves.
There are no data on ethnicity (as perpetrators or as victims) so the scale of the phenomenon of early marriages within the Roma community is impossible to estimate. The phenomenon was rarely reported officially (and always by public institutions when they accidentally learnt about the existence of such unions) although from informal commentaries and talks, it occurs within the Polish Roma communities, most of them being very traditional. The common conviction is that the age of Roma in Poland entering into marriages is slowly rising. Marriages of 12 years old girls are quite rare now and the phenomenon is widely (but not univocally) criticized by Roma themselves. The problem still exists though, currently pertaining to c.a. 15 year old girls. According to the Fundamental Rights Agency’s survey Discrimination against and living conditions of Roma women in 11 EU Member States (2014) in all surveyed states around 2% of Roma girls aged 10 to 15 are reported as “traditionally married” or “cohabiting” with a partner and about 24% of 16 and 17 year old Roma are legally or traditionally married or “cohabiting”. It is difficult to judge whether these figures describe the situation in Poland. The visibly lower number of married, divorced and widowed Roma (if compared to other groups) depicted in the National Census results seems to suggest that traditional Roma marriage is still a vivid institution as Roma in Poland belong to very traditional groups.
84 Only 7% of Roma acceded secondary and 2% of them higher education (compared to 31.5% and 17% respectively for the whole society). The level of economic inactivity of Roma reaches 63% compared to 44.5% for the whole population. Only 13.31% of Roma declared that they are working.
CAHROM (2015)8
 26

Occasionally cases of early Roma marriages come into light coincidently, for example because of health problems or problematic pregnancies. This was the case of a 12 year old Roma girl of Kowary “traditionally” married to her 24 year old cousin (2006). A similar case from Opole involved a 21 year old man and a 16 year old girl. This time the girl was caught on petty theft and the subsequent inquiries led to disclosing the existence of traditional marriage. Such cases are widely considered to be serious violations of basic human rights. Both involved men were prosecuted. In 2007 the District Court of Kedzierzyn- Kozle trialed a 23 year old Roma man for marrying a 14 year old girl. The man was found guilty and a suspended sentence was pronounced. The prosecuted and sentenced men were defended publicly by some Roma leaders accusing justice system of violating Roma traditions and so-called “Roma rights”.
Problem of abusing of Roma women rights is especially visible in the context of sexual exploitation, a phenomenon that touches only migrant Roma women in Poland. According to information provided by the Polish branch of La strada organisation, the vast majority of Bulgarian women prostitutes working along the roads are of Roma ethnic origin.85 A police research states that the sphere of sexual exploitation in Poland is monopolized by Bulgarian citizens of Roma ethnic origin from Varna, Dobrich, Stara and Nova Zagora, and victims – recruited from those villages - are often Roma women and girls without any education, deriving from very low economic status families, often “sold” by their families. A typical problem for conducting investigation has to do with the fact that it is a specific hermetic group, using a Bulgarian local Romani dialect, sometimes combined with emotional dependency between the victim and the perpetrator. Generalization should however be avoided, the above cases are probably not typical members of Roma migrant communities, which are anyway very few in Poland. Roma migrants residing in Wrocław, as an example, are Romanian citizens and are not involved in prostitution.
According to that report the market of forced begging is monopolized by Romanian citizens of Roma ethnic origin, mainly from Sibiu and Braşov which are places where victims are recruited from86. Foreign victims of human trafficking in Poland are mostly citizens of Romania, Bulgaria and Hungary; one can imagine that part of them is of Roma ethnic origin. The number of legal proceedings concerning begging in statistics is low and stable. It touches mainly citizens originated from Romania, the Republic of Moldova and Ukraine and perpetrators are organised gangs of Roma origin. Victims are mostly women and children, sometimes people with disabilities. There are cases of injuries of victims in order to gain additional profits from begging.
3.6 United Kingdom
There are two distinct population groups in the United Kingdom:
a) A number of groups who have been living and travelling in the United Kingdom and Ireland for centuries (British Gypsies of the Romanichal and Kale Romani groups have lived in the United Kingdom since the 15th century). They are commonly referred to as Gypsies, Travellers (of Irish heritage) or Gypsies/Travellers, all of whom speak English as their mother tongue. Some Gypsies and Travellers travel, or travel some of the time, but many are sedentary. From the latest twice-yearly count of Traveller caravans on both authorised and unauthorised sites across England87, there were 20,123 Gypsy and Traveller caravans in England in January 2015;
85 Information from shadow report of La strada NGO prepared as an additional material for CEDAW UN in 2014.
86 Tomasz Piechocki, Handel ludzmi w Polsce [in] Zapobieganie handlowi ludzmi w Polsce. Materialy do raportu za lata 2009- 2011,Ministry of Internal Affairs, p. 76
87 This is a count of caravans and not of people, covering only England and excluding Scotland, Wales and Northern Ireland. See https://www.gov.uk/government/uploads/system/uploads/attachment_data/file/434107/Statistical_Release_Traveller_Caravan_Co unt_-_Jan_2015.pdf.
CAHROM (2015)8
   27

CAHROM (2015)8
b) The Roma, the term generally used to refer to people of Roma origin who have migrated from other countries of Europe in recent years, and who are not travellers. The first Roma from the new EU countries, particularly from the Czech Republic, Poland, Romania and the Slovak Republic, came to the United Kingdom in the 1990s seeking asylum to escape persecution. Since the enlargement of the European Union in 2004 and 2007, many more have moved legally to the United Kingdom to find work, equal opportunities and a good education for their children, and to escape racism and discrimination. They have established significant communities in the north of England, East Midlands, Kent and north and east London. It is not known how many Roma live in the United Kingdom88. The best estimate is around 300,000.89
The 2011 census introduced for the first time a tick box for “Travellers of Irish heritage” and “Gypsy/Roma heritage” in the ethnic origin question. Census data on ethnicity published in late 2012 by the Office for National Statistics90 show that 58,000 people identified themselves as “Gypsies and Travellers” in England and Wales (Scotland and Northern Ireland are not covered). The census also provides detailed information on their geographical distribution in England and Wales. Available data show that Gypsies and Travellers are among the most disadvantaged minority ethnic groups, particularly in education and health, and also face discrimination, hostility and prejudice.
As concerns the situation of forced marriage (child or early marriage being considered in the United Kingdom as forced marriage), there are no specific data as concerns Roma, Gypsies and Travellers. The Forced Marriage Unit (FMU) collects data and statistics from calls to its National Helpline
.
For 201491, the collected statistics were the following:
- The FMU gave advice or support related to a possible forced marriage in 1267 cases92;
- Where the age was known, 11.% of cases involved victims93 below 16 years; 11% involved victims aged 16-17; 16% involved victims aged 18-21; 13% involved victims aged 22-25; 7% involved victims
aged 26-30; 7% involved victims aged 31 or over;
- 79% of cases involved female victims and 21% involved male victims;
- The FMU has handled cases involving a total of over 88 different countries94 specifically. In 2014 this
included Pakistan (38.3%), India (7.8%), Bangladesh (7.1%), Afghanistan (3%), Somalia (1.6%), Turkey (1.1%), Iraq (0.7%), Sri Lanka (1.1%) and Iran (1.0%). The origin was unknown in 3.5% of cases;
- 23% of the cases handled by the FMU were domestic and had no overseas element;
- Within the United Kingdom the regional distribution was: London 23%, West Midlands 11.9%, South East 10.8%, Yorkshire and Humberside 8.9%, North West 8.1%, East 4.7%, East Midlands 4.4%, Scotland 2.3%, South West 1.7%, Wales 1.4%, Northern East 1.3% and Northern Ireland 0.7%. The
region was unknown in 20% of cases;
- 135 cases involved victims with disabilities;
- 8 involved victims who identified themselves as lesbian, gay, bisexual or transgender (LGBT).
88 There are no reliable figures on the number of Roma in the UK, since ethnic origin is not recorded on entry to the UK. Some non-official sources estimate that the number of Roma could be as high as several hundreds thousand.
89 Information collected from the Equality (a non-governmental organisation) website: http://equality.uk.com/Roma.html.
90 http://www.ons.gov.uk/ons/rel/census/2011-census/key-statistics-for-local-authorities-in-england-and-wales/index.html; http://www.ons.gov.uk/ons/rel/census/2011-census/key-statistics-for-local-authorities-in-england-and-wales/rpt-ethnicity.html; http://www.ons.gov.uk/ons/rel/census/2011-census/key-statistics-for-local-authorities-in-england-and-wales/rpt-international- migrants.html
      91
See also FMU statistics between January and December 2012 at:
https://www.gov.uk/government/uploads/system/uploads/attachment_data/file/141823/Stats_2012.pdf.
92 This statistic includes contact made to the FMU via the helpline or by email in relation to a new case.
93 Victim includes people thought to be at potential risk of future forced marriage, those currently going through a forced marriage and those who have already been forced to marry.
94 This includes countries to which a victim is at risk of being taken or has already been taken to in connection with a forced marriage.
 28

IV. REVIEW OF RELEVANT LEGALISLATION AND POLICY FRAMEWORKS ADDRESSING (OR NOT) CHILD/EARLY AND/OR FORCED MARRIAGES
4.1. Romania
Article 4 of the Romanian Constitution consecrates the principle of non-discrimination: “Romania is the common and indivisible homeland of all its citizens, without any discrimination on account of race, nationality, ethnic origin, language, religion, sex, opinion, political adherence, property or social origin.” Article 11 establishes that “treaties ratified by Parliament, according to the law, are part of national law”.
Although there is no formal prohibition of early (child) or forced marriages in the Romanian Constitution, it brings guarantees for the protection of children. Article 49 “Protection of children and young people” stipulates in paragraph 1 that “children and young people shall enjoy special protection and assistance in the pursuit of their rights”, while in paragraph 3 it prohibits child exploitation (“the exploitation of minors, their employment in activities that might be harmful to their health, or morals, or might endanger their life and normal development are prohibited”) and in paragraph 4 it prohibits child labour for children below the age of 15 (“minors under the age of fifteen may not be employed for any paid labour”).
Prior to the thematic visit of the group of partner countries’ experts, a number of policies have been reviewed by the Romanian expert of the thematic group, Mr Eugen Crai95, in order to assess if they define, prioritize and/or recommend specific actions in relation to the prevention or reducing early marriages, forced marriages or child betrothals. As such, the following national strategies have been analysed:
- the National Gender Equality Strategy 2014-2017;
- the Government Strategy for the Inclusion of the Romanian Citizens Belonging to Roma
Minority 2015-2020 (as adopted in 2015);
- the National Strategy for the Protection and Promotion of Child Rights 2014-2020;
- the draft National Strategy on Reducing Early School Leaving.
He came to the conclusion that these important national strategies fail to address early marriage. This is particularly the case for the National Gender Equality Strategy 2014-2017 and the Government Strategy for the Inclusion of the Romanian Citizens Belonging to Roma Minority 2015-2020 adopted in 2015 which do not address it at all.
The National Strategy for the Protection and Promotion of Child Rights 2014-2020 does refer to child/early marriages, but only in its analysis of the situation. It first announces that there is recorded a continuous increasing trend for the age at first marriage, in 2011 this age being 26 for women and 29 for men. The same is announced for the median age at first birth, which in 2011 was 26. Then, in the next paragraph is revealed that “a series of phenomena identified by the specialists reveals for Romania an insufficient family planning, education for sexual and reproductive health, especially in the case of the socially vulnerable categories. Thus, while the average age at first birth increased in the total population, the phenomenon of birth among adolescent girls and young women continues to be worrisome with more than one child out of ten being born by mother under the age of 20. At the same time, in Romania, the abortion rate was extremely high, until 2003 the frequency of abortions being higher than the frequency of births. Although the rate of abortions continues to be high, with 52.7 abortions reported to 100 live births, the level has decreased by 7 times in the last two decades”96.
95 See Mr Crai’s full report in the Addendum to this thematic report.
96 National Strategy for the Protection and Promotion of Child Rights 2014-2020, pg. 22
CAHROM (2015)8
 29

CAHROM (2015)8
Surprisingly, the National Strategy for the Protection and Promotion of Child Rights 2014-2020 speaks of early marriages only in the section dedicated to Roma children, where it mentions that approximately 28% of children/youth aged 15-19 are married, a situation with a negative impact on school participation, on access to labour market for the young families and on access to opportunities for the next child generations”97. Besides mentioning the problem and citing its dimensions, the Child Rights Strategy does not include any specific measure or strategic action targeting early marriages. Nonetheless, the Child Rights Strategy has specific strategic actions targeting the prevention and combating violence against children. And it is at this point that early marriages pop up in the policy framework again.
The only conceptual elaboration of early marriages in the Romanian policy framework has been identified in Government Decision 49/2011 for the adoption of the Framework Methodology on the prevention and multi-disciplinary team and network intervention in cases of child abuse and domestic violence, as well as of the Methodology for the multidisciplinary and inter-institutional intervention regarding the exploited children and children in situations of risk of being exploited through work, child victims of trafficking in persons, as well as Romanian migrant children victims of other forms of violence on the territory of other states98.
In its Annex 1 – Framework Methodology on the prevention and multi-disciplinary team and network intervention in cases of child abuse and domestic violence, Section II.2 “Conceptual Framework”, Sub-section II.2.1. “Operational definitions”, Title A – “Abuse”, letter c – “Sexual Abuse”, there is included among the examples of sexual abuse the case of early marriages: (point 5) says “early marriages or child betrothal that involves sexual relations (especially in the Roma communities)”. This is the only conceptual clarification, albeit incomplete, identified in the policy framework in Romania, and unfortunately it ethnicizes futilely the problematic of early marriage by adding the uninspired phrase “especially in the Roma communities”.
On a similar pattern, the draft National Strategy on Reducing Early School Leaving refers to early marriages only in its analysis of the situation among the factors contributing to early school leaving. It includes99 in among these factors “the health, early marriage and/or pregnancy, other personal reasons”. Later on in the section dedicated to “marginalized minorities and other groups”, the draft National Strategy on Reducing Early School Leaving mentions that “according to the recent studies, the key reasons for school dropout identified by both the educational stakeholders, and by the families, are directly related to financial hardships. Roma population is the most vulnerable to such hardship, and the situation is even more dramatic in the case of Roma girls, due to the precarious living conditions and traditions”100. Yet, no more is elaborated in the draft Strategy on what is meant by “traditions”. Nor is included in the draft Strategy any specific measure or strategic action targeting early marriages.
The sedes materiae for child rights protection and promotion in Romanian legislation is Law 272/2004 on the protection and promotion of child rights101. Although this law is quite advanced for the protection of the rights of the child, it is completely silent when it comes to early marriages or child betrothals.
In 2007, the Law 288/2007 for the modification and completion of Family Code Law 4/1953102 was adopted. It was for the first time in Romania when the legal minimum age for marriage became common for both men and women and set to the age of 18. However, the amended Article 4 of the Family Code stipulated that for solid reasons, the minor (whether boy or girl) who is already 16 years old can marry, on
97 National Strategy for the Protection and Promotion of Child Rights 2014-2020, pg. 25
98 Hotărârea Guvernului Nr. 49/2011 pentru aprobarea Metodologiei-cadru privind prevenirea şi intervenţia în echipă multidisciplinară şi în reţea în situaţiile de violenţă asupra copilului şi de violenţă în familie şi a Metodologiei de intervenţie multidisciplinară şi interinstituţională privind copiii exploataţi şi aflaţi în situaţii de risc de exploatare prin muncă, copiii victime ale traficului de persoane, precum şi copiii români migranţi victime ale altor forme de violenţă pe teritoriul altor state.
99 See table 1.10 on page 26 of the draft National Strategy on Reducing Early School Leaving.
100 Draft National Strategy on Reducing Early School Leaving, pg. 27 (Romanian language version)
101 Lege nr. 272/2004 privind protecţia şi promovarea drepturilor copilului.
102 Legea 288/2007 pentru modificarea si completarea Legii 4/1953 – Codul Familiei.
  30

CAHROM (2015)8
the basis of a medical notice, with the approval of his/her parents, or if case be, with the approval of his/her legal guardian and with the authorization of the competent County General Directorate for Social Assistance and Child Protection.
A new Civil Code entered into effect on 1 October 2011. According to Article 272 “Matrimonial Age”, the age for marriage for both men and women is legally established at the age of 18. However, the second paragraph stipulates that for solid reasons, the minor who is already 16 years old can marry, on the basis of a medical notice, with the approval of his/her parents, or of his/her legal guardian, if applicable, and with the authorization of the competent Guardianship Court. In case one of the parents does not approve the marriage, the competent Guardianship Court will also rule on such a divergence, taking into account the best interest of the child.
The new Penal Code of Romania, Law 286/2009, entered into effect on 1 February 2014, is the equivalent of a “revolution” in the penal regulations in Romania, bringing an enormous amount of innovation (not only as concerns what is criminalized or decriminalized, but also in the manner in which the criminalization is regulated) and aligns Romanian penal legislation to the EU standards.
However, this also raises a number of challenges, particularly for the more marginalized communities, including Roma communities, where awareness and information on the new legislation is supposedly scarce. Socially excluded Roma communities might not be necessary aware of the new penal legislation which may lead to a reduced compliance with it.
According to the new Penal Code of Romania the age of sexual consent is 15 (the old Penal Code also regulated the age of sexual consent at 15). However, penal legislation is excluded when the age difference is less than 3 years, irrespective of the age of the participants to the sexual activity (this is how Article 18, paragraph 3 of the Lanzarote Convention – non-criminalization of the freely consented sexual activities among minors - was translated into internal penal legislation). However, when sexual activities are “committed by a person of age with a minor 13 to 18, when the former abused their authority or influence over the victim”103 then such activities are criminalized.
An overview of a number of selected crimes, as regulated in the new Romanian Penal Code, is included in Appendix to this report (with potential application in cases of child/early marriages), including ill treatments applied to minors, domestic violence, trafficking in minors, pandering, use of an exploited person’s services, rape, sexual assault, sexual intercourse with a minor, sexual corruption of minors, recruitment of minors for sexual purposes, and sexual harassment.
4.2 Italy
As for the prevention of child, early and/or forced marriages (CEFM), it is worth mentioning that Italy is a party to several relevant international legally binding standards104, the last of which is the Istanbul Convention which expressly requires the introduction of the formal crime of early/forced marriage. All these core treaties demand for the creation of national monitoring mechanisms and procedures to prove an adequate implementation of their contents. To this end, several ad hoc committees have been established, including the National Ombudsman on Children’s rights, composed of representatives from the competent Ministries and Departments of the Presidency of the Council of Ministers, as well as local governmental representatives, also supported by the advisory contribution from the civil society.
103 Romanian new Penal Code, Art. 220, para. 3
104 UN Convention on the Rights of the Child and related Optional Protocols (Act No. 176/1991 and Act No. 46/2002); UN Convention for the elimination of discrimination against women (Act No.132/1985); UN Convention against transnational organized crime and its Optional Protocols (Act. No.46/2006); Council of Europe’s Convention on Action against trafficking in human beings (Act. No.108/2010); Council of Europe’s Convention on the protection of children against sexual exploitation and sexual abuse (Act. No. 172/2012); Council of Europe’s Convention on preventing and combating violence against women and domestic violence (Act No. 77/2013).
 31

From a legislative standpoint, in the course of the current Legislature, mention should be made of Bill No.724, entitled “Provisions for the promotion of the female subjectivity and the fight against femicide” and Senate Act No.764, entitled “Introduction of the crime of femicide”, under the newly adopted Act No. 119/2013. This Act must be read in conjunction with the Act No.77/2013 and has three main objectives: to prevent gender-based violence; to punish whoever commits this crime; and to protect the victims. The first will be accomplished also through the introduction of criminal offences as far as forced marriage, FGM, abortion and forced sterilization. Furthermore mandatory arrest is established for stalking and family abuse crimes, with the abusive spouse subject to immediate removal from the household. Penalties increase in cases of violence against a pregnant woman, or in the presence of youth and children. Moreover women will be supported by free legal aid when they are victims of crime and must be kept informed about the hearing of their abuser.
By Legislative Decree No.24/2014, Italy has fully translated into domestic legislation, Directive 2011/36/UE (on the prevention and the fight against trafficking in human beings and protection of the victims, replacing Framework Decision 2002/629 JHA). By this Directive, the EU has set minimum common criteria for the definition of criminal offenses in relation to trafficking. As mentioned in the explanatory report supplementing the above Legislative Decree, Directive No. 36 pursues the objective to ensure the strengthening of the repressive criminal protection system in order to ensure effective protection of victims, intended as "an essential step/element of the fight against trafficking in persons which necessarily requires an integrated approach”.
At the policy level, Italy has recently adopted relevant National Action Plans in the following areas: the National Action Plan (NAP) on Violence Against Women and Stalking (2010-2013 - being under current revision); the National Action Plan on Children and the Youngsters (2011-2013); the National Strategy on the Integration/Inclusion of Roma, Sinti and Caminanti Communities (2012-2020), in accordance with EC Communication No. 173/2011; the First Plan of Action for the prevention and the fight against discrimination on the ground of sexual orientation and gender identity (2013-2015); and the second National Action Plan on Women, Peace and Security, 2014-2016.
By Ministerial Decree dated 10 November 2010, the then Minister on Equal Opportunities approved, upon positive opinion by the Unified Conference, the three-year term “National Action Plan against gender- based violence and stalking”. This document is the result of an inclusive process involving all relevant private and public stakeholders and envisages specific actions in the socio-cultural, health, economic, legislative, and judicial fields. More specifically, the aim of this Plan is seven-fold: (a) Raising awareness in a broad, adequate and effective manner; (b) Ensuring and implementing a network of relevant anti- violence Centres and shelters; (c) Securing an adequate support for the victims nationwide; (d) Adequately training and equipping with the appropriate tools, all those social and health-care providers mandated to supporting victims and/or working in this area, with the ultimate goal of mainstreaming gender-based culture; (e) Envisaging a structured collection of data to better steer relevant policies; (f) Enhancing forms of assistance and support for women, victims of violence, and their children; (g) Broadly enhancing the level of protection by an effective collaboration with Police Forces. Within the Plan the issue of the child, early and force marriages is referred to as one of the relevant forms of violation of women’s human rights, together with MGF and trafficking. In the biennium, 2010-2011, 18.6 million Euros were allocated for the implementation of this Plan, and further 1.5 million Euros, for the year 2012105.
105 The NAP has provided for the establishment of a high-level inter-ministerial Task Force on gender-based violence (from June 2013 onwards), aimed at coordinating governmental action for the prevention and repression of such a plague. The development of coordinated actions at all levels to implement the NAP contents has aimed at improving the role of private stakeholders in order to ensure the prevention and repression of violence against women: a National Audit was organized on 22 May 2013, during which the then Minister for Equal Opportunities met with relevant civil society representatives of a national and local relevance (CSOs), and the fourth annual week against violence was launched by the Ministry of Education and the Ministry for Equal Opportunities, on the basis of the cooperation initiated in July 2009. Through this week, financed by the Department for Equal Opportunities, the aim is to fight against all forms of discrimination by organizing awareness-raising campaigns, information and training courses on prevention of violence and fight against all forms of intolerance, especially those grounded on racial, religious
CAHROM (2015)8
 32

4.3 Republic of Moldova
In accordance with Article 30 of the Law Nr. 338 on Child Rights (adopted by the Parliament of the Republic of Moldova in 15.12.1994): “The state takes all necessary measures to prevent the abduction, sale and trafficking of children for any purpose and in any form”106.
4.4 The Netherlands
The Dutch Government follows the following international regulations:
1. The EU guideline (2011/36/EU) regarding prevention and combating human trafficking;
2. The Treaty of the Council of Europe on combating human trafficking (2005);
3. The Palermo Protocol;
4. The recommended principles and guidelines of the UN on human rights and human trafficking107.
The Compulsory Education Act108 is applicable to all children with or without Dutch nationality, refugees or illegally entered individuals who are of school age. Education is compulsory for children between 5 and 18 years old109. The paper on Policy Measures in The Netherlands for the social inclusion of Roma submitted by the Ministry of the Interior and Kingdom Relations to the European Commission on 16 December 2011, in response to the European Commission Communication about a EU framework for national Roma integration strategies, recalls the main principles of the Dutch Compulsory Education Act.
Municipalities are responsible for enforcing the law and employ school attendance officers to ensure compliance with this requirement. Parents bear primary responsibility for complying with the Compulsory Education Act, i.e. for enrolling their children into school and for ensuring their daily presence at school. When children, Roma or otherwise, are persistently absent, the school attendance officer takes action – if necessary legal – to ensure they go to school. As a last resort, the attendance officer can report the case to the Public Prosecutor; judicial proceedings can lead to a fine or a custodial sentence on the parents110.
The Netherlands has adopted a legal framework on forced marriage and leaving behind111. It has also developed a criminal policy on human trafficking and adopted a Circular as indication to the Dutch Immigration Office about people asking for a temporary stay in the Netherlands on humanitarian grounds. Indication about human trafficking of the College of Prosecutors-General to the heads of regional prosecution offices also exists. On 23 March 2012, the Dutch Government indicated that the Netherlands is going to reinforce its fight against forced marriages, namely by preventing marriage among minors (less than 18 years old) on the Dutch territory112. The exception for a minor to get married through a judge decision was abolished following the entering into force of the new law.
4.5 Poland
The prohibition of discrimination in political, social or economic life on any ground is based on the Constitution of the Republic of Poland, especially its Articles 32 and 33.
and gender-based intolerance, besides dealing with all forms and root-causes of violence, or on sexual orientation and gender identity.
106 http://lex.justice.md/viewdoc.php?id=311654&lang=1
107 Source: the Dutch Ministry of Security and Justice.
108 More information on the Dutch Compulsory Education Act is available on: http://www.european-agency.org/country- information/netherlands/national-overview/legal-system
109 In the Netherlands, many students follow full-time education at least until they are 18. Between 16 nad 18 they are allowed to work but are required to follow part-time education related to their job.
110 Fines to Roma parents remain usually unpaid and both Dutch interlocutors and experts from partner countries agree that they are not a suitable answer as they increase family debt and poverty. This is why, in Veldhoven, the fine was replaced by a work penalty (parents who do not send children to school must work on a Saturday).
111 See the Addendum of this report (in Dutch).
112 Source: Article published by AFP on 23 March 2012 (in French). 33
CAHROM (2015)8
    
Article 32
1. All persons shall be equal before the law. All persons shall have the right to equal treatment by public authorities.
2. No one shall be discriminated against in political, social or economic life for any reason whatsoever.
Article 33
1. Men and women shall have equal rights in family, political, social and economic life in the Republic of Poland.
2. Men and women shall have equal rights, in particular, regarding education, employment and promotion, and shall have the right to equal compensation for work of similar value, to social security, to hold offices, and to receive public honours and decorations.
Additionally, Article 35 guarantees rights of national and ethnic minorities.
Article 35
1. The Republic of Poland shall ensure Polish citizens belonging to national or ethnic minorities the freedom to maintain and develop their own language, to maintain customs and traditions, and to develop their own culture.
The whole system of the Polish law offers a wide range of instruments to ensure in practice full respect for the principle of equal treatment. In case of violation of this principle, the Polish law guarantees adequate compensation both for moral and pecuniary damage. The Polish equal treatment legislation is composed of various legal acts which have been drafted in line with the EU anti-discrimination directives. As a matter of principle, Roma, both men and women, can benefit from the Polish legal instruments on equal footing with other Polish citizens.
Firstly, on 1 January 2011 the Act of 3 December 2010 on the implementation of certain provisions of the European Union on equal treatment (hereinafter Equal Treatment Act) entered into force. This was an important step towards consolidation of legal protection of the equal treatment principle under the Polish law.
The act specifies areas and methods of counteracting violation of equal treatment principle on the grounds of sex, race, ethnic origin, nationality, religion, denomination, world-view, disability, age or sexual orientation. It fully implements the provisions of the EU antidiscrimination directives, defines legal measures to protect the principle of equal treatment and bodies responsible for implementing the principle of equal treatment.
The Act contains definitions of direct and indirect discrimination, harassment, sexual harassment, unequal treatment, and principle of equal treatment.
The Act prohibits the encouragement or ordering of unequal treatment (Art. 9). In the event of a violation of the principle of equal treatment, damages may be claimed. The burden of proof in the proceedings is shifted – a plaintiff claiming that the principle of equal treatment has been violated must lend credence to the violation. In the event of lending credence to the violation of the principle of equal treatment, the party accused of violating the principle is obliged to prove that they did not violate the principle (Art. 13).
In addition, the Polish Labour Code (in its Chapter II.a, Articles 183a-183e) contains a set of guarantees with a view of ensuring equal treatment in work settings and provides an efficient mechanism of remedying any violations. The principle of equal treatment is understood as the freedom from discrimination, both direct and indirect.
Also, relevant provisions of the Civil Code guarantee a broad protection of personal goods (Art. 23) which are defined and interpreted by courts in an open and non-exhaustive manner, applying also to cases of discrimination. Under its provisions of Art. 24 in conjunction with Art. 415 and 448 – the Civil Code affords possibility for redress for persons whose personal goods have been infringed or merely threatened.
34
CAHROM (2015)8

CAHROM (2015)8
Adequate protection can also be granted in the course of criminal proceedings. The court can apply penal measures in parallel or instead of a penalty, inter alia obliging the perpetrator to redress damage or harm (Art. 39.5 of the Criminal Code) or ordering him/her to pay a sum of money for the benefit of the victim (Article 39.6 of the Criminal Code). These possibilities are open to victims of all crimes, including victims of discrimination.
Relevant provisions protecting against various forms of discrimination are also included in other sectorial laws, starting with the Act on National and Ethnic Minorities and Regional Language. The principle of spousal equality is included in the Family and Guardianship Code (Articles 23 and 24).
The whole system of the Polish equal treatment law guarantees full respect for the principle of equal treatment. As it may be assumed, it does not contain provisions specifically addressing discrimination of Roma or Roma women. People belonging to the Roma minority, both men and women, can benefit from the Polish legal instruments on equal footing with others and with no restrictions. The phenomenon of multiple discrimination is not however defined in the Polish law.
According to the Equal Treatment Act, the Civil Rights Defender (as an independent equal treatment body) and the Government Plenipotentiary for Equal Treatment (as the coordinator of government’s activities) are tasked with the implementation of the principle of equal treatment. This does not exclude responsibility of other government bodies and public institutions for implementing the equal treatment principle within their competencies. As regards the obligation of the authorities to promote equality and to prevent discrimination in carrying out their functions, this clearly stems from Articles 30 and 32 the Constitution.
As regards Polish legislation addressing early and/or forced marriages, Article 10 of the Family and Guardianship Code sets the minimum age for those entering into marriage at 18. A court may permit a woman who has reached the age of 16 to marry if the marriage would be in the best interest of the newly established family.
The National Programme for Equal Treatment for 2013-2016 constitutes a horizontal, governmental strategy for equal treatment. The Government Plenipotentiary for Equal Treatment coordinates the implementation of the Programme by all ministers and relevant central offices. Within its goals and priorities regarding equal treatment in all spheres of social life the Programme indicates measures for counteracting discrimination based on sex, race, ethnic origin, nationality, religion, denomination, world- view, disability, age and sexual orientation. The Programme anticipates activities in all areas including (but not limiting them to) the further general implementation of antidiscrimination policies, increasing activation and participation of women, elderly, persons with disabilities, Roma and foreigners in the labour market, combating gender based violence, preventing and combating hate crimes as well as ensuring equal treatment in education (including measures aimed at elimination of stereotypes and intolerance), healthcare system and access to goods and services (including media). Many of the actions envisaged in the Programme are of transversal nature and concern all groups being potentially at risk of discrimination as well as the majority of the society. The phenomenon of multiple discrimination or specific situation of Roma women is explicitly taken into consideration only in the context of culturally appropriate health care. There are however many actions foreseen for the Roma minority and even more activities aimed at women empowerment and equality.
The Programme for Integration of the Roma community in Poland 2014-2020, managed by the Minister of Administration and Digitalization, sets goals and measures in four priority areas: education, employment, housing and health − not limiting its actions to these areas. The strategy does not have any direct references to dealing with specific problems of Roma women or to women empowerment. There is only a short statement that the special attention should be given to the participation of Roma women in the planned actions. The reason behind this approach was to limit obstacles inside the Roma communities to Roma women participation in proposed activities. However, the issue of the Roma women participation is
35

CAHROM (2015)8
explicitly and strongly emphasized during workshops for the network of regional plenipotentiaries for national and ethnic minorities who initiate and monitor the implementation of Programme at the regional and local levels. The reporting mechanism on the implementation of the strategy requires information pertaining to the Roma women involvement. The programme is a continuation of the previous government programmes implemented since 2001.
Policy measures and affirmative actions taken by the Polish government towards the Roma national minority benefit Roma women and girls. In the field of education, 71% of assistants for Roma education are Roma women; 66% of beneficiaries of the scholarship system for tertiary education students are Roma girls; and the majority of beneficiaries of scholarships for secondary school students are Roma girls. In the sphere of public life, 31% the Roma Team of the Joint Commission of the Government and National and Ethnic Minorities are women. In addition, 53% of the participants of projects implemented within the so- called Roma Component of the Human Capital Operational Programme are Roma women/girls. Through their active participation in the above activities, Roma women have been systematically empowered not only by public authorities, but also, indirectly, inside their local communities.
The Polish authorities have developed a number of activities for empowering Roma women and eliminating “multiple discrimination” (though this term is not defined in Polish legislation), including the following:
 Consultative meetings on multiple discrimination on the grounds of gender and ethnic origin, nationality, religion, denomination and world-view initiated in 2014 by the Government Plenipotentiary for Equal Treatment;
 A first large scale meeting devoted to the situation of the Roma women in Poland organised by the Government Plenipotentiary for Equal Treatment in 2011 ( a second such event took place on 12 June 2015);
 Efforts to ensure the parity between male and female representatives of Roma communities;
 A three-week long visit of five Roma women to the United States of America (April-May 2015);
 Publications113;
 Support for a Project showing successful Roma, many of them being Roma women, to promote a
better image of Roma and their self-esteem.
4.6 United Kingdom
The 2007 Forced Marriage (Civil Protection) Act brought into being the use of Forced Marriage Protection Orders (FMPO). FMPOs are civil court orders with legally binding requirements to protect a person at risk. They have been used to both restrict the actions of those presenting a risk of forced marriage to another, to prevent marriages from occurring and can also be used to ensure someone is safely returned to the United Kingdom from overseas. They can be used pre-and post-marriage. Police, social services and any 3rd party given permission by court can obtain and use this tool to assist those at risk. MPOs conditions include:
- Protect victims from being taken overseas/or being them back;
- Stop them for being forced into marriage whether religious or otherwise;
- Stop them being hurt/harmed or threatened;
- Stop them being harassed.
FMPOs are critical in cases where victim is in a country that FMU cannot assist in; freedom of movement is restricted or where the FMU has no contact address. Failure to comply resulted in a “contempt of court” and was punishable by up to 2 years in prison.
113 Studia Romologica, From the life of Romni. Tradition and contemporary civilization. 36
 
CAHROM (2015)8
Following a detailed consultation and having listened carefully to all views, on 8 June 2012, the Prime Minister announced that the Government will make forcing someone to marry a criminal offence. This is a twin track approach. In doing so, the British government is sending out a clear message that this brutal practice is totally unacceptable and will not be tolerated in the United Kingdom.
The 2014 Anti-Social Behaviour, Crime and Policing Bill received Royal Assent and became Law on
16 June
- -
- -
-
2014. This new law:
criminalises of the act of forcing someone to marry against their will;
criminalises the act of luring of a person to a territory of a state for the purpose of forcing them to enter into marriage without consent;
criminalises the act of using deception with the intention of causing a person to leave the UK with the intention of forcing that person to marry;
if a person lacks the capacity to consent, the offence is also capable of being committed by any conduct carried out for the purpose of causing the victim to marry, whether or not it amounts to violence, threats or any other form of coercion;
criminalises the breach of a Forced Marriage Protection Order (FMPO).
The Foreign and Commonwealth Office and Home Office have set up a specific website on forced marriage114: This website provides:
- a definition of “forced marriage”;
- Information for people directly affected by forced marriage;
- Brief information about the Forced Marriage Unit (FMU) - a joint Foreign and Commonwealth
Office and Home Office unit set up in January 2005 to lead on the Government’s forced marriage
policy, outreach and casework, and FMU contacts;
- Legislation on forced marriage, in particular The Anti-social Behaviour, Crime and Policing Act
2014 which makes forced marriage a criminal offence to force someone to marry;
- Statistics on Forced Marriage collected by the FMU
o Statistics on forced marriage for 2015 ; Statistics on forced marriage for 2014
o Statistics on forced marriage for 2013 ; Statistics on forced marriage for 2012 - Guidance for professionals
o Multi-Agency Statutory Guidance for dealing with forced marriage 2014
o Multi-Agency practice guidelines: Handling cases of forced marriage 2014
o 2010 Review of implementation of statutory guidance across public agencies in
England and Wales
o Guidance for Members of Parliament and constituency offices
o Guidance for Registrars
- eLearning training for professionals
- Information about an Outreach programme run by the FMU across the UK to raise awareness of
forced marriage and about the 2015/16 FMU Domestic Programme Fund;
- Publications and other resources
o What is a forced marriage? (leaflet)
o Forced Marriage Protection Orders / Forced Marriage Protection Orders (leaflets) o Marriage: it’s your choice: (cards)
o Forced Marriage poster English available in 9 other languages (but not in Romani) o Forced Marriage: A Survivors Handbook (handbook)
o Campaign videos (see the website).
                  114 https://www.gov.uk/guidance/forced-marriage.
 37

V . REVIEW OF POSITIONS OF RELEV ANT ROMANIAN INTERLOCUTORS AND MEASURES UNDERTAKEN IN RELATION TO CHILD/EARLY AND FORCED MARRIAGES
5.1 The position and the response of the National Authority for Child Rights Protection and Adoptions (restructured in 2009 as a Directorate within the Ministry of Labour)
In its reply to the questionnaire of the 2010 Romanian survey team for the project Preventing Early/Forced Marriage115, the National Authority for Child Rights Protection and Adoptions formulates very clearly the essence of the harmful practice of forced marriages: “ forced and early marriages imply the violation of children’s rights as they are stated in Romanian Law 272/2004 regarding the protection and the promotion of children’s rights”. According to the opinion of the Authority, practicing early and forced marriages means to violate the right of the child to enjoy life conditions that are guaranteeing his or her physical, mental, spiritual, moral and social development, and, prevents the children from expressing their own opinions on facts influencing their life. The Authority considers that in several cases the practice of forced marriages imply also additional abuses, physical, emotional, sexual, and consequently, violates the right of the child to be protected against all forms of violence, abuse, ill-treatments. However, the Authority’s involvement has been limited to:
- the introduction of an optional study subject focusing on the pre-marital education for teenagers and youngsters studying colleges, vocational schools and other types of schools;
- the legislative introduction of a compulsory premarital advice programme for adolescents approaching the minimum legal age of marriage and willing to marry;
- the development of a network of advisory centres for children and parents in municipalities and big cities;
- the extension of the Parents’ School Programme for all parents’ advice centres, mothers’ centres and day care centres;
- the implementation of an educational campaign targeting the parents and advocating for the respect of children’s rights under the title “You can be a good parent, too!”, involving parents, health care agencies and medical practitioners, teachers, representatives of the police, churches and the judiciary.
The Authority has not implemented programmes or projects specifically directed to tackle the issue of early marriages in the Roma community, although this type of children’s rights violations occurs in compact communities and in well-known areas. 116
County Directorates for Social Assistance and Child Protection (CDSACP) have no expressly defined public policies regarding early/forced marriages.117
5.2 The position and the response of the National Agency for Roma (NAR)
Mr Daniel Vasile, NAR president, was very clear during the thematic visit that child marriage is a matter of concern and should be properly addressed, and not only in Roma communities. He even introduced the concept of “pre-early marriages” to describe unions between very young children (8-13 years old)118.
115 This project was implemented in Bulgaria, Romania and Greece with support from DG Justice of the European Commission (within the frames of the Daphne Programme 2009 - Reference number JLS/2008/DAP3/AG/1298-30-CE-03124780080). For the 2011 report Preventing Early/Forced Marriages implemented in Bulgaria by Amalipe Centre for Interethnic Dialogue and Tolerance, see http://www.amalipe.com/files/publications/ranni%20brakove%20last.pdf.
116 See pages 37-38 of the 2011 report Preventing Early/Forced Marriages implemented in Romania by Liga Pro Europa (
117 Ibid, page 45.
118 As a recent example of this situation, see the following article (in Romanian) dated 1 February 2016 about the “marriage” of two Romani girls aged 6-7 in Galaţi: http://www.nasul.tv/scandal-in-comunitatea-rroma-daniel-cioaba-a-prezentat-o-fotografie- cu-doua-copile-sotii-din-galati-aceste-fetite-sunt-maritate-iar-casatoria-consumata-este-o-crima-si-un-act-de-cruzime/.
CAHROM (2015)8
    38

The Agency has implemented several projects and programmes targeting to prevent and combat the practice of forced marriages. In 2006 the Agency released the report SOS – Traditional (Pre-modern) Roma communities confronted with the risks of European integration and (post) modernity – Inclusion policies implemented in the traditional (Semi) Nomadic Roma Communities. The report constitutes an inventory of traditional practices of the Roma community from Sinteşti. This includes express recommendations for the prevention of forced marriages. One chapter is devoted to the elaboration of complex programmes at the national level to prevent early marriages, refusal of vaccinations, school drop- out and exploitation of child labour. (pg. 39) Building upon the experience gained in the Râmnicelu case, monitored for several years, the Agency succeeded to elaborate action plans, including measures designed for combating forced marriages, such as evaluation of the local community; facilitation of the local development; elaboration of public policies directed towards the traditional communities focusing on the protection of children’s rights and interests; education of the members of the community regarding their rights and obligations; information campaigns; supporting the partnership between school and public administration and community; adopting projects and programmes facilitating the access to schools and education for the parents; setting up a centre to advise young mothers, to help carrier orientation of the young members of the Ramnincelu community. Despite its positive achievements, the National Agency for the Roma works on solving a wide range of problems and does not have enough resources to concentrate on the issue of forced marriages.119
5.3 The position and the response of the Ministry of Education
The Ministry of Education, in partnership with UNICEF in Romania, organised in 2010 a National Conference on the issue of school drop-out, with the participation of the Ministry of Labour, Family and Social Protection, the National Agency for the Roma, the National Authority for the Protection of the Family and the Children’s Rights, the county school inspectorates, local administrations, county councils, the Institute for the Educational Science, the World Bank Mission in Romania. The National Conference was aimed to raise the awareness towards the increasing number of cases of school leaving, but early marriage as a reason for the Roma girls’ dropping out was not per se on the agenda120. However, two reference studies on Roma children’s participation to education (supported financially and technically by UNICEF) were presented: one conducted by Romani CRISS and the other conducted by Community Development Agency “Împreună” (Together). Data on school drop-out generated by early marriages was presented in the conference.
Between 23-25 September 2012, UNICEF and implementing partners121 of the School Attendance Initiative “Let’s Go to School!” organised the third National Conference in Sinaia122. The event was meant to present those involved and decision makers the objectives, components, actions and mechanisms of the campaign rolled out to prevent absenteeism and drop-out.
The County School Inspectorates do not have any statistics which could reflect the percentage of school drop-outs as a result of early/forced marriages of children from traditional Roma communities.123
Roma school mediators employed in Romania contribute to the awareness-raising on the risks of child/early marriage, in particular in respect to education and school drop-outs.
119 Ibid, pages 39-40.
120 Ibid, pages 41-42.
121 UNICEF’s implementing partners for this project are the Romanian Ministry of Education, Research, Youth and Sport (MERYS), the Institute of Education Sciences (IES), the Resource and Information Centre for Social Professionals (CRIPS), Holt Romania and “Impreună” Community Development Agency.
122 For more information on the School Attendance Initiative, see http://www.unicef.org/romania/20682.html.
123 Same reference as footnote 77, page 50.
CAHROM (2015)8
  39

5.4. The position and the response of the Ministry of Public Health
The Ministry of Public Health and the subordinated county authorities approach the issue of early marriages from the perspective of reproductive health. Early pregnancies are in the centre of attention, but statistics do not reflect the ethnic background or the causes of early pregnancies.124
The large number of Roma health mediators working in Romania contributes to the awareness-raising on the risks of child/early marriage, in particular in respect to health.
5.5 The position and the response of the Ministry of Internal Affairs and the Ministry of Justice
The Ministry of Internal Affairs coordinates the activity of the police and has branches in all 41 counties. Police intervention in cases of early marriage is frequently a result of media information. In many cases, police intervention in wedding ceremonies (in cases of early marriages) is being shot by television teams. Usually, in such cases the perpetrators are arrested on charges of rape or sexual intercourse with a minor, but frequently these actions of the police result in light sentences. Generally, imprisonment does not take place and alternative punishment is preferred. The Ministry of Internal Affairs has no statistics on the number of arrests related to early marriages.125
5.6 County Offices for Roma
Only in 4 Counties Offices for Roma (out of 41 in total at national level) the issue of early/forced marriages in traditional Roma communities was discussed in the mixed working group’s meetings (these mixed working group consist of representatives of County Roma Offices, county level institutions, experts in Roma issues from the local mayors’ offices, health and school mediators, Roma informal leaders and NGOs dealing with Roma issues). In the other respondent counties this issue was not discussed.
The project Preventing Early/Forced Marriages implemented in Bulgaria, Romania and Greece by Amalipe Center for Interethnic Dialogue and Tolerance (Bulgaria), Liga Pro Europa (Romania) and the Association for Social Support of Europe – ARSIS (Greece) led to the adoption of a “Declaration towards a comprehensive policy for social inclusion of Roma women” (a Declaration adopted unanimously by the participants in the International conference “Policies for the empowerment of Roma women in the context of European programme for Social Inclusion”, held in Sofia on 29 November 2010 as the closing event of the project “Preventing Early/Forced Marriages”). The Declaration was built around four key pillars: 1. Strong and comprehensive national policy for Roma integration that takes into consideration the challenges for Roma women emancipation; 2. Strong and comprehensive European policy on Roma integration that takes into consideration the challenges for Roma women emancipation; 3. Linking the overall European gender policy to take account of the challenges Roma women meet; and 4. Promoting the widespread application of an innovative approach for supporting the modernization of the Roma community and overcoming the patriarchal practices hampering the realization of the Roma woman.
The research on the phenomena of early marriages in Romania is the one conducted in 2012 by Rita Sorina Sein for ERRC – “Racial Discrimination, Deprivation, Segregation and Marginalisation as a Reinforcement of the Practice of Child Marriage”. Her report is based on a socio-economic comparison between Roma communities in two locations: Roma who migrated from Romania to Italy and have regular access to social services, and Roma who stayed in Romania and continue to live in a highly marginalised situation. This comparison is very interesting as it depicts the same Romanian Roma community (Geambasi community from Banat region) with the same cultural values and traditions but with visible different practices related to early marriages due to the only variable in the equation: socio-
124 Same reference as footnote no.77, page 43. 125 Ibid, page 43.
CAHROM (2015)8
 40

CAHROM (2015)8
economic status of the members of the community (the Roma migrants to Italy has been integrated in the wider communities from the locations in Italy, had sustainable access to employment, education, health services and social protection, while the Roma who remained in the location from Romania continued to live in destitute conditions, isolation from the wider society and lacking any development perspectives).
The data included in the report shows that of all Roma interviewed in Banloc village in Romania 96.5% were married before reaching the age of 18 (of all the 88 Roma women and men interviewed only 3 reached the age of 18 without being married – two men and a woman), while the Roma from Banloc village who migrated to Italy gave up the early marriage practice. All the cases of early marriage among the interviewees located in Italy were between people that married in Banloc before migrating and none of the girls and boys below the age of 18 were married or were planning to marry. In the case of the Romanian Roma who settled in Italy, the actual situation indicates a lack of support for the practice of child marriage. In Italy, the Romanian Roma “when asked at what age they would choose to marry, all males said after 18. In the case of girls, most of them said that they wanted to marry after they were 20 years old so that they could finish their studies and find employment before they got married.”126 When analyzing the reasons for “consenting” to an early marriage the girls interviewed in Romania often invoked “an understanding of the high level of poverty in which her family lived and the financial benefit that her family might gain if she got married.”127 “The Roma Judge also showed awareness of the socio- economic reasons that lead to child marriage in the Romani community”128 in Romania.
This research also goes into comparing the knowledge among the two Roma groups of the legal age of marriage (almost 80% of the Roma still living in Romania were unaware of the legal age of marriage in Romania, while 100% of the Roma who settled in Italy were aware of the legal age of marriage in Italy) or if the children are consulted about their marriage the girls and boys are consulted (in Romania 67% of women were not asked whether they agree or not to their marriage, while there was no child marriage case in Italy). Also the report comes to present one cultural practice associated with marriage, i.e. the virginity testing: “In the Romani community in Banloc (Romania) children are pushed to have sexual relations after the marriage ceremony and the girls then undergo a virginity test, an intrusive and in most, if not all, cases, degrading practice. In Banloc, Roma use only one modality of virginity testing: the bed sheet. The virginity of the bride is ‘proven’ by the bed sheet, which must be stained with blood after breaking the hymen. In the Banloc community there are women who perform the virginity test. For Romani girls this is the most important test of their life; it can have a great impact on their lives and puts tremendous psychological pressure on them. Virginity testing focuses the attention of the whole community on whether the girl appears to be a virgin or not. If girls do not “pass” the test by staining the sheet with blood on their wedding night, they are humiliated, mistreated and, in most cases, excluded from the community, along with their entire family. The education of children in the family is considered a woman’s responsibility. As a result, if a girl is not considered a virgin when she gets married, the mother of that girl will lose the respect of the entire community for the rest of her life. The community will believe that the mother did not know how to pass on the oral education about Romani culture and traditions, and she is not considered a Romani woman with traditional morality and respect. All married Romani girls and women interviewed in both locations say they underwent virginity testing, and they all state that they agreed to it as they consider it an important part of Romani values and tradition.”129
Other projects implemented for the prevention of early marriages have been implemented by the Roma Christian Centre , Sibiu (“Early Marriages in Kalderash Roma Communities – In Between Tradition and Law”, 2005), by Romani CRISS, Roma Parents Association - Iasi, Amare Rromentza Roma Centre, Asociatia Sanse Egale, etc (mostly community campaigns).
126 “Racial Discrimination, Deprivation, Segregation and Marginalisation as a Reinforcement of the Practice of Child Marriage”, Rita Sorina Sein, 2012, ERRC, pg. 19
127 Idem, pg. 19
128 Idem, pg. 19
129 Idem, pg. 20
 41

CAHROM (2015)8
VI. PENAL AND JUDICIAL RESPONSE TO CHILD/EARLY AND FORCED MARRIAGES 6.1 General remarks
Whether we refer to a child/early marriage or a forced marriage, both violate a number of universal human rights, and are unequivocally condemned by the international human rights regime.
Forced marriage is an appalling and indefensible practice and the very nature of forced marriage means that it is likely that many cases go unreported. It is a serious abuse of human rights and is never acceptable.
Country-level legal systems are often ill-equipped to combat – and at times even incentivize – child/early and forced marriages. Where child/early and forced marriages are criminalized, these practices often continue unchecked by state and local authorities. During the discussions, it was reported that, in a number of cases, local authorities and sometimes representatives of the church are invited to attend “traditional” marriages involving under legal age children and therefore give their de facto consent to such practices.
 The group of experts argues that irrespective of the ethnic background of the communities where the early marriage phenomena are manifest, a change in such practices are needed for the complete realization of the human rights of each girl and boy, of each woman and man.
 The group of experts recalls that the Istanbul Convention expressly requires the introduction of the formal crime of early/forced marriage.
6.2 National responses and measures
6.2.1 Romania
An overview of a number of selected crimes, as regulated in the new Romanian Penal Code, with potential application in cases of early marriages is available in Appendix 4, part A, of this report.
6.2.2 Italy
As for the relevant case-law, mention has to be made of the very recent Court of Cassation’s ruling (Judgment No. 16321, dated April 14, 2014) concerning the transfer to Italy of a Roma minor and the subsequent custody to the future father-in-law upon payment of a sum of money, to her parents. In this case, the Supreme Court has confirmed the following offences: trafficking, reduction into slavery, and sexual violence against a minor. Decisions of a similar nature had been already adopted in the past by the Supreme Court (See also Judgments Nos. 23989 and 23988, both dated June 15, 2011).
6.2.3 Republic of Moldova
The expert indicated that the Republic of Moldova, as a democratic state, respects one of the core democratic values of the rule of law - the principle of subsidiarity. The proposal to include the phenomenon of "early and/or forced marriage" under penal law should be formally addressed by representatives of the Roma community and/or Roma Civil Society.
6.2.4 The Netherlands
Article 273f of the Dutch Penal Code concerns human trafficking. A Dutch court sentenced a grandfather to 8 months of prison because he abused his granddaughter several years (between her 7th and 10th year of age) by forcing her to lift shops. That this grandfather was a Roma played no role in the court hearing and almost not in the news.
  42

The Parliament adopted a Memorandum with regard to the implementation of international regulations to combat smuggling and trafficking of human beings. A letter was addressed to the Second Chamber approach on forced marriage and leaving behind; both the letter and the reply appear in the Addendum to this report.
6.2.5 Poland
According to the information of General Prosecutor’s Office there are three related articles of Polish penal code related to forced and child/early marriages130.
According to Article 200 § 1 of the Criminal Code, subjecting a minor under the age of 15 to sexual activity is punished with imprisonment for a term of between 2 and 12 years. In accordance with Article 211, abducting or detaining a minor against the will of his or her care taker or supervisor is punished with imprisonment for up to 3 years. According to police data the number of instituted legal proceedings under this article in 2014 was 204 and asserted crimes was 59. In Poland, early marriage under 15 is often referred to as paedophilia since 15 is the minimum age of consent. Above 17 years old, the person is reliable to justice.
The number of case law seems to be rather limited. Early marriages among Roma come into the light coincidently. The Polish expert mentioned three cases:
- In 2007, the District Court of Kedzierzyn Kozle condemned a 23 year old Roma man for marrying a 14 year old girl. He was sentenced for 8 months imprisonment suspended for 3 years and assigned a court probation officer;
- In 2006, a 12 year old Roma girl of Kowary who was “traditionally” married to her 24 year old cousin was brought to a maternity ward;
- In 2006, in Opole a 21 year old man was married to a 16 year old girl (caught on shop lifting).
6.2.6 United Kingdom
The 2014 Anti-Social Behaviour, Crime and Policing Bill that entered into force on 16 June 2014:
- ensures that victims are protected against forced marriage which is a fundamental breach of basic
human rights;
- sends a clear message that forcing a person to marry against his/her will is unacceptable;
- provides further clarity for frontline professionals and also communities that forced marriage is
totally unacceptable and will not be tolerated in the United Kingdom;
- aims to reduce the number of victims that are being forced into marriage;
- aims to deter perpetrators from actively seeking to force someone into marriage in the future.
Penalties for a forced marriage offence are as follows:
- If convicted in a criminal court, maximum penalty on indictment will imprisonment for a term not
exceeding seven years;
- If convicted in a civil court, maximum penalty on summary conviction will be imprisonment for a
term not exceeding six months imprisonment and/or a fine.
Penalties in case of a breach of a forced marriage protection order (FMPO):
- If the breach is in a criminal court, maximum penalty on indictment will imprisonment for a term not exceeding five years;
- If the breach is in a civil court, maximum penalty on summary conviction will be imprisonment for a term not exceeding six months.
CAHROM (2015)8
 130 See those articles in Appendix 4, part B.
43

VII. CONCRETE MEASSURES AND TOOLS TO PREVENT CHILD/EARLY AND FORCED MARRIAGES, ASSIST AND PROTECT THE VICTIMS
7.1 Romania
See chapter VI above.
7.2 Italy
Several measures have been implemented in recent times to be eventually associated with the fight against child, early and/or forced marriage - as promoted by some relevant competent Ministries whose experiences insist on the opportunity to improve the exchange of information and the adoption of common procedures and the training of specialized personnel who enter into contact with women and girls as victims.
As an example, the Italian Ministry of Justice launched in the biennium 2011-2013, the following activities: 1. the possibility of signing MoUs at the local level, with CSOs, to improve the exchange of information between magistrates, law enforcement officials, health-care providers and other relevant stakeholders when dealing with cases of gender-based violence; 2. the possibility of defining modalities to collect relevant quantitative and qualitative data on all forms of discrimination against women and girls, to better steer local and national actions; 3. confidence-building measures in the judicial sector to adequately protect victims of violence especially when rendering testimony against offenders; 4. training and awareness-raising initiatives at the local level, considering that the fight against impunity goes through action-oriented measures, including police training, free legal aid, and effective protection for the victims and the witnesses.
Under the 2011 MoU between the Department for Equal Opportunities and the Ministry of Interior, the issues of domestic violence, stalking and discriminatory acts have been included through the formula ‘“Stalking and crimes against the so-called vulnerable groups (women, children, the elderly)”; in 2012, by providing for monitoring and tackling discriminatory acts against minority groups; in 2013, by focussing on the issue of violence against women and children from the juridical, psychological and operational standpoints.
Another relevant project was recently concluded by the Ministry of Health and Candelaria Donne Immigrate Onlus and refers to the “Health and security of the newborn: a guide for immigrant families” by which it was arranged the publication and broadest dissemination of a pamphlet on child-maternity health care, entitled “girls and boys: children of the world”. It was made in 10 different languages, to reflect the languages spoken by the largest immigrant communities living in Italy.
Finally, at the international cooperation level, mention should be made of the sectoral Guidelines by the Directorate General for Development Cooperation at the Ministry of Foreign Affairs, with the contribution of relevant public and private stakeholders, on gender equality and women’s empowerment and children’s rights, respectively. Among the main initiatives of the Italian Development Cooperation the following could be interrelated with the issue under examination: “acquire data relating to cases of maltreatment, and the sexual abuse and exploitation of children, to gain a better understanding of the various elements and dimensions of the phenomenon and the complex risk factors, and for the purpose of monitoring in the field; implement prevention policies, including through networks of institutions with responsibility for child protection, with two priority goals: One is to support the most vulnerable households and/or those experiencing difficulties, including by improving the services and instruments available to prevent and overcome intra-family disputes and other situations of vulnerability. And the other is to link up services provided by schools and other institutions in contact with the population in order to strengthen monitoring activity. The aim here is to promptly identify cases of risk and/or of actual violation. The focus should be
44
CAHROM (2015)8

CAHROM (2015)8
on situations of disadvantage, marginalisation and deviance. The national and international media should also be involved so that they can collaborate in promoting and disseminating an ethos that rejects all forms of violence against children”.
7.3 Republic of Moldova
In 2003 the Moldovan Helsinki Committee has issued recommendation by central, regional and local authorities to development special issues to include all school-age Roma in schools, especially Roma girls that manifest the highest level of drop.131
On 20 December 2013 was launched the first Network of Young Roma Women activists with the support of the UN family in Moldova and NGO “Tarna Rom”. Network is an informal group of young Roma communities, aims to become a platform for identifying important issues for Roma women and girls from the Republic of Moldova. “It is important that Young Roma Women have a platform that could jointly address issues of community and society in general”, said Rada Padureanu, president of the Network of Young Roma Women activists.132
7.4 Netherlands
The Dutch CAHROM expert referred to a number of existing reports, including the report of the Police Academy on multi problem families with a Roma background133 and the final report of the exploration group on strengthening approach forced marriage and leaving behind.
7.5 Poland
In Poland since 2001 works the group of c.a. 100 Roma school assistants of Roma origin. Roma school assistants do not play the role of mediator in such cases but one of their objectives at work is encouraging the Roma parents to continue their children education on upper level. Since the discussion on this subject seems to become more and more important in the agenda of various international organisations, the Polish side decided to put that problem into the agenda of newly composed Roma Team, acting within the framework of Joint Commission of Government and National and Ethnic Minorities. At the same time the network of 16 plenipotentiaries of Voivod on National and Ethnic minorities was asked in 2015 to raise the problem of early/forced marriages during the meetings with Roma school assistants in order to get a picture of this phenomenon in local Roma communities and get some information. Since the Polish Roma do not have any relations with migrant it is hard to involve the migrant Roma into activities led by Roma school assistants at present.
7.6 United Kingdom
The Forced Marriage Unit (FMU), established in 2005134, is now the Government’s main delivery arm for developing effective Government policy; awareness-raising; and domestic and consular casework. The FMU provides direct assistance to victims, as well as undertakes a full programme of outreach activity to practitioners and communities to ensure that people working with victims are fully informed of how to approach such cases. Overseas the FMU provides consular assistance to victims prior to or after marriage to secure their return to the United Kingdom. The Forced Marriage Unit (FMU) provides support at every stage by:
131 Situaţia comunităţilor rurale ale romilor in Republica Moldova: Regiunea Centru-Vest. Raport. Chișinău: Comitetul Helsinki pentru Drepturile Omului din Republica Moldova, 2003. https://www.academia.edu/6932138/Raport_Situatia_Romilor_din_Republica_Moldova_in_zona_rurala_Centru-Vest_2003
132 http://www2.un.md/news_room/pr/2013/Roma_20Dec2013/index_rom.shtml
133 English summary available in the Addendum. 134 https://www.gov.uk/forced-marriage.
    45

CAHROM (2015)8
- helping to protect children – the FMU helps those working in education and safeguarding children know how to spot the earliest signs a child may be at risk and know what action to take – this has included revised statutory guidance for professionals and multi-agency guidelines for handling forced marriage. The FMU is also working with NGOs like Freedom Charity to raise awareness in schools through the use of the Freedom mobile phone ap, the accredited lesson plans of forced marriage and a free copy of the "But it’s not fair’ Aneeta Prem book to all libraries, police forces and schools that request them for every pupil (a fictional story written for children aged between 11-16 on how to help a friend at risk);
- assisting young people at risk of being taken abroad and forced into marriage – in 2012, the FMU ran a major summer awareness campaign highlighting the right to choose and the help that is available. In 2014 the FMU had an awareness campaign before school holidays all through social media – reflecting the need to use avenues and formats which children and teens would use themselves. The FMU also worked with National Society for the Prevention of Children Cruelty (NSPCC) to create a short animation aimed at 13-17 year olds explaining the change in Law and the difference between arranged and forced marriage. In addition to this, the FMU also undertakes approximately 120 outreach events annually including schools and colleges;
- raising awareness across all communities – the FMU has rolled out a nation-wide engagement programme focused on prevention and education, delivered through regional road shows and debates – this has been in conjunction with Karma Nirvana a leading NGO whose national helpline specifically supports those at risk of Honour-Based-Violence (HBV) and/or forced marriage;
- ensuring that victims receive the right support in a joined up way – the FMU has developed and expanded its current training for frontline professionals ensuring all the relevant agencies are included - the CPS, the police, the judiciary, health agencies, social services, and Independent Domestic and Sexual Violence Advisors – ensuring that every local authority nominates a Single Point of Contact;
- assisting those who have already become victims overseas – the FMU continues to fund a comprehensive package of support for those who are repatriated, inclusive of funding NGO Southall Black Sisters to provide one to one care and support for victims repatriated – this includes, housing, counselling, legal protection, engaging again with education and employment and helping them to access benefits they are entitled to.
In addition, the FMU collects statistics135 from calls to its National Helpline136. Through its national helpline and email address the FMU reassures, assists, provides options and remains victim focused.
It works with police, social workers, teachers, welfare officers, health professionals and many others in United Kingdom to protect people at risk. It provides support, guidance, information and contacts and arranges safe accommodation in the United Kingdom.
When the victim has been taken overseas, the FMU provides the following support:
- Signposting to BHC/Embassies;
- Arrange safe accommodation overseas;
- Assistance with their return to the UK, providing local knowledge linked to exit visas;
- Close work with police and staff at airports addressing preventative measures and safety/support
whilst victims are in the airport and then managing risks for victims upon their return;
- Awareness of local laws in order to provide advice on any travel limitations;
- Organise repatriation - and rescues in extreme cases;
135 See those statistics under sub-chapter 3.6.
136 +44 (0)207008 0151 from 9am-5pm Mon-Fri and GRC out of hours.
 46

CAHROM (2015)8
- Accompanying victims to the airport – especially in the case of minors;
- Organise emergency flights/ travel documents with safe pick-up and transport from airport.
The FMU also provides after-care for repatriated victims. An aftercare project is being delivered by the NGO Southall Black Sisters which provides emotional and practical support for victims that have been repatriated to the United Kingdom. Without support, victims can experience pressure to return home. This project aims to bridge the gap that victims experience in support and practical advice and enable them to develop a plan for the future.
The FMU has partly funded a useful free app developed by Freedom Charity for both potential victims and those concerned for others. Some of the features of this free app are:
- GPS Tracking;
- Advice for professionals – spotting the signs;
- Advice and checklist for friends and friends of victims;
- Links to nearest police station and hospitals;
- Information also on sexual abuse and FGM;
- Direct dial to Police, NSPCC, Freedom charity and the FMU helpline at the Foreign Office;
- Does not look like Forced Marriage App;
- Free to download on IPhones and Blackberries.
The FMU has published inter alia the following:
- Booklet “What is a forced marriage”;
- Survivors’ Handbook;
- Statutory Guidance;
- Guidance for Registrars;
- Guidance for MPs and Councillors.
The Multi-Agency Practice Guidelines137 provides a list of warning signs (that are not exclusive to forced marriage though):
- Anyone, male or female, adult or minor, when facing a threat of forced marriage may become anxious, depressed and emotionally withdrawn with low self-esteem;
- there may also be more overt (but less common) signs in cases involving females; for example cut or shaved hair (as form of punishment), being taken to the doctors to be examined to ensure she is a virgin or presenting to hospital/doctors with symptoms associated with poisoning.
     +44 (0)208 571 0800/(0)208 571 9595
  137 A full list of warning indicators can be found on page 13 of the Multi-Agency Practice Guidelines. 47
 
VIII.CONCLUSIONS, LESSONS LEARNT, GOOD PRACTICES IDENTIFIED AND FOLLOW-UP
8.1 Conclusions as regards the organisation of the thematic visit
The group of experts expressed great satisfaction about the organisation and the proposed agenda of the thematic visit by the Ministry of Labour, Family, Social Protection and Elderly and the hosting of the round table by the Ministry of Foreign Affairs. Experts found it particularly useful to have bilateral meetings with key line ministries and central government institutions during the first day and before having the roundtable. The group of experts considers however that it might have been also useful to meet during the visit representatives from the Ministry of Justice, as well as the Ministry of Interior and its anti- trafficking Unit. The participation of local authorities’ representatives during the round table was also limited. Experts regretted that the visit could not be a day longer to address deeper certain aspects.
The group of experts would like to thank all Romanian interlocutors for their availability and rich interventions, and wish to underline the presence of numerous high officials (inter alia State Secretaries from various ministries, the Prime Minister’s advisor on Roma issues, Members of the Romanian Parliament, president of the National Agency for Roma) which showed real interest for the topic. The experts also appreciated the efforts of the organisations to bring at the round table family members of traditional Roma communities which allowed lively testimonials during the discussion and also welcomed the presence of the president of traditional Roma communities, Roma academics and anthropologists.138 The group of experts understand that due to the sensitivity of the topic, and the full agenda proposed by Romanian hosting authorities, a field visit to a Roma district or village was not proposed.
8.2 General conclusions on how to address the topics of child/early and forced marriages
During the thematic visit, the experts of the CAHROM thematic group came up with the following conclusions on how to address the topic of child/early and forced marriages:
 The appropriate term is “child marriage” instead of “early marriage”; the first expression reflects accurately the gravity of the facts, i.e. a child is the victim of this practice.
 The group of experts has therefore decided to use “child/early marriage” in this report and to rename the full thematic report as follows: “Thematic report on promoting gender equality within Roma communities with a focus on child/early and forced marriages”.
 The group of experts considers that the key parameter to define forced marriage/union is the lack of free consent of the person. Not every child marriage is a forced marriage, unless a third party (usually an adult) is involved. When two young people get “married” or decide to be in an official or unofficial union, it does not have to be considered as a forced marriage or union.
 It also considers that it is more appropriate to speak about “unions” instead of “marriages”, in particular when there is no official record of the marriage. Some of these unions can be consensual; others can be forced under the pressure of adults or family members.
 The group of experts agrees that irrespective of the ethnic background of the communities where the early marriage phenomenon is manifest, a change in such practice is needed for the complete realisation of the human rights of each girl and boy, of each woman and man. It also recalls that the Istanbul Convention expressly requires the introduction of the formal crime of early/forced marriage.
138 For the full list of Romanian interlocutors and their names, please see the agenda of the thematic visit in Appendix 2. 48
CAHROM (2015)8
 
8.3 General conclusions and lessons learnt concerning the approach towards child/early and forced marriages
The group of experts identified the following persisting challenges related to child/early and forced marriages in Roma communities:
1. There is a lack of conceptual clarity on child/early and forced marriages in the legal and policy frameworks.
2. Relevant international instruments need to be ratified, e.g. the Netherlands, the Republic of Moldova, Romania and the United Kingdom need to ratify the Istanbul Convention on preventing and combating violence against women and domestic violence.
3. International instruments ratified need to be transposed into internal legislation and policies (e.g. Article 37 of the Council of Europe Convention on preventing and combating violence against women and domestic violence on forced marriages needs to be transposed into Romanian penal legislation).
4. The problematic of child/early marriages is absent from the most relevant national strategies (rights of the child rights, Roma inclusion, gender equality, education and health policies, etc.). As an example, the Government Strategy for the Inclusion of the Romanian Citizens Belonging to Roma Minority 2015-2020 and the National Gender Equality Strategy 2014-2017 of Romania fail to address child/early marriage. The National Strategy for the Protection and Promotion of Child Rights 2014- 2020 and the draft National Strategy on Reducing Early School Leaving do refer to child/early marriages, but only in its analysis of the situation.
5. The futile ethnicization of the problematic of child/early marriages and stigmatization of the Roma communities as a whole should be avoided. E.g. Annex 1 of the Government Decision 49/2011 for the adoption of the Framework Methodology on the prevention and multi-disciplinary team and network intervention in cases of child abuse and domestic violence states “Early marriages or child betrothal that involves sexual relations (especially in the Roma communities)”.
6. Reliable official data (both quantitative and qualitative) on child/early and forced marriages are limited. “The absence of reliable data on early and forced marriages is an irrefutable prove of the lack of commitment of the state institutions to identify, monitor, prevent and combat the harmful practice of early marriages and needs to be addressed in any further public national strategy”139.
7. Limited culture of multi-sector administrative co-operation and interventions, in general, and in Roma community development interventions, in particular, and limited synergy between government and civil society interventions. “The main task in Romania should be to create a synergy of NGOs and state institution public policies and to implement at all levels public policies specifically directed to prevent, detect and combat the harmful practice of early marriages. Prevention and education campaigns should take place with the equal involvement of all stakeholders and the ownership of the process should remain with the targeted traditional Roma communities. The above mentioned in no way releases the commitment of the state institutions, which should create the mechanisms for institutionalising and financial provision for these activities.”140
139 Preventing Early Marriages, Amalipe Center for Interethnic Dialogue and Tolerance (Bulgaria), Liga Pro Europa (Romania), Association for Social Support of Europe – ARSIS (Greece), 2011, (Reference number JLS/2008/DAP3/AG/1298-30-CE- 03124780080), pg.30
140 Preventing Early Marriages, Amalipe Center for Interethnic Dialogue and Tolerance (Bulgaria), Liga Pro Europa (Romania), Association for Social Support of Europe – ARSIS (Greece), 2011, (Reference number JLS/2008/DAP3/AG/1298-30-CE- 03124780080), pg.163
CAHROM (2015)8
 49

CAHROM (2015)8
Human rights institutions, such as Gender Equality and Children’s Rights Ombudspersons, at national and international levels, should pay more attention through their monitoring mechanisms to the situation of Roma women and girls, ensuring that children’s rights are respected and law is enforced when it comes to compulsory education, combating early marriages, fighting drug trafficking/addiction, etc., using inter alia the relevant Council of Europe Conventions (e.g. Istanbul and Lanzarote Conventions), the Council of Europe Strategy for the Rights of the Child and its transversal Programme “Building a Europe for and with Children”.
In addition, more attention should be paid to policies and actions addressing Roma youth taking into consideration certain characteristics of the Roma community which for many reasons require a more specific and targeted approach since the situation of Roma youth largely differs from non-Roma youth, including as regards their marital status and early marriages. This was reflected not only in the conclusions of the CAHROM thematic visit on the empowerment of Roma youth and the youth dimension of national Roma integration strategies carried out in Slovenia on 4-6 June 2015141 but also in the OSCE-ODIHR Report from the 8-9 December 2014 Conference in Belgrade on Activism, Participation and Security among Roma and Sinti Youth (see extracts of pages 39-42 of the OSCE-ODIHR report below142):
Marital status and early marriages: One of the characteristics that may set Roma youth apart from non-Roma youth is their marital status and, more specifically, the percentage of early marriages among Roma. The current marital status143 of participants was analysed using one indicator from Module 1 of the survey on the marital status of all household members. Figure 18 provides the distribution of marital status across the entire sample of Roma and non-Roma participants. Most of the Roma youth in this sample were currently either married (traditionally or officially) or cohabitating with a partner (58 per cent in total), whereas most of their non-Roma counterparts had never been married (59 per cent).” In order to measure the number of early marriages among Roma and non-Roma youth, we took responses to the question “Which year did s/he get married/ begin cohabiting?” from Module 1 of the UNDP/WB/ EC survey and compared these to the year of birth of respondents. Based on the results, out of 6,166 marriages, 2,166 were early marriages. The total number of early marriages among Roma youth was 1,971, compared with 194 among non-Roma youth. The earliest age of marriage or cohabitation with a partner registered among Roma youth was 6 years old, compared to 8 years old among non-Roma youth. Most of the respondents who were married before the age of 18 were female, including 1,412 Roma and 160 non-Roma girls. The number of early marriages varied across the countries surveyed, ranging from 54 in the Czech Republic and 270 in Albania, revealing that early marriages are more common in some countries in Central and South-Eastern Europe than in others. These results show that early marriages are far more likely to occur among Roma populations than among non-Roma populations, particularly among Roma girls, and that early marriages continue to be an issue in the countries of Central and South-Eastern Europe. Table 4 shows the number of early marriages among Roma and non-Roma youth disaggregated by the age at which the respondent was married or began cohabiting with a partner.
Arranged marriages: In the previous section, we showed that about one third of young Roma respondents to the survey were married before the age of 18, and that more than 70 per cent of them were girls. Early marriages (official and unofficial) often happen as a result of pressure from family members, especially if an opportunity rises for the child to marry someone living abroad. As such, the marriage becomes an arrangement between two families rather than a choice between two people. Although not all arranged marriages are early marriages, the UNDP/WB/EC survey studied attitudes specifically towards arranged marriages for children. Thus, we decided to examine perceptions among Roma and non-Roma youth of arranged marriages for boys, on the one hand, and for girls, on the other. Figure 19 provides the gender distribution of Roma and non-Roma youth who expressed the opinion that arranged marriages for boys and for girls are unacceptable. The results show that the majority of Roma and non- Roma youth do not agree with the practice of arranged marriages for children. Nevertheless, the difference between Roma and non-Roma respondents who think arranged marriages are not acceptable is more than 20 per cent, with more Roma youth finding the practice acceptable. It is recommended that future research examine the issue of arranged marriages among Roma from a gender perspective, as well as in relation to economic prosperity and education.
141 See CAHROM (2015)9.
142 The full report, including tables and figures, is accessible at: http://www.osce.org/odihr/187861?download=true.
143 This “Marital status” indicator consisted of seven categories: (1) never married; (2) married – traditionally; (3) married – officially; (4) cohabitation; (5) separated; (6) divorced; and (7) widowed. The indicator does not provide sufficient information on the meaning of “married - traditionally” and how it differs from “married - officially” or “cohabitation”. (
    50

- - -
CAHROM (2015)8
8.4 Conclusions & characteristics of an effective model for the prevention of child/early marriage:
1) There is a need to clarify conceptually the child/early marriages in the legal and policy frameworks;
2) Once the conceptual framework is clarified there is a need to train the professionals working in the different services and agencies with a mandate to prevent and combat child/early and forced marriages (local governments, child protection authorities, education and health authorities, police and public prosecutor’s offices, etc.) as well as Roma NGOs and professionals;
3) Data collection and segregated data collection (within the legal framework and with all legal safeguards) is essential to exploring more in-depth such phenomena and to devising effective and efficient policy interventions. As well, data and segregated data should be connected to the existing data-bases (including the available Roma data-bases, such as the map of Roma communities);
4) There is a huge needs to increase awareness of the Roma communities on the intrinsic risks and dangers associated with child/early marriage, as well as on the dangers related to trafficking in Roma girls and boys or to exploitation of Roma girls and boys associated with child/early marriage and not only;
5) Interventions targeting the prevention and combating of child/early marriage should not be isolated interventions but rather a component of a wider integrated approach to Roma community development. Only integrated interventions (with multi-sectoral teams at both national, regional and community level) can eliminate the root causes of child/early marriages, in general, and in Roma traditional communities, in particular, and ensure a sustainable development of the communities where such phenomena are manifest;
6) Education – namely ensuring in practice compulsory education for all Roma children - is a valid entry point to change community mentalities, but then again education alone (such as campaigns, curriculum development for tackling child/early marriages, desegregation in education, etc.) will not be sustainable and educational interventions need to be complemented by other types of interventions (integrated approaches);
7) Interventions and messages targeting the prevention and combating of child/early marriage should be designed taking into account Roma cultural specificity and diversity;.
8) Interventions for the prevention of child/early marriages should be designed as part of wider community development plan and not as singled out intervention;
9) Support for community mobilization is crucial for the success of the interventions for the prevention of child/early marriage;
10) For the efficiency of the prevention of child/early marriages interventions there is needed a convergence / synergy of the mandates of all relevant authorities (child protection, social assistance, education, public health, various levels of government, etc.);
11) Personal examples of successful Roma people should be emphasized;
12)A position of the community condemning child/early marriage practices needs to be
institutionalized at community level (support from formal and informal community leaders is
crucial)144;
13) Child and women perspectives on child/early marriages should be heard and the community

participation mechanisms should make room for the child and women voices.
Indicators of forced marriage include (indicators listed below by the British expert are not necessarily relevant in the context of forced marriage within Roma communities):
Early school drop-out and school absenteeism;
The victim or other siblings within the family is/are reported missing;
Reports of domestic abuse;
 144 As positive examples, see statements from the Romania’s self-proclaimed Roma King and the president of traditional Roma communities condemning early marriages.
51

- - - -

Suicide attempt/overdose;
Leaving work accompanied/concern from employment;
Not returning from planned leave/school (missing from education); History of forced marriage in the family.
Factors, warning signs and indicators conducting to child/early and forced marriages
The Romanian experts recalled that main factors contributing to early marriages are a complex combination of poverty, marginalization, poorly understood community traditions and lack of opportunities and perspectives in Roma communities. Patriarchal community structures, community so- called cultural and traditional attitudes, and religious interpretations also lie at the heart of forced and child/early marriages.
The level of education of parents and children, economic hardship, cultural/and/or religious attitudes related to honour and sexuality can be both causes and risk factors for child/early and forced marriages.
The British expert listed some of the factors that are behind forced marriage in the United Kingdom context (which are not necessarily all applicable to Roma communities):
- Controlling unwanted behaviour particularly that of women;
- Preventing ‘unsuitable’ relationships;
- Claiming residence and citizenship to strengthen family links (e.g. getting a British Passport for
extended family);
- Wearing “wrong” clothing/too much make-up;
- Socialising with members of opposite sex;
- Being seen to be overly affectionate in public;
- Dating someone of different race, culture/caste or religion;
- Protecting perceived cultural or religious ideals;
- Providing carer for child with disabilities;
- Being or perceived as being LGBT;
- Drinking, smoking or using drugs.
 The experts underlined that no religion endorses forced marriage; similarly, forced marriage is a form of abuse... Abuse is not part of any culture, whether the victim’s family are Christian, Muslim, Sikh, Hindu or Jewish. No religious texts promote this harmful practice.
8.5 Negative consequences of child/early and forced marriages
This report does not seek to highlight in details the implications, consequences and dangers related to early marriages for the girls and boys involved in such practices but highlight those that have been mentioned by the experts of this thematic group during the thematic visit.
The consequences of child/early and forced marriages are severe. The Romanian experts indicated that for women, they generally result in a lack of autonomy, a lack of education, a limited decision-making power, as well as high risks of health problems, including sexual and reproductive health, insecurity, domestic violence, abuse, trafficking, or even death in the worst scenario.
Without getting into more details, it is worth recalling that young Roma are at risk of human trafficking as a result inter alia of child, arranged and forced marriages. In the OSCE-ODIHR report on Activism, Participation and Security among Roma and Sinti Youth (see footnote 141), it is stated that “Trafficking is not limited to sexual exploitation, and Roma and Sinti children and young women are also often forced into labour, marriage, begging and pick-pocketing.” (page 14); and “Roma and Sinti are also at risk of trafficking in human beings, child exploitation and forced labour, early and arranged marriages, and the numerous effects of these security risks on health, education and human development.” (page 18).
CAHROM (2015)8
  52

There are also negative consequences for society at large, from over-population to perpetuation of gender oppression145.
The British expert identified among the negative consequences of child/early and forced marriages:
- education and employment ceasing;
- theft (e.g. of passport, money and belongings);
- unlawful imprisonment and restriction of freedom of movement and association;
- abduction and kidnapping;
- rape;
- enforced pregnancy;
- abortion
- murder and mutilation.
The Dutch, Italian and Polish experts added to this list:
- human trafficking;
- prostitution;
- early school drop-outs (in particular of Roma girls) and school absenteeism.
One of the main consequences of early marriage in Roma families is early school drop-out (both for girls and boys) leading to exclusion from professional career, poverty, illiteracy, family breakdown146.
When dealing with victims of child/early and forced marriages:
one should:
 Take the victims seriously;
 See them immediately and alone;
 Respect their wishes and reassure them;
 Establish means of safe contact (secret phone/sim/codeword).
one should not:
 Send them away/minimise their concerns;
 Approach members of the family or Community;  Share information without consent;
 Attempt to mediate.
8.6 Key conclusions of the bilateral meetings of experts of the CAHROM thematic group with Romanian line ministries and central government agencies
Meetings have been organised with the following line ministries and central government agencies:
- Ministry of Labour (MoL);
- Department for the Equality of Chances between Men and Women (DECMW);
- National Authority for Child Rights Protection and Adoptions (NACRPA);
- Ministry of Health (MoH);
- Ministry of Education (MoE);
- National Agency for Roma (NAR).
The thematic group of experts drew the following key conclusions from these bilateral meetings:
145 Child, Early and Forced Marriage: A Multi-Country Study - A Submission to the UN Office of the High Commissioner on Human Rights (OCHCR), 15 December 2013, page 39.
146 See a number of testimonials in the presentation of the Moldovan expert in the Addendum to this report.
CAHROM (2015)8
   53

CAHROM (2015)8
- Child/early marriage in Roma communities issue is on the central government agenda but it is not among the top priorities (NAR) and devising a policy response to tackle child/early and forced marriages is still in its initial phases of the process (MoL).
- Ministries and central government agencies are approaching the child/early marriage phenomenon rather remotely and indirectly and, in any case, more on an ad-hoc basis.
- The same is valid for the existing national policies – they do not include expresis verbis strategic directions or measures for combating child/early marriages, but rather indirectly have included such measures (e.g. health education campaigns, counselling campaigns for adolescent girls, values of family life campaigns, etc.).
- Ministries and central government agencies have implemented specific interventions in Roma communities related to child/early marriages (again on an ad-hoc basis, following the notification of such phenomena by Roma or non-Roma NGOs or by other stakeholders).
- There has been expressed the political will to set up a functional, inter-ministerial mechanisms with a mandate for combating the child/early and forced marriage phenomenon in Roma communities, similar to the one existing now on anti-trafficking in human persons (MoL). It is considered that if by 2016 such a mechanisms will be set up this in itself will represent a huge progress.
- All ministries and central government agencies have decentralized or de-concentrated structures in the territory (local structures, school mediators, health mediators, local government experts, local support groups, etc.) but their capacity is limited and coordination among these structures remains a challenge.
- While there is a short history of interventions in Roma communities of the government authorities, there seems to be a complete absence of interventions in the non-Roma communities where child/early marriage phenomenon is manifest. This in itself induces an undue ethnicization of the government actions related to combating child/early marriages.
- Conceptual framework for the actions combating child/early marriages continues to be rather unclear: some ministries or agencies speak of early marriages and pre-early marriages (NAR), the distinction appearing to be informally related to the age of puberty/nubility of the girls.
- Pre-early marriages or child betrothals have been unequivocally condemned as illegal and unacceptable practices (as well as by the president and representatives of traditional Roma communities during the round table and by the self-proclaimed “king” of Romanian Roma).
- The National Agency for Roma reported a decrease in the dimensions of child/early marriages in Roma communities based on the reports of Roma NGOs and on the evolving standpoints of Roma community leaders.
- Ministries and central government agencies are reluctant to collect ethnic segregated data invoking the EU and national legislation on sensitive data. They seem unaware of the possibility to collect such data in a legal and non-discriminatory manner provided that the necessary safeguards related to sensitive data, regulated in both the EU and national legislation, are in-built in the data collection processes.
8.7 Country specific conclusions/lessons learnt
8.7.1 Romania, hosting country
The group of experts noted with satisfaction the openness from both public authorities and institutions and the Roma community leaders and activists to address the very sensitive issue of early/child and forced marriage and the commitment to condemn child/early marriage of children less than 15 years old. Some divergence still exists as regards the “grey zone” between 15 and 18 years old.
The group of experts was positively impressed by the opportunities given to ethnic Roma to participate in public institutions and the number of Roma involved at national, regional and local levels in those institutions, as well as by the high number of Roma school and health mediators.
54

CAHROM (2015)8
The group of experts considers that child/early marriage and measures to address this phenomenon should be introduced in the Roma Inclusion Strategy and the National Gender Equality Strategy 2014-2017, if not in the short term, at least when these documents will be re-examined for another periodic timeframe. The system of Helpline should be reinforced and improved so as not to leave Roma women victims of domestic violence or pressure to get married alone once they have signalled their case.
8.7.2 Partner countries
As underlined by the Moldovan expert, any Roma-related topic, beyond the case of child/early and forced marriage, should bring the expertise from five main stakeholders: central government institutions (ministries); local public authorities; Roma community representatives; Roma civil society leaders; and international organisations. Conclusions might not be as convincing is one of these opinions is missing. The Moldovan expert also advised to research and debate early marriages within Roma communities in conjunction with early school dropouts. On the contrary, extrapolating the topic of child/early marriage together with the phenomena of "sexual abuse", "domestic violence", "trafficking in human beings", and "protection of children's rights" create confusion for the contextual analysis of the causes and consequences of this phenomenon within Roma communities. He indicated also that representatives of the Roma community and/or Roma civil society in the Republic of Moldova should lobby for the introduction of the phenomenon of "early and/or forced marriage" under penal law.
The thematic group of experts considers that Poland should include a definition of “multiple discrimination” in its legislation on equal treatment and address it specifically within its national programmes, such as the National Programme for Equal Treatment for 2013-2016 and the Programme for integration of the Roma community in Poland 2014-2020. As regards the latter programme, the group of experts also considers that direct references to specific problems faced by Roma women, including in relation to their empowerment147 and participation, should be included, as well as information pertaining to the participation and involvement of Roma women in the implementation of this programme collected.
Concerning the Polish Family and Guardianship Code, the group of experts is of the view that Article 10 would need to be amended so as to replace the conditionality of a possible derogatory court decision to allow a woman who has reached the age of 16 to marry “if the marriage would be in the best interest of the newly established family” by “if the marriage would be in the best interest of the child”. It might be worth including direct references to dealing with specific problems of Roma women or to women empowerment in the Programme for Integration of the Roma community in Poland 2014-2020.
Whilst being impressed by the work of the Forced Marriage Unit in the United Kingdom, the group of experts considers that the FMU should elaborate more statistics as regards the phenomenon of forced marriage within Roma and possibly Traveller communities. In that respect, it might be worth recruiting Roma (Gypsy and Traveller) mediators or social workers and conducting some research involving representatives of the community.
8.8 Good practices identified per country In Romania:
In the absence of a sustainable approach to the prevention of early marriages (most of the initiatives were sporadic and rather donor-driven) and in the absence of any monitoring and evaluation data on the impact of the various initiatives or of the implementation of the very few policies touching the problematic of early marriages it would be hazardous to speak of “best practices” in this field. Yet, the existing body of evidence allows us to include these key initiatives among “promising practices”.
147 Poland is not an exception in this regard. See the CAHROM thematic report (2014)11 on Roma women’s empowerment and the inclusion of a gender dimension into national Roma integration strategies/policies which covers Lithuania (as a requesting country) and Finland, Italy, the Republic of Moldova and Spain (as partner countries).
 55

The extensive use of Roma school and health mediators remains a positive asset. The Polish expert has expressed interest for the training of 1000 of Roma health mediators and the system of community nurses developed in Romania. In Poland it is difficult to recruit Roma health mediators for cultural reasons.
In Italy:
- Ratification of major international instruments, including the Istanbul Convention.
- Dialogue with Roma and Sinti civil society (in particular from UNAR).
In the Republic of Moldova:
- The gender component of the National Action Plan for Roma.
- Court cases and national case law concerning child marriage.
In the Netherlands:
- The attention given to the protection on young Roma, and girls in particular.
- The fact that, in accordance with the Dutch legislation, child abuse can be prosecuted.
In Poland:
- The National Programme for Equal Treatment for 2013-2016.
- The human rights approach of police training.
- The well-developed system of (100) school assistants.
In the United Kingdom:
- The setting-up and the work of a Forced Marriage Unit. 8.9 Follow-up
During the thematic visit, the President of the National Agency for Roma (NAR), Mr Daniel Vasile, indicated that he would explore the possibility to revive the Dosta! campaign in Romania, the NAR having be attributed the coordination role of the Dosta! campaign in Romania in 2009. The introduction of a gender perspective to the Dosta! campaign could help raising awareness to some of the issues discussed during the thematic visit, keeping in mind that one of the campaign goals is to combat stereotypes.
At the end of the thematic visit, the Dutch and Italian experts of the thematic group expressed the wish to visit the Forced Marriage Unit in London so as to get more familiar with the British approach to forced marriages and the work of the MFU. The dates of such a visit remain to be defined.
At the end of the thematic visit, the Moldovan expert promised to send extra copies of the publication 500- year historical presence of Roma in the Republic of Moldova – which was distributed to various Romanian interlocutors of the thematic visit - to the I-CARE Unit of the Support Team of the Special Representative of the Secretary General of the Council of Europe for Roma issues.
6-7 May 2015: the Italian and Romanian female experts of the thematic group and some of the Romanian Roma women that have participated in the round table organised during the thematic visit have been invited to the preparatory meeting of the 5th international Roma Women’s Review Conference that was held in Skopje, “the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia” on 6-7 October 2015. The topic of child/early and forced marriages within Roma communities was proposed as a topic for the agenda of the 5th International Roma Women’s Review Conference.
27-29 May 2015: preliminary conclusions of the present thematic report were presented at the 9th meeting of the Council of Europe Ad Hoc Committee of Experts on Roma Issues (CAHROM) by the CAHROM member on behalf of Romania, Mr Codrin Scutaru, State Secretary in the Family Policies and Social Assistance Directorate of the Ministry of Labour, Family, Social Protection and Elderly.
56
CAHROM (2015)8

In June 2015: gender equality and empowerment of Roma women was introduced as a line of action in the Council of Europe’s Updating agenda for on Roma Inclusion (2015-2019) presented by the Secretary General and approved by the Committee of Ministers of the Council of Europe. The Council of Europe’s Thematic Action Plan on the Inclusion of Roma and Travellers (2016-2019) under preparation includes proposals to empower Roma and Traveller women and promote gender equality, in particular as regards access of Roma women to justice, Roma women’s entrepreneurship and future Roma women’s conferences.
11-12 June 2015: the Dutch expert of the thematic group was invited to a brainstorming workshop in Rome with police officers and trainers on how to best train police officers or police academy students on non-discrimination (with a focus on Roma) that will be co-organised by the Council of Europe and the Italian Ministry of Interior/OSCAD. The National Office against Racial Discrimination and Racism (UNAR) - for which the Italian expert of the thematic group is working – was also invited.
12 June 2015: the 2nd large scale meeting devoted to the situation of the Roma women in Poland was organised by the Government Plenipotentiary for Equal Treatment scheduled in Warsaw. The Polish expert of the thematic group already extended an invitation to the I-CARE Unit of the Support Team of the Special Representative of the Secretary General of the Council of Europe (SRSG) for Roma issues to present the conclusions of the preliminary conclusions of the present thematic report and the non- discrimination training activities for legal professionals and police officers. It resulted with a proposal to organise a non-discrimination training for the police and the Government Plenipotentiary for Equal Treatment in 2016. The I-CARE Unit will further establish contact with the Polish expert on how to associate the Polish Project showing successful Roma, many of them being Roma women, to the Dosta! campaign which has promoted exhibitions of portrayals and testimonials of successful integrated Roma in France and in Montenegro with the similar objective, i.e. promoting a better image of Roma and increasing their self-esteem. Such a co-operation could hopefully lead to the official launch of the Dosta! campaign in Poland under the coordination of the Government Plenipotentiary for Equal Treatment.
In October 2015: the new Council of Europe Strategy for the Rights of the Child 2016-2021 which is based on four main principles of the United Convention on the Rights of the Child (UNCRC) – i.e. the best interests of the child, non-discrimination, participation and the right to life, survival and development – has included among its priorities some actions to evaluate the effective implementation of Roma children’s rights, to address the issue of early/child marriage, to strengthen access of Roma children and in particular girls to inclusive education, to make use of Roma mediators and school assistants, as well as to fight stereotypes against Roma children. The inclusion of these proposals was supported by the CAHROM Rapporteur for Roma children at the Committee of Children’s Rights (DECS-ENF).
6-7 October 2015: following the decision taken in consultation with Roma women activists and representatives of Roma women’s associations and networks, the topic of child/early and/or forced marriage was addressed in one of the sessions of the 5th International Roma Women’s Review Conference that was held in Skopje, “the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia”.
27-30 October 2015: the present thematic report will be presented and discussed in Bucharest, Romania, following the invitation from the Romanian Ministry of Labour, Family, Social Protection and Elderly to host the 10th plenary session of CAHROM. It will be also an occasion to discuss any developments following the endorsement by the CAHROM in October 2014 of the CAHROM thematic report (2014)11 on Roma women’s empowerment and the inclusion of a gender dimension into national Roma integration strategies/policies which covered Lithuania (as a requesting country) and Finland, Italy, the Republic of Moldova and Spain (as partner countries), as well as any follow-up to the International Seminar on promoting the gender dimension into national Roma integration strategies/policies organised in Kyiv, Ukraine, in November 2014.
57
CAHROM (2015)8

CAHROM (2015)8
After the adoption of the thematic report by the CAHROM: the report will be circulated for information and possible use to the Secretariat Group of Experts on Action against Trafficking in Human Beings (GRETA), to the Secretariat of the Group of Experts on Action against Violence against Women and Domestic Violence (GREVIO) and to the Secretariat of the Steering Committee on Human Rights (CDDH), the latter having introduced combating early marriages as one of its thematic priorities (this topic will be on the agenda of the CDDH in May 2016 and the CAHROM thematic report will be circulated to the CDDH Secretariat).
In November 2015: a non-discrimination training for the police in the Republic of Moldova will be organised by the Council of Europe Support Team of the SRSG for Roma Issues. The issue of child marriage in relation to human trafficking might be addressed during the training. Following a request addressed by the Bureau for Inter-Ethnic Relations of the Republic of Moldova to the Council of Europe, expertise could be provided in the coming months to assess the implementation of the National Roma Action Plan of the Republic of Moldova. If so, particular attention will be devoted to the gender aspects.
At the individual level, the way how persons originating of mixed marriages (including a Romani spouse and another from the majority) are perceived, varies considerably from one local context to another but in many cases the perception is negative, especially in Western countries, and would deserve a specific study. Another topic that could deserve specific attention and which was referred to through individual testimonials is the difficulty for an educated Roma woman in her 30s to find a husband within the Roma community.
A topic that could deserve specific attention and which was mentioned during the thematic visit to Romania by individual testimonials is the difficulty for an educated Roma woman in her 30s to find a husband within the Roma community.
As a follow-up of this thematic report, the Support team of the Special Representative of the Secretary General for Roma Issues envisages to conduct a more comprehensive study on child and forced marriages within Roma communities in all Council of Europe member States based on the example of the study initiated by the Directorate General of Human Rights in 2005 entitled “Forced marriages in Council of Europe member states – a comparative study of legislation and political initiatives”148.
 148 This study was prepared by Ms Edwige Rude-Antoine, Doctor of Law, Research Officer CERSES/CNRS. 58

APPENDIX 1: Official invitation letter received from the Romanian authorities
Letter CAHROM.pdf
******
APPENDIX 2: Agenda of the CAHROM thematic visit to Bucharest,
Agenda of CAHROM
thematic visit to Romania 27-29 April 2015_Final Agenda.doc
****** APPENDIX 3: List of experts of the thematic group
List of experts of the
CAHROM thematic group on gender equality and early and forced marriage.doc
CAHROM (2015)8
      59

APPENDIX 4:
CAHROM (2015)8
  Overview of a number of selected crimes, as regulated in the new Romanian Penal Code, with potential application in cases of early marriages
Article 197 Ill treatments applied to minors
Serious jeopardy, through measures or treatments of any kind, of the physical, intellectual or moral development of a minor, by parents or by any person under whose care the minor is, shall be punishable by no less than 3 and no more than 7 years of imprisonment and a ban on the exercise of certain rights.
Article 199 Domestic violence
(1) If the acts set by Art. 188, Art. 189 and Art. 193-195 are committed against a family member, the special maximum term of the penalty set by law shall be increased by one-fourth.
(2) In case of offenses set by Art. 193 and Art. 196 committed against a family member, a criminal action may be initiated also ex officio. Reconciliation shall eliminate criminal liability.
Article 211 Trafficking in minors
(1) Recruitment, transportation, transfer, harbouring or receipt of a minor for the purpose of their exploitation shall be punishable by no less than 3 and no more than 10 years of imprisonment and a ban on the exercise of certain rights.
(2) If such act was committed under the terms of Art. 210 par.(1) or by a public servant while in the exercise of their professional duties and prerogatives, it shall be punishable by no less than 5 and no more than 12 years of imprisonment and a ban on the exercise of certain rights.
Article 213 Pandering
(1) The causing or facilitation of the practice of prostitution or the obtaining of financial benefits from the practice of prostitution by one or more individuals shall be punishable by no less than 2 and no more than 7 years of imprisonment and a ban on the exercise of certain rights.
(2) In the event that a person was determined to engage in or continue the practice of prostitution through coercion, the penalty shall be no less than 3 and no more than 10 years of imprisonment and a ban on the exercise of certain rights.
(3) If such acts are committed against a minor, the special limits of the penalty shall be increased by one- half.
(4) Practicing prostitution means having sexual intercourse with various individuals for the purpose obtaining financial benefits for oneself or for others.
Article 216 Use of an exploited person’s services
The action of using the services listed under Art. 182, provided by a person about whom the beneficiary knows that they are a victim of trafficking in human beings or of trafficking of minors, shall be punishable by no less than 6 months and no more than 3 years of imprisonment or by a fine, unless such action is a more serious offense.
Article 218 Rape
(1) Sexual intercourse, oral or anal intercourse with a person, committed by constraint, by rendering the person in question unable to defend themselves or to express their will or by taking advantage of such state, shall be punishable by no less that 3 and no more than 10 years of imprisonment and a ban on the exercise of certain rights.
(2) The same penalty shall apply to any act of vaginal or anal penetration committed under par. (1).
(3) It shall be punishable by no less than 5 and no more than 12 years of imprisonment and a ban on the exercise of certain rights, when:
a) the victim is entrusted to the perpetrator for care, protection, education, guard or treatment;
b) the victim is a direct-line relative, a brother or sister;
c) the victim has not turned 16 years;
 60

CAHROM (2015)8
d) the act was committed for the production of pornographic materials;
e) the act resulted in bodily harm;
f) the act was committed by two or more individuals, acting together.
(4) If such act resulted in the victim's death, it shall be punishable by no less than 7 and no more than 18 years of imprisonment and a ban on the exercise of certain rights.
(5) Criminal action for the act set by par. (1) and par. (2) shall be initiated based on a prior complaint filed by the victim.
(6) The attempt to commit the offenses set out in par. (1) - (3) shall be punishable.
Article 219 Sexual assault
(1) An act that is sexual in nature, other than those set out under Art. 218, with a person, committed by constraint, by rendering the person in question unable to defend themselves or to express their will or by taking advantage of such state, shall be punishable by no less than 2 and no more than 7 years of imprisonment and a ban on the exercise of certain rights.
(2) The penalty shall be no less than 3 and no more than 10 years of imprisonment and a ban on the exercise of certain rights, when:
a) the victim is entrusted to the perpetrator for care, protection, education, guard or treatment;
b) the victim is a direct-line relative, a brother or sister;
c) the victim has not turned 16 years of age;
d) the act was committed for the production of pornographic material;
e) the act resulted in bodily harm;
f) the act was committed by two or more individuals, acting together.
(3) If such act resulted in the victim's death, it shall be punishable by no less than 7 and no more than 15 years of imprisonment and a ban on the exercise of certain rights.
(4) If the sexual assault acts were preceded or followed by the commission of the sexual intercourse set out in Art. 218 par. (1) and par. (2), such act shall constitute rape.
(5) Criminal action for the act set by par. (1) shall be initiated based on a prior complaint filed by the victim.
(6) The attempt to commit the offenses set out in par. (1) and par. (2) shall be punishable.
Article 220 Sexual intercourse with a minor
(1) Sexual intercourse, oral or anal sex, as well as any act of vaginal or anal penetration committed with a minor aged 13 to 15 shall be punishable by no less than 1 and no more than 5 years of imprisonment. (2) The act set by par. (1), committed on a minor who has not turned 13 years of age, shall be punishable by no less than 2 and no more than 7 years of imprisonment and a ban on the exercise of certain rights.
(3) The act set by par. (1), committed by a person of age with a minor 13 to 18, when the former abused their authority or influence over the victim, shall be punishable by no less than 2 and no more than 7 years of imprisonment and a ban on the exercise of certain rights.
(4) The act set by par. (1) - (3) shall be punishable by no less that 3 and no more than 10 years of imprisonment and a ban on the exercise of certain rights, when:
a) the minor is a direct-line relative, a brother or sister;
b) the minor is entrusted to the perpetrator for care, protection, education, guard or treatment;
c) the act was committed for the production of pornographic materials.
(5) The acts set out in par. (1) and par. (2) shall not be punishable if the age difference does not exceed 3 years.
Article 221 Sexual corruption of minors
(1) The commission of an act that is sexual in nature, other than the one set out in Art. 220, against a minor who has not turned 13 of age, as well as determining a minor to endure or carry out such an act shall be punishable by no less than 1 and no more than 5 years of imprisonment.
(2) The penalty shall be no less than 2 and no more than 7 years of imprisonment and a ban on the exercise of certain rights, when:
61

CAHROM (2015)8
a) the minor is a direct-line relative, a brother or sister;
b) the minor is entrusted to the perpetrator for care, protection, education, guard or treatment;
c) the act was committed for the production of pornographic materials.
(3) The sexual act of any nature, committed by a person of age in the presence of a minor who has not turned 13 shall be punishable by no less than 6 months and no more than 2 years of imprisonment or by a fine.
(4) Determination of a minor who has not yet turned 13 years of age, by a person of age, to assist to the commission of acts that are exhibitionist in nature or to shows or performances in which sexual acts of any kind are committed, and making materials that are pornographic in nature available to the minor shall be punishable by no less than 3 months and no more than 1 year of imprisonment or by a fine.
(5) The acts set out in par. (1) shall not be punishable if the age difference does not exceed 3 years.
Article 222 Recruitment of minors for sexual purposes
The act of an individual of age to propose that a minor who has not yet turned 13 years of age to meet for the purposes of the commission of one of the acts set out in Art. 220 or Art. 221, including when such proposal has been made using remote communication means, shall be punishable by no less than 1 month and no more than 1 year of imprisonment or by a fine.
Article 223 Sexual harassment
(1) Repeatedly soliciting sexual favours as part of an employment relationship or a similar relationship, if by so doing the victim was intimidated or placed in a humiliating situation, shall be punishable by no less than 3 months and no more than 1 year of imprisonment or by a fine.
(2) Criminal action shall be initiated based on a prior complaint filed by the victim.
Forced and child/early marriages in Polish criminal law
According to the information of General Prosecutor’s Office there are three related articles of Polish penal code in that context:
- Article 189a.
§ 1. Whoever commits the crime of human trafficking, shall be subject to the penalty of the deprivation of liberty for a minimum term of 3 years.
§ 2. Whoever commits an act of preparation for the crime specified in § 1, shall be subject to the penalty of the depravation of liberty for a term between 3 months and 5 years.
According to police data the number of instituted legal proceedings under this article in 2014 was 28 and asserted crimes was 64;
- Article 200.
§ 1. Whoever submits a minor under the age of 15 to sexual intercourse or commits any other sexual act thereon or causes a minor under the age of 15 to submit themselves to or to perform such acts shall be subject to the penalty of deprivation of liberty for a term of between 2 and 12 years.
§ 2. The same penalty shall be imposed on a person who, in order to satisfy their sexual needs, shows a sexual act to a minor under 15 years of age.
According to police data the number of instituted legal proceedings under this article in 2014 was 2 156 and asserted crimes was 1 104;
- Article 211 and 211a.
211. Whoever, contrary to the will of the person appointed to take care of or supervise, abducts or detains a minor person under 15 years of age or a person who is helpless by reason of his mental or physical condition shall be subject to the penalty of deprivation of liberty for up to 3 years.
211a. Whoever in violation of the provisions of this law arranges for profit the adoption of children shall be subject to the penalty of the deprivation of liberty for a term of between 3 months to 5 years.
  62

 CAHROM (2015)7
AD HOC COMMITTEE OF EXPERTS ON ROMA AND TRAVELLER1 ISSUES (CAHROM)
__________
FINAL REPORT of the CAHROM thematic group of experts on addressing and combating human trafficking within Roma communities (with a focus on prostitution and street children)
(Tirana, Albania, 4-6 March 2015)
 1 The term “Roma and Travellers” is used at the Council of Europe to encompass the wide diversity of the groups covered by the work of the Council of Europe in this field: on the one hand a) Roma, Sinti/Manush, Calé, Kaale, Romanichals, Boyash/Rudari; b) Balkan Egyptians (Egyptians and Ashkali); c) Eastern groups (Dom, Lom and Abdal); and, on the other hand, groups such as Travellers, Yenish, and the populations designated under the administrative term “Gens du voyage”, as well as persons who identify themselves as Gypsies.

Table of Contents
I.
1.
2.
3. II.
1. 2. 3. 4. 5.
III. 1.
2. 3.
INTRODUCTION TO THE THEMATIC REPORT .................................................................................. 3 Composition of the thematic group pf experts .......................................................................... 3 Background ................................................................................................................................. 4 Agenda of the thematic visit ....................................................................................................... 5
SITUATION OF ROMA AND MAIN PROBLEMS ENCOUNTERED ....................................................... 6 Albania ........................................................................................................................................ 6 Greece ......................................................................................................................................... 6 Italy.............................................................................................................................................. 7 Netherlands................................................................................................................................. 8 Romania ...................................................................................................................................... 9 SITUATION OF TRAFFICKING IN THE TARGET COUNTRIES ........................................................ 10 International human rights standards on trafficking in human beings in brief........................10 Situation of trafficking in human beings in Council of Europe member States........................12 Trafficking of people of Roma origin in the target countries.................................................... 13
3.1. General remarks................................................................................................................ 13
3.2. Albania .............................................................................................................................. 14
3.3. Greece ............................................................................................................................... 29
3.4. Italy.................................................................................................................................... 37
3.5. Netherlands....................................................................................................................... 40
3.6. Romania ............................................................................................................................ 43
CONCLUSIONS AND LESSONS LEARNT......................................................................................50 Albania thematic visit................................................................................................................50 General conclusions .................................................................................................................. 51
APENDIX 1: AGENDA OF THE THEMATIC VISIT ............................................................................. 53
IV. 1.
2.
V.
2
CAHROM(2015)7

I. INTRODUCTION TO THE THEMATIC REPORT
1. Composition of the thematic group of experts
Experts from Albania, requesting country:
Mme Blerina Zoto TEPELENA, Technical Secretariat of Roma, Ministry of Labour, Social Affairs and Equal Opportunity
Experts from GREECE, ITALY, NETHERLANDS, and ROMANIA partner countries: Greece:
Ms Maria VERVERIDOU, Expert-Counsellor, Office of the National Rapporteur on Trafficking of Human Beings, Ministry of Foreign Affairs of the Hellenic Republic
Mr Spyros BRATSIKAS, Police Captain, Hellenic Police Headquarters, Security Branch, Security Division, Analysis & Encountering Crime Section, Anti-Trafficking Office
Italy:
Mr Stefano PASTA, sub-group on Roma education, Centre for Research on Intercultural Relations, Sacred Heart Catholic University in Milan
Netherlands:
Mr Walter HILHORST, Operational Specialist, Inspector of the National Police, Expert in human trafficking in relation to Roma
Romania2:
Mr. Ionut LUPASCU, Expert, National Agency Against Trafficking in Persons, Romanian Ministry of Interior
The thematic group included experts from Albania (host country), Greece, Italy, Netherlands and Romania3. The hosting country, Albania, was represented by the CAHROM Member, Mme Blerina Zoto TEPELENA, working in the Technical Secretariat of Roma within the Ministry of Labour Social Affairs and Equal Opportunity. Greece nominated Ms Maria VERVERIDOU, Expert- Counsellor within the Office of the National Rapporteur on Trafficking of Human Beings under the Ministry of Foreign Affairs of the Hellenic Republic and Mr Spyros BRATSIKAS, Police Captain, Hellenic Police Headquarters, Security Branch, Security Division, Analysis & Encountering Crime Section, Anti-Trafficking Office. Italy was represented by Mr Stefano PASTA, involved in the sub- group on Roma education within the Centre for Research on Intercultural Relations, Sacred Heart Catholic University in Milan. Mr Walter HILHORST, Operational Specialist, Inspector of the National Police and expert in human trafficking in relation to Roma in Netherlands, represented the Dutch Government. Romania appointed Mr Ionut LUPASCU, Expert in the National Agency against Trafficking in Persons within Ministry of Interior, who unfortunately could not be present in the visit.
2 The Romanian Expert was not able to attend but submitted a written contribution for the thematic visit report 3 The Romanian Expert submitted a written contribution for the thematic visit report
CAHROM(2015)7
     3

2. Background
At the 4th CAHROM meeting, in November 2012, the Secretariat of the Group of Experts on Action against Trafficking in Human Beings (GRETA) presented the results from the first country evaluation of the implementation of the Convention on Action against Trafficking in Human Beings based on 13 country evaluation reports regarding prevention, identification of and assistance to victims, non-punishment, compensation and prosecution. As a result, the CAHROM Members, the Committee highlighted a number of issues, among which the importance of raising awareness and understanding of Roma communities about trafficking in human beings and involving Roma themselves when tackling trafficking issues within Roma communities. The Committee emphasised also the need to raise awareness among Roma of their rights so they are better placed to protect themselves from exploitation. In addition, a human rights-based approach should be used, focusing on prevention and building cooperation between member States. The Committee cautioned against using generalisations and stereotyping the Roma community and reminded that this phenomenon is not particular to any group, but that vulnerable groups to poverty and marginalisation such as Roma, may be at higher risk of trafficking. The Committee concluded that there is a need to collect further data in order to assess the extent of the phenomenon among vulnerable groups, including Roma.
The Secretariat asked the Committee Members to provide more information on the topic, in order to better understand the magnitude of the trafficking in human beings within the Roma communities. As a result, the Secretariat was able to extract a number of general observations, as follows:
 There is a lack of data to assess the extent of the phenomenon among Roma groups;
 There is a need to strengthen the identification of trafficking victims;
 There is a need to involve Roma themselves in tackling trafficking issues within their
communities and to associate Roma representatives in any discussion about this topic;
 Poverty: There is a need to strengthen measures combating poverty, both in countries of origin and host countries and to link anti-poverty policies with national Roma inclusion
strategies.
 Debts: Countries of origin should take measures to control and, if needed stop, the
practice of usury. This also requires in parallel to lift any obstacles for Roma families in
need to access the banking system and credits.
 Lack of education and employment: Spain indicated that the decision to postpone [early]
marriage is clearly linked to families that have experienced improvement in the process of social inclusion, particularly in education, as well as in access to employment. This delay in the age of marriage is often accompanied by a fewer number of children per household. There is need to enhance school enrolment, continuity and academic success through different programmes conducted by Roma NGOs, supported in many cases by the work of Roma mediators, legitimised Roma interlocutors, as well as to offer job opportunities.
 Lack of knowledge of the danger of trafficking and about their rights: there is a need to raise awareness and understanding of Roma communities about the danger of trafficking and about their rights so they are better placed to protect themselves from exploitation.
 Lack of training on how to combat trafficking within the community: Training of anti- trafficking Roma mediators (either as a specific task or in combination of other tasks performed by Roma mediators trained for instance on health and education under the ROMED joint EC/CoE programme) could be organised. Per memory, the CoE Roma and Travellers Division had organised in the past – in cooperation with the OSCE and Norwegian and Finnish voluntary contributions -such training in Albania, Slovakia and the Republic of Moldova. Good practice in Norway: The Government has developed
4
CAHROM(2015)7

information and educational material as well as training programmes for newly arrived
immigrants on the topics of forced marriage.
 Lack of training for enforcement agents, the migration unit and the border police, with the aim of increasing the efforts to completely combat trafficking in persons and prostitution. Good practice in “the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia”.
 Lack of legislation and measures preventing forced/early marriages: some countries have strengthened their legislation and have adopted legislation aimed at combat trafficking:
o “the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia”: Amendments to the Criminal Code were adopted in September 2009. These amendments referred to Articles 418–a, 418–b and 418–d which sanction the responsibility of official persons for committing acts related to trafficking in persons by imprisonment of at least eight years, or imprisonment of ten years if the victim is a minor.
At the 7th CAHROM meeting (Strasbourg, 14-16 May 2014), the Executive Secretary of GRETA spoke on the issue of early and/forced marriage in relation to trafficking (Please see the thematic visit report on early/child and forced marriage for more information on the topic of early marriages). The Albanian CAHROM Member put forward a request for a thematic visit on addressing and combating human trafficking within Roma communities, with a focus on prostitution and street children. In the exchanges between the Committee members, Greece and Italy expressed an interest to be involved in the thematic visit as partner countries, viewed that Albania is a country of origin of human trafficking in their regard. Netherlands also expressed interest since human trafficking related to Roma is a topic that they regularly address at European level. Romania was invited to join the thematic group following a proposal from Italy, in order to seek further cooperation on the topic.
3. Agenda of the thematic visit
The thematic visit has been organised by the Technical Secretariat of Roma within Ministry of Labour, Social Affairs and Equal Opportunity, which drafted the agenda of the visit (see Appendix 1 of this report) with a view to allow experts of the partner countries to get an overall idea of various institutions addressing human trafficking in Albania and exchange information and good practices. As such, bilateral meetings were organised during the first day with the Ministries of Education, Labour, Social Affairs and Equal Opportunity and the Ministry of Interior, as well as with the Ombudsperson, and the Municipality of Tirana, while the second day was devoted to a roundtable with local authorities, Roma civil society and Tirana based organisations.
5
CAHROM(2015)7

II. SITUATION OF ROMA AND MAIN PROBLEMS ENCOUNTERED 1. Albania
In Albania there are two different groups: Roma and Egyptians. Currently Roma and Egyptians in Albania differ from each other having completely different identities.
According to the population census from 2011, 8,301 persons declared themselves as Roma (0.30% of the total population). Estimates of the size of the Roma population in Albania range from 40,000 to 120,000. Roma live all over the country, although the biggest communities are concentrated in and around Tirana, the towns of Fier, Gjirokaster and Berat, and around the town of Korce. A great majority of them are living in deplorable conditions and face extreme poverty and social marginalization. A regional study of the UNDP published in 2006 reported that the rates of poverty and extreme poverty of Roma in Albania are particularly high (78% and 39%). The fact that a Roma woman in Albania earns 36% of the average wage of an Albanian woman is another example of the socio-economic situation of the Roma minority in Albania.
Unlike Roma, Egyptians do not speak the Romani language. Their distinctive features include particular activities such as blacksmiths, musicians, etc. They have a syncretic religion (which combines different parts of Islam, Orthodox religion and Animism). Unlike the Roma, Egyptians have been sedentary, usually living in “separate neighbourhoods” near the centre of cities or large villages which often even took their name. Compared to the Roma, they are more integrated into Albanian society.
According to the EC report on Albania from 2015, “Roma and Egyptians continue to face very difficult living conditions and frequent social exclusion and discrimination, particularly regarding access to healthcare, social protection, education, employment and housing”. According to the same report, the inclusion of Roma children in the education system has improved slightly; however, enrolment and drop-out rates remain a serious concern: 42 % of Roma children attend preschool education (3-6), but only 16.1 % finish middle school, 2.1 % have high school education, and 0.3 % have university education. 40.3 % of the Roma population is illiterate. Regarding housing, the report underlines that budgetary allocation for housing Roma and Egyptians have tripled, but remain insufficient to address needs. No long-term solutions have been found for many families evicted in the last two years.
2. Greece
In Greece, the Roma or Gypsy presence can be traced back to the 14th century, though their Greek nationality was effectively given to them as late as in 1979.
Roma population in Greece is not an entirely homogeneous group, but it consists of different (often conflicting) “tribes” of Roma people. The main groups of Roma in Greece can be categorised as follows1: (a) domestic nomadic Roma (albeit an extremely limited number); (b) very long-term settled distinct Roma communities, very poor and excluded; (c) very long-term settled distinct Roma communities, a number of which are almost entirely unproblematic; (d) recent Roma migrants who are not EU nationals (especially from Albania, but also from Kosovo* and “the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia”); (e) recent Roma migrants from new EU Member States (mainly Bulgarian and Romanian Roma); (f) completely integrated/assimilated Roma who may never even identify themselves as Romani; (g) Roma Muslims in Thrace, who benefit from the minority protections available under the peace treaties between Greece and Turkey following World War II; (h) other persons and communities.
6
CAHROM(2015)7

The total share of the Roma within the total Greek population is estimated between 2-3% (ROM Network, 2000). The estimations regarding the magnitude of Greek Roma ranges from 180,000 people to 365 thousand people, as it can be seen from the Table below. An average estimation of 265 thousands Greek Roma seems to be more close to reality2. Yet, a recent survey conducted in 2008, estimated the number of Roma population in discrete and recognisable residences to approximately 15,000 families or 65,000 persons, a very conservative estimation which should be seen with caution.
Informal estimates of the number of immigrant Roma in Greece put the figure at tens of thousands, probably close to or possibly even more than 100,000. Most of these people come from Albania, but others come from Bulgaria, Kosovo*, “the Former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia” and Romania. Some of these persons are temporary migrants, performing in particular seasonal agricultural work in Greece, and then returning home. Others are involved in scrap metal recycling. The majority of these people have “been legally living in Greece for over a decade, although a few have obtained citizenship. Foreign Roma are outside of the scope of state programmes”. Moreover, “the residence of these newly arrived Gypsies in Greece goes relatively unimpeded, as the public authorities tend to avoid addressing the problems of this particular group”.
The Roma are scattered all over the country, with greater density in the regions of northern Greece, northwest and west Peloponnesus, Epirus and Etoloakarnania, in several areas of the region of Thessaly (Larissa, Farsala, Sofades etc.) and in the greater area of Athens and west Attica (St. Barbara, Petralona, Chalandri, Rentis, Moschato, Menidi, Ano Liosia, Eleusis, Megara, Drapetsona, Spata, etc.). The greatest concentration of established Roma populations is found in regions of major urban centres, as well as rural regions that present the most employment opportunities. Most surveys carried out in recent years, show that Roma continue to live in more or less the same localities that they lived in 1999, which implies that the vast majority of Roma in Greece are sedentary. It has been estimated that they are settled to approximately 240 locations most of which are found in the periphery of the big cities all over Greece.
It is generally noticed that there is a spatial concentration of Roma in specific areas, neighbourhoods, suburbs or villages. This implies that Roma live, in most cases, in isolation, separately from the rest of the population and they do not mix with non-Roma. This consequently leads to their social disintegration and reinforce their social exclusion.
Greek Roma community faces persistent inequalities in all aspects of life, including access to education of Roma children, the right to housing and to other basic social goods, let alone the excessive exercise of police violence.
3. Italy
The Roma, Sinti and Camminanti4 (hereafter RSC) living in Italy are characterized by their heterogeneity in terms of groups, dialects and specific linguistic varieties, and cultures. When considering RSC communities, we are referring to a) Italian citizens; b) citizens from other EU countries; c) non-EU citizens; d) foreigners who were granted asylum or subsidiary protection; e) (de facto) stateless people, born in Italy from stateless parents.
4 The Italian spelling was used for Camminanti (with double”m”), whilst in Sicilian it is written Caminanti.
CAHROM(2015)7
 7

It is estimated that nation-wide there are 100,000 to 200,000 Roma, Sinti and Camminanti present in Italy5: half of whom (about 70,000) are Italian citizens; and the other 50%, although made up of foreigners, is mostly in Italy, on a permanent basis.
The visibility of Roma settlements in the suburbs of large urban areas of North-Central and North of Italy leads to neglect sometimes the important presence of these communities in other areas of the country. In Scampia (Naples), there are over 1,500 Roma people from the former Yugoslavia whose presence dates back to the late eighties6 (the second generation of Roma people from the former Yugoslavia, though being born in Scampia, is made up of Italians). In Puglia, on the border between Molise and Abruzzo, the Roma community is largely located there on a permanent basis.
The North of Italy is characterized by a predominance of Sinti (estimated to be around 32,000). They had been traditionally involved in nomadic labour activities that required them to travel around the country (fairs or circus). Anyway, it is considered that just 3% of them are actually nomadic, because the majority of them have a permanent place where they come back when they do not work.
In Noto, Sicily, the Camminanti community has been living there since the late fifties (some of them are still "semi-nomadic"). The majority of Sicilian Camminanti of Noto travel through all Italy for around a semester, offering small manual services and coming back in the Province of Noto for the remaining part of the year.
Regarding the recently migrant Roma, mainly, the precarious conditions of settlements and evictions carried out by local authorities create a forced nomadic habit linked to their vulnerable condition of marginality.
4. Netherlands
There are no exact figures regarding the number of people of Roma origin in the Netherlands as registration based on ethnicity is prohibited. Estimates vary from approximately 10,000 (if we exclude Dutch Travellers) to approximately 45,000 (Dutch Travellers included), which means that no more than 0.25% of the Dutch population is of Roma and Traveller origin. Roma (general term) in the Netherlands can be divided into five different groups according to their historical presence:
 Roma, Sinti and Dutch Travellers traditionally residing in the Netherlands: this group concerns Sinti and a few Roma families present on the Dutch territory since the 15th century7 who, until the 1960s lived a nomadic lifestyle. This group of Dutch Sinti and Roma contains approximately 2,500 people. Dutch Travellers (woonwagenbewoners) are estimated to be 35,000 and have Dutch ethnicity. They do not have a language of their own and their history dates back to ‘only’ around 1850. A small number of Travellers, Sinti and Roma live in caravans or mobile homes (predominantly fixed in situ), situated in special centres or campsites.
 About 1,500 Roma who came to the Netherlands as migrant workers and labourers around the late 1960s and 1970s and as refugees from Turkey in the 1980s.
 Roma who were granted a residence permit in 1978: this third group, often referred to as the General Pardon group, concerns Roma who were legalised in the 1970s. Although most of them did not have any identity papers, it is assumed that the majority originates
5 This coincides with the estimated figure used by the Council of Europe (140,000).
6 See the CAHROM (2014)10 Thematic report conclusions on solving the legal status of Roma from ex-Yugoslavia and their lack of personal identity documents covering Italy, Bosnia and Herzegovina, Croatia, Montenegro, Serbia and “the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia” at http://www.coe.int/en/web/portal/cahrom.
7 See e.g. Marko D. Knudsen, The history of the Roma, RomNews Society, Hamburg, Germany and Jean-Pierre Liégeois, Roma in Europe, Council of Europe Publishing, 2009.
CAHROM(2015)7
  8

from the former Yugoslavia. In 1978, this group consisted of 520 individuals dispersed around eleven municipalities. In the meantime, this group increased to approximately 2,800-3,000 individuals.
 Roma who came to the Netherlands in the 90s: this fourth group is more a collection of individuals and families from the former Yugoslavia, the Czech Republic, Slovakia, and Bulgaria. They are not concentrated into certain cities or areas but can be found anywhere in the Netherlands. This group concerns about 1,000 people.
 Roma newcomers, arriving since the expansion of the European Union (as from 2000): this last group concerns essentially Bulgarian and Romanian Roma.
Within the Netherlands, approximately 55 municipalities house Roma residents from various backgrounds. In the 1980s, eleven municipalities welcomed Roma from group C above. Most municipalities represented in the Dutch Platform for Roma municipalities acting under the Association of Dutch Municipalities (VNG) accommodate Roma from the General Pardon group.
5. Romania
According to the Romanian National Population Census from 20118, only 621,573 persons out of a total population of 20,121,641 declared themselves as being Roma, i.e. 3.08 % of the total population. It should be noted that the number of self-declared Roma increased compared to the previous censuses from 2001 (535,140) and 1992 (401,087).
The National Agency for Roma (NAR) gave an estimate of 1.5 to 2 million Roma living in Romania which is in line with the Council of Europe’s current estimate of 1.8 million9, close to 9% of the total population.
According to NAR and based on the 2011 population census results, out of the self-declared 621,573 Roma living in Romania, 230,000 are living in urban areas and 390,000 in rural areas. About one third of the self-declared Roma population in Romania (244,000) speaks the Romani.
Roma is one of the 18 recognised national minorities in Romania. Romania has the second highest number of Roma population in Council of Europe’s member States, after Turkey. Though a part of the Roma community in Romania is socially integrated, educated and graduated and has access to the labour market (including in public administration), a majority of them remain socially excluded.
Roma sub-groups that are present in Romania include Vătraşi (13,8%), Căldărari (5,9%), Rudari (4,5%), Spoitori (3,7%), Mătăsari (3,2%), Ursari (2,7%), Cărămidari (1,5%), Gabori (1,4%), Florari (1,2%)10. Other known Roma sub-groups are Horahai (Muslim Roma), Ciurari, Cortorari, Geambaşi, Lingurari and Rostaş11.
Sub-group affiliation is not unanimous: according to research conducted in Romania in 200812, 56% of the Roma respondents did not identify with a sub-group, whilst 44% of the Roma respondents also identified with a sub-group.
8 Source: http://www.insse.ro/cms/files/publicatii/pliante%20statistice/04-recensamantul%20populatiei.pdf
9 A decade ago, international estimated figure used to be comprised between 1,800,000 and 2,500,000 like in the European Union document from 2003 “Support for Roma in Central and Eastern Europe” (http://ec.europa.eu/enlargement/pdf/brochure_roma_oct2003_en.pdf) or in Jean-Pierre Liégeois “Roma in Europe”, 2007. 10 Source: http://www.natgeo.ro/locuri-si-oameni/comunitati/9165-neamuri-tiganesti.
11 Come closer - Inclusion and exclusion of Roma in Present-Day Romanian Society, Gabor Fleck, Cosima Rughinis, National Agency for Roma, 2008, page 50.
12 Idem, page 51.
CAHROM(2015)7
    9

III. SITUATION OF TRAFFICKING IN THE TARGET COUNTRIES
1. International human rights standards on trafficking in human beings in brief
International agreement on what constitutes “trafficking in persons” is very recent. The first agreed definition of trafficking was incorporated into the 2000 Protocol to Prevent, Suppress and Punish Trafficking in Persons, Especially Women and Children13, supplementing the United Nations Convention against Transnational Organized Crime (Trafficking Protocol). That definition has since been incorporated into many other legal and policy instruments as well as national laws.
The Trafficking Protocol defines the term “trafficking in persons” as follows: (a) “Trafficking in persons” shall mean the recruitment, transportation, transfer, harbouring or receipt of persons, by means of the threat or use of force or other forms of coercion, of abduction, of fraud, of deception, of the abuse of power or of a position of vulnerability or of the giving or receiving of payments or benefits to achieve the consent of a person having control over another person, for the purpose of exploitation. Exploitation shall include, at a minimum, the exploitation of the prostitution of others or other forms of sexual exploitation, forced labour or services, slavery or practices similar to slavery, servitude or the removal of organs; (b) The consent of a victim of trafficking in persons to the intended exploitation set forth in subparagraph (a) of this article shall be irrelevant where any of the means set forth in subparagraph (a) have been used; ... (art. 3).
The three key elements that must be present for a situation of trafficking in persons (adults) to exist are therefore: (i) action (recruitment, ...); (ii) means (threat, ...); and (iii) purpose (exploitation).
International law provides a different definition for trafficking in children (i.e., persons under 18 years of age). The “means” element is not required in this case. It is necessary to show only: (i) an “action” such as recruitment, buying and selling; and (ii) that this action was for the specific purpose of exploitation. In other words, trafficking of a child will exist if the child was subjected to some act, such as recruitment or transport, the purpose of which is the exploitation of that child.
In 2003, the OSCE decided to strengthen existing commitments made by its member states by developing the OSCE Action Plan to Combat Trafficking in Human Beings14. This Action Plan not only recommends specific action for OSCE participating states in the fields of prevention, protection and prosecution, but it also tasks relevant OSCE bodies and missions to provide technical assistance to participating states, as well as targeting internal organisational issues in the anti-trafficking field, such as the implementation of a Code of Conduct and appropriate training of OSCE personnel.
CAHROM(2015)7
With its Convention for Action against Trafficking in Human Beings (CETS No. 197)15, the
 Council of Europe has created the first legally binding instrument in Europe to fight the problem of human trafficking comprehensively. The Convention entered into force in 2008 and is open for signature to non-member states of the Council of Europe as well as to member states. It covers every form of trafficking, every type of victim and every sort of exploitation, and focuses on “three P’s”: prevent trafficking, protect the Human Rights of victims of trafficking, and prosecute the traffickers. In addition, the Convention provides for the setting up of an effective and independent monitoring mechanism capable of controlling the
  13Text of the Trafficking Protocol available at: https://www.unodc.org/unodc/treaties/CTOC/#Fulltext
14 Text of the OSCE Action Plan To Combat Trafficking in Human Beings is available at: http://www.osce.org/odihr/23866
15
https://www.coe.int/t/dghl/monitoring/trafficking/Docs/Convntn/CETS197_en.asp
  The Convention for Action against Trafficking in Human Beings is available at:
 10

The cornerstone of the EU anti-trafficking policy is Directive 2011/36/EU on preventing and combating trafficking in human beings and protecting its victims (Anti-Trafficking Directive)16, adopted on the basis of Article 82 (2) and Article 83 (1) of the TFEU. The directive places victims’ rights at the centre, providing a number of measures specifically addressing child victims, such as the appointment of guardians. Dealing with child victims of trafficking, the EU Strategy towards the eradication of trafficking in human beings 2012–2016 seeks to promote victims’ rights and safeguard their protection while ensuring appropriate support and access to justice. The strategy underlines that “comprehensive child-sensitive protection systems that ensure interagency and multidisciplinary coordination are key in catering to diverse needs of diverse groups of children, including victims of trafficking”. It also calls on Member States to strengthen their child protection systems. It further notes the importance of guardianship as a key element of child protection systems and calls on FRA to work together with the European Commission on this issue.
International human rights law recognizes that certain groups require additional or special protection. This may be because of past discrimination or because their members share particular vulnerabilities.
In the context of trafficking, relevant groups include women, children, migrants and migrant workers, refugees and asylum seekers, internally displaced persons, and persons with disabilities. Sometimes, members of a group will be specifically targeted for trafficking. Children, for example, may be trafficked for purposes related to their age such as sexual exploitation, various forms of forced labour and begging. Women and girls are trafficked into gender-specific situations of exploitation such as exploitative prostitution and sex tourism and forced labour in domestic and service industries. They also suffer gender-specific forms of harm and consequences of being trafficked (for example, rape, forced marriage, unwanted or forced pregnancy, forced termination of pregnancy, and sexually transmitted dis- eases, including HIV/AIDS).
Individuals belonging to specific groups who are subject to trafficking may be in a position to claim different or additional rights. For example, international human rights law imposes important and additional responsibilities on States when it comes to identifying child victims of trafficking as well as to ensuring their immediate and longer-term safety and well-being. The core rule derived from the obligations contained in the UN Convention on the Rights of the Child is the best interests of the child. In other words, States cannot prioritize other considerations, such as those related to immigration control or public order, over the best interests of the child victim of trafficking. In addition, because of the applicability of the Convention to all children under the jurisdiction or control of a State, non-citizen child victims of trafficking are entitled to the same protection as nationals in all matters, including those related to the protection of their privacy and physical and moral integrity. Other treaties may further specify these rights. For example, the Trafficking Protocol requires certain special measures with regard to child victims, as does the Convention on Action against Trafficking in Human Beings.
The UNICEF Guidelines on the Protection of the Rights of Child Victims of Trafficking in South Eastern Europe17 do not directly address the issues of prevention or awareness raising, but focus on the interventions required for the protection of the rights of child victims of trafficking,
16 EU Anti-Trafficking Directive available at: https://ec.europa.eu/anti-trafficking/legislation-and-case-law-eu-legislation- criminal-law/directive-201136eu_en
17 Guidelines on the protection of child victims of trafficking available at: http://www.unicef.org/ceecis/0610- Unicef_Victims_Guidelines_en.pdf
CAHROM(2015)7
implementation of the obligations contained in the Convention. The Convention applies to all forms of trafficking; whether national or transnational, whether or not related to organised crime. It applies whoever the victim (women, men or children) and whatever the form of exploitation (sexual exploitation, forced labour or services).
      11

including their re-integration. They restate the fact that child victims of trafficking are entitled to special protection due to their status as children and as victims of crime. The Guidelines recommend, inter alia, the following:
 The pro-active identification of child victims, the presumption that a victim is a child if there are reasonable grounds to believe this to be the case,
 The appointment of a guardian to act in the child’s best interests until such time as a durable solution has been identified and enacted, and the
 The completion of a thorough risk and security assessment before the child is returned to his or her home country.
 Upon return to their home countries, “child victims are entitled to receive long-term care and protection including security, food, safe accommodation, access to healthcare, psycho-social support, legal assistance, social services and education, with a view to their social re-integration”.
CAHROM(2015)7
    Protocol to Prevent, Suppress and Punish Trafficking in Persons, Especially Women and Children, supplementing the United Nations Convention against Transnational Organized Crime, 2000 (Trafficking Protocol)
Convention on the Elimination of All Forms of Discrimination against Women, 1979 Convention on the Rights of the Child, 1989
Optional Protocol to the Convention on the Rights of the Child on the sale of children, child prostitution and child pornography, 2000
United Nations Convention against Transnational Organized Crime, 2000
International Convention on the Protection of the Rights of All Migrant Workers and Members of Their Families, 1990
International Covenant on Civil and Political Rights, 1966 International Covenant on Economic, Social and Cultural Rights, 1966
Council of Europe, Convention on Action against Trafficking in Human Beings, 2005 (European Trafficking Convention)
Charter of Fundamental Rights in the European Union, 2000, article 5, and Directive 2011/36/EU of the European Parliament and Council on preventing and combating trafficking in human beings and protecting its victims, 2011
South Asian Association for Regional Cooperation, Convention on Preventing and Combating Trafficking in Women and Children for Prostitution, 2002
ILO Convention concerning Forced or Compulsory Labour, 1930.
 Treaties and other instruments particularly relevant to trafficking
 12

2. Trafficking of people of Roma origin in the target countries
2.1. General remarks
On 28 June 2012, the Parliamentary Assembly adopted Recommendation 2003(2012) on Roma migrants in Europe, according to which particular attention should be paid to establishing whether the Roma community is affected by and/or involved in trafficking in human beings and whether the measures contained in the Council of Europe Convention on Action against Trafficking in Human Beings are effectively implemented as regards Roma.
In its country evaluation reports, GRETA has paid particular attention to groups which are vulnerable to human trafficking, such as the Roma. GRETA has observed that the focus on Roma in anti-trafficking preventive and protection services remains low. In its country evaluation reports, GRETA has recommended that the authorities step up preventive measures among the Roma through targeted awareness-raising campaigns and measures aimed at improving their access to education, employment, health care and social assistance as a means for preventing trafficking and retrafficking. GRETA has expressed concern about the failure to register the birth of children from the Roma communities and has urged the national authorities to secure the registration of all persons at birth and for social services, both as a prevention measure to decrease the risks of being trafficked and in order to avoid re-trafficking.
GRETA has also stressed the need for providing training to law enforcement officers, prosecutors and the judiciary, which aims to overcome entrenched negative attitudes and prejudices vis-à-vis Roma victims of trafficking. In this context, GRETA has encouraged the national authorities to include in the national strategies for the integration of Roma measures to prevent the trafficking of Roma.
The Council of Europe Commissioner for Human Rights has also stated in its 2012 report on Human Rights and Roma and Travellers in Europe that “the vulnerability of Roma must be taken into account in national policies regarding trafficking in human beings”. He further recommends that „Roma-specific preventive and protective measures should be adopted in order to improve victims’ protection, including training of law enforcement officials and awareness-raising campaigns targeting Roma communities, in particular segregated and socially excluded communities, to change (amongst other things) prevailing attitudes and practices which result in child marriages”.
The research conducted by the ERRC and PiN18 in Bulgaria, the Czech Republic, Hungary, Romania and Slovakia indicated that trafficking in persons affected Roma disproportionately. In the absence of official data, the estimates provided for the perceived representation of Roma among trafficked persons in Bulgaria, the Czech Republic, Hungary, Slovakia and Romania are several times higher than the proportion of Roma in the general population. Research in 2010 for this study indicated that Roma represent 50-80% of trafficked persons in Bulgaria, up to 70% in parts of the Czech Republic, at least 40% in Hungary, around 50% in Romania and at least 60% in Slovakia. The 2011 report on Bulgaria by the Group of Experts on Action against Trafficking in Human Beings (GRETA) reconfirms that NGO data indicates that over 50% of trafficking victims were from the Roma community, and according to police officers, the Roma community accounted for over 80% of trafficking victims.
ERRC and PiN research confirmed that Roma are trafficked for various purposes, including sexual exploitation, labour exploitation, domestic servitude, organ trafficking, illegal adoption and begging. Romani women and children are the most represented regardless of the purpose of
18 ERRC and PiN, Breaking the Silence. Trafficking in Romani Communities, March 2011. Report available at: http://www.errc.org/cms/upload/file/breaking-the-silence-19-march-2011.pdf
CAHROM(2015)7
  13

trafficking. In addition, certain practices which do not always constitute trafficking are often linked to trafficking of Roma, such as prostitution/sex work, exploitative begging (particularly when it involves minors) and forced and child marriages. The presence of these practices in Romani communities was found to increase the vulnerability of Roma to trafficking.
The vulnerability factors identified by the ERRC and PiN study and reconfirmed by several existing studies19, are closely linked to those commonly associated with non-Romani trafficked persons, to say that there is no unique “Roma vulnerability factor,” and no indication that trafficking is a “cultural practice” of Roma. Thus it becomes clear that Roma are highly vulnerable to trafficking due to structural forms of ethnic and gender discrimination, poverty and social exclusion which result in low educational achievement, high levels of unemployment, usury, growing up in state care, domestic violence affecting predominantly women and children and substance abuse. Furthermore, many of the vulnerability factors such as domestic violence, high school dropout rates, homelessness or being in state care affect children and youth exclusively or disproportionately. The complicity of family members in trafficking of Romani individuals is apparent, which is also similar to the situation in other communities throughout the world.
In the 2014 Anti-Slavery research project study20, Roma communities were flagged as particularly vulnerable to trafficking for the purposes of street crime and begging. In the report, debt bondage is cited as a major driver of trafficking. While some Roma communities will rely on neighbours (both Roma and non-Roma) for support, many often for them to resort to informal money lenders (known as ‘kamatari’, essentially loan sharks), who charge exorbitant interest rates and use repressive measures to ensure payment’. These measures can include forcing them to undertake criminal acts such as begging and pickpocketing, or to traffic their own children for the same purpose, in order to clear debts they may have accumulated.
2.2. Albania
2.2.1. National situation and legal framework
Albania is a country of origin for victims of trafficking in human beings (THB). Although Albania used to be a country of transit, according to the Albanian authorities, this is no longer the case.21 All the victims of THB identified to date have been Albanian nationals, the great majority of them being victims of transnational trafficking, mainly for the purpose of sexual exploitation. The Albanian authorities have identified. 97 in 2010, including 14 children; 84 in 2011, including 39 children; 92 in 2012, including 26 children; 95 in 2013, including 43 children; 125 in 2014, including 62 children; and 109 in 2015, including 48 children. The vast majority of the victims were Albanian. There were 3 foreign nationals identified as victims in 2013, 2 in 2014, and 4 in 2015. However, there have also been cases of national trafficking (within Albania), a phenomenon which is reportedly on the increase, particularly in connection with migration from rural areas to towns and seasonal migration to places of tourism (trafficking of women for the purpose of sexual exploitation and children for the purpose of sexual exploitation and/or exploitation of begging).
Under Article 122 of the Albanian Constitution, the international treaties ratified form part of the country's internal legal system and are directly applied, except in cases where the adoption of a law is required to implement them. The Criminal Code of Albania contains three main provisions relating to trafficking in human beings: Article 110(a) ("trafficking in persons"), Article 114(b)
19 Anti-Slavery, Trafficking for Forced Criminal Activities and Begging in Europe. Exploratory Study and Good Practice Examples, September 2014. Report available at: http://www.antislavery.org/includes/documents/cm_docs/2014/t/trafficking_for_forced_criminal_activities_and_begging_in _europe.pdf
20 Anti-Slavery, Trafficking for Forced Criminal Activities and Begging in Europe. Exploratory Study and Good Practice Examples, September 2014.
21 GRETA country report 2011: http://www.coe.int/t/dghl/monitoring/trafficking/Docs/Reports/GRETA_2011_22_FGR_ALB_en.pdf
CAHROM(2015)7
    14

("trafficking in women") and Article 128(b) ("trafficking in minors"). These articles were incorporated in the Criminal Code by Law No. 9188 of 12 February 2004.
Several amendments were made to the Criminal Code (CC) which concerned the provisions on trafficking in human beings. Article 110/b concerning trafficking in women was repealed and Article 110/a now criminalises trafficking of adults, both men and women. The wording of Article 110/a has been amended to expressly refer to internal trafficking. Further, a new Article 110/b was added criminalising the use of the services of a victim of THB, with the knowledge that the person has been trafficked. Furthermore, penalties for human trafficking have been increased. Other amendments concerned the list of aggravating circumstances and the criminalisation of offences linked to travel and identity documents related to THB. Moreover, a new Article 52/a enshrines the principle of nonpunishment of victims of THB for offences they are forced to commit while being trafficked. Law No. 108/2013 on Foreigners, passed on 28 March 2013, has introduced changes with regard to the right of stay of foreign victims of trafficking, and in particular their right to a recovery and reflection period and a residence permit. Further, Law No. 10383/2001 on Compulsory Health Insurance has been amended by Law No. 141/2014 to provide for free-of-charge health care for victims of trafficking and , Law No. 10039/2008 on Legal Assistance was amended in May 2013 by Law No. 143/2013, intended, inter alia, to improve access to legal assistance for trafficking victims.
Some of the most important changes in terms of improving and completing the legal framework are those in the Criminal Code adopted in May 2013 by Law No. 144/201 3 “On Amendments to the Law No. 7895, dated 27.1.1995 “Criminal Code of the Republic of Albania”, as amended, which determined the difference between the domestic trafficking and inter-border trafficking, this way giving an end to legal disputes regarding cases of domestic trafficking; as well as the impunity of the trafficking victims, in cases they are involved in criminal activities.
The new law No. 108/2014 “For the State Police” provides some additional guarantees for a better protection and full support to victims of trafficking, especially children. This law, among other duties of the state police in Article 17(g) foresees the identification, protection and referral for assistance to appropriate authorities for victims of trafficking.
Whereas Article 123 specifies the measures to be taken by the state police to protect minors, and this way charges the state police officers with the direct responsibility for assisting and referring when necessary of the abandoned children or those who have left family to the appropriate service. According to the Order No. 179, dated 19.06.2014 of the Prime Minister “On the establishment of the State Committee on Trafficking of Human Beings”, the State Anti-Trafficking Committee has been expanded with four new members, responding to new challenges in the fight against trafficking in persons through the provision of appropriate capacity, commitment and willingness to vigorously fight trafficking of human beings. This mechanism is responsible for setting the strategic priorities that shape the action of anti-trafficking in Albania.
For a more proactive identification and referral of victims/potential victims of trafficking by the Joint Directive No. 3799, dated 07.08.2014 of the Minister of Internal Affairs, Education and Sports, Health, Foreign Affairs and National Coalition of Anti-trafficking, the Responsible Authority (RA) was reorganized and expanded by adapting its role and duties with the Standard Operating Procedures. The review of the RA aimed to support the effective implementation of the agreements signed for the protection and support of children, victims of trafficking, the functioning of the MKR NRM, and the monitoring of the possible implementation of bilateral agreements and/or future multilateral agreements, between Albania and other countries in the region and beyond on issues of human trafficking.
Article 128/b of the Criminal Code “Minors trafficking and article 114/b CC on “Exploitation of prostitution linked to the exploitation of minors for prostitution” with aggravating circumstances
15
CAHROM(2015)7

were abrogated. Other changes regard the article 52/a of the Criminal Code “Exemption or reduction of sentence for accomplices of justice and victims” for the Socio-Economic Reintegration of Women and Girls, Victims/Potential Victims of Trafficking, 2015-2017; the Criminal Procedure Code, for guaranteeing the right of compensation of the victims in the decision to forfeiture (review of articles 58-68); article 75/a, and article 158 “Exemption from the obligation to testify”.
2.2.2. Anti-trafficking strategies, frameworks and national action plans
The National Strategy for the Fight against Trafficking in Human Beings for the period 2014-2017 and its Action Plan were approved by the Ministry of the Interior on 26 November 2014. The Action Plan for the Socio-Economic Reintegration of Women and Girls, Victims/Potential Victims of Trafficking, 2015-2017, underpinning the Strategy against child trafficking covers prevention, protection and reintegration of child trafficking victims and prosecution of child traffickers.
The Office of the National Coordinator for the Fight against Trafficking in Persons (ONAC) coordinates and monitors anti-trafficking activities at the national level. In 2012, the National Anti-Trafficking Task Force was established pursuant to the revised National Referral Mechanism (NRM). The Task Force meets periodically with the aim to monitor implementation of the NRM with a view to improving the identification and referral to assistance of victims and co-ordination between different stakeholders. It is chaired by the National Anti-Trafficking Co-ordinator and comprises experts, representatives of national and local authorities and NGOs.
In 2012, the Anti-trafficking Unit (ATU) reviewed and amended the "Cooperation Agreement to Establish a National Referral Mechanism for the Enhanced Identification of and Assistance to Victims of Human Trafficking" (NRM), with the aim of identifying, referring, protecting, assisting and reintegrating trafficking victims. Amendments aimed at increasing cooperation between the GOA and civil society. The new NRM was enacted on June 15th, 2012, and Ministry of Health, Ministry of Education and Science, General Prosecutor’s Office, and World Vision are the new Parties to NRM.
After the end of the implementation period of the National Action Plan 2011-2013, the Office of National Coordinator (ONAC), launched consultative meetings with its partners to design a new anti-trafficking strategy and its action plan. The final National Strategy and Action Plan to Combat Trafficking of Human Beings 2014-2017, was approved by Decision No. 184, on 26.11.2014.
In the new action plan, one of the main objectives that are foreseen is the prevention and prosecution of trafficking in men and internal trafficking. Through the trainings for police, prosecutors and judges, ATU has aimed at increasing information and knowledge of proactive investigation techniques, for the identification of new cases of trafficking, in particular internal trafficking for exploitation of labour, begging etc.
Regarding strengthening cooperation with neighbouring countries, in June, 2012 Albania signed an additional protocol with Kosovo*22 on stepping up efforts against trafficking in persons, and improving identification, notification, referral and assisted voluntary return of victims and presumed victims of human trafficking, especially children”. The protocol pays particular attention to children trafficked and aims at intensifying cooperation between Albania and Kosovo* as a destination country. A similar one has been signed in 2014 with Montenegro.
22*All references to Kosovo, whether the territory, institutions or population, in this text shall be understood in full compliance
with United Nation's Security Council Resolution 1244 and without prejudice to the status of Kosovo.
CAHROM(2015)7
  16

2.2.3. Existing data on Roma in relation to trafficking
Albania, as many other countries, does not collect disaggregated data on ethnicity in the field of anti-trafficking. However, other governmental or independent reports indicate that Albanian Roma children are increasingly victims of trafficking for the purpose of forced beginning and other forms of forced labour in Greece, Kosovo* and within Albania.23 Roma girls may be subjected to sex trafficking or forced labour following arranged marriages.
According to the EC report on Albania from 201524, the number of Roma and Egyptian street children remains a concern, as up to 2,500 children, mostly Roma and Egyptian, live and/or work on the streets.
According to civil society, within the Roma and Egyptian communities, there are cases of forced marriages of girls, but none have been formally identified as victims of THB in the period 2012- 2015. Children from Roma and Egyptian communities are being exploited for forced begging, but it is not clear from the statistical data whether any have been identified as victims of THB.
An earlier report of the OSCE-ODIHR on trafficking of Roma and Egyptian children in Albania25, identified begging and prostitution as predominant forms of trafficking in Roma and Egyptian children. Thus, Roma and Egyptian children would be found in situations of begging and “other informal/unprotected labour activities like selling roses, washing car windows, playing an instrument.” In addition, Albanian children would also be trafficked for prostitution, usually to Italy and Greece. The report findings describe the main methods of this type of trafficking as kidnapping, selling by family members, fake marriages, or the child leaving on its own. The report cites cases reported by Roma community NGOs that involve parents selling their daughters into prostitution. According to the report, the three main reasons for trafficking for prostitution are: poverty, early marriage, and lack of employment opportunities due to exclusion and social marginalization.
According to another report by the OSCE26, the NGO, Amaro Drom, identified the lack of official documentation as critical to trafficking: “There are numerous barriers in helping children who work and are exploited in the street of Greece. The lack of documentation of the immigrants is an important element. The police or the social workers of Arsis anti-trafficking organisation have often found it hard to distinguish if the person accompanying the child was his parent or the tutor, when they had no identification means. The worst thing is that even in Albania, Roma children and families often prove not to be registered in the registry office.”
The ECRI 2010 report on Albania27 shows that many Roma and Egyptians in Albania live in extreme poverty and social and economic marginalisation. Many of them in live under precarious conditions in dwellings that are often without access to potable water, electricity and sewer networks and in areas with limited health care provisions. Roma in Albania are at particularly at risk of being evicted from their homes without the possibility of being rehoused. The 2015 ECRI
23 Trafficking in Persons Report 2014, available at: http://www.state.gov/j/tip/rls/tiprpt/countries/2014/226665.htm
http://ec.europa.eu/enlargement/pdf/key_documents/2015/20151110_report_albania.pdf
25 The CPRSI Assessment Trip to Albania on Trafficking in Children from Roma and Egyptian Communities (2003) can be accessed at www.osce.org/odihr/documents.
*All references to Kosovo, whether the territory, institutions or population, in this text shall be understood in full compliance with United Nation's Security Council Resolution 1244 and without prejudice to the status of Kosovo.
26 OSCE, CPRSI, Position Paper: Awareness Raising for Roma Activists on the Issue of Trafficking in Human Beings in South- Eastern Europe, Warsaw, April 2006
27 ECRI fourth report on Albania, available at: http://www.coe.int/t/dghl/monitoring/ecri/Country-by-country/Albania/ALB- CbC-IV-2010-001-ENG.pdf
CAHROM(2015)7
   24
Commission Staff Working Document, Albania 2015 report available at:
    17

report on Albania28 highlights that: “[T]here is no comprehensive and coherent data to evaluate the outcome of the strategy and the action plan for Roma inclusion. No proper budget has been a located to their implementation; as many programmes rely on donors’ funds, their long term sustainability is uncertain. Only one out of four Roma children has access to pre -school education. The education outcomes of many Roma and Egyptians remain poor and obstruct their access to the regular labour market. In practice, most Roma and Egyptians cannot benefit from social housing. 60 % of Roma housing premises do not have running water. Many Roma and Egyptians cannot regularise their homes. A considerable number are threatened by forced evictions without alternative housing. Only one in five Roma have health insurance cards.” At the time of the thematic visit, 50 Roma families in the “Selita” community in Tirana were at risk of being evicted as a result of the Ring Road construction by the Ministry of Urban Development and the Tirana municipality.
In accordance with Albanian Employment and Vocational Strategy 2007-2013, the Government supports the employment of all vulnerable groups, such as females of particular groups (including female victims of trafficking), Roma and Egyptian communities, emigrants and youth employed for the first time. Through the governmental employment programs, 74 persons from the Roma community have been employed in the year 2013.
In accordance with the National Program of Zero School Abandonment 2009-2013, the Government aims at eliminating the number of school drop-outs, especially of those children belonging to vulnerable groups, such as Roma community. However, reports29 indicate situations of segregation in school in Gjirokastra, Pogradec and Korça, where schools have been established with children only from Roma and Egyptian communities. In Korça, children reported dropping out of school because they cannot attend another school if it is not called a “school for Roma children” since other school directors refuse to include these children in their own schools. The same situation is also reported in Tirana, where school directors refuse to include children in street situation in their classes. A key NGO stakeholder from Tirana is reproducing a quota by a school representative: “we have an elite school...we cannot have one of these children...”30
The Law “On the Civil Status” amended in 2009 aimed at eliminating the number of unregistered cases in the civil status register. The Ministry of Interior has approved in 2012 a bylaw to reduce to zero the number of unregistered children. ONAC continued to lead the process of amending and facilitating the registration of unregistered children. The Minister of Interior issued the Guideline No. 07 date 10.01.2012 on “Approval of procedures and record sheets to be filled in by the State Police and Municipality/Municipality Unit/Commune representatives for the found unregistered children”. The Ministry of Health has improved the “Certificate-Assistance at birth” document, requiring more personal information from the mother for a better evidence of children’s birth.
A joint agreement has been signed between the Ministry of Interior, the Ministry of Foreign Affairs and “Free Legal Service Tirana” centre to create shorter procedures and timelines for the registration of children born outside the territory of Albania. During year 2012, 270 children were registered, while during year 2013, 212 children were registered. To date, there have been established 12 Child Rights Units at district level and over 170 Child Protection Units at the municipal/commune level and their staff is taking different trainings. „Different and Equal” in
28 The ECRI fifth report on Albania was adopted on March 2015 and published on June 2015, after the thematic visit took place. The full report is available at: https://www.coe.int/t/dghl/monitoring/ecri/country-by-country/albania/ALB-CbC-V- 2015-18-ENG.pdf
29 National Study on children in street situation in Albania, pg. 56, 2014, UNICEF and Save the children, available at: http://resourcecentre.savethechildren.se/sites/default/files/documents/final_research_report_english.pdf
30 2014 National study on children in street situation in Albania, UNICEF and Save the Children.
CAHROM(2015)7
    18

cooperation with local authorities in Tirana is working on establishing CPUs in every administrative unit in Tirana.
Office of the National Anti-Trafficking Coordinator has been an active participant in the study that “ARSIS” NGO conducted on the situation of street children in Albania in 2014. The study31 is aimed at understanding the magnitude of the phenomena of children in street situation in Albania and identifying the elements of the child/family protection system to be reinforced through a qualitative and quantitative analysis. According to the report, trafficking and exploitation of children in street situation “is not currently the focus of particular interventions.” The study recommends further research to understand the extent of the phenomenon and intervene appropriately to protect children and prosecute exploiters. However, the study provides a number of references regarding Roma:
 From initial interviews, children self-declared to belong to one of three different groups of Albanian society. While in the past children in street situation have been categorised from project-based evidence on the ground as being part of two specific communities, Roma and Egyptian, the present study found that there is also a significant number of children from the Albanian majority in street situation. In fact, children from the Albanian majority are between one quarter and one third of the total number of children counted.
 The majority of children begging are from the Roma and Egyptian communities (74,3%), whereas the Albanian majority children are involved in selling small items. There is a big difference between the numbers of the Albanian majority children involved in informal work and selling items on the street during two waves: sale of item - wave 1 was 79.8% (624 children), wave 2 became 22.9% (179 children); informal job - wave 1 was 16.5% (129 children), wave 2 became 73.4% (547 children). This difference in numbers and changes of the activities is due to seasonal influences of these types of street activities. In the summer tourist areas, there is a demand for certain items from the tourists and since schools are on summer holidays, the number of children involved in selling increases. In October the schools are open and there is not much tourism going on so children are more involved in informal jobs.
 There are more girls in street situation from the Roma community compared to the other two, and girls in the Albanian majority community are a relatively small percentage
 In Tirana children in street situation are mainly from Egyptian and Roma communities. In Tirana, children in street situation are found in Kinostudio, Babrru, Bregu i Lumit, Qyteti i Nxenesve areas. In Durres, the majority of children in street situation are from the Roma community. Families of children in street situation from the Albanian majority community migrated during the period 1995 – 2000 from northern cities in Albania and are located in the Porto Romano area. In Dibra, children in street situation are mainly from the Albanian majority community. In Kavaja, children in street situation are mainly from the Egyptian community while in Fushe Kruje they are mostly from the Roma community.
 The majority of Roma families that live in the streets or in huts in Tirana and Durres or who move around come from the following areas: Driza, Levan, Zhupan in Fier region; Otllake, Lapardha and Berat city in Berat region; Bilisht, Maliq, Pogradec and Korca city in Korca region; Fushekruja, Kenata, Nishtulla in Durres region; Cerrik, Peqin, Paper and Elbasan city in Elbasan region; Thumane, Shengjin, Lac and Lezha city in Lezha region; Shkoder city and surrounds in Shkodra region and; Rrogozhine Kavaje, Tirana city and surrounds in Tirana region.
 Even though in most cases economic reasons lie behind children becoming involved in street situations, from the initial interviews in waves 1 and 2, interestingly 22% (172) of children said that they entered into a street situation on their own will, 19% (149) of
31 The study is available at:
http://resourcecentre.savethechildren.se/sites/default/files/documents/final_research_report_english.pdf
CAHROM(2015)7
  19

children learned and were introduced to the street activities by their friends, 11% (86) of children learned or were introduced to the street activities by other adults, 7% (55) did not answer, and (41% (320) of children said they were in the street both because the families live on the streets and where parents force their children to work on the streets. In the study, 96% of children (750) stated that “earning income for their families” was their main reason for being on the streets, while only 4% (32 children) claimed that they kept the money for themselves.
 The study therefore shows that the majority of street children in Albania need to make money to support themselves and/or their families. Most of the children utilise one or two major income generating strategies. The most prevalent are begging (especially among younger children and girls), and working (such as petty trade, delivering goods, collecting glass or scrap metal, and car washing). Children’s involvement in such income- generating activities is primarily motivated by their family’s economic hardship, especially in the case of younger children, who do not spend nights on the street. Income- generating activities often supplement (or substitute) family income, or allow the children to sustain themselves, thus reducing family expenditure. The type and frequency of children’s activities on the street are affected by specific root causes but also linked to their individual situation in life. Children who are begging are often accompanied by someone, whereas children who are working are usually alone. There are also incidences of scavenging and theft, particularly visible among children actually living on the street. Some children in street situations, (particularly older ones who live without their families, those who do not have a primary care-giver and live on the street full-time, or those who have run away from their families), also engage in street begging or street labour to meet their own survival needs because there is nobody else to secure those needs for them. These children apply more income generation strategies than their counterparts who live with their families and spend the money almost exclusively on themselves. Begging typically prevents children in street situation from going to school with only 20% (156 children) of working children still try to combine school attendance with income- generating activities, while children who do not engage in generating income have the highest school enrolment rates (52%).
2.2.4. Main findings of the thematic visit
2.2.4.1. Meeting with the Ombudsman
CAHROM(2015)7
In the first day of the thematic visit, the CAHROM experts had four bilateral meetings with state officials from the Ministries of Education and Sports, Ministry of Social Welfare and Youth, the Ministry of Interior and the Municipality of Tirana, but also a meeting with the Albanian Ombudsman.
 In the meeting with the Ombudsman, the Director of Cabinet and other experts presented the
 main activities of their work on Roma. As such, the Office is placing a great emphasis on Roma issues, particularly on complaints and reports. For the period 2013-2015 in the Ombudsman institution has addressed around 400 (four hundred) complaints. The number of complaints received from Roma has increased in the last years as a result of their on-going awareness activities.
In 2012, the Ombudsman published a report on children’s rights with a focus on Roma children, with a focus on the causes of trafficking in human beings and exploitation for forced labour. In 2013, the Ombudsman published a specific report on Roma rights, which provides a mapping of their situation and the challenges that they face. In October 2014, he submitted to the Parliament a special report “On the situation of housing issues in Republic of Albania”.
 20

CAHROM(2015)7
The office addressed a number of specific challenges such as the issue of social housing for Roma, registration, and housing evictions. The office explained that the Government would have to facilitate criteria for social housing through amending the legislation on social housing since Roma and Egyptians cannot meet the eligibility criteria in terms of minimum income. The ombudsman recommended that the minimum income criteria should be waived in the case of Roma and that quotas should be introduced at the local level to ensure that Roma are represented among social housing beneficiaries.32 The Ombudsman emphasize that his Recommendations remained unimplemented to the date of the CAHROM thematic visit.
The Ombudsman also highlighted the civil registration of Roma and Egyptians as a major problem, especially because it is conditioned by a fixed address and/or payment of taxes. Once they obtain identity documents, Roma and Egyptians are at time unable to register a transfer of residence due to the lack of property ownership records or housing lease agreements in the municipality where they moved.
 Regarding housing evictions, the Ombudsman informed the CAHROM experts about the plans of the municipality of Tirana to build a ring road, for which reason 300 people would be evicted.
 2.2.4.2. Meeting with the Ministry of Social Welfare and Youth
In the Meeting with representatives of the Ministry of Social Welfare and Youth it was highlighted that the situation of children in street situation or ‘on the move’ in Albania dates back to 20 years ago. In 2014, UNICEF and Save the children commissioned national study on children in street situation in Albania33, prepared by ARSIS and GFK Albania, which showed that 74.3 per cent come from Roma and Egyptian communities. Among activities identified the most common are selling different items (38% wave 1- 25% wave 2) such as cigarettes, lighters, water, farm produce and other foods, flowers, pens, pencils, car fresheners or other accessories, as well as begging for money (35% wave 1 - 21% wave 2), recycling plastic and metal (8% wave 1 – 20% wave 2), and informal jobs (12% wave 1 – 15% wave 2). Informal jobs include loading and unloading goods trucks, working in agriculture, cleaning roads, cleaning at cemeteries, looking after sun beds on beaches, working at entrances to mines, and busking.
About 100 children are placed into institutions of social care each year and approximately 30-40 per cent of them come from Roma and Egyptian communities.34 The Transitory Emergency Centre in Tirana is treating families with children together. The Centre also employs families who live there, provides material packages, facilitates registration and ensures school enrolment.
As a way to provide an enhanced protection and assistance to children in street situation, the Ministry of Social Welfare and Youth signed a Memorandum of Understanding with the Ministry of Interior/National Anti-Trafficking Coordinator on September 2014 and developed a Plan of Action for a pilot action regarding children in street situation in collabouration with the civil society. The action aims to protect children in begging situation, also by avoiding separation from parents as much as possible. The Penal code provides for criminalisation of begging, nonetheless, the aim is to act preventively. As a result, mandatory guidelines for professionals, including for social workers have been drafted about addressing children in street situation, respecting the standard operating procedure, in the framework of which workers are trained on child protection. Criteria have been developed to identify the child as a victim or potential victim of
32 The Ombudsman’s recommendations can be found also in the “Legislative recommendation about an amendment to law no. 9232/2004 <On social housing programs for the inhabitants of the urban areas>”, 2013, p.6.
33 National study on children in street situation in Albania, 2014, UNICEF and Save the children, available at: http://resourcecentre.savethechildren.se/sites/default/files/documents/final_research_report_english.pdf
34 National Action Plan for Integration of Roma and Egyptians in the Republic of Albania, 2015-2020
  21

trafficking. The Ministry of Social Welfare and Youth finalised the child protection protocols, which provide the basis for the work of municipalities.
At the time of drafting of this report, Albania was going through territorial and administrative reform (from 375 local government units to 61), which included decentralisation and social services reform, which would impact also the processes initiated regarding child protection. It was expected that the social protection system would strengthen the local level and social service delivery at local level and that child protection services would be part of the social services at local level. It was also expected to have a monitoring system of central and local government and local budget allocations.
According to the Law on child protection, each municipality should have a Child Protection Unit with the task to identify children at risk, mainly children abused, in doubt of abuse or in very difficult situations. So far, these units include only one person, but it is envisaged that they would include in the future social workers, psychologists, doctors etc. In this process, municipalities should be trained to improve their current understanding according to which social services include only social assistance. A similar problem was indicated by the CAHROM expert in Netherlands, where, according to him, social workers were not equipped to deal with vulnerable groups, such as the Roma.
In addition, the reform on social care focuses on working more with families and parents to transform institutions into community-based care and avoid institutionalisation of children. Thus, the Albanian Ministry of Social Welfare and Youth has been working to develop methodologies for community outreach. Increased funding would be needed at central and local level to establish new services, especially for families, including on empowering, parenting, community-based services and residential type system. Discussions with the European Commission have been initiated in this regard.
The Ministry of Social Welfare and Youth has been working also on a law on social enterprises, whereby economic empowerment of women and families is envisaged.
In this overall process, the local municipalities remain one of the biggest challenges. The social services will need to provide social services at local level to strengthen families. Therefore, financial support and training are needed to increase awareness and build capacities at local level.
Protection and assistance for victims of trafficking is provided through shelters. Albania has 4 shelters, one state owned with limited services and three operated by NGOs. They provide psychological, health and legal assistance, medical care, reintegration services and assistance for victims’ children.
During the meeting with the Ministry of Social Welfare and Youth, the experts were informed that the Government was looking into ways to increase funding for the NGO shelters. Later that month, the Government allocated funding for staff salaries at two NGO shelters.
Both the Ministry of Social Welfare and Youth and the Ministry of Interior informed the experts about the establishment in 2013 of three mobile units in Tirana, Vlora and lbasan, funded by the US Department of State and implemented by the International Organization for Migration (IOM) in partnership with the National Coalition of Anti-trafficking. The mobile units are composed of 2 social workers each from the National Anti-trafficking Shelters Coalition (“Të Ndryshëm dhe Të Barabartë” in Tirana, “Tjetër Vizion” in Elbasan and “Vatra” in Vlora). In November 2013, the cooperation with the police was enhanced with the cooperation agreements signed between the Regional Police Directorates and the abovementioned shelters. Between June 20011 and September 2013, the Mobile Units identified a total of 94 potential victims of trafficking of whom
22
CAHROM(2015)7

40 are adults and 54 are juveniles35. The majority of the victims are trafficked for sexual exploitation, forced labour and begging.
Regarding cross-border cooperation, Albanian children are begging mainly in Kosovo*36. Recently, the Vice-Minister went to Kosovo* to discuss cooperation and harmonisation of definition of potential victims of trafficking. According to Albanian laws, children in street situation are automatically identified as victims or potential victims of trafficking as opposed to Kosovo*. Regarding the cooperation with Greece, the biggest challenge is the registration of Albanian children when they are returned to Albania. Seldom, when Albanian children are returned from Greece, the registration documents they hold are not recognised in Albania.
It is important to stress also that the 2016-2020 National Action Plan for the Integration of Roma and Egyptians will be part of a broader framework for implementation of the Social Protection and Social Inclusion Strategies 2015-2020, under the umbrella of the National Strategy for Development and Integration for the same period. The Action Plan is also inspired by the Social Inclusion Strategy 2007-2013, Social Protection Strategy 2007-2013 and the Social Care Reform Action Plans, which recognise the multi-dimensional nature of poverty and social exclusion. The Action Plan focuses on the core areas of civil registration and access to justice, social protection, education and promoting intercultural dialogue, employment and vocational education and training, housing and urban integration and healthcare.
At the end of the meeting, the representatives of the Ministry of Social Welfare and Youth have requested the Council of Europe Secretariat to provide the Government with additional support in training various professionals on the issue of trafficking and Roma, in the context where the Government has limited funding for enhancing the capacity of professionals to respond to the issue of trafficking in human beings in line with human rights international standards and national legislation.
2.2.4.3. Meeting with the Ministry of Education and Sport
In the meeting with the Ministry of Education and Sports, the Deputy Minister, Ms Nora Malaj presented a short overview of the legal framework and projects that support the access of Roma children to education, but also prevent drop-out. In 2011, at the initiative of the Ministry of Education together with the Ministry of Finance, children from poor families received free textbooks, including Roma children. In 2014, the Ministry of Education issued Guidelines according to which Roma children from preschool are exempted from financial guarantees that usually parents pay at the beginning of each month to cover any expenses and damages, and which are reimbursed at the end of the year. In 2013, the Ministry of Education and Sports introduced Guidelines for the Second Chance programme introduced by the Ministry in 2011. The programme itself appointed 93 additional part-time teachers (including 35 Roma and Egyptians) to be in charge of specific courses for Roma children in order to stimulate their school performance, encourage them to return to school or prevent them from dropping out. In 2012- 2013, out of 917 children who attended the second chance programme, 625 were Roma and Egyptian.37
The further help preventing school drop-out of children in street situation, the Ministries of Education, Health and Interior signed a memorandum of Understanding, particularly to prevent the drop-out of girls between 6 and 9 grades. In order to promote and stimulate attendance in higher education, The Ministry of Education and Sports has introduced quotas. According to the
35 Data provided by the Ministry of Interior.
37 The Action Plan for Integration of Roma and Egyptians includes a review of the Second Chance programme.
36 *All references to Kosovo, whether the territory, institutions or population, in this text shall be understood in full compliance
with United Nation's Security Council Resolution 1244 and without prejudice to the status of Kosovo.
CAHROM(2015)7
  23

quota, 20 spaces are reserved at the Bachelor level, 20 in professional schools and 20 in Masters level (all with scholarship).
In the meeting with the Municipality of Tirana, the Director spoke briefly about their cooperation with ARSIS NGO, Save the Children and local actors regarding social services provided by the Tirana Municipality. Regarding social housing, the experts were told that 20% of the total allocation of social housing is intended for Roma and single moms as well as that 385 apartments were distributed under the Rental Social Housing Programme, funded by the Council of Europe Development Bank, though there is no information on Roma or Egyptian beneficiaries.
2.2.4.4. Meeting with the Ministry of Interior
The CAHROM met also the Deputy Ministry of Interior, who is also the National Anti-Trafficking Coordinator and her team.
The National Anti-Trafficking Coordinator described some of the challenges in addressing trafficking, among which the limited proactive investigations by the Courts on serious crime, the limited budget allocated to anti-trafficking, included to NGOs addressing anti-trafficking. During 2014, the Court of Serious Crimes has issues 7 criminal decisions for the offense of “trafficking of adults”, “trafficking of women” and “trafficking of minors”. Ten people have been convicted during 2014. In 2014 the National Anti-Trafficking Coordinator proposed the establishment of a Task Force between the Prosecution of Serious Crimes, Serious Crime Court and State Police in order to strengthen cooperation between authorities and discuss concrete cases of THB. Following the CAHROM thematic visit the National Coordinator on Anti-Trafficking and the Ministry of Internal Affairs of Slovenia would have a workshop in Tirana on Joint Investigation Groups regarding THB in the Western Balkans on 24 to 26 March 2015.
In terms of regional and international cooperation regarding trafficking issues, a Memorandum of Understanding between the Secretary of State for the Home Department, acting through the Office of Internal Affairs and the Ministry of Internal Affairs of the Republic of Albania “On the intensification of cooperation in the fight against trafficking of human beings on improving identification, referral and assisted voluntary return of victims/potential victims of human trafficking” was signed on 4 December in London. On 8 December 2014, the additional protocol was signed with the Republic of Montenegro to “Intensify Cooperation in the Fight against Trafficking of Human Beings ” and the improvement of identification, referral and assisted voluntary return of victims/Potential Victims of Trafficking”, in addition to the Agreement between the Council of Ministers of the Republic of Albania and the government of the Republic of Montenegro, for cooperation in the fight against organized crime, terrorism, illegal trafficking and other illegal activities, approved by DCM No . 483, dated 16.7.2004.
At the end of March 2014 and in January 2015, joint meetings were held in Pristina with the Anti- Trafficking Coordinator of Pristina and Montenegro, as well as with experts from Kosovo* and Albania, here it was highlighted the revitalization of the Additional Protocol and gaps were identified in the implementation of the obligations arising from this protocol on information exchange regarding the identification of victims and potential victims of trafficking.
The National Coordinator for Anti-Trafficking mentioned a series of meetings in the framework of the agreements and signed protocols with regional counterparts, such as Montenegro, „the former Jugoslav Republic of Macedonia”, Kosovo*, Greece, also in international level, with Italy, France, Switzerland and Belgium for the signing of the Agreements in the fight against trafficking of human beings.
The National Coordinator mentioned also a number of anti-trafficking preventive and reactive measures implemented by the Government, such as the mobile team units, the HELPLINE for
24
CAHROM(2015)7

victims of trafficking, the GOOGLE application for reporting and assistance, as well as a number of information brochures and awareness raising campaign for vulnerable groups, including the Roma and Egyptian communities.
Albania is among the first countries in the region to use mobile technology to prevent THB. Citizens can anonymously send a short message which reaches simultaneously 6 public officials, members of the Responsible Authority for the Identification, Referral and Protection of Victims/Potential Victims of Trafficking. They can also call for free the national line 116,006 to report cases of suspected trafficking and send free sms (500 sms received last year regarding children in street situation). The Google application “Report!Rescue!” can be downloaded for free from Google PlayStore.
Since 2011, Albania enforced the Standard Operation Procedure (SOP), according to which every victim/potential victim of trafficking in Albania is identified as a victims or potential Victim of trafficking. According to SOP, the identification process is divided in two stages: initial and formal identification. Victims of trafficking can be identified within the country, at the border and abroad. The initial identification can involve any individual and agency, governmental or nongovernmental within the country. To assist the process of initial identification there are set indicators of trafficking, which are divided into two categories: primary trafficking indicators and secondary trafficking indicators. If the situation of a child or adult indicates one or more primary indicators as components of trafficking and some secondary indicators that may be interpreted as consequences of the trafficking process, the person is considered a potential victim of trafficking.
The Office of the National Anti-Trafficking Coordinator pointed out that a number of trainings on SOPs have been conducted to date for all actors involved in the process of identification, referral and assistance of victims and potential victims of THB in order to appropriately identify, refer and assist victims in full compliance with the rights they are entitled to. Part of these trainings is an increased focus on the identification of male victims of trafficking as well as national victims.
For instance, eight people have been trained as trainers that provide further training to all sectors that provide assistance. They were trained by international organisations and NGOs and now they train other structures at national level, such as: social workers, police and prosecutors. In their training, they put together the police with social services, as they work together to determine whether the person in question is a victim or potential victim of trafficking.38
Trainings on awareness-raising for elementary and high school directors, teachers, and school psychologists in urban and rural areas have also been organized in 2012-2013. The aim of these trainings was to enhance their knowledge, ability and their responsibility to identify and refer potential victims of trafficking, reporting tasks, and measures to take to prevent human trafficking.
A challenge that was also mentioned at the meeting was the the recording of all children in the civil status register and awareness-raising measures, particularly in the Roma and Egyptian communities. In 2012, the Ministry of the Interior adopted regulations aimed at reducing the number of unregistered children. It also signed an agreement with the Ministry of Foreign Affairs and the NGO Tirana Legal Aid Society (TLAS) to speed up procedures for registering Albanian children born outside the country’s territory. However, the number of unregistered children had increased in 2014, partly as a result of numerous Albanians previously living in Italy or Greece returning to the country with their children without valid documents. Furthermore, while
CAHROM(2015)7
 38 Prison staff have not been trained so far.
25

most women gave birth in hospitals, there were still many women giving birth outside maternity units.
2.2.4.5. Meeting with the Municipality of Tirana
The meeting was attended by the Director of Cabinet of the Mayor of Tirana and a representative of the Arsis anti-trafficking organisation. The representative of the Tirana Municipality presented briefly the work of the office regarding Roma, in the area of social protection and services. On the issue of social housing, the experts were informed about the possibilities of social housing for vulnerable groups, including Roma, while it was highlighted that Roma did not submit requests for social housing and that this might prevent some of them in ensuring security of tenure, especially those threatened with evictions.
The representative of ARSIS addressed more specifically the issue of children in street situation and referred also to the findings of the 2014 national study on children in street situation in Albania, published with the support of UNICEF and Save the Children.
2.2.4.6. Roundtable meeting with local authorities and civil society
The Roundtable organised in the second day of the thematic visit by the Albanian authorities provided a unique possibility for a wide range of stakeholders, including Roma representatives to discuss some of the challenges in addressing human trafficking in Roma communities.
At the Roundtable, the CAHROM experts were invited to share their country experiences. As such, Mr Spyros Bratsikas, Police Captain in the Hellenic Police Headquarters, Anti-Trafficking Office presented shortly the Anti-Trafficking “ILAEIRA” Initiative, which is referring to the operational action of Law Enforcement Agencies, for preventively and repressively combating criminal organisations that are activated in Trafficking in Human Beings, mainly women and children. In order to combat THB, the Hellenic Police Headquarters established two Anti-trafficking Departments and 12 Anti-Trafficking Unites throughout Greece.
Regarding the representation of children among victims of trafficking, there were 9 children trafficked for sexual exploitation in 2012 and 7 in 2014, with a decrease to 1 child in 2013.Among them, in 2012 1 was Greek, 5 were Romanian, 2 Albanian and 1 Bulgarian girls, while in 2013 the victim was a Greek girl. In 2014, there were 1 Greek, 4 Romanian and 1 Albanian, all girls. Regarding begging, there were 4 children victims of begging in 2012 and 6 in 2014 with 0 children in 2013. In 2012, there were 3 Romanian boys and 1 Greek girl, while in 2014, there was 1 Greek boy and 2 girls and 2 Romanian girls. As for labour purposes, there were 2 victims in 2012 and 2013 and only one in 2014. In 2012, there was 1 Romanian boy and 1 Bulgarian girl. In 2013, there were 1 Bangladesh boy and 1 Romanian girl. In 2014, there were two Romanian girls.
Ms Maria Ververidou, Expert-Counsellor to the Office of the National Rapporteur on Trafficking of Human Beings in the Ministry of Foreign Affairs of the Hellenic Republic spoke about the latest developments in the legislative changes, such as the ratification of the Palermo Protocol (2010), the ratification of the CoE Convention on Action against THB (2013) and the transposition of the anti-trafficking EU Directive (2011/36/ΕC) into the Greek legal order with the Law 4198/2013.
Ms Ververidou focused her presentation mainly on the role of the Office of the National Rapporteur on Trafficking in Human Beings. The Office of the National Rapporteur (NR) on Trafficking in Human Beings was established in October 2013 by the Minister of Foreign Affairs along with 9 other competent Ministers. The NR Office cooperates closely with focal points in other competent Ministries as well as with the IOM and the accredited NGOs in the field of anti- trafficking. This is promoting a better cooperation between the competent authorities and
26
CAHROM(2015)7

stakeholders and facilitates the national ownership of internationally acknowledged best practices against THB. Through National Structural Funds (ESPA), the Internal Security Fund (ISF) and other EC Funds, the Office of the National Rapporteur (NRO) is coordinating competent State, NGO, Private and Cultural sector stakeholders, towards a large-scale, multi-disciplinary anti-THB Action Plan in Prevention, Prosecution, Protection and Partnership (4-Ps approach).
The mandate of the National Rapporteur Office focuses on increasing partnerships and facilitating synergies among all actors and stakeholders involved in combating THB. Towards that end, the NRO has launched several ongoing initiatives and important meetings resulting into: a) the establishment of a permanent Consultation Forum with Civil Society actors; b) a permanent Coordination Mechanism with public authorities, which include senior officials and agencies from the Ministry of Justice, Ministry of Citizens’ Protection, Ministry of Health, Ministry of Education, Ministry of Interior, Ministry of Mass Media, Ministry of Labour, and the International Organization for Migration (IOM Greece); c) a Memorandum of Cooperation with the private sector aimed at targeting the demand for trafficked persons and implementing awareness-raising projects with businesses and consumers. This Memorandum, signed with Corporate Social Responsibility/ CSR Hellas Network, is under the umbrella of the “Break the Chain” campaign, committing all companies to slave-free supply chains; d) an agreement with the Ministry of Education to introduce THB awareness -raising lessons in the courses of Human Rights and Sexual Education and an Agreement with the Local Administration and Municipalities to join forces against THB with major cities in Europe.
The main priorities of the NRO, which have already been submitted to a proposal to the ISF (2014- 2020) are related to: improving the National Referral Mechanism for the identification, assistance and support of victims of trafficking (VoTs); establishing a comprehensive and systematically updated database for VoTs, according to EUROSTAT standards; promoting cooperation of state agencies and NGOs in EU projects; and implementing large-scale education, train the trainers and awareness-raising projects.
The NRO gives special emphasis to organizing public awareness events, through culture and arts. To this end and on the occasion of the 2014 EU Anti-Trafficking Day (18.10), cultural events (free and open to the public), including theatrical performances, audio-visual material and artwork relevant to THB, have been organized under the auspice of the NR Office and in collabouration with EU Institutions, the IOM and NGOs. Also, an open to public Workshop on Sexual Exploitation has been recently (27.11.2014) organized by the NR Office in partnership with the French Embassy in Greece, at the Institute of France in Athens, with the participation of Greek, French and EU officials, as well as heads of NGOs with a leading role in anti-trafficking issues. On the occasion of the 2015 EU Anti-Trafficking Day, the NRO prepares the organization of a transmedia public awareness festival under the umbrella “Break the Chain” in cooperation with our partners from local authorities, private sector and civil society organizations.
Ms Ververidou also informed participants about the fact that the NRO had planned to host a transnational meeting between Greece, Albania, Bulgaria and Romania on Joint Actions for the Protection of Children on the Move in the framework of MARIO Project. in Athens, at the Ministry of Foreign Affairs on 16 March 2015.
Mr Walter Hilhorst, Operational Specialist, Inspector of the National Police, Expert in human trafficking in relation to Roma, Netherlands, spoke in his intervention about the Dutch approach in combating the exploitation of children in forced criminality with a focus on Roma children. The expert explained that the sense of urgency in addressing Roma appeared in 2009 when municipalities increasingly raised concerns about Roma families, regarding public order, school absenteeism or early drop-out, high crime rates, including Roma children from Romania and Bulgaria forced to beg and steal in Netherlands but also in other Western European countries. As a result, the Ministry of Justice and the Platform of Municipalities with Roma population developed a
27
CAHROM(2015)7

national program, based on three pillars: knowledge development on Roma; developing links with the EU and the Council of Europe and piloting the program in 4 Municipalities. The principles that guided the implementation of the program were the focus on welfare and future of the children and employing an integral approach on “multi problem-families”. As such, the initiative required that there is 1 plan for each family and 1 family manager/worker. In addition, a very good coordination among the social network, the police, the youth care, mental institutions, schools, housing associations, child protection services and other aid agencies was required.
From the police perspective, the aspects that were noticed before the implementation of the national program were only the: burglaries, home diversions, pickpocketing, shop lifting and scams, where the police acted ad-hoc and with little impact. But when starting to look closely at the families involved in crimes, the Dutch police could identify children that were exploited and needed protection, including from their families. Before, the police would look at criminal acts by Roma from a bias perspective, ignoring the best interest of children. Finally, the expert concluded that they were not “combating Roma, they were combating trafficking in human beings”.
Mr Stefano Pasta, from the Centre for Research on Intercultural Relations, Sacred Heart Catholic University in Milan, working on a sub-group on Roma, spoke briefly about the situation of Roma children in Italy and the obstacles they face in the access to education, especially those living in camps and forced to move all the time. He also spoke about Italy’s initiatives to promote the social inclusion of Roma and the role of various institutions including the National Office for Combating Discrimination.
Discussions from participants focused on the overall situation of Roma and Egyptian communities in Albania, particularly of children as vulnerable to trafficking. It was pointed out that Roma children register high drop-out rates and that as a result may fall victims of trafficking. A Roma representative pointed out that often teachers do not know where to report or what should be the procedure to react when children are at risk of being trafficked.
Regarding the responsibility of parents towards their children, it was underlined that sometimes parents and relatives are involved in the trafficking of their children and family members and that this poses a high risk for re-trafficking.
Another Roma representative pointed out that the lack of trust by Roma in police and local authorities is a major obstacle in preventing and tackling trafficking. It was noted that on a few occasions Romani women went to the police to report acts of domestic violence against them and that the police did not respond adequately to the victims and as a result the cases were dropped by the women involved. In response, a representative of police forces said that it is critical to have community policing in order to improve relationships with the Roma community. Examples were also given about Romani women having difficulties to accessing the shelters for victims of violence and the need for increased awareness raising and community reach-out. A concrete example of 25 Roma families living and working on the property of a landowner and potentially trafficked for the purpose of forced labour was mentioned in the discussions, where it was highlighted that there is a need for a better and prompt response from the social authorities, police and other responsible bodies to identify, investigate and respond to potential acts of trafficking. In this regard, the speaker concluded that a stronger partnership with Roma NGOs is needed.
A representative of the state social services discussed about the need for an enhanced cooperation with the International Office for Migration (IOM) in order to avoid overlap. More specifically the speaker referred to the situation of returned victims of trafficking, about whom the social services need to be notified upon their return so that they can receive assistance and avoid re-trafficking. The speaker emphasised that holistic approaches provide better protection of children against trafficking and in this sense, she mentioned that since 2014, state social
28
CAHROM(2015)7

services provide services and assistance to families, including Roma families and not just to children, especially children in street situation.
The IOM representative talked about IOM’s efforts towards the implementation of Albania’s 2009 Reintegration Strategy for Returning Albanian Citizens, thus making possible the return of illegal migrants to Albania.
2.2.4.7. Field visits
The CAHROM thematic group had also the opportunity to visit the National Reception Centre of Victims of Trafficking (NRCVT) and the Centre for Children in Street Situation in Tirana.
The NRCVT is an institution supervised by the Ministry of Labour, Social Affairs and Equal Opportunities (MoLS AEO). It is the only state sponsored centre for the reception of trafficking victims. The target group of this center comprises: trafficked women and girls or those at risk of trafficking; unaccompanied children at risk of being trafficked; and sexually exploited young women who have returned to Albania. All the services in the center are offered by a multi- disciplinaryteam. The center also assists the trafficked peoplethat have testified against their traffickers withservices related to their protection in accordance with the Law for the Protection of Witnesses and Justice Collabourators.
The Centre for Children in Street Situation is a day centre in premises provided by the municipality of Tirana and operates under a project implemented since 2009 by Save the Children and, most recently, funded by the EU Delegation in Albania (in 2011 and 2012).
The centre undertakes outreach to identify children at risk and establish contact with the children’s families. Beyond outreach, services provided by the centre include birth- and civil- registration assistance, medical support and school enrolment. At the same time, the centre provides training for service providers in working with children living and working in the streets and with their families.
In each year of its operation, the centre has served approximately 300 children at risk of living and working in the streets and being subject to exploitation and abuse, including trafficking. Insofar as Roma and Egyptian children account for the majority of children living and working in the streets, they also constitute a main target group of the centre. The approximately 300 Roma/Egyptian children (6-16 years) benefit from improved access to education and gained life- social-vocational skills. Children here are also offered with development opportunities and recreational activities which help children to increase their self-esteem and confidence and empower them to make positive choices in life. This initiative has been validated as a good practice by the OSCE-ODIHR.
2.3. Greece
2.3.1. National situation and legal framework
Greece is a transit and destination country for victims, trafficked for commercial sexual exploitation and forced labour. As Greece is one of the main entry points for migration flows into Europe, potential victims of trafficking may be identified amongst the undocumented migrants entering the country.
On a national level there have been intensive efforts to fight THB, following a comprehensive approach that includes legislative reforms, inter-agency coordination, a more inclusive protection regime for victims, public awareness campaigns and partnership with stakeholders from major
29
CAHROM(2015)7

international organizations, as well as from countries of origin, transit and destination. Towards this end, Greece ratified the three fundamental legal instruments against THB: the UN Convention against Transnational Organized Crime and its Protocols – the “Palermo Protocol”: Law 3875/2010 (158/Α ́/2010), signed and ratified the Council of Europe Convention on Action against Trafficking in Human Beings with the Law 4216/2013 (266/A ́/2013) and transposed the 2011/36/EU Directive into the Law 4198/2013 (215/A ́/2013). The new Law establishes the Office of the National Rapporteur (MFA) and gives an official mandate of accountability to the informal Coordination Mechanism of competent Ministries, International Organisations and accredited NGO’s. It is meant at promoting a better cooperation between the competent authorities and stakeholders, and it facilitates the national ownership of internationally acknowledged best practices against THB.
According to the Government assessment, in 2014, less victims of THB were identified than in previous years, while from 2010 to 2013 the number of identified victims remained stable (ranging from 92 to 99). Similarly, in 2014 fewer perpetrators were prosecuted comparing to previous years. The number of identified perpetrators has been decreasing from 2010 onwards. This may imply that traffickers have resorted to new, tacit means of exploitation and that their new modus operandi is more difficult to be detected and prevented. Moreover, more often than before traffickers are choosing different routes other than Greece. As concerns the type of THB most often identified, labour and sexual exploitation remain the majority of identified cases. Most female victims were recruited by their “partner” who falsely promised that he could offer jobs to Greece as domestic workers or waitresses. Most of the victims originate from EU countries (Bulgaria and Romania) and travelled along with their recruiter to Greece. Female victims continue to appear in greater numbers than male victims (with the exception of 2013, when more male victims of THB were identified). Only four female minors have been identified as victims of THB in 2014. This number may be much higher, given the thousands of unaccompanied minors entering Greece at risk of being exploited.
In the majority of cases, the trafficker’s nationality is Greek, Albanian, Bulgarian and Romanian. Perpetrators from Czech Republic, Russia, Ukraine, Belarus, Georgia, Bosnia, and Turkey were also prosecuted. A few perpetrators from African countries, such as Nigeria, have also been prosecuted. In 2014, three perpetrators from Syria were also identified.
Human trafficking for sexual exploitation remains the predominant manifestation of trafficking in Greece. The majority of victims for commercial sexual exploitation originate from: Romania, Bulgaria, Albania, Russia, Ukraine, Moldova and Nigeria. Their ages range from 20 to 30 years old. According to official statistics, the predominant trafficking route originates from eastern European countries, towards western European countries. Over the last years however, two additional routes are often used by traffickers: a) from south-eastern Asia to Europe, and b) from Western Africa to Europe.
The recruitment of victims for exploitation in forced begging is another aspect of THB occurring in Greece. Statistics show that in 2011 and 2012, forced begging increased, while from 2012 to 2013 the situation has remained stable. In the majority of cases, perpetrators and victims were Romanian and Bulgarian citizens, from the Roma community. Perpetrators approach potential victims, especially those with physical and mental disabilities, transfer them to Greece and force them to begging in several public spaces (shopping malls, traffic lights, metro station etc.).
Child trafficking in Greece concerns unaccompanied minors (girls and boys) who are recruited by perpetrators and are trafficked to Greece for further exploitation. The age of young victims ranges from 15 to 18 years old. Perpetrators recruit young girls and by falsifying their IDs so as to verify that they are adults, transfer them to Greece for commercial sexual exploitation. There have been cases of entire families with minor members, who have been exploited by traffickers. Greek law enforcement authorities have investigated cases related to exploitation of minors in forced
30
CAHROM(2015)7

begging. The victims (boys and girls) originate from the Roma community and their parents either force them to begging or, in some cases, children are “sold” to other Roma, so as to exploit their begging. In the majority of such cases, both victims and perpetrators were Roma from Bulgaria and Romania.
Exploitation of begging and labour exploitation in the form of selling petty items on the street (such as paper handkerchiefs or flowers) is the most common type of exploitation affecting Roma children in Greece. The crime of exploitation of begging did not previously fall under the anti- trafficking legislation or under the legislation relevant to begging. As a result, it remained largely unpunished, despite the fact that it was increasingly committed against economically deprived persons. Anti-begging legislation concerns Article 409 of the Penal Code which criminalises the act of a) coercing persons under one’s custody or dependent on him into begging or neglecting to prevent them from begging; and b) supplying persons under the age of majority, or adults who are mentally or physically handicapped, to others with the aim of gaining themselves, or others, financial benefit through the pity or curiosity these persons evoke to the public.
Recent field research39 suggests that that “law-enforcement authorities in Greece find it difficult to investigate and prove whether or not involving children in begging constitutes trafficking when there is no evidence of the involvement of a third person or group of persons, beyond the parents/legal guardians, as traffickers”. In remains unclear whether the anti-trafficking legislation applies to situations when the parents/legal guardians are the (suspected) perpetrators. This is especially the case when no clear signs of use of physical violence, abuse or coercion against the child, are detected at the stage of the investigation. This is so even though Law 3875/2010 foresees that the recruitment, transportation, transfer, harbouring or receipt of a child for the purpose of exploitation shall be considered “trafficking in persons” even if this does not involve any of the means set forth in the relevant legislation.
These challenges in the identification of children as victims of trafficking have important implications as regards the prevention of the crime, the prosecution of offenders and the protection and assistance that child victims receive. They reveal that Roma child begging constitutes a “grey zone”. The difficulty lies in drawing the line between the two. The limited ability of the anti-trafficking legal and policy framework to prevent the crime and adequately identify the victims is more profound in situations of child trafficking in begging but it is not limited to those. While anti-trafficking efforts and the cooperation between relevant stakeholders have strengthened in recent years, the CONFRONT study suggests that the number of identified child victims of trafficking grossly understates the reality.
Greece has not put in place a formal national identification and referral system for victims of trafficking. Nevertheless, a quasi-formalised process of identification and referral involving the anti-trafficking units and Public Prosecutors exists, while the national identification and referral mechanism (NRM) foreseen in legislation is in the process of development.
Regarding child trafficking for sexual exploitation, girls trafficked for this purpose make up the largest share among the identified victims of trafficking in Greece. The 2015 study40 indicates that a number of Roma girls from Bulgaria and Romania have been trafficked into Greece and exploited in prostitution. Unlike sex trafficking of girls, sexual exploitation of boys in general, and Roma boys in particular, is an under researched phenomenon.
39 CONFRONT. Countering new forms of Roma children trafficking: participatory approach. National report: Greece, February 2015. Report available at: http://childrentrafficking.eu/wp-content/uploads/2015/05/CONFRONT_Country- Report_Greece.pdf
40 CONFRONT 2015
CAHROM(2015)7
   31

2.3.2. Existing data on Roma in relation to trafficking in human beings
According to the 2015 study, the first instances of Roma child trafficking in Greece were reported in the late 1990s. Children of Roma origin were to be found among Albanians who were trafficked and exploited in begging or forced labour in the streets of big cities in Greece. Trafficking from Albania for begging and other purposes affected mainly boys. Cases of Albanian Roma girls who had been trafficked for exploitation in prostitution in Greece were also reported in the early 2000s.
Nowadays, law enforcement authorities and service providers estimate that trafficking of Roma children from Albania in the form described has substantially decreased, if not altogether subsided. Instead, there is an increased presence of Roma children from Bulgaria and Romania in the streets where they are involved in begging and other income-generating activities. The EU accession has enabled legal and unhindered entry to Greece.
According to the 2014 Trafficking in Persons report for Bulgaria, a number of Roma children are forced into street begging and petty theft in Greece. The same report identifies Romania as a country of origin of men, women, and children subjected to labour trafficking, sex trafficking, as well as forced begging and theft in Greece, with victims of forced begging being typically ethnic Roma. In recent years, the police and NGOs have noted the presence in Greece of a significant number of Roma children from Albania, Bulgaria, and Romania subjected by family members to sell goods on the street or beg.
A significant obstacle to have an overall understanding of the extent and forms of Roma child trafficking in Greece is that no data on the ethnic origin of the identified victims of trafficking is collected. The data that is available, collected by the Hellenic Police, can be disaggregated by the sex of the victims, their nationality and the forms of exploitation to which they were subjected.41 Minors make up a minority among the victims of trafficking registered by the Greek Police. During the period 2011-2013, 34 minors were detected as victims of trafficking in Greece in total. Of these, four had been trafficked for begging (3 males of Romanian nationality and a Greek female), nine were victims of labour exploitation (mostly males of Romanian nationality), 19 were subject to sexual exploitation, and one Bulgarian child was found trafficked for illegal adoption.42
According to the CONFRONT national trafficking report, street activities, in which Roma children are substantially engaged, have not been perceived as trafficking or exploitation, either by the Roma or by the majority population, not least because cross-border movement is not present. They are instead viewed as culturally endorsed or tolerated Roma family and community practices.
The tendency of child trafficking to switch from an activity organised by third parties and criminal rings to one under the control of parents or extended family has triggered many discussions among police authorities and civil society organisations. Taking a criminal law approach towards parents or family members as traffickers is arguably likely to only worsen the position of the children by holding liable and taking away from them those who are often their most important source of stability and security. Exploitation may also take place within the immediate and extended family, including from parents themselves and from relatives vis-à-vis their children. At the same time, Roma families may be themselves vulnerable to exploitation by criminal groups.
The CONFRONT national report explains step by step (detailed in the following paragraphs) the complexity of the phenomenon of Roma child begging, which renders the identification of trafficking victims among child beggars a challenging task. The domestic legal framework
41 CONFRONT National report: Greece, February 2015 42 CONFRONT National report: Greece, February 2015
CAHROM(2015)7
 32

provides for a process for the official identification of someone as a victim of trafficking. But for the process to be set in motion it is essential that the police authorities who have initial contact with the incident have grounds to suspect that the child involved is a (potential) trafficking victim rather than a victim of begging. Many times it is the police that first spots child-begging incidents through daily patrols or special operations. Begging is under the competence of the local police stations. Departments dealing specifically with cases involving minors – such as juvenile delinquency and those involving children as victims, related, inter alia, to child abuse, harassment and neglect involving care givers – operate within the Security Divisions of Athens and Thessaloniki as well as within the Security Subdivisions of Herakleion and Patras. As the begging of children is considered a misdemeanour, child beggars are brought in for further investigation. When the child is accompanied by a parent or when the parent appears before the police to claim the child, the case is most of the times - if not always - treated under the begging legislation. This means that the police take down the beggars’ details and let them go or they may arrest and charge the parent for neglect of child supervision and incitement to beg in line with the provisions of the begging legislation. It needs to be noted, however, that the possibility of children being penalised for begging exists, though in practice it is a not generally applied.
At this first point of contact, the role of the police in detecting signs of trafficking in the child begging incidents that come to their attention is crucial. Nevertheless, standardised procedures requiring that a preliminary assessment of the incident for potential signs of trafficking be performed do not so far exist. Therefore, any effort to detect signs of trafficking in child beggars, to the extent that it takes place at all, does so in an ad-hoc manner. This means that the interpretation of a case as a trafficking incident or a begging situation may differ substantially even within law enforcement.
Like adult victims of trafficking, many times children are reluctant to give evidence either because of fear, or simply because they do not see themselves as victims. This is especially true for Roma children trafficked into begging who often see begging as a job and are convinced that they must help their families financially. As a result, very few, if any at all, of these children are granted the official verification of the status of a victim. The official verification of the status of a victim of trafficking is not an eligibility condition for accessing interim assistance and support. But it ensures that victims who are non-EU nationals shall not be immediately deported and, thus, it is important as far as Roma children from Albania are concerned. There are, however, prosecutors who, acknowledging the necessity to offer protection to a child and the difficulties hampering the official verification procedure (unclear legislation, bureaucracy creating delays, etc.) refer the child for protection and assistance on grounds of suspicion that it is a victim of trafficking.43
2.3.3. Anti-trafficking initiatives implemented in Greece
2.3.3.1. Awareness raising campaigns
Numerous awareness-raising campaigns have been implemented on a local or national level, mainly by NGO’s, such as PRAKSIS, Smile of the Child, ARSIS, KMOP, GCR, “The NO Project”, “the A21 Campaign”, or IOM and the General Secretary of Gender Equality.
The ‘No Project' is mostly active in Schools and Universities and uses performance art and trans- media events as an awareness raising medium. A basic aim is to address the “demand side” and the role of the client before it is “too late”;
“The A21 Campaign”, is very active in organizing awareness –raising events. From 2011 to 2013, the A21 Campaign has organized: art festivals and sports events (12-day festival KODRA in 2011, Athletes against Human Trafficking in 2012, Alexander the Great Marathon in 2013, Half night
43 CONFRONT National report: Greece, February 2015
33
CAHROM(2015)7
 
Marathon in 2013); a “Human Trafficking Summit” (2012), called “27 million”, an open to public event with a photo exhibition, the featuring of the documentary, “Sex Slaves”. The “Human Trafficking Summit” of A21 is organized annually; an awareness campaign to taxi drivers in the two major cities, Athens and Thessaloniki (2013). The team of A21 distributed anti-trafficking materials to more than 300 taxi drivers and 770 people on the streets and organised concert nights. At the end of the summer of 2013, the A21 organized the first “A21 Freedom Fest”, two concert nights with various famous artists raising awareness about Human Trafficking and 1109 Hotline. Over 4000 people attended the concerts. The A21 is also very active at schools since 2012. Using dramas, dances and media, A21 presented to over 400 teenagers on the issue of human trafficking in 2012. In 2013, the A21 handed out material to 5,000 high school students and invited them at Freedom Fest as an initiative to inform them. Overall, the A21 had access to 6330 pupils and students in 2013.
The General Secretariat for Gender Equality of the Ministry of Interior launched a three-year long (2012-2015) awareness-raising campaign on gender-based violence, trafficking in women included. The Secretariat has also created a new website, aiming at raising the awareness of the youth. On the website women can find a list of indicators showing that human trafficking is taking place and be informed about their rights and in what ways they can assert their rights.
In 2011, the NR in cooperation with the Ministry of Education, IOM, UNICEF, the US State Department, and other partners, organized an awareness raising multi-media and sports youth event in the Olympic stadium that gathered almost 10.000 high-school students.
On the occasion of EU Anti-Trafficking Day 2013, the theatrical performance “Invisible Olga” was organized under the auspice of the NR’s Office and the cultural platform “Eλculture.gr”. Partners to the event were IOM and the National Centre for Social Solidarity (EKKA).
The “Shoot it” Festival (2013) in collaboration with the cultural platform “Eλculture.gr” invited amateur hopeful cinematographers to “shoot” with their smart phones and compete on short films about trafficking.
The theatrical group “Omada Oneiro” performed several times in Athens and other cities of Greece the production “Sex Trafficking”.
The Department of Mental Health and Social Welfare, Institute of Child Health, in the context of the project “SESN” - funded by the ISEC program - combines social theatre techniques and psychological support, aiming to empower and support unaccompanied minors to develop and train behavioural patterns which would function protectively against THB. In addition, through psychological support, unaccompanied minors will be allowed the opportunity to deal with traumatic experiences and take more informed decisions on their future. The prevention program will be applied to four open shelters, in different locations of Greece. The Institute of Child Health, together with partner institutions in four other EU countries, also develops printed and online material on social auditing for THB, targeting both the public and the private sector. This material is the result of a 2-year ISEC-funded project, whose short name is RESAURSE.
The NGO European Public Law Organization (EPLO) implemented, in 2012, an awareness raising campaign by disseminating posters and flyers in relevant stakeholders as well as in places with high risk of THB and also published a video in Greek online newspapers with high visibility.
In the framework of the EU-funded project “Victor”, two TV spots have been created by the NGO the Smile of the Child: one to be used in order to raise awareness to the general public, the second one aiming at reducing demand by addressing potential clients. In addition, two leaflets providing information on child trafficking have been produced and distributed to the public. Finally, the victor website was launched (victorproject.eu). The Smile of the Child also participates in
34
CAHROM(2015)7

numerous events aiming to provide information and raise awareness to the public on the phenomenon of THB.
2.3.3.2. Shelters for victims and temporary accommodation services
The General Secretariat for Gender Equality in cooperation with municipalities all over Greece established Shelters for women victims of violence, including victims of trafficking. The Project is funded by the National Strategic Reference Framework (NSRF 2007-2013). Currently, 16 shelters are in operation, and 3 more are operated by the National Centre for Social Solidarity (EKKA) offering assistance to 15 new cases in 2013. One (1) shelter is operated by the “A21 Campaign” in Thessaloniki, exclusively for THB victims. The A21 shelter offered specialized assistance and legal support to 20 new cases in 2013.
THB victims (identified or potential ones) receive psycho-social support, psychotherapy, medical care, vocational guidance and legal representation or the facilitation of repatriation. The support continues to transition period towards their reintegration. To this end the “A21 Campaign” operates a Social Enterprise called “Renew Boutique” where second- hand clothes are given and sold and the NGO “Nea Zoi” is going to establish a non – profitable handicraft business for the women to be members in order to make and sell handbags. In addition, IOM provides voluntary return (AVR) and post-arrival assistance to the victims, the majority of which are young women who had been sexually exploited. Prior to returning, IOM Greece meets with the victims and conducts a risk-analysis. To assist these women, IOM Greece works with NGOs and government authorities in Greece (Anti-Trafficking Unit of the Hellenic Police, EKKA, the A21 Campaign) and with IOM missions in the origin countries (Russia, Romania, Bulgaria) to provide post-arrival assistance including shelter, counselling and re-integration into their community.
Another important project is implementing for some time now from the NGO PRAKSIS. This is the STEGI project which provides temporary accommodation services in twenty-five apartments in Attica, Central Macedonia and the island of Lesvos. The project provides psycho-social support and legal aid to particularly vulnerable groups of victims of trafficking, asylum seekers, single parent families, victims of torture, people with chronic health problems.
A21 NGO addressing the human trafficking problem in Europe and in Greece runs the only accommodation facilities particularly addressing victims of trafficking, women and girls. It is a crisis shelter where enhanced safety measures are followed and which offers food, accommodation and counselling services lasting up to six weeks on a voluntary basis. Girl victims are enrolled in school and usually stay in the crisis shelter longer than 16 weeks. Women, on the other hand, move to transitional residence where career counselling, financial management, and educational enhancement are provided.
NGOs Arsis and Praksis undertake street-work on a regular basis in common begging spots in Athens and Thessaloniki (occasionally also in other cities) under the project “Mobile School”. The aim is to establish a trusting relationship with children engaging in begging and other street income-generating activities and, thus, be able to understand their situation, record instances of exploitation and approach the child and family. Street working is done by trained professionals, some of them native speakers of Bulgarian, Romanian and Albanian or speakers of Romani. In addition to outreach work, the NGOs run day centres in Thessaloniki that further operate as a contact point for street children and the families who want to ask for help and support. They provide psycho-social support, counselling, liaison with social services and opportunities for children to be involved in educational and leisure activities. The combination of these practices offers a framework for intervention appropriate to the needs of the street child in question. At the same time, the building of trust with children allows for suspected trafficking incidents to be detected, and to be referred to the police authorities for investigation and to the National Centre for Social Solidarity for assistance. Both NGOs run shelters for unaccompanied minors, while Arsis
35
CAHROM(2015)7

also runs a short-term stay shelter particularly addressing mistreated, neglected and children victims of trafficking and exploitation in the outskirts of Thessaloniki.
The Smile of the Child in cooperation with the Ministries of Justice and the Hellenic Police, operates a centre for children victims of abuse and exploitation. Within this Centre, a child-friendly and fully equipped space is provided for the video recording of a child’s court testimony. This way children victims or children witnesses will be protected by secondary victimization and further trauma that comes with repetitive testimonies during criminal proceedings. This Centre is being implemented with the support of Ministry of Justice and Ministry of Public Order and Citizen Protection, and is at the disposal of the national referral mechanism and all relevant competent authorities in order to accommodate the needs of child victims/potential victims of trafficking as well, as per article 15/b-e, of the EU Directive 2011/36 (preamble article 20).
2.3.3.3. Training and education programs on THB
IOM Greece has carried out numerous training and awareness raising meetings and conferences for different stakeholders. In 2011, a 2-day meeting was organized for prosecutors, judges, law enforcement, NGOs from Greece, Bulgaria and Turkey. The purpose of the meeting was to increase cooperation and share information. In 2012, IOM Greece along with IOM Georgia and IOM Moldova organized two separate study visits to Athens for law enforcement and prosecutors from the visiting countries to meet with Greek authorities and share information and best practices. In 2013, IOM Greece, along with the NR Office and the US Embassy, was involved in organizing a training session for judges, prosecutors and police officers on investigating and prosecuting THB cases.
Police Training: The “A21 Campaign” has developed a training curriculum against human trafficking (based on POLARIS training) in order to provide practical and applicable tools on a victim-centered approach to the police officers and equip them with useful material in their battle against human trafficking. Since the launch of this initiative in October 2013, there have been successfully completed five presentations to 142 policemen at Police Headquarters at 5 important districts: Ptolemais, Kozani, Arcadia and Achaia, and Attica. Τhe main goal is for these presentations to continue until 2016, with the final objective of training 3,500 police in all Police chief in Greece. Furthermore, several other State agencies and Greek NGOs that have been accredited by the Commission’s Civil Society Platform (Praxis, ARSIS, GCR, Smile of the Child) have engaged Greek law enforcement authorities in various trainings in cooperation with leading international agencies such as IOM, UNHCR, FRONTEX. Especially, the police staff that works in the border control participates in educational programs which are organized by Hellenic Police in cooperation with competent European or national, governmental or non-governmental organizations (e.g. IOM, FRONTEX, CEPOL, etc.), paying special attention on awareness, recognition and handling of (suspected) victims of trafficking. Worth mentioning is the recent (in 2013) training of the Greek police staff on trafficking via teleconference by police expertise, the law enforcement training received by the “Warnath Group” and the training of police & judiciary within the “train the trainers program” of the ISEC Project EuroTrafGuide.
Judiciary training: Besides the aforementioned training programs, targeting both police and judiciary, awareness-raising and continuous training of judges on trafficking issues is constantly promoted.
The European Public Law Organization (EPLO-Greece), in the framework of the project "Integrated Approach for Prevention of Labour Exploitation in Origin and Destination Countries” JLS/2009/ISEC/AG/207 and in partnership with stakeholders from Bulgaria, Cyprus, FYROM and Hungary, has implemented regional seminars in all participating countries with key stakeholders (labour inspectors, judges, prosecutors, police officers, social workers, NGOs representatives). EPLO implemented the national regional seminar on 4 and 5 February 2013 in the premises of
36
CAHROM(2015)7

EPLO in Athens. The participants included prosecutors, the NR, Police officers, representatives from NGOs, and from the Greek Ombudsman.
The Smile of the Child, in close cooperation with the Ministry of Education is implementing a comprehensive prevention program within the school community. Upon invitation by schools, teacher associations or parents and legal guardian associations, a team of specialized psychologists deliver prevention sessions and lectures across Greece on selected topics, such as: abuse, neglect, exploitation, online security, school violence, bullying etc. Child trafficking is included in such sessions about sexual exploitation and online security and this NGO is currently in the process of creating additional educational material in order to deliver these sessions separately. Tools used in these sessions vary according to the age and educational level of the children: Interactive, experiential workshops and activities, Puppet theatre, new technologies – YouLearn platform, ‘Odysseus”: the 1st Multi-educational mobile lab of Information, Education & Technology As referred previously (section 2.3.), other NGOs like the A21 Campaign and the NO PROJECT are also very active at schools.
In the framework of the EU-Funded VICTOR Project, which aims at establishing a strong partnership among a broad range of public and non-governmental actors working in the field of child trafficking in the region of Southeastern Europe, the Smile of the Child organized a training seminar in Athens (April 2014) for the identification of children victims/potential victims of trafficking. It brought together national experts and stakeholders, healthcare professionals, social workers, psychologists, public prosecutors and law enforcement personnel. The seminar reflected on how the situation in the field of identification can be improved by providing training to professionals likely to come in contact with victims or potential victims of trafficking. More than 170 professionals and practitioners across Greece took part in this training, which was delivered in plenary session as well as in 4 specialized working groups: a) psychologists and social workers, b) doctors and health professionals, c) law enforcement personnel and d) judges and prosecutors.
2.4. Italy
2.4.1. National situation and legal framework
Italy is a destination, transit, and source country for women, children, and men subjected to sex trafficking and forced labour. Victims subjected to trafficking in Italy often originate from Nigeria, Romania, Morocco, Tunisia, Moldova, Slovakia, Ukraine, China, Brazil, Peru, Colombia, Pakistan, Bangladesh, Ecuador, Poland, Bulgaria, Pakistan, Egypt, Somalia, Eritrea, and India. Victims are subjected to sex trafficking after accepting false promises of employment as, waitresses, dancers, singers, models, or caregivers. Children subjected to sex trafficking and forced labour in Italy are from Romania, Nigeria, Brazil, Morocco, and Italy, specifically Roma and Sinti boys who may have been born in Italy. Transgender children from Brazil are subjected to sex trafficking in Italy. Experts estimate approximately 2,000 children are exploited on the streets in prostitution. Nigerian children and women are subjected to labour trafficking through debt bondage and coercion through voodoo rituals. Roma children from Italy are subjected to forced labour in begging or petty theft and sex trafficking. Unaccompanied children, mainly boys from Bangladesh, Egypt, and Afghanistan, some of whom are employed in shops, bars, restaurants, and bakeries are at risk of trafficking.
In Italy, trafficking principally takes the form of sexual exploitation, and recent years have seen an increase of the “indoor” exploitation, i.e. exploitation inside apartments, nightclubs and spas/health clubs, alongside street exploitation. Most victims of sexual exploitation are Romanians and Nigerians. According to the interviews and research carried out in the past and for this project, victims can be controlled by their exploiters either through the use of violence or through the creation of a strong emotional bond.
37
CAHROM(2015)7

By Legislative Decree No.24/2014, Italy has fully translated into domestic legislation, Directive 2011/36/UE (on the prevention and the fight against trafficking in human beings and protection of the victims, replacing Framework Decision 2002/629 JHA). By this Directive, the EU has set minimum common criteria for the definition of criminal offenses in relation to trafficking. Directive No. 36 pursues the objective to ensure the strengthening of the repressive criminal protection system in order for effective protection of victims, intended as "an essential step/element of the fight against trafficking in persons, which necessarily requires an integrated approach”.
As far as children are concerned, trafficked children are provided with special assistance and care programs, carried out by individualized age-appropriate-related services, as supplied under national assistance projects co-funded by the Department for Equal Opportunities, including dedicated shelters, specific counselling, medical and social support.
The Italian Criminal Code specifically envisages prosecution in case of trafficking in children under 'child prostitution' (article 600-bis), 'child pornography' (article 600-ter) and ‘possession of pornographic material’ (article 600-quater). Pursuant to the Italian Criminal Code, whoever commits trafficking in human beings shall be liable to a term of imprisonment from 8 to 20 years. Penalty is harsher if the offence is perpetrated against minors (Prostitution per se is not criminalised in Italy, but the act of procuring is a crime under Article 3 of Act No. 75/1958).
Provided that all forms of trafficking in human beings are prohibited in Italy. (The specific offence of trafficking in persons was introduced in the Italian Criminal Code (article 601) in 2003 by Act No. 228/2003)), by Legislative Decree No./2014, the Italian legislator amended Articles 600 (Placing/ holding a person in conditions of slavery or servitude) and 601 (Trafficking in persons) of the Italian Penal Code with the aim of strengthening the punishment of perpetrators by ensuring that all forms of trafficking in human beings are punished under the Criminal Code, and with a view to providing a comprehensive definition of such crimes in compliance with the relevant European Directive. More specifically, in case of conducts against children, the conduct is punished under trafficking in persons even if the crime is not committed by fraud, deceit, threat or by promising or giving money. As for the protection of victims of human trafficking, in accordance with the relevant European Directive, the above Legislative Decree also amended the Italian Code of Criminal Procedure in order to extend the existing protection - already envisaged for child victims or mentally ill adult victims - to all adult victims being under particularly vulnerable conditions. Art.1 enlists those who can be considered vulnerable, namely children, unaccompanied minors, elderly persons, disabled persons, women, especially if pregnant, single parents with underage children, persons with mental disorders, as well as persons who suffered rape or other serious forms of physical, psychological, sexual or gender-based violence. With the aim of further strengthening the protection of victims, the above Legislative Decree provides for the obligation to adequately inform them, especially unaccompanied minors who are victims of human trafficking, of their rights. This also establishes that a further decree will be adopted to define specific mechanisms as for the determination of their age and their identification.
In compliance with Directive 2011/36/EU, one of the main novelties introduced by the above Decree is the recognition of the victims’ right to compensation. This form of compensation, amounting to 1,500 Euros for each victim, shall be paid in accordance with the terms established by the Decree under the Annual Fund for Anti-Trafficking Measures. The fund already exists and, according to the relevant law, it should be fed with the proceeds derived from the confiscation of assets following a judgment of conviction. Further, by Act No. 190/2014 8 million Euros are to be allocated for the single unified program.
The victims or alleged victims of trafficking benefit from assistance and social protection projects promoted and co-funded by the Department of Equal Opportunities (DEO). As said, these people, both adults and children, can be victims of both forced labour and forced prostitution or other
38
CAHROM(2015)7

forms of exploitation (forced begging, illegal activities, etc.). From 2000 to 2013, 665 projects were co-funded within the framework of Art. 18 of Legislative Decree No. 286/1998 while, from 2006 to 2012, 166 projects were co-funded under Art.13 of Act No. 228/2003. From 2000 to 2013, 22,699 people (of whom 1,215 were children) had been assisted within the framework of “The Art.18 program”. From 2006 to 2012, 4,207 people (of whom 240 were children) received assistance under “The Art.13 program” (2013-related data is still being elaborated). More generally, as for data-collection, DPO is currently working with ISTAT to set up a national data- base on trafficking in human beings.
Furthermore a National Referral Mechanism will be set up through the ad hoc National Action Plan. Guidelines will be developed for the identification of minimum standards for reception and assistance of victims, as well as for the definition of shared operating procedures. In this context, multi-agency Memoranda of Understanding to address THB cases will be signed, and further initiatives to promote the regular and systematic training of professionals working in this field have been envisaged too (police officers, border police, immigration service officials, public prosecutors, lawyers, the judiciary and the judicial staff).
In 2014, with a view to implementing an even more comprehensive national strategy against THB, the Department for Equal Opportunities – in cooperation with all the national authorities committed to this issue and all other relevant public and private actors – developed an ad hoc National Action Plan against Trafficking in Human Beings. Through an effective coordination among the Ministries, NGOs and associations involved, this Plan is intended to enhance the governance of all national measures against THB and to defining the effective cooperation among all national stakeholders involved in the protection of trafficked people and in the fight against THB.
2.4.2. Existing data on Roma in relation to trafficking in human beings
It is very difficult to assess the situation of Roma as victims of trafficking; however existing data44 show that a total of 342 non-Italian Roma minors were handled by Offices in 2012, 56.4 % of whom male and 43.6 % female. This figure corresponds to about 9% of all foreign nationals handled. The main countries of origin are those in the Balkan areas, with most minors coming from Bosnia Herzegovina (89), Croatia (82), Serbia (58) and Macedonia (22), followed by a large group of children of Romanian origin (73). Roma children handled by these services are characterised by the large percentage of females of a young age. Among Roma minors handled, the percentage of minors aged between 14 and 15 is quite high (42 %), to which should be added 4 % of minors who are not criminally responsible.
With regard to offences for which they are detained by Juvenile Services, the most common offence is theft (64 %), followed at a considerable distance by robbery (8 %) and receiving stolen goods (5 %). The analyses carried out did not definitively reveal the existence of any structured trafficking of Roma children for exploitation specifically in begging.
Begging is considered as an activity “typical” of the Roma population. In reality, for many Roma families relegated to the margins of society and of the city, begging is one of the few ways to get together the money to live. Involvement in activities on the street does not necessarily imply a lack of care and attention to the children, who are usually accompanied by one or more adults and adequately looked after, making this a “borderline” phenomenon, where authorities have difficulties to decide what to do for the best interest of the child, especially if the child is taken care of by his family.
44
CONFRONT. Italy country report, 2013, available at: http://childrentrafficking.eu/wp- content/uploads/2014/04/CONFRONT_Country-Report_Italy.pdf
CAHROM(2015)7
   39

According to the CONFRONT country report, there has been no confirmation that systematic and organized movements of Roma children from the country of origin in order to exploit them in illegal activities and profit from them, with the consent of the family or through deceiving them, are in progress.
There is therefore a certain degree of discretion on the part of local institutions in deciding whether or not to take action when a Roma child is found begging on the street, and if so what sort of action to take. Similarly, there is no uniformity among different Juvenile Courts and among social workers in deciding on the best course of action for the child, in particular whether or not to take the child away from the family of origin. In this regard, the Municipal Police of Rome follows some informal criteria regarding the circumstances in which it is necessary to act by investigating into Roma children begging on the street. Action is suggested when a child is found (by police, or reported by the public) to be alone, or with an adult in those cases in which the child might be mistreated. In such cases inquiries are made into possible abuse, and cases are reported to the Court, while in other situations “softer” checks are generally carried out.
It is extremely difficult to prove enslavement and trafficking for begging, and usually, following the indication of the judge, children involved in begging are returned to their parents, unless there are obvious signs of mistreatment and violence. It is thus rare for investigations to be opened to look into a possible trafficking phenomenon. This fact is corroborated by the very small number of child victims of trafficking in legal proceedings as per data from the National Anti-mafia Directorate.
2.5. Netherlands
2.5.1. National situation and legal framework
CAHROM(2015)7
The Netherlands is a source, destination, and transit country for men, women, and children subjected to trafficking in persons, specifically forced prostitution and forced labour. A significant number of underage Dutch residents continued to be subjected to sex trafficking in the country. Identified trafficking victims primarily originated from within the Netherlands and from abroad, including from Romania, Hungary, Bulgaria, Nigeria, Guinea, Sierra Leone, China, the Philippines, and Vietnam in 2013; victims are also from other countries in Africa, Europe, and South and East Asia. Women and children are primarily subjected to sex trafficking, and men and boys are subjected to various forms of forced labour, including in the maritime sector, agriculture, horticulture, catering, food processing, and cleaning. Some victims were forced to commit crimes, including illegal narcotics trafficking. Groups vulnerable to trafficking include unaccompanied children seeking asylum, women with dependent residence status obtained through fraudulent or forced marriages, women recruited in Africa and Eastern Europe, and East Asian women working in massage parlours.
The Government of the Netherlands fully complies with the minimum standards for the elimination of trafficking. The government further institutionalized the role of its independent
 national anti-trafficking rapporteur and established a statutory basis for the position in Dutch law; it also continued to implement a multi-disciplinary approach to its trafficking problem through its national-level taskforce. It continued to mobilize a range of governmental, non- governmental, and private entities to proactively identify trafficking victims and increased its conviction rate on trafficking defendants. Trafficking experts reported deficiencies in the government’s identification and response to underage domestic trafficking victims, and victim advocates noted concerns about the government’s pilot project linking the reflection period with a viable investigation or prosecution, noting potential detrimental effects on victim protection.
 40

According to data provided by the Dutch authorities, 993 possible victims of human trafficking were reported in 2010, 1 222 in 2011 and 1 711 in 2012. Children represented 16% and men 19% of the total number in 2011.
As regards nationalities, in 2011, 28% of the total number of possible victims were Dutch, 11% Nigerian, 10% Hungarian, 9% Polish and 6% Bulgarian.3 A constant feature over the last years is the high proportion of national victims, the great majority of whom are young women or girls who fall prey to so called “lover boys” who manipulate and force them into prostitution (see paragraph 20).
The proportion of possible victims of THB in sectors outside the sex industry increased from 6% in 2007 to 20% in 2011.4 The levels of victims of trafficking for the purpose of labour exploitation have therefore increased sharply over the last years and they will in all likelihood continue increasing, in particular in high-risk sectors (e.g. agriculture, horticulture, catering and construction).
At the international level, in addition to the Council of Europe Anti-Trafficking Convention, the Netherlands is Party to the United Nations (UN) Convention against Transnational Organised Crime and its Protocol to Prevent, Suppress and Punish Trafficking in Persons, especially Women and Children (Palermo Protocol), ratified respectively in 2004 and 2005. The Netherlands is also Party to the UN Convention on the Rights of the Child and its Optional Protocol on the Sale of Children, Child Prostitution and Child Pornography (ratified respectively in 1995 and 2006), the Convention on the Elimination of All Forms of Discrimination against Women and its Optional Protocol (ratified respectively in 1991 and 2002), as well as conventions elaborated under the International Labour Organization (ILO), in particular the Convention concerning Forced or Compulsory Labour (No. 29), the Convention concerning the Abolition of Forced Labour (No. 105) and the Convention concerning the Prohibition and Immediate Action for the Elimination of the Worst Forms of Child Labour (No. 182) (ratified respectively in 1933, 1959 and 2002). Further, the Netherlands is party to a number of Council of Europe conventions in the criminal field which are relevant to action against trafficking in human beings (THB).5
As a member of the European Union (EU), the Netherlands is bound by EU legislation with a bearing on combating THB, in particular Directive 2011/36/EU of the European Parliament and of the Council of the EU of 5 April 2011 on preventing and combating trafficking in human beings and protecting its victims;6 Council Directive 2004/81/EC of 29 April 2004 on the residence permit issued to third-country nationals who are victims of trafficking in human beings or who have been the subject of an action to facilitate illegal immigration, who co-operate with the competent authorities; Council Directive 2004/80/EC of 29 April 2004 relating to compensation to crime victims; Directive 2012/29/EU of the European Parliament and the Council of the EU of 25 October 2012 establishing minimum standards on the rights, support and protection of victims of crime, and replacing Framework Decision 2001/220/JHA of 15 March 2001 of the Council of the EU on the standing of victims in criminal proceedings.
2.5.2. Existing data on Roma in relation to trafficking in human beings
In connection to Roma, a national programme against the exploitation of Roma children was launched in 2011. The desire to protect children – regardless of their background – and the duty to defend children from exploitation was the major impetus behind this broad-based programme, which aimed to crack down on the exploitation of (Roma) children and prevent future occurrences of such offences by means of a cooperative approach involving municipalities, police, central government and other organisations needed to ensure a comprehensive approach at local level. An integrated approach was used under the direction of the individual municipalities, using the instruments afforded by criminal and administrative law. This approach combines law enforcement and the active discouragement and prevention of deviant and criminal behaviour. It
41
CAHROM(2015)7

also involved the VNG, the Child Protection Board, Youth Care the Netherlands, the OM, the Police, the Ministries of Security and Justice, Social Affairs and Employment, and Foreign Affairs. Thus the programme aimed at addressing, inter alia, the participation of children in criminal activities, exploitation of children and forced marriage of underage girls, through (i) knowledge improvement, (ii) pilot projects in four municipalities to solve concrete problems faced by Roma families, and (iii) European co-operation, including through CAHROM, to exchange information and share good practices to combat better transnational child trafficking as well as deal with push and pull factors between countries.
At the start of the programme it emerged that local governments, the Public Prosecution Service, the Dutch police, social workers and professionals in related fields needed well-documented, reliable information on problems specific to Roma. More insight into the nature and extent of the problem was needed to formulate and implement the most effective possible response to crime and child exploitation. The Police College drafted this report to meet that demand.
Four municipalities (Nieuwegein, Lelystad, Ede and Veldhoven) were assisted in their approach to child exploitation and crime in Roma problem families. The parties involved are working on an integrated family-centred approach that could eventually be applied to other municipalities. They are seeking to strike a balance between enforcing the law and offering opportunities. A ‘barrier model’ will be developed to explain the nature of this type of child exploitation and how best to combat it and to identify which organisations can play a role in taking preventive measures, picking up signals of exploitation, and preventing or penalising this kind of behaviour.
Within the parameters of the programme’s third track, efforts were directed towards promoting bilateral and multilateral cooperation and making agreements (especially with victims’ and perpetrators’ countries of origin and with transit countries), because child exploitation (e.g. forced marriages involving underage girls) is often a transnational issue that must be dealt with jointly.
The programme came to an end in December 2013 and a follow-up programme was proposed. The Dutch Police College also produced an information document on problem families with a Roma background for social workers and law enforcement officials as part of this wider process.
The Dutch government policy vis-à-vis Roma has varied substantially over the years: from emphasising social work to applying the law very strictly to turning a blind eye to the problem. For a long time, coordination between the various institutions was lacking, and no unified approach existed.
Around 2008 a radical change took place within a number of municipalities, following the adoption of an integrated approach, which focused less on Roma as a group, and more on individual families, especially those experiencing multiple problems. Measures are tailored to the needs of these families. Intermediaries act as contact points for these families and play a key role in the process as a whole. The success of this approach depends on close collaboration between the various local partners, strong oversight on the part of the municipality and, needless to say, the family’s willingness to cooperate.
42
CAHROM(2015)7

2.6. Romania
2.6.1. National situation and legal framework45
CAHROM(2015)7
Romania is mainly an origin country for European states, but also a destination country for Romanian citizens (internal traffic).46 To a lesser extent, in the period 2011-2013, Romania was a destination country for trafficking in persons for 13 foreign citizens, from Bangladesh, Republic of Moldova, Serbia and Poland.
Most of the identified victims between 2011 and 2013 are adults, with a percentage of 70% in 2011, 65% in 2012 and 66,5% in 2013. The majority are women, with a percentage of 63% in 2011 (664 female victims), 65% in 2012 (675 female victims) and 64% in 2013 (577 female victims). They mainly graduated secondary or high school, the moment they entered into traffic, came from the rural area and were between 14 and 40 years, but the highest percentage are aged
 between 18 – 25 years.
Most of the identified minors came from the rural areas (55% in 2011 up to 58% in 2013), which represent an environment with high risk for minors, besides other factors such as economic and family related. Most of them were in school the moment they entered into traffic and they abandoned or interrupted the studies when they were recruited for trafficking. Generally, when recruited, they are approached with prostitution or labour offers in the country or abroad, by persons from the group of their friends or acquaintances.
During 2011-2013, the main counties/regions of origin were: Brasov, Arges, Iasi, Arad, Bihor, Dolj, Prahova, Olt, Bacau, Mures, Galati, Vaslui. The geographical distribution of minors-victims shows a wide spread, mobility and flexibility of the groups of traffickers, who get to recruit victims almost in all counties of Romania. The percentage of the minors-victims trafficked internally was from 70% in 2011 to 82% in 2012 decreasing to 78% in 2013.
The rural area is a source also for adult victims of trafficking in persons. Gender distribution is balanced among adult victims of trafficking, in 2011 and 2012; the number of female victims is slightly higher than the number of male victims. The main origin counties for the adult population were: Mures, Ialomita, Iasi, Timis, Salaj, Bacau, Olt, Timis, Botosani, Constanta, Brasov, Teleorman and Olt. The distribution of administrative regions in Romania shows, as in the case of minors, the vulnerability of persons independent of the geographical areas as well as the flexibility of the groups or the presence of criminal factors specific for the trafficking in persons in all the regions/ counties of Romania.
Unlike the minor victims, the adults are mostly trafficked abroad, in states such as Greece, Germany, Italy, Spain, Czech Republic etc. The adult victims trafficked internally represented 10% of the number of adult victims identified in 2011, 29% in 2012 and in 2013 18%.
If we carefully observe the dynamics of the equation victim – trafficker, we acknowledge that, like
 in previous years, the circumstances which lead to the victims’ vulnerability as indicated by the analysis and criminal investigations are connected with factors such as: quality of life, seeking for better life opportunities, inconsistency of the formal and informal training, the limited access and the low interest for information, lack of opportunities on the labour market, the unemployment, lack of relevant life experience, limited cognitive development and emotional immaturity, naive attitudes and judgments such as „it cannot happen to me!”, coming from disordered families, the
  45 Information provided by the Romanian National Agency for Trafficking in Persons, according a national evaluation between 2011-2013.
46 According to the Romanian legislation, National Agency against Trafficking in Persons, as an Equivalent Mechanism to the National Rapporteur, is not collecting data regarding victims of trafficking taking into consideration ethnic criteria. The ethnic appurtenance is recorded on their statements only when and if the victims are consenting expressly for that.
43

CAHROM(2015)7
victims’ wish to escape an abusive or neglecting environment, the desire to satisfy one’s needs with any costs, legal or illegal, special vulnerability (sensory, motor, mental deficiency or any other disability), people’s lack of interest to get informed on the risks they can be expose to in situations of labour migration.
Being forced to practice prostitution, to participate in pornographic representation or any other form of sexual exploitation, later on called "sexual exploitation" represent the main reasons why the victims end-up in being trafficked. Thus, 1482 persons were victims of sexual exploitation, representing 50% of the total number of victims identified in the reference period.
Sexual exploitation takes place in various public or private areas and has many forms starting from forced prostitution in the streets or in hotels and ending with forced pornographic representations and even on the internet. The number of victims trafficked in various forms of sexual exploitation was, as it follows: no. of victims forced to practice prostitution in the street: 567; no. of victims forced to practice prostitution in private dwellings: 418; no. of victims forced
 to practice prostitution in clubs: 249; no. of victims forced to practice prostitution in brothels: 103; no. of victims forced to practice prostitution in hotels: 95 and no. number of victims forced to pornographic representation: 53.
The analysis on forced labour and forced lucrative services shows that, according to the trends in the last period, this form of exploitation continues to be the second most common form of exploitation, 1193 victims being trafficked for this purpose, their number representing a percentage of 40%. These were forced to provide lucrative services in agriculture (797), in the field of constructions (109), HORECA (7), or in other situations (street selling, clothing and shoes manufactory, wrapping factory or advertising production – 235 victims). 167 victims were forced to practice beggary, 20 victims were forced to commit “petty” thefts (pickpocketing or shop- lifting). In the reference period, 82 cases of attempt to commit crimes of trafficking in persons were registered. Out of the total number of 2985 identified victims, 1916 were female victims (894 of them were minors). The risk among male victims maintains low in this period, 1069 male victims were identified (95 of them were minors).
The analysis of gender and age indicators reveals the adult female victim population (1022 victims representing 34% of the total number) and of minor female victims (894 victims representing 30% of the total number). The number of adult male victims identified in the reporting period is smaller than the number of female victims (1069 victims representing 32%).
One of the main particularities of the victims’ recruitment process is misleading the injured parties, under the false promises of ensuring better-paid jobs than in Romania and emotional confidence of the victims gained through servitude. After the victims are recruited, the traffickers use various methods and mechanisms of constraint. Thus, the sexual exploited victims are especially constrained through abuse and emotional blackmail, physical violence and sexual abuse, seizure and documents’ retention, constant surveillance of brothels, periodic movement in other locations as well as inducing fear of severe reprisals including family, if they ask for police
 assistance. Labour exploited victims are constrained through threats, deprivation of water, food or personal hygiene products, and the retention of documents, financial penalty or unpaid work performed.
The trust that the victims have granted to the job offers or any other, coming from people they know, the people in the circle of friends and acquaintances was significant, and this is reflected by the high percentage of such victims recruited (67 % of all victims were recruited by acquaintances, relatives, neighbours, pimps or life partners).
Thus, a decrease in the number of the victims recruited through placement agencies and job announcements in the media was registered. In conclusion, it seems that people are starting to realize the existing dangers in the vague job ads, which does not ensure transparency in the
 44

Regarding the legal framework, in 2001, Romania adopted Law 678/2001 on Preventing and Combating Trafficking in Human Beings, which was subsequently amended and supplemented as the institutional anti-trafficking structure evolved.
Thus Law no. 678/2001 on preventing and combating trafficking in persons, hereinafter called framework law, after recent amendments, includes provisions on prevention trafficking, offenses related to trafficking in persons, protection and assistance to victims of trafficking and aspects of international cooperation in this field.
Also, through the amendments made, the framework law has progressed in terms of Romania's alignment with the European standards in the field of combating and preventing trafficking by criminalizing the use of services of trafficked persons and by providing a definition of the concept of victim of trafficking. This new indictment was repeated in the content of the new Criminal Code, being a consequence of Romania’s ratification of the Council of Europe Convention on Action against Trafficking in Human Beings (Law no. 300/2006).
The legal framework became applicable in February 2014, established by the new Criminal Code adopted by Law no. 286/2009, provides a comprehensive framework concerning the criminalization of trafficking and other similar acts, and in terms of special procedural provisions necessary to combat crime. In relation to the Criminal Code, it keeps the content of the previous regulation, but bringing them through systematising improvement and alignment to the European standards.
45
CAHROM(2015)7
conditions regarding the wages and the working conditions, or does not fulfil the conditions of understanding accessibility of the agreement object.
In 2013 the destination states for traffickers were Italy, Germany, Spain, Greece, Great Britain, Czech Republic, Netherlands, France, Belgium, Portugal, Denmark, Austria, Hungary, Ireland, Poland and Cyprus. This shows the mobility of criminal groups that act in the country of destination/ exploitation – i.e. transferring the criminal activity from one country of exploitation to another. Cooperation between criminal groups mainly engaged in trafficking of persons is reduced.
According to the ANITP assessment, the structural feature of criminal groups is that they are established at large based on family ties, kinship, and ethnicity – and that the profits of criminal activities remain in the possession of a small group of people/ families/ relatives.
From data provided by the specialized structures of the Romanian Police, a growing tendency is
 noticed in the cases of trafficking for labour exploitation, both in the European area and beyond.
Regarding forced prostitution, the classic modus operandi is maintained (false promises regarding better paid jobs abroad as waitresses, exotic dancers, baby-sitter, hostesses, etc.). Most victims are recruited from rural areas or from dysfunctional families with limited financial potential, often with large gaps in education. There is however an increase in the cases in which the victims are aware that they will practice prostitution in the country of destination where this practice is legal. Even in those cases, they do not receive the sums agreed upon, the arguments given by traffickers being that the victims need to pay for fictitious debts related to accommodation, meals, specific clothing items, accessories etc.
Forced begging has a lower rate compared to other types of exploitation, often begging it is identified as a form of isolated elements without taking forms of organized crime. In most cases this modus operandi involved ethnic Roma, reflecting an obvious difficulty in collecting data and recording information and material evidence in the case.
 
Chapter VII of Title of special section of Law no. 286/2009 – Criminal Code - comprises trafficking and exploitation of vulnerable persons’ crimes, bringing in this chapter incriminations currently contained in Law no. 678/2001 and Government Emergency Ordinance no. 194/2002.
The texts criminalizing trafficking in persons, child trafficking and migration were systematized for an easier understanding and better correlation with other incrimination texts, however without bringing substantial changes. The aggravated form of trafficking in persons’ crime committed by a public servant in the performance of its duties, was added to implement art. 24 of the Council of Europe Convention on Action against Trafficking in Human Beings, ratified by Law no. 300/2006. The chapter includes child trafficking, as distinct offense with a more severe sanction regime, submission to forced or compulsory labour, pimping, begging, using a minor for begging, using the services of an exploited person.
Regarding the sexual exploitation and the incrimination of these behaviours, the Criminal Code does not anymore incriminate the practice of prostitution, while it keeps incrimination of facts that determine the expansion of prostitution, namely, the facts of its exploitation (pimping, trafficking in persons, use of the services of an exploited person), being in most cases manifestations of organized crime, while the person who provides sexual services is only a victim of human trafficking or sexual exploitation.
Moving the burden from the person who recruited to the recruiters is, thus, likely to help punishing the real perpetrators for extending the prostitution and other correlative phenomena characterized by a higher degree of social danger, especially trafficking in persons.
The fact that prostitution will be removed from the scope of criminal penalties, it does not mean its "legalization" or the activity’s transformation into one regulated or allowed by law, because the act of prostitution will still be sanctioned. Mere decriminalization means only to remove this work from the field of criminal sanctions, aimed not necessarily at changing the perception of society from a moral point of view on prostitution.
In this context, even the criminalization of child pornography should be mentioned under the Criminal Code, incrimination that keeps the existing provisions (incriminations of Law no. 678/2001, Law no. 161/2003 and Law no. 196/2003), but also with a more functional systematization.
The new code gives up the criminalization of begging in the form established by the Criminal Code into force, but brings two separate indictments, related to begging and designed to meet the common situations in the recent years. It is about child begging or the one practiced by a person with disabilities (inducing begging or obtaining benefits from this activity) and the use of a minor by an adult who has the ability to work and thus, in order to obtain material help from the public. This latter situation - for example, a woman who goes for begging, and to inspire public charity she keeps a child a few months old in her arms - presents an obvious danger, not only in that seriously violates human dignity, the child coming to be used as props, but endangers the health or even the life of the minor, given the conditions in which he/she is held during begging (very cold or very hot temperatures, rain etc.).
The crime of using services of an exploited person was inserted after ratification by Romania of the Council of Europe Convention on Action against Trafficking in Human Beings (Law no. 300/2006). For example, the text will be applicable if the person agrees to receive an organ transplant, knowing that it is illegally taken from a victim of trafficking in persons, or of the one who agrees to use forced labour imposed on these victims or benefits of forced prostitution services, if he knows that these people are victims of human trafficking.
46
CAHROM(2015)7

The Criminal Code entered into force on 1 February 2014 according to Law no. 187/2012 for the implementation of Law no. 286/2009 on the Criminal Code.
With regard to the Directive 2011/36 / EU of the European Parliament and of the Council, 5 April 2011 on preventing and combating trafficking and protecting its victims, and replacing Council Framework Decision 2002/629 / JHA, it was found that most criminal and procedural law material contained in the Directive are already set in law, without involving major interventions when transposing the Directive into Romanian legislation.
In terms of national mechanism regarding THB, in 2006, the Romanian Government established the National Agency against Trafficking in Persons (ANITP)47 under the auspices of the Ministry of Interior. ANITP coordinates and monitors anti-trafficking efforts at large. ANITP is supported by its 15 Regional Centres throughout Romania and presides an Inter-Ministerial Working Group (IWG) on this issue. The National Authority for the Protection of Family and Children’s Rights (ANFPDC)48 within the Ministry of Labour, Family and Social Protection is responsible for the portfolio concerning trafficked children at the national level. It chairs a National Coordination Committee on Child Labour and Child Trafficking, which is closely linked to the IWG.
The National Agency against Trafficking in Persons (ANITP) is the main state actor in Romania’s fight against trafficking in human beings. Its mandate spans from research to monitoring and operational tasks such as providing support to victims of trafficking. In addition, ANITP coordinates the Inter-ministerial Working Group (IWG) to Combat Trafficking in Persons. The IWG is composed of the Ministry of Interior and Administration Reform and its police inspectorate, Public Ministry, Ministry of Justice, Ministry of Labour, Family and Equal Opportunities and its various agencies, Ministry of Education, Research and Youth, Ministry of Public Health and the Ministry of Culture and Cults.
Selected non-governmental and international organisations are invited to be permanent IWG members with observer status. The National Agency for Roma formally is a member of the IWG49 but has not been pulled into actual coordination activities.50 Its input has been requested however at various occasions within the framework of the EU Twinning Project “Supporting Institutional Capacity to Prevent Trafficking in Human Beings in Romania”.
As a member of the IWG, the National Authority for the Protection of Family and Children’s Rights (ANPDC) is responsible for all issues related to trafficking in children. The agency operates as the technical secretariat for a National Coordination Committee dealing with child trafficking and child labour. The deliberations of which are taken into consideration by the IWG. Also, each county has inter-disciplinary teams dealing with child exploitation and child trafficking, which are coordinated by the county councils.
ANITP runs 15 Regional Centres51 composed of one coordinator (from law enforcement structures), one psychologist and one social worker. The Regional Centres’ original attribution was to monitor available assistance for trafficked persons. In an effort to assist its partners in supporting victims of trafficking, ANITP’s Regional Centres started to offer emergency assistance in crisis situations as well as to refer victims directly to specialised organisations. Staff of the
47 Originally the agency was called “National Agency for the Prevention of Trafficking and Monitoring of Assistance provided to Victims of Trafficking”, established through GD 1584/2005 of 8 December 2005, published in the Official Journal 5/04.01.2006. For more detailed information, see: http://anitp.mai.gov.ro/en/
48 For more detailed information, see: http://www.anpfdc.ro/content.aspx
49 Governmental Order 1951/2007 from 24th October 2007 on the establishment, organization and operation of a Working Group for the coordination activities regarding the protection of and assistance to victims of human trafficking at the national level.
50 Interview with the National Agency for Roma, March 2010
51 ANITP’s Regional Centres are based in Alba-Iulia, Bacău, Braşov, Bucharest, Constanţa, Craiova, Cluj Napoca, Galaţi, Iaşi, Oradea, Piteşti, Ploieşti, Suceava, Timişoara and Targu Mureş.
CAHROM(2015)7
 47

Regional Centres furthermore monitors the victim’s social integration in the “post-assistance period” for a minimum period of six months.
Even though cooperation between ANITP and ANPDC seems to be working well, other stakeholders are confused about their mandates resulting in an over-reliance on these two agencies without getting engaged themselves. This trickles down to the local level, where the interest in dealing with trafficking is very low, especially in rural areas. Local authorities have too little concern, will and interest in creating and developing cooperation and networks on this issue. For instance,
The National Victim Identification and Referral Mechanism53 sets out the main principles and guidelines for Romanian stakeholders to identify, refer and assist presumed trafficked persons. In fact, this tool should enable anybody to initiate victim identification and referral.
Cooperation and operations are facilitated through personal contacts and informal networks between law enforcement and social services at various levels. The entire system of support should apply regardless of a victim’s decision on whether s/he participates in criminal proceedings and is based on the National Standards for Victims of Trafficking in Persons Assistance Services.54
2.6.2. Existing data on Roma in relation to trafficking in human beings
Many Roma communities, especially in rural areas, live in poverty with limited access to social welfare, medical services and education. Many revert to informal labour or live of marginal resources generated through begging, metal collection or prostitution. Roma’s traditional system of norms and values underwent a lot of changes in recent years, a trend that can actually be observed in Romanian society at large.
Poverty in the case of both Roma and non-Roma is one of the main vulnerability factors for exploitation and ultimately trafficking in human beings. This is aggravated by a lack of education, lack of employment as well as a high degree of credulity and desperation. The inherent lack of perspectives back home puts many people at risk of becoming re-trafficked.
According to existing data55, street children are amongst the most vulnerable of becoming victims of trafficking. The majority of them are runaways from state-run placement centres as well as they are of Roma ethnicity. They may also be the second or third generation born on the streets, invisible for the state due to their lack of identity papers. Many are drug consumers and exercise prostitution. In general, they are settled in a specific zone, which is controlled by a “boss”, who is also a street child.
There are victims of trafficking among Romani sex workers (i.e. bought and sold among pimps).
The social background of Roma victims varies. In principle, they are from very poor families and agree to become sex workers. Their families tacitly accept their decision. On the other hand, there are
52 Interview with Romanitin Iasi, April 2010
53 The Romanian Ministry of Interior and Administration Reform issued Governmental Order no. 335 of 29 October 2008 to adopt the National Victim Identification and Referral Mechanism (Romanian Official Journal no.849 of 17 December 2008) 54 GD 1238/2007
55 ERRC Country report: Romania, 2011
trafficking in human beings has never been on the agenda of local authorities in Iasi
CAHROM(2015)7
 County. In contrary, civil society initiatives are expected to make up for the lack of state involvement. This burdens the work of civil society as much as it waives the responsibility of
 authorities.52
 Many of the victims of trafficking for sexual exploitation are from urban areas because the communities in the rural areas are conservative and closed to outsiders while the urban Roma
 community “is built on the independence of its members and is more open.”
  48

Romani girls with education, who use drugs, and become sex workers in order to generate „easy money“ for drugs and ultimately become trafficked abroad. Drug addiction is frequently used by pimps to increase the vulnerability and dependence of sex workers.
Research56 on Roma migration patterns from Romania to Italy (especially Naples and Rome) led to the identification of cases of trafficking in human beings. Romanian Roma in Naples entertain connections to the Italian mafia and oversee the market for begging, prostitution, stealing and garbage collection. It appears that all Roma (app. 5,000) in Naples come from the town of Calarasi in Romania. The migration/exploitation modus works as follows: Roma communities in Calarasi are extremely poor and live on the margins of society. Loan sharks (camatari) send people to Naples to work for one year in order to have their debts cancelled. Fake NGOs are organising trips from Calarasi to Naples. People come and go between Romania and Italy on a regular basis for begging, prostitution and metal collection. Their main source of income is a combination of Romanian social aid and begging or prostitution abroad. A worrying trend is that parents are reported to increasingly subject their children to prostitution in Italy since Italian state authorities are taking children, who they find begging on the street, into state care. Roma have to pay fees, either to the network that facilitates the travel or for a place in a camp. Most Roma from Calarasi reportedly migrate to Naples, most Roma from Craiova reportedly migrate to Rome.
It is difficult to assess the extent of Romani women among female prostitutes, who may be victims of trafficking since women commonly do not identify themselves as Roma and because of sex work being an underground business. Within Romania, there is a tendency to move commercial sex from the streets to hotels and apartments in order to circumvent police. Pimps contact clients through the internet and newspaper ads, establish meetings and bring the clients to the sex workers.
Law enforcement and social workers dealing with trafficking cases indicate57 that their perception was that the majority of victims of trafficking for “committing felony” were of Roma origin.
CAHROM(2015)7
 56 ERRC Country report: Romania, 2011 57 ERRC Country report: Romania, 2011
49

IV. CONCLUSIONS AND LESSONS LEARNT 1. Albania thematic visit
At the end of the thematic visit, the CAHROM experts debriefed on the meetings that they had with the Albanian authorities, the roundtable with local authorities and civil society and the field visits.
The experts were very positive about the organisation of the thematic visit by the Albanian CAHROM Member, Ms Blerina Zoto Tepelena.
Concerning the findings of the thematic visit, the experts were very pleased with the wide range of meetings they had and with the amount of information they had received, particularly that the experts from Greece and Netherlands were working intensively with the issue of trafficking in their countries and could further use the exchanges of information in their daily work.
Overall, although exact data about the real extent of the phenomenon in Roma communities in Albania were lacking, the experts could conclude that Roma communities are particularly vulnerable to trafficking for the purposes of street crime and begging.
The Albanian authorities identified a number of good practices that the experts of the thematic visit took note of, among which, the Albanian National Referral Mechanism, the Standard Operating Procedure, coalition of NGOs addressing trafficking in human beings, the national help- line and centres for victims of trafficking, managed by NGOs.
The experts agreed that the issue of identification and protection of victims is an on-going challenge for all countries and while Albania has made important steps through involving various actors at national level under the National Referral Mechanism (NRM). The NFM in Albania covers all stages from initial identification to the reintegration of victims and a multidisciplinary group of experts, including consultation with the civil society. In this regard, there is a coalition of 30 NGOs in Albania dedicated to THB that the Government cooperates closely with. On the other hand, the meeting with Roma civil society during the thematic visit was indicative of the fact that involving Roma NGOs in this mechanism is a necessity and that a closer cooperation of anti- trafficking organisations and Roma NGOs is needed. In addition, building the capacity of Roma NGOs to better understand and address issues of trafficking in Roma, including those at risk of trafficking, particularly children is also key to the prevention their further victimisation and trafficking.
The experts agreed that the Standard Operating Procedure (based on which victim identification and referral are made), according to which social services, the Ministry of Foreign Affairs, the border police etc. reacted so far when in contact with potential victims of trafficking seemed to be proving efficient.
The national help line for victims of trafficking – application from Google, free sms and calls are regarded as good reactive measures and could inspire countries that do not use such services. Other awareness raising tools and mechanisms, particularly the mobile units was seen as essential for raising awareness about trafficking of vulnerable groups, including Roma and Egyptian communities. The mobile teams’ project was financed by US Government to help identify those communities at risk of trafficking and provide services. The Albanian Government would like to replicate it, but they need more resources, thus this is an initiative that would need further consideration.
50
CAHROM(2015)7

The experts visited two centres for victims of trafficking /children at risk, managed by NGOs, which provide health care, accommodation and psychological help, in collaboration with international organisations, such as ‘Save the Children’ and found these initiatives meaningful and well implemented. Concerns were raised over the sustainability of such centres and limitations on the side of the Government to sponsor them.
The trainings implemented for professionals on anti-trafficking, including social workers, police and prosecutors were welcomed by the experts. Representatives of the Ministry of Social Welfare and Youth asked the Council of Europe about the possibility to provide additional support for training needs regarding professionals including front line professionals such as law enforcement, coast guards, health professionals, labour inspectors and educators in order to better identify victims and potential victims and provide quality assistance to more victims.
As most Roma children in street situation and begging belong to poor and vulnerable families, providing support for economic and livelihood opportunities for Roma families and facilitate their access to education, employment, housing and public services as a way to prevent trafficking or children being at risk of trafficking was highlighted. Resolving the on-going insecurity of housing of Roma in Albania can prevent further victimisation and the risk of trafficking and re- trafficking of Roma children.
From discussions with the Albanian authorities, the experts concluded that more work needs to be done on cross border cooperation protection system and management – to build joint systems and to exchange experiences, including working together on concrete cases on issues just as identification and registration of children without identity documents.
Finally, the exchanges that took place between with the Albanian authorities and civil society as well as between all the experts are seen as very useful and the experts suggested that such exchanges should continue in the future.
2. General conclusions
In the absence of ethnic data, it is difficult to assess the real extent of the phenomenon of trafficking in human beings in Roma communities; the information gathered in this and other reports however is indicative of tendencies that should be further monitored and analysed.
Conclusions from the thematic visit on the issue of trafficking in Roma point to the fact that Roma are indeed vulnerable to trafficking as they are disproportionately affected by the discrimination they face in their home country and the barriers they face in accessing public services such as schools, health and social services and employment opportunities. More so, it was evident from the visit to Albania and the reports of the groups of experts that Roma children are particularly at risk of being trafficked and re-trafficked for the purpose of sexual exploitation and street crimes, including begging.
Begging of Roma children is viewed in Albania but also in Greece, Italy, the Netherlands and Romania as part of a family survival strategy, especially that the Roma children begging come from very challenging economic backgrounds, where parents lack employment and whose income is daily based, mostly from what children bring home. The begging of children raises a number of questions, however clarification should stem from prioritising on the best interest of the child. As a result, it is obvious that children should not be made responsible for the financial and social wellbeing of their families and that the social and child protection authorities should intervene to assess the family situation and support through combined measures and interventions the social and economic empowerment of poor families, accompanied by additional psychological, educational, medical services and employment services for the child and the adults in the family. If this is done, the dilemma about the criminalisation of parents involved in the
51
CAHROM(2015)7

beginning of their children diminishes greatly, thus allowing for harsh measures only to extreme situations, including those of relapse.
Regarding the general protection of victims of trafficking, proper and timely identification of victims is essential. Firstly, the existence of multidisciplinary structured is proved to be critical, but so its functionality and effectiveness. In this structure, all relevant bodies, including civil society and representatives of communities at risk have to be included and committed to an agreed process and guidelines of operation. Secondly, needs-oriented and regular training of staff responsible for identification is highly recommended. Identification and assistance to children victims of trafficking needs to take account of the specific circumstances and needs of child victims and ensure the best interests of the child.
A particular attention should be paid to providing further training to law enforcement officers, coast guards, prosecutors and the judiciary, on various aspects of trafficking and to further enhancing their internal capacities to multiply expertise on trafficking to their peers. A particular focus to training activities should be Roma as victims of trafficking, including through sessions aimed overcoming negative stereotypes and attitude towards Roma as victims or potential victims of trafficking.
From the discussions with the Roma civil society in Albania and reports by the group of experts, increased coordination and cooperation with Roma civil society in addressing human trafficking is needed. All countries concerned need to adopt an inclusive approach and develop formal consultation methods between governmental and Roma NGOs on human trafficking. Building the capacity of Roma NGOs to better understand and address issues of trafficking in Roma communities, including those at risk of trafficking, particularly children should be one of the priorities. Further links and exchanges with the Council of Europe sectors can also contribute to this process.
As regards international cooperation, a wider and more consistent, on the ground cooperation is needed to prevent and combat THB in Roma communities, to protect and to provide assistance to victims, and to investigate and prosecute cases of THB. A stronger cooperation with countries of origin is needed in this regard.
All countries participating in the thematic visit shared good practices in tackling human trafficking; however, such examples need to be better known by those on the ground. Therefore, it would be very useful to explore further ways to disseminate and raise awareness of good practices at national and regional level.
Finally, the CAHROM Committee should continue to discuss the issue of trafficking in human beings and provide the space for further exchanges and joint initiatives among member States
52
CAHROM(2015)7

V. APENDIX 1: AGENDA OF THE THEMATIC VISIT
AGENDA
Ad hoc Committee of Experts on Roma Issues (CAHROM)
CAHROM thematic group of experts on addressing and combating human trafficking within Roma communities (with a focus on prostitution and street children)
(Tirana, Albania, 4-6 March 2015)
DAY 1: Wednesday, 4 March 2015
CAHROM(2015)7
   The working languages will be English and Albanian (whenever needed, consecutive English/Albanian interpretation will be provided by the hosting authorities).
   10:00 – 11:00 12:00 – 13:00
13:00 – 14:20 14:30 – 15:30
Meeting with Mr Igli Totozani, Albanian Ombudsman
Venue: Ombudsman’s Office (address: Bulvardi Zhan D’Ark, Nr.2)
Meeting with Ms Bardhylka Kospiri, Deputy Minister of Social Welfare and Youth (MoSWY)
Venue: MoSWY premises (address: Rruga e Kavajës)
Lunch
Meeting with Ms Nora Malaj, Deputy Minister of Education and Sport
Venue: Ministry of Education and Sport (address: Rruga e Durrësit)
16:00 – 17:00 Meeting with Mrs Elona Gjebrea, Deputy Minister of Interior/National Anti- traffic Coordinator
Venue: Ministry of Interior (address: Sheshi Skënderbej, Nr.3)
17:15 – 18:15 Meeting with Ms Nevila Xhindi, Deputy Mayor of Tirana,
Venue: Municipality of Tirana (address: Bulevardi Dëshmorët e Kombit
DAY 2: Thursday, 5 March 2015
  Venue: Hotel Tirana International
  9:00 – 13:00 Round table on addressing and combating human trafficking within Roma communities (with a focus on prostitution and street children) with experts
 53

CAHROM(2015)7
from partner countries (Greece, Italy, the Netherlands and Romania), Council of Europe Secretariat, representatives of the Albanian government, and representatives of NGOs and Albania-based international organisations
13:00 – 14:30 Lunch
Afternoon Visit organised in the National Centre for the Trafficking Victims DAY 3: Friday, 6 March 2015
  Venue: Hotel Tirana International
  09h00-11h00: Debriefing meeting and conclusions of the two-day thematic visit in Tirana between the CAHROM thematic group of experts and the National Anti- trafficking Coordinator Office
 11h00-12h00: Visit organised in the Centre for Children in Street Situation
12h00: End of the programme. Departure of experts and CoE Secretariat
54

 Report endorsed by the CAHROM through written procedure
CAHROM (2016)8
AD HOC COMMITTEE OF EXPERTS ON ROMA AND TRAVELLER ISSUES1 (CAHROM)
__________
THEMATIC REPORT BY THE GROUP OF EXPERTS ON VOCATIONAL EDUCATION AND TRAINING FOR ROMA
(following the CAHROM thematic visit to Cracow, Poland, on 26-28 November 2015) __________
POLAND (requesting country)
Ms Agnieszka GAJEWSKA, Chief Specialist, Department of Denominations and National and Ethnic Minorities, Ministry of Administration and Digitization
BOSNIA AND HERZEGOVINA (partner country)
Ms Ljiljana ŠANTIČ, Expert Advisor for Roma, Ministry for Human Rights and Refugees
FINLAND (partner country)
Ms Mervi SUMMANEN, Planner, AIKOPA-Kajaani University of Applied Sciences
Mr Rickhard LÅNGSTRÖM, Roma expert, Roma Working Group of the City of Kajaani
“THE FORMER YUGOSLAV REPUBLIC OF MACEDONIA” (partner country)
Ms Mabera KAMBERI, Head of the Sector for Coordination and Technical Assistance, Ministry of Labour and Social Policy
TURKEY (partner country)2
Mr Can ALKAN, Employment Expert, Turkish Employment Agency (İŞKUR), Foreign Relations and Projects Department, International Relations Team
Ms Latife USLU, Assistant Expert, Department of Social lnclusion, Ministry of Family and Social Policies
1 The terms “Roma and Travellers” are used at the Council of Europe to encompass the wide diversity of the groups covered by the work of the Council of Europe in this field: on the one hand a) Roma, Sinti/Manush, Calé, Kaale, Romanichals, Boyash/Rudari; b) Balkan Egyptians (Egyptians and Ashkali); c) Eastern groups (Dom, Lom and Abdal); and, on the other hand, groups such as Travellers, Yenish, and the populations designated under the administrative term “Gens du voyage”, as well as persons who identify themselves as Gypsies.
2 Turkey did not take part in the thematic visit. However, Turkish experts that had been initially appointed for the thematic visit contributed to the report, and also transmitted information provided by Mr Hasan Emin ÇELİK.
2 September 2016
 
I. INTRODUCTION
page 3
page 3 page 3 page 4 page 4 page 6 page 8 page 8
page 9
page 9 page 14 page 15 page 17 page 21
page 23
page 23 page 26 page 31 page 34 page 40
page 43
page 43 page 43 page 44 page 54 page 54 page 55 page 56 page 57 page 58 page 59 page 60
page 62
page 62 page 62 page 62 page 62 page 63 page 64
TABLE OF CONTENTS
1.1 Background and context of the thematic group and visit
1.2 Composition of the thematic group
1.3 Programme of the thematic visit
1.4 Introduction to the topic
1.5 European and international standards and reference texts
1.6 Terminology
1.7 Main issues addressed during the thematic visit
II. SITUATION OF THE ROMA POPULATION AND CHALLENGES IN TERMS OF EDUCATION, INCLUDING VOCATIONAL EDUCATION, AND EMPLOYMENT
2.1 Poland
2.2 Bosnia and Herzegovina
2.3 Finland
2.4 “The former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia”
2.5 Turkey
III. LEGISLATION, POLICY MEASURES AND PROJECTS, INCLUDING VOCATIONAL TRAINING, AT NATIONAL AND LOCAL LEVELS
3.1. Poland
3.2. Bosnia and Herzegovina
3.3. Finland
3.4. “The former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia”
3.5. Turkey
IV. CONCLUSIONS, LESSONS LEARNED, GOOD PRACTICES AND FOLLOW-UP
4.1
4.2 4.3
APPENDICES:
Appendix 1: Appendix 2: Appendix 3: Appendix 4: Appendix 5: Appendix 6: ADDENDUM:
Conclusions of the thematic group and lessons learnt
4.1.1 Conclusions concerning the organisation of the thematic visit
4.1.2 General conclusions and lessons learnt on the topic
4.1.3 Lessons learnt per country
Poland
Bosnia and Herzegovina
Finland
“The former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia” Turkey
Good practices identified Possible follow-up
Official invitation letter received from Polish authorities List of experts participating in the thematic visit Programme of the CAHROM thematic visit in Poland
Other countries’ vocational education and training projects Compulsory education comparative table
Eurostat statistical data
Experts’ and participants’ presentations and other reference documents
CAHROM (2016)8
2

I. INTRODUCTION
1.1 Background and context of the thematic group and visit
The thematic group on vocational education and training for Roma was set up at the request of the Polish member of the CAHROM in 2013. Representatives from Bosnia and Herzegovina, Finland, “the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia”, and Turkey later confirmed their interest to join this thematic group as partner countries.
The proposal from Polish authorities to be a requesting country and host a CAHROM thematic visit of partner countries’ experts was much welcome by the CAHROM since a thematic report on vocational education would bridge the already adopted thematic reports related to Roma education (namely on inclusive education as opposed to special schools3, school drop-outs and absenteeism of Roma children4, school enrolment of Roma children with a focus on Roma girls5, inclusive pre-school education for Roma children6 and the schooling of Roma migrants’ and Travellers’ children7) and the planned thematic visit to Turkey on access of Roma to employment in 20178.
An official invitation was received from the Roma Minority Division of the Department Of Denominations and National and Ethnic Minorities of the Ministry of Administration and Digitization9 inviting the CAHROM’s group of experts to visit Cracow, Poland, on 13 October 2015 (see Appendix 1).
1.2 Composition of the thematic group
Bosnia and Herzegovina, Poland and “the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia” were represented by their respective CAHROM members who are working for the ministry in charge of co-ordinating the national Roma integration strategy and its implementation. The Finnish CAHROM member appointed two experts from grass-root level from the city of Kajaani, including a representative of the Finnish Roma (Kaale) community, who works in the local Roma Working Group. The participation of the two Turkish experts, respectively from the Turkish Employment Agency (İŞKUR) and the Department of Social Inclusion of the Ministry of Family and Social Policy, was cancelled shortly before the thematic visit; however, the Turkish experts contributed to the present thematic report. The list of the experts participating in the thematic group, as well as the list of local Polish participants, can be found in Appendix 2.
3 See CAHROM (2012)18 Thematic report on inclusive education of Roma children as opposed to special schools (covering the Czech Republic, the Slovak Republic, Hungary, Slovenia and the United Kingdom) at http://www.coe.int/en/web/portal/cahrom.
4 See CAHROM (2012)6 Thematic report on school drop-out and absenteeism of Roma children (covering the Netherlands Hungary, Spain and Sweden) at http://www.coe.int/en/web/portal/cahrom.
5 See CAHROM (2013)5 Thematic report on school attendance of Roma children, in particular Roma girls (covering Finland, Latvia, Norway and Sweden) at http://www.coe.int/en/web/portal/cahrom.
6See CAHROM (2015)6 Thematic report on inclusive pre-school for Roma children (covering the Czech Republic, Hungary, Latvia, Poland and “the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia”) at http://www.coe.int/en/web/portal/cahrom.
7 This thematic report, covering France, Belgium, Switzerland and Romania, will be presented to the CAHROM for endorsement at its 11th meeting in Sofia, Bulgaria, on 26-29 April 2016.
8 This thematic visit to Turkey has been postponed to 2017. Partner countries shall include Bosnia and Herzegovina, the Republic of Moldova, Poland, Spain and “the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia”.
9 Shortly before the CAHROM thematic visit, this Ministry was dismantled following the presidential elections. The Roma Division was incorporated into the Ministry of Interior of Poland.
CAHROM (2016)8
     3

1.3 Programme of the thematic visit
The agenda included a two-day round table, opened by Mr Jerzy Miler, Malopolski Voivode, and attended by 30 local participants, including state officials, representatives of various regional and local institutions, Roma civil society representatives, including Roma NGO representatives, an entrepreneur (horse business), an ethnic Roma career adviser and an ethnic Roma social worker of Limanowa municipality. The morning of the third day was devoted to a debriefing meeting between the experts of the thematic group with a view to defining the main conclusions and lessons learnt, identifying good practices and proposing follow-up actions summarized in the last chapter of this report. The detailed programme of the thematic visit is reproduced in Appendix 3 to this report.
The agenda followed the guidelines developed by the CAHROM10 and allowed the possibility for partner countries to introduce their experience and exchange views with local interlocutors. Partner countries’ experts made full use of the opportunity to raise questions to their Polish interlocutors.
1.4 Introduction to the topic
The setting-up of such a thematic group was a response to the still unsolved situation of insufficient presence of Roma on the labour market all over Europe which is mainly caused by a lower level of education of that community compared to the rest of the population. This lower level of education results from various factors, some of them being internal to the community (e.g. early school drop outs before completing compulsory education that may find its roots in early marriages) and some being linked to external reasons and discriminatory practices (including poverty, school segregation, misplacement in schools for light mentally disabled, lower quality education, lack of reference of Romani culture, history, language in school curricula, etc.). Some of these factors are interlinked: illiteracy of many Roma parents and their mistrust towards educational institutions often result from educational barriers they faced and lower education they had during their young age; and in turn they play a role in the fear to have their children discriminated or bullied at school, and sometimes in being unable assist their children with homework, etc. The above remarks should however not be generalised to the entire Roma community in Europe. Situations differ very much from country to country, community to community, family to family.
Since many years the education of Roma has been a priority at both national and international levels, examples of which being the inclusion of education as one of the core priorities of the Decade for Roma Inclusion (2005-2015)11 and of the EU Framework for National Roma Integration Strategies up to 202012. It is therefore not surprising that the first Roma-specific related Recommendation adopted by the Committee of Ministers in 2000 focuses on education of Roma children13 and the same applies to the choice of the topic of the first CAHROM thematic reports. In most member States that have adopted a national Roma Integration Strategy the education chapter has often been given political and financial priority (e.g. Finland, Poland). The first Roma Decade Action Plans to be adopted in Western Balkan countries was usually the one on education (e.g. Bosnia and Herzegovina).
10 See document CAHROM (2013)26 Guidelines for the CAHROM thematic visits and reports.
11 www.romadecade.org
12 http://eur-lex.europa.eu/legal-content/EN/TXT/?qid=1444910104414&uri=CELEX:52011DC0173.
13 Roma and Travellers’ education was the focus of another CM recommendation adopted in 2009. To access the text of these recommendations click on http://www.coe.int/en/web/portal/roma-related-texts.
CAHROM (2016)8
    4

For obvious reasons, education stays the main domain of international and national interest in the framework of activities on improving the situation of Roma and Travellers in Europe. Data deriving from nationals censuses show clearly that the Roma minority has the lowest education level among all ethnic groups in Europe. The issue of education stays also the best recognized topic with many national and cross-Europe surveys. According to data of the European Union Fundamental Rights Agency (FRA) from its survey conducted in 11 EU member states in 201114, 56 % of Roma left school before the age of 16 and 17 % have never been in the education system. This determines the situation of Roma in general, most of all on the labour market. The shortage of Roma educated skilled craftsmen on the labour market is an issue in many countries. Whilst, from the international organisations and national authorities’ point of view, education is often considered as the first priority, many Roma, men in particular, might put employment as their first priority, before education or housing, though again no generalisation should be drawn. On paper, employment is also a core priority of the EU framework strategy, of (Roma Decade) action plans and of quasi all national Roma inclusion strategies. Employment was also the topic of the 2nd specific Roma-related Council of Europe Recommendation adopted by the Committee of Ministers in 2001. However, political and financial priority given to the employment chapter is often scarce when non-existent. Main employment-related activities, when they exist, are often limited to provide training and new skills. Still, only 4% of Roma respondents described their job situation in 2011 as “being in training” according to the above-mentioned FRA survey, which reveals that training concerns relatively few Roma and when they are provided, they often fail to ensure employment at the end.
Relatively little focus is put on vocational education and training. Some international texts or national Roma inclusion strategies sometimes address it in relation to education or to employment or sometimes to both. Vocational education and training are still insufficiently recognised as a priority15 and a solution that offers possibilities to activate and empower the Roma community and ensure their economic self- sufficiency. Vocational education and training seem also interesting in terms of Roma community development because they respond to some patterns existing in Roma traditional communities, such as child/early marriages (unions) and relatively early parenthood. Vocational education is a kind of “transmission belt” into the labour market for those who take responsibility for the family at an early age. Another important factor is also the legal obligation for compulsory education which in most countries is for children until 16 years of age (France, Germany, Hungary, Italy, Spain, Sweden), 17 years of age (United Kingdom) or 18 years of age (Belgium, the Netherlands, Poland, Portugal, Russian Federation and Turkey) – which, generally, also covers completing primary and vocational education16.
Up-to-now, international and national emphasis was put mostly on the access to education, the right to quality education, pre-school, inclusive education, which is reflected in texts, studies and reports, including in the choice of CAHROM thematic priorities17. The rise of interest for vocational education was however accelerated in the context of the European Structural Funds programming period 2007- 2013, since ESF could be used for professional activation of vulnerable groups, including Roma. The link between the opening of the labour market for Roma and vocational training became more obvious. Nonetheless the outcomes, lessons learned or good practices were not widely disseminated.
14 FRA survey and report from 2001: Education: the situation of Roma in 11 EU Member States:
http://fra.europa.eu/en/publication/2014/education-situation-roma-11-eu-member-states.
15 As examples, the 2015 Roma Decade Inclusion Index does not refer to vocational education or training and the Council of Europe Thematic Action Plan for the Inclusion of Roma and Travellers (2016-2019), adopted on 3 March 2016 by the Committee of Ministers, does not list vocational education or training among its priorities or envisaged actions.
16 See Appendix 5.
17 See Introduction chapter 1.1. above.
CAHROM (2016)8
  5

1.5 European and international standards and reference texts
At the level of the Council of Europe, three texts adopted by the Committee of Ministers addressing specifically Roma issues touch upon the topic of vocational education and training:
 Recommendation No R (2000) 4 of the Committee of Ministers to member States on the education of Roma/Gypsy children in Europe, in its Preamble, recalls that educational policies in favour of Roma/Gypsy children should be backed up by an active adult education and vocational education policy.
 Recommendation Rec(2001)17 on improving the economic and employment situation of Roma/Gypsies and Travellers in Europe18: Part V. of that Recommendation is devoted to the training and education needs of Roma. Paragraph 36 states that: “Vocational training programmes for Roma/Gypsies should respond to local or regional needs, for instance the improvement of Romani neighbourhoods, and to employment opportunities. Preference should be given to on-the- job training and product development. Market research should be part of the training”.
In the paragraph 35 Committee of Ministries put attention on the cultural background and traditional experiences: “Roma/Gypsy culture and identity should be introduced as an integral part of the design and delivery of vocational education. For example, a system of accreditation should be developed for skills in traditional crafts and trades and regarded as equivalent to official qualification standards”.
Member states should also ensure that “Employment programmes (also referred to as public support programmes), including adult literacy training, should include the enhancement of skills and training as an integral part of their design to help improve the long-term employment prospects of participants” (par. 37).
 Recommendation CM/Rec(2009)4 of the Committee of Ministers to member states on the education of Roma and Travellers in Europe: In paragraph 12 Council of Ministries states: “Access of Roma and Travellers to vocational training should be adapted and supported through targeted measures and culturally sensitive adult education programmes should be implemented. Furthermore, in absence of diplomas, the validation of knowledge acquired by experience should be encouraged”.
 The Strasbourg Declaration on Roma adopted at the High Level meeting on Roma on 20 October 2010, states that the member States of the Council of Europe agree on a non- exhaustive list of priorities, which should serve as guidance for more focused and more consistent efforts at all levels, including through active participation of Roma. Education and employment are among these priorities, including vocational training: “Ensure equal access of Roma to employment and vocational training in accordance with international and domestic law, including, when appropriate, by using mediators in employment offices. Provide Roma, as appropriate, with possibilities to validate their skills and competences acquired in informal settings” (par. 34).
18https://wcd.coe.int/ViewDoc.jsp?id=241681&Site=CM&BackColorInternet=C3C3C3&BackColorIntranet=EDB021&BackColorLo gged=F5D383 (the term “Gypsies” was used in the Council of Europe terminology of that time).
CAHROM (2016)8
   6

In an effort to support the education of the Roma, the Council of Europe has organised European workshops and seminars on the following themes: teacher training on Roma history and culture, training of Roma school mediators/assistants, on the relationship between families and schools, access to quality education, pre-school education, and vocational training.
For recommendations from the European Commission against Racism and Intolerance (ECRI) regarding (vocational) education and employment to participating countries in this thematic group, see chapter 2.
At the European Union level, relevant texts include the EU Council conclusions on an EU Framework for National Roma Integration Strategies up to 2020 in Brussels on 19 May 2011 and the European Parliament Resolution on the EU Strategy on Roma Inclusion (March 2011) and European Commission 2014.Report on the implementation of the EU framework for National Roma Integration Strategies. The European Union also prepared a wide series of programmes and initiatives for the promotion of vocational training cooperation to promote a collaborative approach to the development of vocational training systems in Europe, within Socrates and Grundtvig, Leonardo da Vinci, Adult Education and Lifelong Learning in Europe programmes19. As an example, in the framework of the project “Migrant Roma youth in Brussels: education and vocational training” the Integration Centre “Foyer” presented in Brussels on 6-7 January 2014 a Life Long Learning EU Programme supported project called “A mentoring system for Roma women on their vocational and educational path” which was implemented in Hungary, Slovenia, Spain, and Turkey, with a focus on Roma teenage girls as a multi-discriminated group20.
At the level of the OSCE, the 2003 Action Plan on Improving the Situation of Roma and Sinti within the OSCE Area21 recommended OSCE participating states to “develop policies and programmes, including vocational training, to improve the marketable skills and employability of Roma and Sinti people, particularly young people and women” (Article 51). The 2013 ODIHR Status Report on the Implementation of the Action Plan on Improving the Situation of Roma and Sinti within the OSCE Area22 draws the following conclusion: “In countries aiming at EU accession that have had to begin harmonizing their legislation and policy with EU standards, financing tools such as the Instrument for Pre-Accession Assistance have been essential. Such programmes commonly feature several stages of intervention, including provision of information, mediation with potential employers, and free-of-charge vocational training courses. The actual employment of the beneficiaries is not necessarily an objective of such programmes, raising questions about their effectiveness” (pp. 39-40).
“In 2010, ODIHR also actively engaged in the establishment of the International Task Force for the Education of Roma, in co-operation with the Council of Europe, UNESCO, UNICEF, the European Commission, the Roma Education Fund and the International Step by Step Association. The Task Force fosters co-ordination of the promotion of early childhood care and education, of regular education, of out-of-school education, of vocational training and of adult education in Roma communities” (page 63).
The Roma Education Fund has organised study visits for education and vocational training specialists and decision makers23.
19 http://rome.angloinfo.com/information/working/eu-factsheets-working/vocational-training/.
20 See the PowerPoint http://eacea.ec.europa.eu/LLp/events/2014/documents/kickoff-ka/ka1/543327_ms4row_en.pdf.
21 http://www.osce.org/odihr/17554.
22 http://www.osce.org/odihr/107406?download=true. See also some country examples of measures under this chapter.
23
CAHROM (2016)8
     http://www.romaeducationfund.hu/news/ref/news-and-events/study-visits-education-and-vocational-training-specialist- and-decision-make.
  7

1.6 Terminology
In his introduction, the Head of Roma Minority Division, Denomination and National and Ethnic Minority Department within the Ministry of Administration and Digitization, Mr Krzysztof Cwetsch, put emphasis on the terminology used in the Polish main statistical office to differentiate several categories, i.e.:
 Unemployed person - person over 15 years old who do not work but is ready to start a job and is registered in labour office (in Poland, registration is an obligatory condition to get a status of unemployed person);
 Unemployment rate – the relation of the number of (registered) unemployed persons to the number of persons economically active;
 Economically inactive (or passive) – person over 15 years old, who do not work and do not look for a job; this group encompasses also students, prisoners, pensioners, retired persons, etc.
 Working or production age – usually over 15 years old to 60 years old (women) or 65 years old (men); working age is divided into mobile working age (readiness to change the qualification, work place or job, usually people between 18 and 44 years) and non-mobile working age (lack of readiness to any change related to a job position, usually people between 45 to 64 years).
CAHROM (2016)8
      According to the 2011 Polish Census:
12,776 Roma in working age
(over 15 years old)
%
working
1,700 1,985
13.30% 15.53%
economically inactive
8,029 62.85%
no data 1,062
8.32%
unemployed
               1.7 Main issues addressed during the thematic visit
1) obstacles to achieve high education level among a majority of Roma;
2) cultural and economic reasons that could explain a lack of professional skills among Roma;
3) needs and challenges for developing vocational education and promoting this kind of education;
4) need for mentoring and monitoring support measures for Roma already professionally active;
5) needs for proper definitions (e.g. persons unemployed versus economically inactive persons);
6) Needs and challenges for collecting data which reflect the real situation of Roma professional
activity on the labour market;
7) possible incentives for entrepreneurs to hire workers from marginalised groups, including Roma;
8) possibilities offered by re-emerging craft market or social economy entities, with (optional)
reference to former traditional Roma occupations, if needed;
9) systemic problems encountered on the labour market: low level of education of potential
workers, lack of professional skills, high costs of labour, often lack of territorial correspondence to the job resources or lack of correspondence between demand and supply, periodical demand for specific services or products, lack of professional flexibility, etc.;
10) the role and possible use of European Structural Funds in professional activation of Roma communities in EU member States,
11) the unwillingness of job seekers (not only Roma) to accept low-paid and low-esteem jobs;
12) the exact extent of the dependency of Roma communities on social welfare systems and
inheritance effect of joblessness status from a generation to the next;
13) how to make us of the possible influence of role models within the Roma communities;
14) the need and role of carrier advisers, including those with an ethnic Roma background;
15) the patriarchal structure of some Roma groups which prevent higher education and professional
activity of Roma women.
   8

II. SITUATION OF THE ROMA POPULATION AND CHALLENGES IN TERMS OF EMPLOYMENT AND EDUCATION, INCLUDING VOCATIONAL EDUCATION AND TRAINING
2.1 Poland
Size and composition of the Roma community
Roma in Poland are recognized as an ethnic minority. According to the 2011 National Census of Population and Housing, 16,723 Polish citizens declared Roma ethnicity: 9,622 declared the Roma nationality alone. This was more than in the previous 2002 census figure (12,731 in total). More realistic estimations based on information provided by the voivodes and other implementing partners of the “Roma Programme” carried out in 2004-2013 put the total number of Roma between 20,000 and 25,000 (0.08% of the total population).
Roma are divided into five main groups who differ in cultural, social and economic terms: Polish Roma, Bergitka (Mountain, Carpathian) Roma, Lovara, and Kalderash (Kelderari), as well as two smaller groups of Sinti and Chaladytka (Russian Roma). Lovara, Kelderari, Polish Roma and Russian Roma used to be nomads until the half of the 1960s and were forced to sedentarize by the communist regime. The Bergitka Roma, on the contrary, had a sedentary way of life since ages.
Vast majority of Roma in Poland constitute urban population: 92 % live in cities and 8% in rural areas. They mainly live in major cities across the country. In the 2002 census, 15,657 Polish citizens declared using the Romani language at home.
According to the 2011 census, Roma is a young population: people aged 0-19 consist of 32.5 % of the total Roma population (compared with 21.5 % within the majority population); people aged 60 and more consist of 7.7 % of the total Roma population (19,7 % within the majority). The Polish Roma population consisted in 2011 of 8,604 women and 8,119 men, including 10,840 persons of working age.
During the communist regime a number of Roma emigrated, mainly to Germany and Sweden but there is no reliable data on the scale of that migration. The next migration wave was connected with Poland joining the European Union in 2004. The search for a better life after the enlargement resulted in the migration of Polish Roma to Western Europe. The main destination countries were (and still are) the United Kingdom and the Republic of Ireland. Very few Roma from other European countries have recently arrived in Poland, mostly from Romania and fewer from Bulgaria.
Situation of Roma in the field of education
Despite a number of activities undertaken by Polish authorities in the field of education of the Roma community since the early 1990s, the level of education of most Polish Roma should still be identified as low. Significant disparities exist between the educational level of Roma and non-Roma.
Exact figures on the number of Roma children and youth covered with compulsory education are difficult to determine. However, data collected from annual reports submitted by voivodeship offices show that this figure is steadily increasing (in the school year 2004/2005 it amounted to 2,844 people, whilst in 2012/2013 it reached 3,259).
CAHROM (2016)8
9

According to data from the 2002 National Census of Population and Housing, almost 51% of self- declared Roma over 13 years of age had not finish primary school. In the 2011 census data, a similar category was no longer available. However, it was pointed out that 82% of Roma declaring education chose the education category "lower than secondary education" (see the graphic below). During the two censuses respondents were asked for secondary education: in 2002, 247 Polish citizens of Roma origin declared having secondary education; in 2011 they were 934 (7%). As for the higher education, 13 declared to have it in 2002; they were 272 in 2011 (2%). These figures show at least some progress.
The number of Roma pupils for whom schools undertook additional educational activities in 2013 was 2,547 pupils according to information collected annually by voivodes, and based on reporting by educational institutions in Education Information System. Moreover, the Minister responsible for religious denominations and national and ethnic minorities collects annually information on the number of Roma pupils benefiting from support under the assistance programmes (monitoring the number of pupils receiving school starter kits, or insurance, participation in classes in community centres, etc.).
Analysis of the above data and reports on the implementation of the Roma Programme indicate that over 80% of Roma children in age of compulsory education actually pursue their studies. Turnout of Roma pupils is however still low, with an average of 70%. The grade average of Roma pupils: is also low: between poor and satisfactory (between 2-3 in 6-grade scale, where 6 is the highest). Over the last 3 years, the number of diagnoses on mild mental retardation varied between 6.5% and 7.4 % of the total number of Roma pupils. Although this figure is still a relatively high, it has decreased compared with previous years.
Despite the increase in the number of Roma children benefiting from early childhood education, sending children to kindergartens is still not widespread among Roma families. According to the Education Information System collected in 2013, 338 Roma children attended kindergartens and kindergarten units. Since 2013, one year of compulsory pre-school education has been introduced for all children aged 5, which should improve the situation.
CAHROM (2016)8
  Level of education of Roma in Poland, census 2011, %
 2 7
9
82
basic secondary high
no answer
10

Situation of Roma on the labour market
Provisions of the 1997 Act on data protection limit data collection on ethnic grounds. The Polish administration uses estimated data based on the population census on households; however the census does not collect data on all areas and might have missed some Roma households. For the purpose of the thematic visit, data regarding the Roma community was collected through two main sources:
- Data collected by the chief statistical office, a governmental body which reports to the president of the Council of Ministers. This office is responsible for collecting and making available information related to public life and – for some areas – to private life.
- Data collected by the Centre for public opinion survey. This foundation reflects specific matters in the Polish society, primarily social and economic issues.
Data presented during the visit resulted from an analysis of three surveys: the 2011 population census survey, the 2014 examination of economic activities of the Polish population (done regularly since 1992) which gives an idea of the labour structure (people who are professionally active, employed and unemployed, and also those who are passive in terms of employment). The third one was a research on unemployment conducted in 2014 which identified the number of persons who are unemployed, how long they have been unemployed, whether they are registered or not, what is their main source of income, whether they are seeking job or are ready to take employment in nearest time and what kind of sacrifices the persons are ready to make to get a job).
Figures show that Roma are the least socially integrated minority in Poland. A large proportion of Roma remain excluded from the labour market. The unemployment rate for Roma is 30% as compared with 11% nationwide, indicating a pattern of discrimination not only in relation to the Polish majority, but also in relation to other national minorities. Low professional activity of the Roma in the labour market is one of the main barriers to the social integration of this minority. According to data from the 2011 National Census of Population and Housing, Roma professional activity rate was 22% (for the general population this rate was 55.5%). In 2011, 13.3% of the Roma (1,700 people) declared that they had a job, whilst the remaining 86.7% (11,076 people) were classified as unemployed, professionally inactive or people with no defined status on the labour market (see table under 1.6 Terminology).
Members of society aged 15 or more who are not working and are not looking for a job constitute what is called a professionally passive group. This group – which is not counted under the unemployment rate - includes people that are not willing to get employed at all, retired persons, production age people who are given benefits but do not want to come back on the labour market, disabled or sick persons, young people who have not yet finished their studies, people who withdrew from the labour market to start again their studies, prisoners and people who stay home to take care of children or other persons. For the entire Polish society, the number of active people is 44% and the number of passive is 44.2%. For Roma, the figures are 13% and 62.8% respectively. In 2014 given reasons for passivity were: sickness or disability (26.8%), students or starting again studies (26%), family obligations (25%), pensioners (12.5%), discouraged of seeking a job (9%). For Roma, proportions were the same but figures vary a lot.
Challenges regarding employment and education, including vocational education and training
In Poland, challenges exist both within the Roma communities and from an institutional perspective. Poverty and cultural patterns, especially among traditional Roma groups, are obstacles to the enrolment of children in pre-school education and education at large: a number of Roma families face financial difficulties and education appears less a priority compared to daily economic survival although pre-
CAHROM (2016)8
11

school education receives governmental support. This is particularly true for Roma children dropping out of school before finishing secondary education. For very young children, there is a certain over- protectiveness on the side of mothers which plays in favour of keeping their children at home with the family rather than sending them to pre-school. Another factor is the lack of trust in the school system which is often linked to stereotypes, prejudice and negative attitude towards Roma children.
Roma ethnic minority is the only minority at risk of social exclusion in Poland. This diagnosis is due to a number of social and cultural factors, of which the first one is the low educational level of this group, which directly affects the lack of qualifications desired in the labour market, and thus the health situation and living conditions of the Roma. Not without significance is the hermetic nature of some traditional Roma communities that defend their “independence” and “difference” leading to their self- exclusion of the rest of society. Mutual isolation has deepened the negative stereotypes. Many centuries of isolation of the group, caused by culturally motivated self-isolation and barriers on the part of the majority society, meant that Roma until these days are not a socially integrated group. The consequence of this isolation is insufficient knowledge about the Roma among the majority population, and thus, a high level of distrust towards this group (this is mirrored on the Roma side). Different lifestyle, system of values, aversion to institutionalized education, and the lack of employment cause high level of aversion towards the Roma (although the level of social aversion towards the Roma is steadily decreasing).
Among certain groups and categories of the Roma population, cultural factors are clear barriers for the overall improvement of their socio-economic and educational situation. During the thematic visit, numerous examples were given of professions that certain traditional Roma groups would disregard or categorically refuse if they would be proposed such occupations (see the conclusions chapter of this report for concrete examples). These cultural aspects are not always sufficiently taken into consideration in vocational education and training offers, which partly explains the relatively low (though slightly increasing) number of Roma involved in vocational education (the graphic below shows the number of scholarships for Roma pupils in general secondary education or in vocational schools:
CAHROM (2016)8
   13
17
6 2015
2014
2013
79
79
number of Roma pupils in vocational schools
number of Roma pupils in seconadry education level in general
91
0 20 40 60 80 100
Note: Some data and experiences show that the total number of Roma pupils attending secondary education is a little bit higher than the number of scholarships presented in this graphic but the difference is not too big.
12

The lack of acceptance of institutionalized education of children and youth in traditional circles results in a high degree of school drop-out in the early stages of education, especially among girls. The acceptance by a part of the Roma population of a low eligibility age to start a family and of a low educational level are causes explaining the fact they remain on the side-lines of modern contemporary societies. Because of the position of women in traditional Roma communities - determined primarily by the fact of motherhood - the equality between Roma men and women remains a big problem. Roma women often face double/multiple discrimination both from an inside and outside community perspective.
Roma are not always prepared for the smooth functioning in the increasingly complicated reality of the modern world. The low level of education among the Roma (also caused by past educational policies towards this minority), prevents their entry into the labour market, and the consequent lack of or minimal economic independence. The lack of schooling and jobs translates into bad housing situation of this group - the degradation of dwellings, and raising population density, deteriorating housing and sanitary conditions, and placement of Roma clusters in poor neighbourhoods. This situation is reflected in the health situation of Roma, being the cause of shorter life expectancy, chronic diseases and decreasing immunity, also playing a role is endogamy of this population. Simultaneously, there is an increase in substance abuse, which is a relatively new phenomenon in the Roma community, proving the disintegration of existing cultural norms.
The above play a major role in the social aversion towards this group from the part of the majority society and gives ground to manifestations of discrimination towards this minority, although specific cultural features should not overshadow and be an excuse for not addressing persistent discriminatory behaviours within parts of the Polish society. Cultural characteristics that are clearly different from the dominant culture cause reluctance towards this group from the part of the majority society. Roma are perceived as intentionally disregarding the law (e.g. parents not sending their children to school, early marriage, Roma avoiding employment, or having a demanding attitude, etc.). On the other hand, positive Roma cultural features (solidarity, importance of the family, etc.) are not sufficiently valued among the majority population.
Raising the level of education is considered to be the condition for changing the situation of Roma and improving their access to the labour market. Without raising the level of education and facilitating job opportunities, any other accompanying measures shall have low efficiency.
To summarize, among the key barriers affecting the persistent low level of education of the Roma community in Poland, the following should be indicated:
- Lack of preliminary preparation offered by pre-school education (kindergarten);
- Insufficient command of the Polish language, resulting, inter alia, in the misunderstanding of
teachers’ instructions;
- Absence in school activities (due both to the lack of enforcement of compulsory education by
educational authorities and to the lack of family responsibilities to send children to school);
- Early school drop-out by Roma pupils, mainly girls (even just after finishing primary school);
- Lack of motivation of Roma pupils/students and parental support;
- Lack of preparation of teachers to work with culturally diverse pupils;
- Disapproval of Roma children’s school attendance on the part of non-Roma parents;
- Poverty, poor social and financial conditions making it hard for pupils to prepare for classes;
- Migration of Roma families is causing frequent schooling interruptions and educational
difficulties after returning from a foreign residence.
CAHROM (2016)8
13

2.2 Bosnia and Herzegovina
Size and composition of the Roma community
Roma are the biggest minority among the 17 national minorities officially recognized in Bosnia and Herzegovina. The last census was in 2014 but official results have not been announced. In the last census from 1991, only about 8,864 Roma declared Roma ethnicity. Information from the field reveals that that there are more Roma living in Bosnia and Herzegovina.
The lack of data was the reason that the Ministry for Human Rights and Refugees of Bosnia and Herzegovina had registration process of Roma population and their needs in 2010. Registration of Roma needs was useful for better planning of activities and funds allocation. Special attention was paid to data protection, according to the Law on data protection. During 2010 and 2011, data were registered and included in a unique data base. The registration process continued to be opened for each Roma returnee family or other Roma who missed the chance to be registered. Local social welfare centres have led the registration process and they were delivered technical equipment (computers) in order to establish their database. In total about 17,000 Roma were registered during that process.
Taking into consideration that not all Roma registered and that some were absent, authorities estimate the real number of Roma living in Bosnia and Herzegovina to be between 30,000 and 40,000 (close to 1% of the total population). Other sources estimate that the Roma population in Bosnia and Herzegovina could be around 76,000 persons (almost 2% of the total population)24.
Situation of Roma in the field of education
Primary education is compulsory, whilst pre-school education is not. Collected data indicate an upward trend in the enrolment of Roma children in primary schools. Interestingly, there are no differences in the enrolment of boys and girls. In the school year 2013/14, a total of 2,078 Roma children were enrolled in primary schools. According to the annual report, 64 Roma children dropped out of school (3.07%), which is considered a significant improvement compared to previous years.
During the school year 2013/1425, 51 Roma children were enrolled in secondary school, and 29 Roma pupils completed this level of education in the same year. That same year, a total of 92 Roma pupils attended secondary education with no significant differences between Roma girls and boys. One Roma student dropped out of secondary school. There are Roma students at universities and many of them finish their high level education.
Situation of Roma on the labour market
Data on the employment of Roma are largely missing. The Roma employment rate is 16% lower than for other groups, and estimated to be significantly lower (30%) for Romani women. The rate of Roma without any employment experience is also significantly higher (21%) than for others. The gap in the unemployment rate between Roma and the total population seems however to decrease26.
24 See PowerPoint presentation of Hilswerk International Austria, delivered at the CAHROM thematic visit on social housing for Roma held in Skopje, “the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia”, in April 2012.
25 Statistics for the school year 2014/2015 are still not available.
26 Pp 16, 33 and 34 of the 2015 Roma Decade Inclusion Index: http://www.romadecade.org/cms/upload/file/9810_file1_roma- inclusion-index-2015-s.pdf.
CAHROM (2016)8
   14

Challenges regarding employment and education, including vocational education and training
Roma is not only the biggest but also the most vulnerable minority among the 17 national minorities in Bosnia and Herzegovina. The governmental Roma Strategy and Action Plan indicate that 19,500 Roma persons, or 4,500 Roma households, require some type of assistance.
Roma are disproportionally affected by the lack of access to employment, both in public and the private sector. One of the major obstacles in access to public services, among others the registration on unemployment offices, is the lack of documents. The lack of documents can be also a serious barrier in vocational training27. Not many Roma in Bosnia and Herzegovina are in fact interested to apply to vocational education and training despite the adoption of a Strategy for Vocational Education and Training in 2007.
The main difficulties to employ Roma have been so far their lack of education. Other problems identified by employment agencies for the employment of Roma have been listed as follows:
 low qualification of registered unemployed Roma;
 lack of knowledge to manage self-employment projects;
 lack of interest of employers to employ Roma;
 lack of coordination with local authorities in order to help Roma to enter own business;
 lack of support regarding registration of business or issuance of permissions;
 lack of good communication and coordination in order to follow-up the realization of projects
for those Roma that were employed (number of permanently employed Roma after a project expired, communication with employers, etc.).
Pre-school education has been recognized as extremely important for the subsequent development and progress of each individual. However, the conditions under which children of that age are educated are not equally stimulating and motivating for all children, particularly those who belong to marginalized groups, such as Roma children. Since authorities do not have general information on the total number of Roma children of pre-school age due to administrative and data collection barriers, information on the number of Roma children enrolled in pre-school programmes cannot be expressed in percentages, but only numerically collected.
Despite an increasing education budget for education within the Revised Action Plan (RAP) on Roma Educational Needs of Bosnia and Herzegovina, there are still not enough funds to meet the needs of all Roma children to achieve full equality in access to education. Despite significant progress, the goals set in the RAP for education are far to be fully achieved.
2.3 Finland
Size and composition of the Roma community
According to official estimates, the Finnish Roma (called Kaale) living in Finland are 10,000 to 12,00028, i.e. about 0.20% of the total population. As highlighted in the Finnish Roma History Book, Finnish Roma settled on the territory of Finland 500 years ago.
27 See ECRI Report on Bosnia and Herzegovina (fourth monitoring cycle), published in 2011. 28 About 3,000 Finnish Roma (Kaale) live in Sweden.
CAHROM (2016)8
 15

The mother tongue of Roma is mainly Finnish but Kaale (Finnish Romani variant) and Swedish are also spoken. The Finnish Roma belong to the Lutheran religion or free sects.
Finnish Roma are spread in different regions but are predominantly present in the southern part of the country. Finnish Roma are more present in certain cities, including the capital Helsinki (with about 5,000 Roma, i.e. almost half of the total Roma population). In the municipality of Kajaani, located in north-east of Finland and from where the Finnish experts of the thematic group were coming from, live 120 Roma.
All Finnish Roma are Finnish citizens and their position is secured in the Constitution. Finnish Roma constitute a rather homogeneous community. However, this might change since during recent years an increasing number of Roma have arrived in Finland, particularly from Bulgaria, Romania and Estonia. The number of Roma migrants is unknown but 50 to 100 are estimated to stay permanently in Finland.
Situation of Roma in the field of education
While an increasing share of Roma pupils are doing well in basic education, one out of five of all Roma pupils (i.e. 20%) continue to have significant problems in their school attendance and do not complete compulsory school education. Starting independent life and a family at a young age, as well as a lack of information and support, discourage them from pursuing further studies and studying for a vocation. This has a direct negative impact on their position in the labour market.
Only 50% of those Finnish Roma pupils who complete compulsory basic education (80%) are seeking further education (46% are girls and 54% are boys). Almost all of them (95%) enter vocational secondary education, whilst 5 % choose general upper secondary schools29. Roma pupils thus need more support than others in moving on to secondary level studies. Young Finnish Roma people recognise the necessity of vocational studies which would improve their quality of life and well-being. Nevertheless, still today, girls’ lives are aimed at finding the spouse of their dreams and starting a family of their own. Girls experience that further education prevents moving on and discover the world which is the only way to find a partner unless there are any suitable candidates in their hometown.30
Situation of Roma on the labour market
Another major obstacle preventing Roma from accessing the labour market is discrimination and negative attitudes. A study on Roma employment conducted in companies in 2008 showed that many employers are reluctant to recruit Roma even when they have the requisite qualifications for the job, which would also explain why unemployment in this community stands at 40%. Although local employment agencies are required by law to recruit someone to assist Roma with job seeking, only five persons are currently employed in this capacity, in the south of the country31. According to the above 2008 study, it was estimated that the educational background of 70% of the unemployed Roma job- seekers consisted of comprehensive school only, and 60% of the job-seekers lacked vocational qualifications of any kind. Employers highlighted the above as major obstacles for Roma employment.
29 See pages 6 and 25 of CAHROM (2013)5 Thematic report on school attendance of Roma children, in particular Roma girls, available at http://www.coe.int/en/web/portal/cahrom.
30 Ibid, page 14.
31 See ECRI report on Finland (fourth monitoring cycle), published in 2013.
CAHROM (2016)8
  16

Challenges regarding employment and education, including vocational education and training32
Although significant progress has been achieved in some of the areas covered by the National Policy for Roma, in particular education, local-level implementation is still a challenge. Particular challenges have been identified in the fields of employment and adult education for the Roma. The general situation of young Roma still raises a number of concerns, including in relation to education and employment. Due to the life cycle of the Roma population – reaching adulthood and starting a family early on – they only seek access to vocational education and training and the labour market relatively late in life. Accordingly, vocational education and training aimed at the adult population and the development of its educational structure is essential for the Roma population.
No comprehensive data however exist on the participation in vocational education and training of Roma adults. The National Board of Education has conducted a study on the Adult education of the Roma. The results of this study will be published towards the end of 201533. The lack of vocational education and training has been usually identified as one of the main obstacles preventing Roma from gaining access to the labour market. According to the up-dated information the Roma in Finland have achieved vocational diplomas but it has not opened doors into the labour market.
2.4 “The former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia”
Size and composition of the Roma community
According to the 2002 population census, the number of self-declared Roma is 53,879, i.e. 2.6% of the total population34. Estimates of the Roma population provided by NGOs and researchers vary from 80,000 to 260,000. The estimated figure used by the authorities is 150,000 (Egyptians excluded), i.e. 7.5% of the total population. The country is also home to nearly 1,700 refugees, mostly Roma, who fled their homes as a result of the 1999 conflict in Kosovo*35. Most of these persons are living in the municipality of Šuto Orizari in Skopje, Europe's first “Roma municipality” (i.e. led by a Roma mayor) and the only one in the world where the Romani language has been granted an official status. Roma do not concentrate in a particular region of the country, but are instead spread all over the territory. According to the 2002 population census, 27 municipalities have a share of Roma exceeding 1%; 10 of them have a share of Roma exceeding 4%. Ethnic differences are less relevant than the way of life, costume and appearance that the members of this group share. Most Roma speak Romani as their first language; others speak Albanian, Macedonian or Turkish pending on the surrounding population and regions where they are located. Most of them are Muslim, although some of them practise other religions too.
Situation of Roma in the field of education
There is among Roma children a lower attendance rate, as well as higher drop-out rates than in the non- Roma population. The problem of low enrolment is particularly critical in pre-school education which is of utmost importance for the further education of children, especially regarding the learning of the national language used in school.
32 See also under sub-chapter 3.3 of this report the conclusions and recommendations of the first monitoring report of the National Policy for Roma as regards vocational education and training.
33 One of the Finnish experts presented some of these results during the thematic visit.
34 In addition, 3,843 declared to be Egyptians.
35 All reference to Kosovo, whether to the territory, institutions or population, in this text shall be understood in full compliance with United Nations Security Council Resolution 1244 and without prejudice to the status of Kosovo.
CAHROM (2016)8
 17

There are several studies that indicate that the enrolment of Roma children in all levels of education is 20 to 30% lower than among non-Roma, and the drop-out rate of children is two times higher among Roma, in comparison to non-Roma children. Some of the positive measures aimed at promoting the inclusion of Roma in mainstream education have however brought results, such as a reduction of the drop-out rate between fifth and sixth grade among girls and the doubling of Roma enrolment in public universities in the past seven years (from 150 in 2005 to 300 in 2012).
The drop-out rate of Roma children is high. It is due to health problems because of bad weather conditions and outbreaks but also because of the lack of awareness among some Roma parents about the importance for their children to attend school. Poor socio-economic condition of the community also plays an important role: education is less a priority for parents and children are taken out from school to help their families. Child begging is a widespread problem which affects Roma pupils’ attendance at school.
Total number of Roma pupils attending schools and universities in 2015
According to several conducted studies on the educational status/needs of the Roma, few reasons have been stated as factors for the low educational status of the Roma:
 Low socio-economic status of the Roma population;
 High percentage of Roma children which are not enrolled in pre-school education;
 Low level of knowledge of the Macedonian language when entering primary education, thus
causing difficulties for Roma children to fully understanding the programme;
 Low awareness of Roma parents regarding the importance of education of their children.
The lack of personal identity document can also be an issue though birth certificates are no longer required to enrol children in public elementary schools36.
36 Source: CommDH(2013)4 Report by Nils Muižnieks, Council of Europe Commissioner for Human Rights, following his visit to “the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia”, from 26 to 29 November 2012.
CAHROM (2016)8
  Number of Roma pupils in FYROM, 2015
300
650
 800
9500
pre-school primary secondary academic
 18

The 2011 UNDP/WB/EC regional Roma survey revealed disproportionate literacy levels between Romani communities and the general population, with around 17% of adult Roma being illiterate. The literacy gap among adult Roma and non-Roma is 13 percentage points, while this gap is even bigger among Romani and non-Romani women (20 percentage points).
Situation of Roma on the labour market
Official data from March 2014 indicate that 2% of all unemployed persons are Roma (based on official statistic of people actively searching for a job). Data from 2011 provided insight into the educational profile of the unemployed Roma: 88% had complete or incomplete primary education, 4.14% had complete or incomplete secondary education and only 0.2% had completed tertiary education37.
Based on information available, the total number of Roma persons registered in the Agency for Employment is 6,110 (2,071 are Roma women).Those with elementary school count for 5,413 (including 1,959 Roma women); those with uncompleted secondary education are 297 (52 women); those with completed secondary education are 367 (including 144 women) and only 29 (15 of them being women) have a university degree. The total number of employed Roma in public and national sector is 1,600.
Challenges regarding employment and education, including vocational education and training
The educational and employment situation of the Roma minority – with a particularly high rate of unemployment, approx. 70 % according to several sources - is a cause for concern. Their low level of education (see graphic below) reduces not only their “employability” but also their capacity to participate in certain general employment schemes and projects38.
Educational level of unemployed Roma in 2015
37 Source: Employment Service Agency and Ministry of Labour and Social Policy”.
38 See ECRI Report on “the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia” (fourth monitoring cycle), published in 2010.
CAHROM (2016)8
   academic
seconadary
245 52
14 15 223
52
 men women
 uncompleted sec.
elemenary
3454 1959
         0 1000 2000 3000
4000 5000 6000
 19

One of the main problems identified in the field of education is the large percentage of Roma children who are not enrolled in pre-school education, partly due to the fact that pre-school education is not compulsory. Although there are activities that directly contribute to the inclusion of Roma children in pre- school education, the number of Roma children aged 0-6 years who are not covered by any form of pre- school education is still high. A project called «Inclusion of Roma children in pre-school education» is implemented in 18 municipalities by the Ministry of Labour and Social Policy and supported by the Roma Education Fund (REF). Main reasons for the low number of Roma children in kindergartens are:
 The fact that children speak Romani at home and have little knowledge of the Macedonian language. In 80% of the 18 municipalities targeted by the Roma Education Fund (REF)-supported project for Roma inclusion, Roma people mostly speak the Romani language. This contributes to a low level of knowledge of the Macedonian language among the Roma community. The curriculum according to which the educational process is carried out is mostly in Macedonian language, which is why the Roma students have problems with learning and understanding the educational programme.
 The low awareness of Roma families about the importance of enrolling their children in pre-school institutions. The parents still do not understand the importance and the need of inclusion of their children in pre-school education and up-bringing have some percentage of children who did not succeed in completing the pre-school educational process.
 Financial problem for the parents due to the fact that pre-school education being not compulsory, it is not free of charge (it costs 25 Euros per child per month).
 Low capacities and poor conditions in the kindergartens, etc.
In the academic year 2009/2010, 20,317 children (of all nationalities) aged 0-6 years were enrolled in 52 kindergartens; 454 or 2.23% of them were Roma children. In the academic year 2010/2011, there were 23,503 children (of all nationalities); 551 or 2.34% of them were Roma children. In the academic year 2011/2012, there were 25,200 children (of all nationalities); about 600 or 2.38 % of them were Roma children. The above suggests that the percentage of inclusion of Roma children in pre-school education has slowly increased thanks in particular to the project “Inclusion of Roma children in public pre-school institutions” jointly conducted by the Roma Education Fund (REF) and the Ministry of Labour and Social Policy between 2009 and 2012 and to the implementation of the project A Good Start (AGS)39 in four Macedonian localities. Despite these efforts, the percentage of inclusion of Roma children in pre-school education remains particularly low.40
Despite the increase of enrolment, attendance rates of the Roma children in day-care programmes remain much lower than the rest of the population. The main reason is the high monthly fee for public kindergarten (€.25 while most of the families live below the poverty line of €.94 monthly income). Primary education and, since the 2008–2009 academic year, secondary education is compulsory in the country. Yet enforcement is weak, in large part because families living in poverty are not able to pay cash penalties from €.400 to 700. Only one out of ten Roma children complete the primary school cycle, approximately half as high as among Macedonian citizens. Moreover, it appears that only a fifth of Roma children attend the secondary cycle.
39 A Good Start was funded by the European Union. Explicit but non-exclusive in its targeting, the project currently helps more than 4,000 Roma and non-Roma children from ages zero to six to access early childhood education and care (ECEC) services. With a mandate until June 2012, it operated in a total of 16 locations in Hungary, Romania, Slovakia and in the «the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia». Coordinated by the Roma Education Fund (REF), its three international partners were the International Step By Step Association (ISSA), Fundacíon Secretariado Gitano, the Slovak Governance Institute, and 12 local implementing partners.
40 Source: “Inclusion of Roma Children in Public Pre-school Institutions” project, Ministry of Labour and Social Policy.
CAHROM (2016)8
 20

2.5 Turkey
Size and composition of the Roma community
Although Turkey’s population consists of a lot of ethnic majorities and minorities, there is no official record of the number of any ethnic group since the Republic of Turkey citizenship is not based on ethnicity. Turkish authorities estimate the total number of Roma in Turkey to be between 500,000 and 2.5 million41. Several NGOs, including Istanbul-based Zero Discrimination association and the European Roma and Travellers Forum (ERTF), indicate 3 to 5 million42. Researchers working in the ERRC/HYD/EDROM Research covering cities in seven regions of Turkey, mention 4.5 to 5 million43.
In Turkey, there are four main Roma groups: Roma, Lom, Dom and Abdal. Roma live mostly in Aegean Region, Lom live in the Black Sea Region, Dom live in Eastern and South-Eastern Anatolia, while Abdal live in Central and South-Eastern Anatolia. Most of these groups have similar living standards.
Situation of Roma in the field of education
Despite the lack of any actual data, it is estimated - according to studies conducted by some public institutions and NGOs - that the educational level of Roma people is lower than the national average in Turkey. The education level of Lom people seems to be higher compared with the other Roma groups. Besides, school abandonment and non-attendance ratios of Roma children and youth are significant. Their attitude towards education at early ages results with lower educational level which leads to difficulties in their adulthood, such as social exclusion and unemployment. The schooling rate for Roma is also reportedly low, due to problems of accessibility, financial difficulties, intensified by the forced eviction cases44.
Situation of Roma on the labour market
Roma people usually work at unskilled and/or temporary jobs due to their low level of education. They also accept to work for lower salaries and without social protection. Some Roma people in Turkey are traditionally inclined to make their living on handcrafts. However, the market for these goods is limited and they provide income just enough to cover daily needs.
Challenges regarding employment and education, including vocational education and training
According to studies conducted by some Roma NGOs which exist in Turkey since early 2000s, Roma people in Turkey live in conditions less than ideal. Considering observations of some public institutions and assumptions of NGOs, Roma people live in poverty, work at temporary jobs, have limited access to education and live in unfit dwelling compared to the general population. They also have a perception of discrimination, according to those studies. However, there is no statistical data concerning the depth and width of the social exclusion towards Roma.
41 Estimate d figure provided by the Turkish Ministry of Family and Social Policy at the 6th CAHROM meeting (Rome, Italy, 28-31 October 2013).
42 See Appendix 5 of CAHROM (2011)25 Meeting report of the 2nd CAHROM meeting, Istanbul, Turkey, 22-25 November 2011, available at http://www.coe.int/en/web/portal/cahrom, as well as ERTF factsheet on Turkey available at https://www.ertf.org/images/Reports/The_situation_of_Roma_in_Turkey_17062015.pdf.
43 http://www.hyd.org.tr/staticfiles/files/biz_buraday%C4%B1z__turkiye’de_romanlar-1.pdf. 44 See ECRI Report on Turkey (fourth monitoring cycle), published in 2011.
CAHROM (2016)8
    21

There are difficulties to implement special employment policies for the Roma people due to lack of valid and reliable data. Nevertheless there are incentives for employers encouraging them to employ more people based on the categories of age, gender, vocational educational background, disabilities etc. Jobseekers among Roma people can benefit from these incentives individually if he/she matches with any of the corresponding categories.
Challenges faced by Roma have been recognized by the Government for the first time in 2009, and a dialogue with Roma has been initiated and embraced by the Prime Minister and Secretary of State at the time.
CAHROM (2016)8
22

III. LEGISLATION, POLICY MEASURES AND PROJECTS, INCLUDING VOCATIONAL TRAINING, AT NATIONAL AND LOCAL LEVELS
3.1 Poland
Roma policy framework
Poland has gained experience on professional activation during three successive governmental programmes aimed at the integration of the Roma community in Poland:
 The Pilot government programme for the Roma community in the Małopolska Province for the years 2001-2003;
 The Programme for the Roma community in Poland in the period 2004-2013;
 The Programme for the integration of the Roma community in Poland in the years 2014-2020;
All these programmes have a comprehensive character with several intervention areas, including education, housing and social situation, health, labour market, anti-discrimination and security, culture, promotion of Roma culture and civic education of Roma (education with cultural, historical and civic component). Some lessons have been drawn from the implementation of these programmes (see General conclusions).
Coordination, monitoring and participation of Roma
There are approximately 120 Roma non-governmental organisations registered in Poland, declaring themselves as Roma minority organisations, 50 of them are active in the implementation of the national programme for the integration of Roma.
Two representatives of the Roma community are present in the Joint Commission between the Government and National and Ethnic Minorities, established by the Act of 6 January 2005 on National and Ethnic Minorities and Regional Languages.
Making use of the institutional opportunity to establish a permanent panel of this Commission, a Roma Team, consisting of 20 representatives of Roma origin, was established in 2008. It acts as a forum of exchange of information on matters relating to the Roma ethnic minority, and serves an advisory body whose aim should be to develop proposals for actions aiming at improving the situation of Roma in Poland.
Educational policy and measures
The Act on the Education System provides the general framework for education in Poland. It was amended in 2011 so as to reactivate vocational education (see below).
Legislation changes which facilitate gaining a professional education, supplementing skills and training in a new occupation define the following types of secondary schools:
 a three-year vocational school, which enable pupils to obtain a vocational qualifications diploma after passing the examinations of qualification in the profession and further education starting from the second class of secondary school for adults;
 three years of high school, which enable pupils to obtain leaving certificate after passing the matriculation examination;
CAHROM (2016)8
23

 four-year secondary technical schools, which enable pupils to obtain a diploma of vocational qualifications after passing the examinations of qualifications in a given profession, as well as obtaining the certificate of maturity after passing the matriculation examination;
 post-secondary schools for the period teaching no more than 2.5 years to obtain a higher vocational qualifications diploma after passing the examinations of qualifications in a given profession;
 a three-year special school preparing for employment for students with disabilities (mild, moderate, severe or conjugate disabilities), which enable pupils to obtain a certificate of adoption for work.
Vocational education and training
In the 1990s vocational schools disappeared in favour of other types of schools but afterwards people realised that there was a lack on the labour market of skills which used to be provided by vocational schools. So vocational education was reintroduced and is of the responsibility of local governments (the Powiats, equivalent to French “departments”).
Following amendments the Act on the education system in 2011, vocational education has been reactivated in Poland since 201245. The main objective of the changes introduced in 2012 in vocational education and training (VET) was to improve its quality. The results are expected to be:
 Better preparation of graduates of vocational schools to enter the labour market,  Increasing interest in vocational education among high school students,
 Building public confidence in vocational training.
The new VET model is based on a flexible learning pathway with several options:
- Either a three-year basic vocational school (with a theoretical and practical examination to
obtain a certificate);
- A four-year technical vocational school which combines a vocational diploma equivalent of an A
level allowing the student to enter university or post-secondary technical vocational schools.
There are no entrance exams. The core curriculum is common for the basic and technical vocational schools (four common subjects plus a fifth one for technical vocational schools). A minimum of 50% of class hours must be practical oriented. Students in technical vocational education are doing a minimum of four weeks practical training in an enterprise and can enter school workshops, laboratories or centres for practical training. 60% of the students following basic vocational education also decide to be employed by an enterprise. Roma students in vocational education get support from Roma assistants.
The classification of occupations for vocational education46 has been aligned with the International Standard Classification of Occupations to the names of professions and their digital symbols. It is the primary source of information when planning vocational training. The classification of vocational education is of paramount importance to vocational training because it specifies:
 a list of occupations that can be used in vocational education47;
 types of secondary schools, where learning can take place in a given profession;
45 The main legislation describing the changes is the Act of 19 August 2011 amending the Act on the education system and some other acts (Dz. U. 2011 No. 205 item 1206).
46 Ordinance of the Minister of National Education of 23 December 2011 on the classification of vocational education occupations (Dz. U. of 2012 item. 7).
47 For example gardener, pastry chef, cook, hairdresser, etc.)
CAHROM (2016)8
 24

 qualifications extracted in the competition;
 order in which qualifications should be carried out in the curricula for proficiencies;
 qualifications for which training can be carried out on qualification vocational courses.
The information contained in Classification of occupations for vocational education is the starting point for the development and all the programming work offered by the schools.
From 2013 students of schools providing vocational training courses, according to the new core curriculum of vocational education, proceed to the qualification examination in the profession under the new rules:
 source of examination requirements is a core curriculum for vocational education;
 during the examination students may acknowledge the achievement of learning outcomes
specific to a single qualification separated in the profession;
 extramural exams are possible as a form of skills accreditation;
 professional exam consists of two parts: a written part (consists of 40 multiple-choice tasks, with
the use of computer, it takes 60 minutes) and the practical part (practical exams, it takes 120-
240 minutes - practical task with the use of appropriate tools);
 after passing both parts of the examination students receive a certificate for one qualification;
 after passing exams for all qualifications distinguished in the profession and obtaining adequate
level of education examinee receives a diploma confirming vocational qualifications.
Employment policy and measures
Activities related to planned education and careers are designed to assist students in making educational and career decisions, using active methods of work. Classes can be led by teachers, educational group tutors and specialists, including career counsellors. A few career counsellors are of Roma ethnic origin (one of them was present at the round table). The Governmental Roma integration Programme also provides funding for Roma women (48 as teachers’ assistants; 55 as community rooms and children clubs for extra-curricular activities.
The tasks guidance of a counsellor in a secondary school who provides vocational training is:
 Systematic diagnosis of students’ needs on educational, vocational and career path;
 Collecting, updating and sharing educational and career-specific information for relevant level of
education;
 Conducting activities related to the planning of education and career;
 Coordination of information and advisory activities conducted by the school;
 Cooperation with other teachers in ensuring sustainability of the advisory activity;
 Providing support for teachers, educators and educational group tutors.
Social cooperatives48 are entities – based on voluntary association of unlimited number of people, with variable composition and variable share fund which, in the interest of its members - established to activate the people with a special situation on the labour market (unemployed, refugees, disabled, mentally ill, ex-prisoners, etc.). There is in Poland a comprehensive system of support for social cooperatives (subsidies, lower income taxation, reimbursement of some costs, exemption of fees for court registration, etc.).
48 Social cooperatives are regulated by 27 April 2006 Act on Social Cooperatives and 13 June 2003 Act on Social Employment.
CAHROM (2016)8
 25

Social cooperatives are an interesting concept of activation of Roma in Poland because it can serve also as of social activation through the possibilities of organising outdoor events together with the local community. It also attractive for refugees, light mentally-disabled persons, former prisoners, former addicted persons, etc. Other categories can be members of social cooperatives provided that they do not exceed 50% of the total number of cooperative founders. Social cooperatives can receive support from volunteers in accordance with the legislation for volunteers.
Social cooperatives are monitored every three years. Controls do not impose any fines but recommendations for better management of the cooperative. Four so-called Roma social cooperatives (essentially run by Roma) existed some years ago but they all stopped after three years because inter alia they could no longer be supported by European Structural Funds. The Governmental “Programme for integration the Roma community in Poland for the years 2014-2020” is an instrument supporting the initiatives focusing on professional activation of Roma – like, for example, the Roma social cooperatives. In Małopolska region there is still one Roma man working for a social cooperative run by others.
The scope of the social cooperative is to carry out a joint enterprise based on personal work of its members. Social cooperatives can lead social, educational and cultural activities to the benefit of its members and of the local community. A Social cooperative aims at:
 The social reintegration of its members involving the implementation of measures aimed at restoring and maintaining skills for participation in community and social roles in the workplace, residence or domicile;
 The professional reintegration of its members involving the implementation of measures aimed at restoring and maintaining the ability to independently perform work on the labour market.
Employment component of ESF 2007-2013 in Poland: The main project financed from ESF was to ensure the increase in employment, education, social inclusion and health of members of the Roma community. The number of Roma who have completed participation in the projects was 8,762 people (4,635 women and 4,127-men). The outcomes included inter alia:
3.2
   
Training and vocational courses: 3,126 people (35.67% of the total number of participants); Course in formal and informal education: 4,277 people (48.81%); Internships/apprenticeships: 549 people (6.26%);
Getting employed/setting up a business: 421 people (4.80%).
Bosnia and Herzegovina
Roma policy framework and funding
The Ministry for Human Rights and Refugees of Bosnia and Herzegovina leads and coordinates all
activities related to the integration of Roma. The Human Rights Department of the Ministry is responsible for providing professional, administrative and operational support and for monitoring, promoting and protecting the rights of Roma. At the initiative of the Ministry for Human Rights and Refugees of Bosnia and Herzegovina, the Council of Ministers of Bosnia and Herzegovina adopted the following Roma policy documents:
 In 2005, the Strategy of Bosnia and Herzegovina for Roma;
 In 2005, the Action Plan on Roma Education;
 On 3 July 2008, the Action Plan of Bosnia and Herzegovina on Roma Issues in the Fields of Roma
Employment, Housing and Health Care;
 In July 2010, the Revised Action Plan on Roma Educational Needs of Bosnia and Herzegovina.
CAHROM (2016)8
26

The basis for the adoption of all these Roma-related documents is the Law on the Protection of Minorities in Bosnia and Herzegovina adopted in 2003.
Every year since 2009, the Ministry of Human Rights and Refugees of Bosnia and Herzegovina and the Council of Ministers of Bosnia and Herzegovina have allocated funds at the state level amounting to 1.5 million Euros in order to fund the implementation of the Roma Action Plan. These funds are increased through a system of co-funding by other ministries and implementing partners, particularly in the field of Roma housing, which has been the main priority. The funds are also increased with donations from international organisations that co-fund activities. Most municipalities allocate funds at the local level to improve the living conditions of Roma and invest their funds in infrastructure projects.
The Ministry of Human Rights and Refugees of Bosnia and Herzegovina regularly applies for IPA funds from the European Commission. The European Commission approved the 5 million Euros IPA project and the implementation of the first stage amounting to 2.5 million Euros began in the second half of 2013. Most of these funds, i.e. 80%, are devoted to Roma housing and the improvement of living conditions. Funds planning will continue regularly on a yearly basis. All funds are used solely to improve the inclusion of Roma in society, by providing better living conditions. These funds are also used to award small grants for employment and for improving health care and education.
Coordination, monitoring and participation of Roma
The Roma Board, an advisory body of the Council of Ministers, is responsible for systematic monitoring of the implementation of the Action Plan, the adoption of new action plans and proposing measures for improving the situation of Roma, as well as for initiating the provision of budgetary resources for Roma and the like. Monitoring is done on the ground in different directions by several actors. Independent monitoring is performed by Roma representatives and independent experts, experts in particular areas coming from local and national institutions and others. A Roma Thematic Group (RTG), consisting of all relevant institutions, international organisations and Roma umbrella NGOs, deals with and shares information about Roma activities to provide a better planning and avoid overlapping of activities.
Roma are present in 64 municipalities in the whole Bosnia and Herzegovina, and, at the moment, there are about 107 Roma associations officially registered, but only 10% of them are active. The Ministry of Human Rights and Refugees has involved many Roma in fieldwork at local level, particularly in the selection of beneficiaries of housing. In this way, massive participation of Roma representatives in the decision-making process was ensured. Every year, the Ministry for Human Rights and Refugees organises several referral meetings with Roma representatives and local authorities in order to better coordinate activities. Representatives of Roma and Roma NGOs take therefore an active part in the process
Educational policy and measures
Bosnia and Herzegovina has 12 ministries of education and one Department of Education in the Brčko District. All of them are involved in the implementation of the Revised Action Plan (RAP) of Roma Educational Needs of Bosnia and Herzegovina adopted by the Council of Ministers in July 2010. Responsibility for the implementation of educational policies is determined by the Constitution of Bosnia and Herzegovina, the constitutions of the entities and cantons and the Statute of the Brčko District, whilst development of educational policy is the responsibility of the lower levels of government, such as entities:
CAHROM (2016)8
27

a) The Federation of Bosnia and Herzegovina, where education is a decentralized system in ten cantons. The Federation Ministry of Education and Science has a coordinating role in planning and implementation of activities related to education policy in the Federation. Cantonal ministries of education are responsible for designing educational policies, including the enactment of legislation on education and the provision of education in each canton individually;
b) In the Republika Srpska, the educational system is centralized;
c) The Brčko District has its own educational system.
Education in Bosnia and Herzegovina is regulated by the framework of laws of Bosnia and Herzegovina, laws at the entity level in Republika Srpska, cantonal laws of the Federation of Bosnia and Herzegovina and the Law of Brčko District governing pre-school, primary, secondary and higher education. In Bosnia and Herzegovina, there is no segregation of Roma in pre-school, primary and other education levels. The educational system is based on inclusive education. In the school year 2013/2014, 23 Roma students attended special educational institutions but these were really children with special educational needs49.
In 2011, the Minister of Human Rights and Refugees took the decision to appoint a team of experts who prepare for each school year a report on the implementation of the RAP and Roma educational needs and submit it to the Council of Ministers of Bosnia and Herzegovina. Up to now, three such reports have been produced.
Education and upbringing of Roma children carry certain specificities and there is a need to train teachers, but also parents and students in this respect. There are regular training courses for teachers, parents and children in primary schools.
During the school year 2013/2014, an emphasis was placed on education of Roma parents for the compulsory primary education of their children, the importance of programmes related to early childhood growth and development, training of teachers, parents and students, to raise their awareness on human rights, the rights of the child, as well as on stereotypes and discrimination against Roma in the field of education and ways to overcome them. During that period,
 194 meetings with parents of Roma children were held in order to inform them that primary education was compulsory. Developing awareness of the role and importance of education among the Roma population is of great importance given that education traditionally does not define one’s social status within the Roma community;
 37 meetings with Roma communities and activists were held in order to train them in the importance of programmes related to early child development;
 24 thematic lectures were held for parents in Roma communities;
 85 training courses of teachers, parents and children in primary schools were held in order to
raise awareness of human rights and rights of the child, involving 400 teachers, 4,328 children
and 1,123 parents;
 39 training courses on stereotypes and discrimination against Roma in the field of education and
ways to overcome them, involving 269 teachers, 1,817 students and 948 parents.
49 Before the adoption of the Revised Action Plan of Bosnia and Herzegovina on the Educational Needs of Roma in 2010, there was an upward trend of enrolment of Roma children in special educational institutions, at the request of Roma parents, even when they were not children with disabilities in order to be provided with a full day care and food and "to be removed" from the street.
CAHROM (2016)8
 28

The inclusion of children, Roma children in particular, in formal pre-school education is also increasingly becoming a priority target. Attending pre-school programme in the year before going to primary school has recently become obligatory50.
Incentive and supporting measures are being taken by educational authorities and local communities in Bosnia and Herzegovina, pending financial means available, to advance the regular attendance of Roma children in primary school. These incentives took different forms such as:
 Individual counselling work with Roma children and their parents;
 Parent-teacher meetings;
 The inclusion of an expert team consisting of educators and psychologists in addition to social
and health workers;
 Assistance in providing school supplies and textbooks, clothing and footwear;  Provision of free school meals, free textbooks, and free transport.
o Free textbooks for Roma children in primary school were provided to 1,295 students, i.e. to 62.32% of the total number of Roma pupils enrolled during the school year 2013/14. Textbooks were provided mainly through the financial support from respective (entity, cantonal) ministry, municipality or city.
o Free transport was provided to 147 Roma students in primary school (free transport is generally provided throughout Bosnia and Herzegovina to primary school children if their place of residence is more than 2km/4km far from the school they attend).
o Free snacks at school were provided to 749 Roma students, i.e. to 36.04% of the total number of Roma students.
Incentive and supportive measures in secondary school include scholarships. In total, 99 Roma students enrolled in secondary schools, received scholarships, with equal gender distribution, from the institutions’ budget, including eight Roma students during the school year 2013/14. The total budgetary funds allocated to Roma students in school year 2013/14 were BAM 117,959.15.
Relevant ministries and local municipalities of Bosnia and Herzegovina allocate budgetary funds to support enrolment, attendance and graduation of all Roma children, which have increased from a school-year to another, although there are still not enough funds to meet the needs of all Roma children to achieve full equality in access to education. Authorities reckon consider that there has been a significant progress, but the goals set in the RAP are far to be fully achieved.
A significant contribution in the education area was given by the Increasing Early Learning Opportunities for Children in Bosnia and Herzegovina Project, implemented by UNICEF in co-operation with Dubai Cares Foundation. The target groups are marginalized children, including Roma children. Examples of good practices of the mentioned project were noted in the municipalities of Bijeljina and Živinice where a large number of Roma resides.
Vocational education and training
In order to support the Roma population and other vulnerable groups, authorities of Bosnia and Herzegovina adopted a Strategy for vocational education and training in 2007.
50 See the Law on Pre-school Education, BiH Official Gazette 88/07.
CAHROM (2016)8
 29

The Council of Ministers of Bosnia and Herzegovina also adopted a Framework Law on Secondary Education and Training in 2008. There have been many vocational training organised by various Education Centres; some Roma have been included and got employment, but generally-speaking few Roma apply to vocational training.
In addition, as the result of good cooperation established by the Ministry for Human Rights and Refugees of Bosnia and Herzegovina with international organisations, a number of sponsored vocational training programmes targeting Roma women were concluded, such as:
 Roma women’s education through two major Care International Balkans projects;
 Roma women’s political participation covering up to 50 Balkan Roma women (Bosnia and Herzegovina, Croatia and Serbia) who were educated for political participation in following skills:
- Political marketing and presentation;
- Campaigning;
- Participation in governmental bodies.
 Women’s economic empowerment targeting 85 women from rural places, including 15 Roma women, who were education in the following business skills:
- Business management, business plan, and marketing (for all);
- Agriculture (for 40 women);
- Trade (for 10 women);
- Services, such as hairdresser, food production, tourism, consultancy (for 20 women);
- Production such as traditional cloth, honey production, etc. (15 women).
All Roma women were trained from 3-6 months and after that, they were allocated some funds to start their own business. They are still working and producing.
Education training programmes were implemented by BOSPO Agency in Bosnia and Herzegovina in coordination with the Ministry for Human Rights and Refugees.
The network of Roma women actively participates in programmes to improve the situation of Roma women and education of Roma children. 17 Roma women have undergone training proposed by the Council of Europe within the joint European Commission/Council of Europe ROMED programme.
Employment policy and measures
The Ministry for Human Rights and Refugees of Bosnia and Herzegovina designed the Action Plan for Roma in Employment, Housing and Health Care for the period 2013-2016, which was adopted by the Council of Ministers of Bosnia and Herzegovina on 11 December 2013. The earlier Action Plan and the new Revised Action Plan make the basis for the implementation of planned activities in accordance with the funds provided from the budget of Bosnia and Herzegovina and budgets of the entities, cantons and municipalities as well as from donor funds and EU funds (IPA).
On the basis of signed Memoranda of Understanding, funds for Roma employment are transferred from the state budget to the Federation Employment Institute, the Employment Institute of Republika Srpska and the Employment Bureau of the Brčko District, which are obliged to spend them on employment or self-employment of Roma. Every year these Institutes issue a public call for the selection of beneficiaries of Roma employment and self-employment projects. The beneficiaries are selected by commissions appointed by the Institutes which also include representatives of the Roma community.
CAHROM (2016)8
30

The Ministry for Human Rights and Refugees of Bosnia and Herzegovina allocates every year a certain amount for Roma employment (250,000-300,000 Euros) out of the total envelope for the implementation of the Action Plan for Roma in Employment, Housing and Health Care (1,422,000 Euros), i.e. about 19% for Roma employment and self-employment measures (in comparison, 80% of the budget goes for housing projects). About 475 Roma beneficiaries have been included in projects for employment and self-employment.
The Revised Action Plan takes into consideration the employment needs of Roma families who registered and set a realistic goal to give jobs to 4,700 Roma people. i.e. at least to one member of the Roma families that registered their needs. Until today,10.5% of persons have been employed in one way or another.
3.3 Finland
Roma policy framework
The Finnish Constitution guarantees the Roma the right to maintain and develop the language and the culture of their own. The right of the Roma to their language and culture was included in the Constitution in 2000.
The National Policy on Roma in Finland was adopted in 2009. It has six Key Areas and ten Policy Guidelines. It contains 147 measures, responsibility for which has been delegated to several branches of the administration. In 2012, the Ministry of Social Affairs and Health appointed a working group to coordinate and monitor the implementation of the National Policy on Roma.
The information contained in this first monitoring report is based on data obtained in 2013 from the ministries and other bodies responsible for implementing the policy, from municipalities in connection with a hearing for municipalities, and from the Roma, for example through a hearing for organisations. The report examines how the objectives of the National Policy on Roma have been achieved in the fields of employment, education, social and health care services, anti-discrimination measures and housing. It also explores how the programme has been implemented at the regional and the local level.
Coordination, monitoring and participation of Roma
In Finland the administrative structures for handling Romani affairs have been developed since 1956. The participation of the Roma in these structures has been enhanced since the late 1960s.
The National Advisory Board on Romani Affairs is a co-operation body for Roma and the authorities. The Advisory Board on Romani Affairs is linked to the Ministry of Social Affairs and Health. The legal basis of the Board lies on the Decree stated by the Government. The Advisory Board is appointed by the Government for three years at a time. At least half of the members must be Roma. The Advisory Board on Romani affairs has influenced the development of Finnish legislation and administration in matters regarding the rights and the equality of the Roma. As its initiative, a Roma Education Unit was created within the National Board of Education in 1994. Through its experts’ statements regarding the position and needs of the Roma addressed to authorities, parliamentary committees and other organisations, the Advisory Board on Romani Affairs has been able to influence the development of the equality and inclusion of the Finnish Roma. There has been a considerable increase in the development of co- operation structures between the Roma population and local authorities in recent years.
CAHROM (2016)8
31

In addition to the National Advisory Board on Romani Affairs, there are four Regional Advisory Boards on Romani Affairs covering the entire country which work in conjunction with the Regional State Administrative Agencies. The Regional Advisory Boards were settled by a Government Decree in 2003 and started functioning in 2004. The Regional Advisory Boards have reinforced the link and co-operation at the local level. The Advisory Boards on Romani Affairs have taken initiatives, including by supporting the establishment of Voluntary Local Roma Working Groups in various municipalities or regions51. In 2010 there were Roma working groups, either in operation or in the process of being established, in more than 20 Finnish municipalities. The Advisory Boards on Romani Affairs also organise hearings for municipalities and national seminars. One of the seminars of the Advisory Boards on Romani Affairs paid particular attention to the need for supporting the employment and education of Roma youth.
Educational policy and measures
The main key objectives in the Finnish National Policy on Roma as regards education are:
 Enhancing the participation of Roma children in early childhood and pre-primary education;
 Enhancing the social inclusion of Roma children and youth in basic education and upper
secondary education;
 Enhancing the participation in vocational education and training of adult Roma;
 Promoting the development of the Romani language and culture.
The Finnish National Board of Education (FNBE) is a national agency subordinated to the Ministry of Education and Culture. The FNBE has a wide range of tasks related to the development of education all through pre-primary and basic education, general and vocational upper secondary education and training, liberal adult education and basic education in the arts. The FNBE is responsible for drawing up the national core curricula.
The 2010-2011 Review of the Basic Education of Roma Pupils in Finland included these proposals52:
 Educational guidance should stress the importance of upper secondary school for further education and encourage Roma pupils who have done well at comprehensive school to go on to upper secondary level. Information should also be provided on the alternatives to daytime upper secondary school, such as upper secondary school for adults and taking upper secondary courses alongside vocational education;
 Preparatory education for general upper secondary school should also be aimed at Roma youth. Supplementary teaching should be utilised more in order to equip better the Roma youth for further education.
The first monitoring report of the National Policy for Roma came up with the following general conclusion: “the National Policy on Roma has raised awareness and improved the coordination of Roma issues nationally. The highest success rates have been seen in measures assigned to various ministries, and significant progress has been achieved, in particular in the educational sector”.
51 The Finnish Roma expert of the thematic group was a member of the Voluntary Local Roma Working Group of Kajaani.
52 See Proposal 9/11 of the 2010-2011 Review of the Basic Education of Roma Pupils in Finland entitled “Completion of basic education and seeking further education”.
CAHROM (2016)8
 32

Vocational education and training
As stated above, the National Policy on Roma includes, among others, a measure concerning
consolidation the vocational training received by adult Roma and integrating them into employment.
For the results of the first monitoring report of the National Policy for Roma concerning these specific measures, see the conclusions of this report.
Various education models that take into account the Roma population have been developed in projects partially funded by the European Social Fund. These models were developed to provide support for transitional stages in education in various projects, such as the Romako and Roti Projects, and to support the education and training of adult Roma, as in the EQUAL Community Initiative Programme funded by the European Society Fund. Educational projects aimed at the adult Roma population in particular have produced useful data on educational structures and teaching methods that take into account the needs of the Roma. These projects have also yielded viable educational models.
In the Roti Project, a support person was appointed for each group of students in vocational education and training aimed at Roma. This led to fewer drop-outs and helped the students in solving many problems in their personal lives, which often tend to have a negative effect on motivation or prevent the student from participating in education altogether.
The ROM-EQUAL Project (2004–2007) focused on the development of an education model for qualification-oriented vocational education and training for adult Roma. The essential components of the model were an extensive orientation phase preparing the students for vocational studies, competence-based vocational studies according to an individual study plan, and the alternation of theoretical studies and practical training. While studying, students were supported by a person familiar with Romani culture, whereas in practical training they were appointed a mentor in the workplace.
Helsinki Deaconess Institute and the Church Training College, which participated in the implementation of the ROM-EQUAL Project, established in 2009 the Tsétanes Training Centre, which focuses on the education and training of Roma. The Centre utilises an education model that takes into account the special needs of the Roma population in social welfare and health education and training.
Some projects were developed at municipal level, among them a Development project in Oulu municipality supporting Roma girl students in basic education53. This project includes a large variety of measures supporting Roma girls’ education, including visits to vocational institutions since in situ discussions and visits give a more realistic image and view of the content of different professions which help students to find suitable training for themselves.
In many Finnish municipalities, a lot of attention has been focused on guidance: Roma pupils have been supported in all transition phases of education, and in particular when moving on to vocational studies or general upper secondary schools. Roma households and schools nowadays work together particularly well, and over the long term, the outcome will hopefully be a higher standard of education for the Roma. Previous experience shows that various forms of co-operation are necessary and are vital in providing Roma families with more information about education and in developing studies guidance, mentoring and career guidance.
53 See page 14 of CAHROM (2013)5 Thematic report on school attendance of Roma children, in particular Roma girls, available at http://www.coe.int/en/web/portal/cahrom.
CAHROM (2016)8
  33

Employment policy and measures
In 2011, the Ministry of Employment and the Economy launched a research project to develop the system for monitoring discrimination in the employment sector and to measure this phenomenon in recruitment.
In 2012, a guide designed to promote Roma participation in the labour market was published.
Employment agencies are required by law to recruit someone to assist Roma with job seeking; only five persons are currently employed in this capacity, in the south of Finland.
3.4 “The former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia”
Roma policy framework
The Preamble of the Constitution explicitly recognizes Roma as an ethnic community. The same applies for the Ohrid Framework Agreement signed in 2001.
The National Strategy for Roma Inclusion (NRIS) is a policy document that was first adopted in 2005 and then reviewed in 2014 for a decade. A National Action Plan for Education was developed as part of this strategy.
Coordination, monitoring and participation of Roma
Approximately 1,600 Roma are employed in the public and national sectors.
Roma NGOs are very active and contribute to the implementation and monitoring of numerous projects. Roma, especially women, are also active as Roma school assistants and as Roma school and health mediators.
Educational policy and measures
According to the Law on Secondary Education (article 43, Official Gazette, No. 52/2002) there are four types of secondary schools in “the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia”: general schools (gymnasiums), vocational schools, secondary arts schools and secondary schools for pupils with special needs. In 2011, a majority of young people (about 60%) attended vocational education and training schools, although the share of pupils attending such schools has declined (it was 70% in 2001).
Besides the main legislation, education is also covered in several strategic documents and action plans from other areas of social life, such as the 2007 National Action Plan for Gender Equality, the Child Protection Programme, the 2009 Social Protection Programme, the National Strategy for Reduction of Poverty and Social Exclusion 2010-2020, the National Action Plan for Education for the Decade of Roma Inclusion (which emphasizes access of Roma population to scholarships and tutoring, and also calls for the legal obligation of supplementary instruction to be delivered), etc. However, most of these programmes do not make specific reference to vocational education as a potentially powerful tool for increasing social inclusion and cohesion (for instance, the Strategy for Reduction of Poverty and Social Exclusion).
CAHROM (2016)8
34

In 2010, the Government adopted a Strategy for Integrated Education which aims at reducing the distance between pupils from different ethnic backgrounds on the grounds that limited interaction between pupils from diverse ethnic minorities, limited knowledge about each other’s culture and language barriers might lead to the disintegration of society. The Strategy was prepared jointly by the Ministry of Education and Science and the OSCE High Commissioner on National Minorities (OSCE HCNM).Specific inclusive measures were developed for the Roma population.
The Directorate for Development and improvement of education in minority languages which is an independent body under the auspices of the MES has a special role in the implementation of the concept of integrated education. The Directorate implements several measures/activities directed towards promoting the inclusion of all ethnic communities in the education. It cooperates with several international donors, such as the Roma Education Fund-Budapest and UNICEF. One of the most significant activities of the Directorate is the project providing scholarships, mentoring and tutoring for Roma pupils in their 1st, 2nd, 3rd and 4th years of secondary education. The project has been in operation since 2009 (and was due to run until 2014) and is supported by the Roma Education Fund (REF). The project aims at increasing the progress and attainment of Roma pupils from all state and private secondary schools in “the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia”. So far, 600 pupils have been involved with the project, from 28 municipalities. The project was implemented in 3 phases:
 scholarships – financial support of 2,200 MKD for 9 months, for 400 secondary school pupils with an average grade of above 3.5, and 1,500 MKD for 200 pupils with average grade of 3.0-3.49. So far, 591 pupils have used the scholarships, 395 of whom fall into the first category of scholarship. This support comes on top of the CCT payment;
 mentoring – in the school year 2011/2012, a total of 133 teachers were involved in mentoring Roma pupils (not beneficiaries of the scholarships) from secondary schools. Each mentor can organize a minimum of 10 additional classes (on top of the regular ones) with a group of at least 10 pupils. The mentor monitors pupils’ progress, school attendance, oversees their involvement of pupils in extracurricular activities within schools and has regular contacts with the parents;
 tutoring – tutors are assigned to the pupils that have scholarships to support their preparation for the Matura (secondary school-leaving examination). To date this phase of the project has not been implemented.
In July 2012, a Twinning project “Support of integration of ethnic communities in the educational system” started within the Directorate for Development and improvement of education in minority languages, worth about 1 million Euros. The project aims at ensuring equal access to quality education for pupils from all ethnic communities. Specifically, the project objectives are to: ensure equal access to education; support equal opportunities through education; and support equal respect among different ethnic and cultural communities
“The former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia” has implemented educational reforms at all levels of education. It introduced mandatory secondary education, along with supporting measures such as free textbooks and transportation. Quality improvements were achieved through revisions to the curricula which promoted outcome-oriented and interactive teaching and learning, early learning of English language and information technology skills, training for teachers, etc. Within the VET system, 4-year study programmes and curricula were reformed and streamlined to better reflect new economic reality (the 3- year programme curricula are mostly the same).
CAHROM (2016)8
35

Apart from the reforms specific to the vocational education (see below), one of the major reforms in the education system was the introduction of mandatory secondary education from the school year 2008/2009. The Law on Secondary Education imposes a penalty of €.1,000 for parents whose children are not enrolled or do not regularly attend classes (Official Gazette, No. 49/2007).
As a support to the policy for establishing a compulsory secondary education the Government in recent years, has implemented several programmes and measures for increasing enrolment into primary and secondary education, some of which are general whereas some are targeted towards vulnerable groups. These programmes include:
 Free books and transportation from the place of residence to the school for children enrolled in secondary education;
 Establishing a system of mentoring and tutoring;
 Scholarships for the students from poor families, especially for Roma students;
 Introduction of Conditional Cash Transfers (CCTs) for children from poor families who regularly
attend secondary schools. The transfer is given when a child from a family that receives social financial assistance is enrolled and regularly attends a school with the joint aims of strengthening the effectiveness and efficiency of the social safety net, as well as of enhancing the human capital of children from socially disadvantaged families. The total amount that children receive is MKD.12,000 (about €.200) per school year.
Starting in 2009/2010 the Ministry of Education and Science has reduced the criteria (points) for enrolment of Roma pupils in secondary school by 10% from the prescribed minimum points. The intention of this measure is to increase the access of Roma population to preferred schools and to mitigate their self-selection into certain, lower-quality or low-attainment schools.
Vocational education and training
The main laws governing the vocational education and training system are the following:
 The Law on Secondary Education (Official Gazette, No. 52/2002) with several subsequent amendments;
 The Law on Vocational Education and Training (Official Gazette, No. 71/2006, and recent amendments 17/2011);
 The Law on the Bureau for Development of Education (Official Gazette, No. 37/2006, with most recent amendments in Official Gazette No. 148/2009);
 The Law on Adult Education (Official Gazette, No. 7/2008);
 The Law on the State Examination Centre (Official Gazette, No. 142/2008);
 The Law on Education Inspectorate (Official Gazette, No. 52/2005).
These laws are accompanied by numerous bylaws (rulebooks, norms, regulations, guidelines, etc.) which regulate the curricula, personnel, technological, organisational and financial areas.
Vocational education and training (VET) starts after completion of primary education (after grade 8 of basic school), and may last 2, 3 or 4 years. There are 93 public secondary schools out of which 11 provide only gymnasium education while the remainder are either vocational (56) or a mixture of both in the same building (25).
CAHROM (2016)8
36

Two-year VET programmes train for immediate employment. Curricula cover general and vocational education with practical sessions. The range of practical sessions depends on the educational profile. In some profiles 75% of the time is devoted to vocational training with emphasis on practical work, and 25% to study of mother tongue, public affairs and protection. Practical sessions take 40% of vocational training time. Graduates cannot go on directly to higher level education; they can enrol in the first year of a 3-year VET school. 3-year programmes cover general and vocational education and training, and practical work. In some profiles vocational education and training covers 45% and general education up to 55% of the time. Graduates can continue their education for another year in order to acquire a 4-year vocational education. VET takes 3 years for most educational profiles for the labour market. The 4-year VET programmes are the most attractive for students. This type of education has two goals: preparation for university or preparation for employment in industry, trade, tourism, or any other cluster chosen by the students. Curricula cover general education, vocational-theoretical subjects and practice sessions (35-40% of the teaching time is for general education and 60-65% for VET). Four year VET ends with a final exam. The diploma gives students the right to take the entrance exam to a university faculty.
A special type of VET takes place at art schools. There are three types: music, ballet and applied arts. Assessment of students takes place during the school year both in school and at the practical work location. Each school sets a final exam at the end of 3-4 years.
The Vocational Education and Training (VET) Centre, established in 2006, occupies a central place in the institutional setting of the VET system. The Centre’s primary role is to integrate the public interests and interests of the social partners in VET. Besides the VET Centre, several other institutions are involved in vocational education. These include: the Bureau for Development of Education (BDE), the Adult Education Centre (AEC), the State Education Inspectorate (SEI) and the State Examination Centre (SEC). The BDE is in charge of monitoring, research, improvement and development of the educational processes in the pre-primary education, primary, secondary general education, secondary vocational education, education of children with special needs, adult education, etc. The BDE sets the educational curricula for all levels of education (except the tertiary education), organises training for the professional development of teachers, makes proposals to the minister for enhancing the quality of the educational processes, prepares educational standards and standards for the assessment of pupils’ achievements, prepares concepts for textbooks and approves textbooks. The work and institutional setting of the BDE is laid down in the Law for Bureau for Development of Education, Official Gazette No. 37/2006 with most recent changes in Official Gazette No. 148/2009. The personnel of the BDE is specialized in a certain area, such as biology, geography, etc.
The institutional setting and responsibilities of the SEI are set in the Law on Educational Inspection (Official Gazette No. 52/2005, and most recent changes in the Official Gazette No. 51/2011). SEI monitors the implementation of educational standards and assures quality in pre-schools, primary and secondary schools, special educational institutions and adult education institutions. The main tool of the SEI for quality assurance is the integral evaluation of the educational process. The integral evaluation includes: evaluation of the organization and fulfilment of the educational program, the environment and culture in the educational institutions, management, professional development of the teachers and managers, communication and the public relations, cooperation with the parents and the other stakeholders. This integral evaluation is considered as a key tool for early recognition of potential discrimination, and in overcoming discrimination through recommendations from the inspection.
As part of the overall effort to decentralize the delivery of public services, the competencies and responsibilities for the delivery of the VET were to some extent transferred to local self-governments.
CAHROM (2016)8
37

The Law on Vocational and Education Training states that the local self-government should analyse the local labour market and inform the VET Centre about the latest developments on the labour market, make suggestions for the development of new curricula and programmes, for enrolment quotas in the VET, etc.
A Strategy for vocational education and training in a lifelong learning context (2013-2020)54 and an action plan were elaborated and adopted in April 2013 by the Ministry of Education and Science55. The Strategy, financed by the European Training Foundation (ETF), was prepared by the National Council, including representatives from the Ministry of Education and Science, the Vocational Education and Training Centre, the Association of Local Self-Governments, the Ministry of Labour and Social Policy, the Employment Service Agency, the Bureau for Development of Education, the Centre for Adult Education and the Chamber of Commerce.
This Strategy recognises that education should allow for personal and professional training of youth and adults according to the changing demands of the labour market and life in general. One of the main goals of this Strategy is to translate into practical action the concept of lifelong learning and adult education. The Strategy also aims at addressing the main dilemmas in the future development of the VET system, such as the policy design (aim, mission and vision), the systematic organisation of the VET (occupational areas, profiles, network of schools, curricula), the challenge of meeting the needs of the multiple clients (pupils, parents, business sector, the society), and in the delivery of the programmes.
Employment policy and measures
The Law on Employment and Insurance in Case of Unemployment (Article 98-a) regulates the possibility for an employer of the private sector that will employ an unemployed person who is a social financial assistance beneficiary to receive a subsidy for the employed person amounting to 80% of the amount of the social financial assistance paid to the person/household for the month preceding the month in which the person has been employed, provided that there is no reduction in the number of employees employed for an indefinite period of time during the period of three months prior to the date of hiring the new employees, except in cases of death or retirement.
Vulnerable categories of unemployed persons are the following: young persons aged up to 29 years with low qualifications, victims of domestic violence, children without parents and parental care, homeless persons, former drug users, parents of children on streets, single parents, the Roma, convicted persons following their release from a penitentiary institution, unemployed persons registered in the Employment Service Agency of the Republic of Macedonia for at least one year, unemployed young persons registered in the Employment Service Agency of the Republic of Macedonia for a period of at least six months, parents of children with disabilities, as well as parents of three or more children.
Full information about active measures of employment and training programmes for unemployed young people, including Roma, are available in the Addendum to this report and are summarized below:
54 A previous Vocational Education and Training Strategy was adopted for the period 2001-2010.
55 http://www.seecel.hr/UserDocsImages/Documents/VET%20STRATEGY%20AND%20ACTION%20PLAN_EN.pdf.
CAHROM (2016)8
  38

CAHROM (2016)8
   Training at a Known Employer – YOUNG PERSONS AGED UP TO 29 YEARS
       Goal
  The goal of this Programme is to provide the unemployed young persons with skills to perform work tasks required by the employer, and to stimulate the demand for work
   Scope of beneficiaries
   300 unemployed young persons from the register of active jobseekers of the Employment Service Agency
   Required funds
    6,785,100.00 MKD
    On-the-job Training with Subsidized Employment – YOUNG PERSONS AGED UP TO 29 YEARS
       Goal
  Acquisition of professional knowledge and skills necessary for performing work tasks and stimulation of the employment of registered unemployed young persons that face difficulties to enter in the labour market
  Scope of beneficiaries
   142 unemployed young persons from the register of active jobseekers of the Employment Service Agency
   Required funds
    18,935,280.00 MKD
    Training to meet the need for occupations that are in demand in the labour market – YOUNG PERSONS AGED UP TO 29 YEARS
       Goal
  The aim of this measure is to increase the employability of unemployed young persons through acquisition of knowledge for occupations that are in demand in the labour market
   Scope of beneficiaries
   66 unemployed young persons from the register of active jobseekers of the Employment Service Agency
  Required funds
    3,616,800.00 MKD
   Training with private training providers to meet the need for occupations that are in demand in
the labor market – YOUNG PERSONS AGED UP TO 29 YEARS
         Goal
The aim of this measure is to increase the employability of unemployed young persons through acquisition of knowledge for occupations that are in demand in the labour market
      Scope of beneficiaries
54 unemployed young persons from the register of active jobseekers of the Employment Service Agency
     Required funds
2,975,640.00 MKD
    39

Other measures include an internship/traineeship programme which aims to provide unemployed young persons with opportunities for practical learning and gaining work experience with an employer from the private sector, thus preparing them to enter the labour market. A needs assessment of unemployed young people will also be conducted.
3.5 Turkey
Roma policy framework
A National Strategy Document for Social Inclusion of Roma People 2015-2020 has been prepared by the Ministry of Family and Social Policy in co-operation with other public institutions, such as the Ministry of Labour and Social Security, the Ministry of Education, the Ministry of Interior and the Ministry of Health, as well as with Roma NGOs. The process of drafting this Strategy Document started in 2013. The Strategy Document was finalized and should be soon published.
Coordination, monitoring and participation of Roma
There are approximately 320 registered Roma NGOs in Turkey. However, most of them do not have the capacity to advocate for their rights. Since 2009 and the dialogue with Roma initiated and embraced by the Prime Minister and Secretary of State at the time, the Ministry of Labour and Social Security, the Ministry of National Education, the Ministry of Health have worked in co-operation with Roma NGOs to find permanent solutions for the problems of Roma.
The Ministry of Family and Social Policy has taken a leading role in ensuring this co-ordination since it has been established in 2011. A number of activities on social inclusion of Roma are also directly carried out by the Social Inclusion Department of the Ministry of Family and Social Policies. The Department is also the national contact point of Turkey on Roma in the context of EU accession negotiations.
Education policy and measures
In 2008, the Education Board approved a catch-up education programme, directed at children 10-14 years of age who have never been enrolled at school or who have dropped out. The measure target mainly Roma children and is considered as a positive initiative since equal opportunities in access to education condition equal opportunities in employment56.
56 See para. 68 of ECRI Report on Turkey (fourth monitoring cycle), published in 2011.
CAHROM (2016)8
   Advanced IT Skills Training – YOUNG PERSONS AGED UP TO 29 YEARS
       Goal
  This measure aims to upgrade the skills of registered young active jobseekers in the field of information technology in order to increase the competitiveness and opportunities thereof in the labour market
   Scope of beneficiaries
   81 unemployed young persons from the register of active jobseekers of the Employment Service Agency
   Required funds
    6,727,698.00 MKD
  40

Inclusion policy and measures
A Project “Promoting Social Inclusion in Densely Roma Populated Areas”, funded by the IPA Mechanism of the European Union, has started in November 2015. The Project will be lasting 24 months and will be implemented in 12 provinces where most of Roma people live. The Project addresses objectives of the National Strategy Document for Social Inclusion of Roma People 2015-2020.
Vocational education and training
Turkey is one of the implementing countries of the pilot MS4ROW project, which consists in a mentoring system for Roma women on their vocational and educational path. This project is supported by the Lifelong Learning Programme of the European Commission. The main idea of the project is to develop an alternative mode of teaching – mentoring system for Roma teenage girls and women. The aim of the mentoring system is to design and realize a personal educational and vocational path for each Roma teenage girl, facilitate their inclusion in education and overcome the discrimination in education and access to employment. The project is tested with all five partners from four implementing countries (Slovenia, Spain, Hungary, and Turkey) over a period of ten months. Düzce Provincial Directorate of National Education is one of the five partners.
MAS4ROW Project consists of individual meetings, group meetings, educational courses, vocational courses, and monthly workshops. The following activities were carried out in Düzce:
 five individual meetings were done with each girl and in the scope of group meetings, meetings were done once a month for describing the mentoring system, how to create on e-mail account, using of web-application, creating account in social media;
 beyond monthly workshops, some activities were done such as information about Distance Education System in Turkey, using of İŞKUR (Turkish Employment Agency) web page to find job, Conflict Management and Parental Education, effective communication, women rights and describing e-state processes;
 Düzce has advanced textile industry and 351 factories, so wearing and textile courses were given to Roma women to teach how to use sewing machine within the context of courses, training and educational programmes to find job in this industry. After signing a protocol with Düzce Employment Agency and Lifelong Learning Centre, they started two vocational courses and all participants are officially certificated.
20 Roma women were included in Düzce where plot implementation is and all activities were carried out in Düzce Research and Guidance. As a result of the Project, 10 Roma women found a job thanks to vocational courses, 6 Roma girls re-register to school through the Distance (open) Education System. In addition to these activities, Roma girls have gained self-confidence, and they are eager to take part in social life and community and business life. They trust themselves about their vocational skills. They can communicate with people in an effective way, and express themselves in a good way. Also institutions (especially individual members of them) which are directly or indirectly involved in the mentoring system and Ms4ROW project have changed their attitudes vis-à-vis the Roma community.
Social Solidarity Centres (SSC) were established within the fund of Social Assistance and Solidarity in 2012. SSCs target Roma women in densely Roma populated areas. SSC is a project that was started for Roma women who are socially and economically disadvantaged.
CAHROM (2016)8
41

The aim of SSC is to promote social integration of Roma women who live in highly bad standards. There are 15 SSCs across Turkey in the following regions: Çanakkale (Centre, Ezine, Gelibolu municipalities), Edirne (Merkez and Uzunköprü municipalities), Kirklareli (Babaeski, Merkez, Lüleburgaz municipalities), Sakarya (Asapazri, Ferizli, Sapanca municipalities), and Tekirdağ (Çorlu, Malkara and Süleymanpaşa municipalities).
Services of SSC are divided into two parts: training and social activities. Training sessions are also divided into three parts: Sports, Cultural, and Vocational training. On the other hand, SSCs serve as kindergarten. Every SSC has a kindergarten, free of charge, in the same building.
Social activities include kermesses, exhibitions, fairs, trips, picnics, seminars, panels, theatre, cinema, medical screening, visiting houses, etc.
Vocational training is provided by trainers who are certificated from the Ministry of National Education. Contents of vocational training are varying from province to province. Generally, vocational training for jewelry design, hairdressing, cooking, pastry cooking, skin care are the most popular among Roma women.
SSCs have four workers which are coordinator, trainer, janitor and security. The coordinator is the main responsible for the centre’s work routine and organises social activities and training. The coordinator also fixes the training calendar. Trainers are part-time workers and are responsible for the training.
SSCs are not just training centres or kindergarten. They adapt according to needs of region and can provide more integrated services. For example, if writing-reading rate is low among Roma women, SSCs develop training and give them classes about reading-writing. Moreover, SSCs generally have their own fitness centre. Roma women also benefit from this opportunity.
After trainings, SSCs help Roma women to get a job and monitor them. As a part of their training, Roma women can find a chance to exhibit their works and creations. They can also find a chance to sell their works in local bazaar57.
On the other hand, SSCs implement some awareness activities such as seminars. These seminars aim to change perception of society, to facilitate Roma people’s labour market and to inform disadvantaged persons about their fundamental rights.
CAHROM (2016)8
 57 http://beyazgazete.com/haber/2014/8/12/ezine-sodam-kursiyerlerinin-urettikleri-urunler-satisa-cikarildi-2331482.html.
42
 
IV. CONCLUSIONS, LESSONS LEARNED, GOOD PRACTICES IDENTIFIED AND POSSIBLE FOLLOW-UP
4.1. Conclusions of the thematic group of experts and lessons learnt
4.1.1 Conclusions concerning the organisation of the thematic visit
At the debriefing meeting experts of the thematic group expressed their entire satisfaction for the organisation of the thematic visit. CAHROM Guidelines for the organisation of such visits were taken into consideration. The group of experts regretted the absence of the Turkish experts but appreciated their readiness to contribute to the thematic report. Other remarks are summarized below:
- An official invitation letter and a draft agenda were circulated before the thematic visit;
- The possibility was given to the CAHROM Secretariat to provide comments on the draft agenda;
- The agenda of the round table and presentations focused on the topic;
- The Polish authorities made an effort to collect and analyse census data and surveys concerning
education of Roma and employment/unemployment and were therefore well-prepared;
- Excellent interpretation was provided by the hosting authorities;
- The programme of the thematic visit was opened by a high local official, namely Mr Jerzy Miler,
Małopolski Voivode;
- Although the programme used a round-table format and did not include any field visit to
vocational schools, Polish organisers brought participants from different municipalities and regions, as well as civil society representatives and even entrepreneurs. The two-day round table was attended by approximately 30 local participants, including state officials from the Ministry of Education, the Ministry of Labour and Social Policy, the Ministry of Administration and Digitization, representatives of various regional and local institutions including Plenipotentiaries of Małopolski and Silesian Voivodes on National and Ethnic Minorities, public servants and Roma social workers or career counsellors from Wroclaw, Cracow, Limanowa, Radom and Wadowice municipalities, Roma associations including the Educational Association Harangos, a Cracow- based Roma association, the Radom-based Roma Association “Romani Waśt”, a horse business entrepreneur from northern Poland, etc.;
- Most of the Polish participants stayed during the two days;
- Experts were presented a large panel of projects and initiatives, including social cooperatives,
work placement and professional training for Roma, etc. and could get acquainted with specific
local situations providing a more concrete picture of local challenges58;
- Partner countries’ experts had the possibility to present their experience in the presence a large
panel of local participants and presentations were followed by a number of questions-answers;
- Partner countries’ experts made full use of the thematic visit to ask questions, not only to Polish
interlocutors but also between themselves;
- Most of the experts were in a position to provide gender and age disaggregated data.
58 As an example, 1,500 to 1,800 Roma are living in Wroclaw (out of 600,000 inhabitants) from all main four Roma groups (Bergitka Roma, Polish Roma, Kalderash and Lovari). It is a poorly educated community (30% have not finished compulsory education; 5% have basic vocational education and only 1% has higher education). From a group of 200 Roma adults, 68% are totally inactive, 20% work illegally on the black market and 12% are working on a contract-base. A specific training project was proposed by the municipality involving young Roma from two Roma groups: Bergitka (open to change) and Lovari (conservative and traditional). Bergitka group members had all primary education, whilst 34% of Lovari had not even primary education.
CAHROM (2016)8
 43

4.1.2 General conclusions and lessons learnt on the topic
The group of experts came up with the following general conclusions (not in specific order)59:
As regards employment and vocational education and training in national Roma integration strategies
Generally-speaking, employment is not given sufficient political and financial priority in national Roma integration strategies in comparison with education, health and - for some countries like Bosnia and Herzegovina – housing chapters. The same observation is valid for vocational education and training.
Pre-school education, primary and to a certain extent general secondary education receive much more attention by policy makers as reflected in national Roma integration strategies or (Roma Decade) action plans. Educational policies in favour of Roma children should be backed up by an active adult education and vocational education policy, as recommended in the Council of Europe CM/Rec No R (2000) 4.
For any policy measures targeting vocational education and training, close cooperation between the Ministry of Education and the Ministry of Labour should be ensured (the same applies between various municipal departments at local level). There is a need to mainstream gender and youth within national Roma inclusion strategies, including in policy measures for vocational and training education. Should the national Roma integration strategy includes a specific chapter for Roma women (example in “the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia”) or for youth (examples in Croatia, Serbia and Slovenia), these chapters should refer to vocational education and training.
As regards education of Roma in general
The generally low level of education of Roma is one the main factors determining the current position of Roma on the labour market throughout Europe.
Both, authorities and Roma activists should pay more attention to the legal obligation related to compulsory education. In almost all European Union countries the compulsory education age let the pupils to (almost) reach at least the level of vocational education (see Appendix 5). Too much passivity toward this problem is observed among either the authorities or Roma parents and community leaders. Compulsory education should be made really compulsory in practice and inclusive education should be the rule. By ensuring the duty of compulsory education, Roma pupils would reach the stage of vocational education at least. Experts of the thematic group believe that ensuring compulsory education is a fundamental condition for the later professional activation of Roma.
The group of experts could not however come to an agreement whether sanctions for Roma parents should be introduced if Roma children do not attend regularly school (examples in the Netherlands and in “the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia”). According to the Polish legal system, parents are responsible to send children to school and could be sanctioned with fines if they do not but some Polish interlocutors said during the visit that this was not a solution and believed more in awareness-raising campaigns.
59 Member States not taking part in this thematic group are mentioned when they have been mentioned during the thematic visit as examples.
CAHROM (2016)8
 44

Compulsory pre-school education should be introduced at an early age, ideally as early as the age of three or four (example in Hungary), and support measures, including Roma school assistants in pre- schools, should be introduced to encourage Roma parents to include their children in pre-school facilities. Celebrating Romani holidays and elements of the Romani culture in kindergartens could help attract Roma families and familiarize non Roma parents with Romani culture.
Higher education should be equally promoted among Roma communities, providing e.g. scholarships as from secondary education level (example in “the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia” and Poland).
School books should be borrowed, not given, so as not to prepare young Roma to the “claiming attitude”. Home schooling (teachers going to families), which is quite present among the Lovari group in Poland, should be limited. Roma parents should see some benefits for sending their children to school, e.g. providing counselling at school. Roma mediators should be engaged to ensure a smooth bridge between Roma and the school environment.
Over-representation of Roma in special schools due to additional support to families if they send their children to these schools can be unwittingly economic incentive which ameliorate negative phenomenon of placing Roma pupils in special school system, especially for poorest Roma families. Enrolling children in special schools or programmes for mild mentally disabled definitely and negatively influence their future on the labour market.
As regards employment of Roma in general
The comparison of unemployed Roma and non-Roma shows several factors common to all participating countries of this thematic group and beyond, including a huge disproportion in the education level between Roma and non Roma to the disadvantage of Roma; and a higher level of young people within Roma community compared to non-Roma.
The age structure of Roma communities in Europe (probably the youngest European ethnic group) has an ambivalent character: on the one hand, taking into consideration the low level of their education it means that the group of unemployed people will rise in the Roma community in upcoming years; on the other hand, the fact that the Roma youth is more ”open for change” - combined with support mechanisms dedicated to Roma communities in European countries - means that that young Roma have more possibilities to continue their education than the generation of their parents. The latter factors can positively influence the situation of Roma in the labour market in the near future provided that they finish at least compulsory school (far beyond the primary level).
Employment of Roma women should receive more attention and support (examples of projects targeting Roma women in “the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia” and Turkey). When discussing the situation of the Roma community one should pay attention to the phenomenon of slow emancipation of Roma women, stemming especially from less traditional communities. Although women are formally less in charge of Roma NGOs than men, at least in a country like Poland, experience of the past 10 years shows a much higher level of their involvement in projects and will to introduce change in the community, even from professional perspective60.
60 For example: in Poland Roma women represent the majority of Roma education assistants (approx. 70%), of students of Roma origin (63% in 2014), as well as of high school students in secondary schools (approx. 59% in 2014).
CAHROM (2016)8
 45

One of the most common tendencies in contemporary labour market is the almost structural unemployment that touches mainly women (see Eurostat statistics table 1 in Appendix 6) and young people (see table 3 in the same Appendix). Similar tendencies are observed also among Roma women and youth, although there are some differences and sometimes different reasons to this phenomenon.
The group of experts identified both systemic and socio-cultural reasons for unemployment:
Systemic reasons:
 relatively high level of work costs for the enterpreneurs;
 non-correspondence of demand and supply for certain services or products, caused by
economic crisis, high concurrence or poor management;
 lack of flexibility due to strict legal regulations for labour-related legislation (licenses,
permits, business licenses, etc.);
 non-correspondence of work demand and labour force on a given territory;
 low level or lack of professional experience among school leavers and young workers;
 lack of incentives for entrepreneurs to hire persons from disadvantaged groups (other
than disabled persons);
 discrimination, including negative stereotypes and attitudes, towards Roma.
Socio-cultural reasons:
• early school drops-out;
• lack of education and professional experience;
• reluctance to take low prestige and low paid jobs;
• dependence on social welfare system, sometimes inherited through generations;
• migrations and gaps in education triggered by migration;
• reluctance to occupy certain job positions for so-called cultural motives or cultural
prohibition (internal issue within some Roma traditional communities);
• hermetic character of certain, more traditional, Roma communities;
• patriarchal model of Roma families which affect Roma women’s further education and,
as a result, their access to the labour market.
As regards the organisation and curricula of vocational education and training
For many years, the trend was to reduce vocational education in several European countries (Poland is a concrete example). Now, this attitude is opposite which is a good “turning point” to pay attention to the positive effects that vocational education and training could have in the professional activation of Roma.
Market research should be part of vocational training. When designing vocational education and training programmes, attention should be paid to ensure as far as possible a correspondence between territorial/local situations and needs regarding the labour market and Roma communities on the one hand and required job resources on the other. In practice there is often a lack of correspondence between demand and supply. Experts noted that it might be easier to reach a certain balance in regions with a relatively small number of Roma or in countries where Roma are not massively present in certain geographical areas. Different approaches should be designed to respond to different situations (e.g. Roma living in urban areas v. Roma living in rural areas).
In economies where crafts and market services correspond to a demand and could offer well-paid jobs, vocational education and training should help supporting Roma traditional crafts and skills.
CAHROM (2016)8
46

Vocational education and training should focus on specific qualifications in the shortest possible time. For most Roma students and adults, it would be preferable to propose more practical and less theoretical vocational education and training. A three-year schooling period seems for many too long. A provision of care for children when parents participate in vocational training could be envisaged to facilitate parent’s enrolment.
Teachers in vocational schools should receive training to work in a multicultural environment and should have basic knowledge of local Roma culture(s) and family relationship. A Roma youngster can hardly count on his family support for his/her education and, on the other hand, if the family is convinced about education it often can hardly financially support it. Possible future employers should participate in vocational training courses.
As regards the impact of vocational education and training measures
Vocational education and training programmes should in theory lead to concrete jobs or at least facilitate an early access to the labour market. The actual employment of the beneficiaries of vocational education and training programmes is not necessarily an objective of such programmes which raises questions about their impact and effectiveness. An illustration of this can be found in the outcome of ESF 2007-2013 funded employment projects in Poland which led to the employment (as employees or self-employers) of 421 persons out of 8,762 beneficiaries, i.e. less than 5%. Priority should be given to job training and product development.
A system of tutoring and mentoring for Roma students during vocational education and training would be worth establishing as a general practice. Paid interim and traineeships, including in public services and ministries, should be privileged since Roma could gain professional experience without having to spend several years in vocational schools since there is often a risk that they drop out before finishing their studies. A debate however took place whether trainees should get paid or not to attend vocational or other type of training. “In the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia”, there are usually paid to attend training. In some Polish municipalities, this was the case at the beginning but resulted in attracting persons who were not really eager to start working afterwards, so this practice was stopped.
There is a certain lack of information regarding the middle and long term impact of vocational education and training. It would be important to follow what happens with Roma people who have been engaged in such training programmes to see whether they managed to get employed over the long term.
As regards the interest of Roma for vocational education and training
Vocational education and training seem a priori a proper response for many Roma and should at least be one of the education options. It gives Roma certified professionals skills and serious job perspectives which would enable young people to support their family. Vocational education gives the possibility to create “family run businesses” which is also important for many Roma. In terms of Roma community development, vocational education responds to some patterns existing in Roma traditional communities, such as skills learning within the family environment, child/early marriages (unions) and relatively early parenthood. Vocational education is a kind of “transmission belt” into the labour market for those who take responsibility for the family at an early age and for those who do not want or cannot carry on with their studies.
CAHROM (2016)8
47

In practical terms, the situation varies a lot: in Finland, vocational education seems to attract a large number of Finnish Roma whilst in Bosnia and Herzegovina and Poland there is relatively low interest from Roma for vocational education (though figures are slightly increasing). In Poland, an explanation could be the traditional fact that cultural aspects and traditions are not sufficiently taken into consideration in vocational education and training offers.
The choice of vocational orientation may vary from country to country. It is often different for men and women, and can considerably vary from one Roma community to another because of certain traditions and cultural prohibitions. Several participants indicated that vocational education and training is more attractive for Roma women and youth. Roma men often bring more money at home by working in the grey economy or sometimes through more illegal ways.
Roma men tend to work with machines, or as mechanics, taxi, bus or truck drivers (e.g. in Wroclaw). Others chose office work, cook, rescue assistant, commercial, etc. Women choose sewing or textile (Turkey), cleaning (Bergitka women in Poland), cooking, aesthetics, hair-dresser, gardening, etc. The job of Roma mediator (Bosnia and Herzegovina and “the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia”, Roma school assistant (Poland) and Roma cultural coordinator (Finland) also attract many applicants.
The economic crisis plays also a role, as well as the location of vocational schools. Within one Powiat (equivalent to a French département) not all the jobs can be taught in vocational schools. The distance between the place of residence and the school plays a role.
As regards a targeted/tailored v. general approach to vocational education, training and employment
A key for success is to support tailored projects to the local and regional needs and opportunities on the labour market, as well as to the experience and skills of specific Roma groups, families or individuals. This remark is not valid just for vocational education, training and employment.
Public funding should concentrate on those Roma parents/families that are already sending their children to school (including pre-school) and on those Roma individuals who are actively seeking for a job. Budget is limited and public/EU funds should not be wasted for persons who have no real interest for education or employment61. It does not mean that the latter who are often living on social benefits should be left out but they should be rather the targets of awareness-raising campaigns on the benefits of education and employment rather than integrating them already in training projects. The need to make this distinction requires some sort of assessment and prior consultation with potential beneficiaries of projects or training. One should ensure that this not always the same people who attend (“people addicted to training”). Selection criteria for enrolling Roma beneficiaries (in vocational training or employment activation projects) should be fair and transparent.
As regards funding
Whilst on the one hand, European Structural Funds (ESF) and IPA funding offer a wide range of possibilities and should be more often used for Roma professional activation, the financial contribution from the state (and municipal) budget is crucial so as not to rely only from external donors.
61 One of the reasons given by a Polish speaker to explain why people are registering themselves as job-seekers, whilst they are in fact not really interested, was to obtain medical insurance.
CAHROM (2016)8
 48

State/local funding shows political commitment and is a better guarantee for the sustainability of the action. In that regard Bosnia and Herzegovina (for the involvement of state and local budget for its Roma housing policy) and Poland (for the use of state and local budget on top of EU funds) can be regarded as positive examples. “The former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia”, however, is able to implement programmes mainly through IPA and other international sources of funding (e.g. REF).
It is important to build and ensure the financing of projects that can be sustainable, including from municipal and regional budgets (good examples in Wroclaw and Wadowice).
Once embarked in financial the professional activation of people, and Roma in particular, the sustainability of funding is crucial: any break in financing individuals will immutably demotivate them and embed mistrust of Roma toward the authorities and the majority. In that respect, some Polish interlocutors regretted the sometimes late arrival of ESF instalments which creates major delays and problems to manage the projects and the motivation of participants.
The Council of Europe Development Bank (CEB) can finance, via loans, education and vocational training projects, and the related infrastructure, such as the construction and/or rehabilitation of early childhood education facilities, primary and secondary schools, technical colleges, vocational training centres, establishments of higher education or specialized learning and/or research and development centres. Eligible investments may include sports and socio-cultural centres/equipment, as well as residence facilities pertaining to such establishments, learning materials, furniture and equipment.
As an example, in 2005, a €.5million loan was approved by the CEB in favour of the Government of Hungary for the partial financing of investments in the fields of housing, education and vocational training to promote the social integration and improve the living conditions of Roma in Hungary.
In additional, the CEB provides Programme Loans with the primary purpose of promoting the creation and preservation of viable permanent and/or seasonal jobs by facilitating access to credit. Such loans can finance fixed productive investments, including through leasing, or working capital requirements as deemed eligible by the CEB. They are aimed at micro, small and medium sized enterprises (MSMEs), including those exercising craftsmanship/artisan activities or small family-owned enterprises engaged in regular economic activity. Reflecting its social mandate, the CEB prioritizes for its support the smaller MSMEs and those with limited, less favourable, or even no access to credit. This includes in particular start-ups and enterprises owned by women, by minorities and by vulnerable groups. In 2014, the Roma Economic Development Initiative (REDI) was initiated by the CEB, CoopEst and OSF with the aim to finance micro-credit vehicles in favour of Roma entrepreneurs. In November 2014, the CEB approved an amount of €. 200,000 in favour of CoopEst to strengthen Roma entrepreneurs’ capacities, facilitate their access to credit and support microfinance institutions in dealing with Roma entrepreneurs as clients.
In 2010, the CEB also approved a €.8 million loan in favour of Caja de Ahorros y Monte de Piedad de Madrid for the partial financing of the ACCEDER Programme, run by the Fundación Secretariado Gitano. This training programme is principally intended for the Roma population in order to facilitate their access to the job markets and thus foster their professional and social integration in Spain.
As regards the social welfare system
The social welfare system sometimes creates negative phenomena, like a dependency on social benefits, and incentives for not seeking actively a job (again not just economically non-active Roma persons).
CAHROM (2016)8
49

In Finland adopted some incentives for Roma to choose employment rather than social benefits: if the salary is 300 Euros, the person keeps its right for social benefit of 300 Euros (whilst in other national contexts, Roma would lose their rights to social benefits if they start working which is not an inventive especially for big families). In “the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia”, it is a middle-way system: a Roma person would get 80 Euros as social benefit per month for a family of five persons (other family members do not get anything). Families would receive extra money if they send their children to school.
As regards data collection and definitions
In almost all European countries, there is a lack of data illustrating the unemployment phenomenon among the Roma communities. Nonetheless there are still some possibilities to extract the needed data from censuses, national surveys on unemployment and by combining and comparing data related to the majority population with data concerning the Roma population (as Polish authorities did for the thematic visit). Another source of data can and should be data from hitherto realized projects. Since at least 2011, most EU countries have adopted strategies for Roma social inclusion and most non-EU countries in Europe have done the same. Authorities are obliged to monitor the progress in any taken actions; therefore ethnic-based data to monitor progress in the implementation of targeted policies towards Roma should made be possible, provided it respects certain international standards concerning data protection. Collecting detailed data concerning the level of education, level of professional qualifications and professional experience of Roma and specific cultural patters on the one hand, and analysis of the local labour market on the other hand, could be the first steps before developing locally based action plans towards the professional activation of Roma communities.
Whilst we may find some ethnic based data concerning school attendance of Roma pupils and students in pre-school, primary, secondary and university levels, as well as Roma attending vocational education, there is a need to collect more ethnic-based data illustrating the phenomenon of unemployment among the Roma population, distinguishing active and passive job-seekers. Most of the academic research and analysis are based on census results (e.g. in Poland) which provide only a partial picture of the situation of Roma since many do not self-declare as Roma. Ways should be found to conduct similar research and analysis based on accepted estimated figures of the Roma population. Statistics and data collection are difficult to compare because they are also linked to definitions and the scope of the used terms may vary from a country to another (e.g. unemployed persons versus economically inactive persons)
One of the weak points of public discussions on Roma’s employment or unemployment situation is that such discussions rely on widely shared convictions that Roma are widely unemployment without any concrete data. This assumption fails to integrate that many employed Roma either do not declare themselves as Roma because of the negative image and the risk to lose their job or clients, or work on the black market/grey economy (which is not a Roma characteristic).
As regards discrimination and measures aimed at breaking stereotypes
Discrimination in the field of employment, especially in the private sector, remains very high in all participating countries. It is often difficult to convince employers to recruit a Rom. When the employer sees a Rom he usually refuses giving the job. If the girl wears traditional dress, it is immediate no. The address of the applicant can also play a negative role. For the few of them who get a job, it is often preferable to hide their Roma identity. Some might get insulted or bullied if they do.
CAHROM (2016)8
50

More studies should be conducted and, where necessary measures undertaken, to address bullying and discrimination on the work place. Finland has good examples in combating bullying at school level. More efforts should be introduced and training provided to human resources and employers conducting job interviews to avoid falling in to the trap of prejudice. Some municipalities have adopted positive measures for the employment of Roma in the municipality, which helps breaking stereotypes, like in Wadowice62. There has been a greater acceptance of Roma workers within the municipality. But, too often, only the municipality provides employment for Roma, enterprises do not recruit Roma.
As regards Romani culture and traditions
The will to preserve Romani culture and traditions shall not result in having Roma staying backwards of the rest of society and Romani culture and traditions be used as an excuse by policy-makers not to be pro-active in proposing and implementing projects for Roma. The experts from Bosnia and Herzegovina and “the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia” were particularly shocked to notice how much the so- called “Romani traditions” in Poland could become real obstacles to enrol Roma in vocational education or for occupying certain jobs. Experts from these two partner countries indicated to Polish interlocutors present, including members of Roma communities, that Romani culture and traditions are not playing a preventing role in their respective countries.
On the contrary, Polish interlocutors, including members of the Roma community, gave numerous examples of professions that certain traditional Roma groups, such as Lovari and Polish Roma, would disregard or categorically refuse if they would be proposed such occupations. It relates for example to occupations connected to human body secretions (impacting medical jobs, such as doctors, nurses, gravediggers, etc.) but also with rubbish (cleaning personnel, plumber, etc.). They cannot wear uniforms such as those of policemen, judges, prosecutors, doctors, nurses, etc. Roma performing jobs connected with law enforcement services (policemen, including municipal police, prosecutors) or dog-catchers are under threat of exclusion from the community. Others cannot according to their tradition collect money from others and can therefore not work at a cash desk. Lovari women can work in esthetics with face and hands but not with feet. Bergitka Roma, however, would accept any job, including cleaning.
These relations to certain professions also vary from a country to another. For example, a debate took place between Polish and Finnish experts, following the intervention of Mr Jerzy Ozga, the Polish entrepreneur from Northern Poland who was considering employing Roma in his horse business, which gives a wide range of employment possibilities, including equestrian sports, horseback riding, hippotherapy, horse breeding, horse studs, touristic use of horses (like hansom cabs) etc. Whilst it is still an emerging market in Poland and the connection with horses is valued in Polish society, including among Roma, the horse business has considerably declined in Finland and the association of Roma with horses has become for Finnish Roma a negative stereotype.to which they are ant to be associated with.
62 Since the beginning of the vocational training project, 63 employment contracts were signed (but often the same people are employed). 12 to 15 Roma are part of this project (9% of the total), including three Roma women. Two Roma employees take care of municipal gardens and one works as a driver. One works as Roma assistant. One person is employed on a full time basis out of six who followed the training (in both cases, they benefit of a so called 13th salary in a year which is a rule for state employees). They work for 9 to 10 month annually and receive also vouchers to clean their work cloths, free material and transport. Children are given textbooks, and can participate in summer camps. Every year an apartment is purchased and modernized for a Roma family. Women are given paid maternity leave and receive additional welfare through social funds. The condition to access this type of employment is to be registered in the employment office. Out of 70% Roma covered by the social welfare centre, only 10% are registered in the employment office. Many Roma people do not know how to manage budget and hardly think about their future pension.
CAHROM (2016)8
 51

Several Polish municipalities shared their challenging experience in enrolling Roma from different groups in vocational training programmes. Wroclaw for example said that they did not succeed in organising joint classes; bringing the Bergitka and the Lovari groups together only took place once at the end of the programme during one festive event.
As regards the self-esteem and self-image of Roma
In order to better adjust the vocational educational and training programme for Roma, diagnostics tests were conducted with Polish Roma from Wroclaw under the Project “Different citizens, one city” funded by ESF and State Roma Integration Programme budget. Tests that aim at showing the self-image of a given person revealed the big difference between the real image and the self-image among Roma participants which confirmed the difficulties encountered when activating Roma in vocational education and training. Though one should be careful not to draw any generalisation since each individual is different, these tests drew certain conclusions. Some Roma have too high expectations compared to what they can do; others have a too low self-esteem. Some do not accept criticisms on the workplace or dislike subordination to employers. Due to insufficient social skills, lower educational level and linguistic barriers many have difficulties to manage an enterprise (hence the failure of Roma social cooperatives).
After the project, an expertise was prepared with recommendations concerning activation of the Roma community. Vocational education for Roma is needed because of quick acquisition of specific skills and lower general education requirements. It was recommended that incomes cannot be too low because Roma have to support large families. Vocational education and training therefore need to concentrate on professions that are in demand. Generally-speaking family-business, social co-operative, and self- employment should be privileged, provided Roma receive support, especially at the starting phase.
The Holanda performed test showed that artistic and creative features are prevalent among Roma. Problems are solved through action and tools for solution are connected with movement. Entrepreneurial personality test revealed an ease for establishing contacts but the unreal self-image makes some of them unable to run their enterprise. Many are skilful for handling machines and for doing work which requires precision. Roma women appreciate more stability in the working field than men. Artistic abilities and creativeness make them easy to work with children.
Raising awareness about the benefits of education and publicizing Roma educated professionals who are still proud of their traditions and culture as role models, would be needed. As a positive example, a campaign “One of many” (http://jednizwielu.pl) was conducted in Poland; it attracted however many anti-Roma reactions. Contacts with those Roma role models (for instance those have finished vocational education or have created their own business after following a vocational training programme) should be facilitated. Organising national competitions for the best apprentice could be also envisaged and motivate Roma involved in educational education (in France, several Roma won such competitions).
As regards job advisers, career counsellors, school assistants and mediators
People assisting Roma, whether job advisers, career counsellors, school assistants, mediators, etc. should not be all necessarily of Roma ethnic origin. Most important is their knowledge about the community and their capacity to build bridges between the Roma individuals and families on the one hand and the institution (employment office, school, hospital, etc.) on the other hand.
CAHROM (2016)8
 52

However it has proved useful to recruit Roma, and especially Roma women and young people, on those positions to respond, especially at the beginning, to the existing mistrust of many Roma in state and public institutions, as well as to overcome linguistic barriers when they exist. More Roma should be recruited as employment mediators in local employment offices (good example in Bulgaria) or as career counsellors in municipal social services (some examples in Poland). Career counselling for children, and Roma children in particular, should be introduced at an early stage of education (before they drop out of school) and activity aimed at involving Roma parents in the education of their children should be developed (example of Roma incubators in Slovenia).
Closer co-operation between education-related stakeholders (schools, Roma school assistants, Roma school mediators, Roma NGOs involved in education, etc.) should be facilitated with local entrepreneurs.
As regards required education levels and skills accreditation
The educational level (graduation) is not the only criterion for recruitment procedures (including for Roma school assistants, mediators, career counsellors or job advisers) and is too often put forwarded as a barrier for recruitment. Concrete grassroots experience and skills of non-educated young or adult Roma should be also valued, e.g. in artistic areas, trade and traditional crafts, provided the latter are adapted to the demand of modern societies.
A system of professional skills accreditation for those Roma who are not graduated because they have dropped school earlier and have not finished compulsory should be more systematically put in place and regarded as equivalent to official qualification standards, using positive experiences, like the VAT63 system in France (see Appendix 4) or the system of extra-mural exams for vocational and training education qualifications in Poland for people who have two year professional experience (after their accreditation, they can register as job-seekers in employment offices).
As regards employability
Measures should be taken to respond to systemic reasons put forward by employers for not recruiting more: high labour costs; stiff labour law and strict labour rules (regulations; permits, etc.); lack of correspondence between demand and supply; lack of sufficient experience from the graduates; lack of sufficient education, etc. On the other hand, job seekers are not interested by low esteem or poorly paid jobs or if social benefits (all family members included) are higher or relatively the same as the proposed salary64. An early contact with possible employers is a key to success. Job-fairs (example in Romania) bringing together potential employers and Roma looking for a job could be organised.
The State and municipality should provide the example: in “the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia” for instance, 1,600 Roma are working in state and local self-governments. Hundreds of them are policemen. Three Roma women are working in high position in ministries. Finland and Bosnia and Herzegovina have also numerous examples of that kind.
63 VAT stands for validation des acquis de l’expérience.
64 As an example, in Poland, unemployment benefit (in average 200 Euros) is time dependent (up to 6 months) and depends on the previous salary. An average gross salary in Poland is 800 Euros (400 to 500 Euros for people with no low education). So if several family members get social benefits, a low salary offered by an employer is not an incentive for work.
CAHROM (2016)8
 53

As regards instruments and tools for professional activation and support measures:
The group of experts identified the following instruments and tools:
 intervention works: employer receive from labour agencies partial reimbursement of the
employees’ salary and social security fees;
 paid community service: can be organised by local authorities for unemployed people without
the right to dole, usually for the benefit of local services, welfare or cultural institutions.
 internship and vocational training in enterprises: can be organised for young unemployed
people (up to 25 years old) and young unemployed academy leavers (up to 27 years old);
 professional training: dedicated to long-term unemployed people, or to people without any
professional qualifications, or to persons over 50 years old, disabled people, etc.;
 public works: mainly infrastructure works paid by government funding;
 social economic entities such as social cooperatives: can be voluntary established associations
of an unlimited number of people deriving from vulnerable groups (unemployed people, ex- prisoners, homeless people, refugees, Roma, etc.).
The above activation tools can be accompanied by support measures, such as the reimbursement of travel and accommodation costs for workers. Other support measures include scholarships for Roma students, and, in some countries, scholarships for unemployed young people who decide to continue their education (up to 25 years old). Micro-credits to help Roma starting an enterprise (example in “the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia”), free-of-charge vocational training courses for the most vulnerable and incentives to entrepreneurs to hire Roma (examples in “the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia”) are also among support measures mentioned during the thematic visit. Such incentives also exist in Turkey but exclusively if they are combined with other categories (age, gender, vocational educational background, disabilities etc.). Recommendation letters from authorities for Roma (examples in Bosnia and Herzegovina and in “the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia”) in their applications for obtaining scholarships, social housing or micro-credits can also be efficient. The Finnish experts were particularly interested by this practice.
4.1.3 Lessons learnt per country
Poland
From the implementation of the three Polish programmes targeting the Roma community, the following conclusions were drawn by the Polish authorities:
 The activities aimed at professional activation of the Roma population will not be effective if they are targeted at all Roma in the category defined as “unemployed”. There is a chance for greater effectiveness of the actions if they are based on individualized needs;
 Additional measures to bolster employment and professional activation should be directed at a group of unemployed people, describing themselves as “ready to work”;
 Unemployed Roma showing a willingness to work should be the beneficiaries of the integration strategies, and the Roma belonging to the “economically inactive”, many of them being women, should be rather the beneficiaries of social welfare activities and awareness-raising campaigns;
 Efforts should be directed at strengthening the group of unemployed expressing readiness to take up any work, thus counteracting the phenomenon of expansion of inactive people;
CAHROM (2016)8
54

 There is a deep need for cooperation between the employers and educational institutions. Of particular importance is the cooperation with employers in the case of groups of students requiring special support, such as Roma;
 Retrofitting the vocational school with modern equipment and teaching materials to ensure high quality education and enable the implementation of the core curriculum in the competition;
 Fostering Roma pupils’ knowledge about vocational training through vocational schools and
primary schools in order to present proficiencies;
 It is of vital importance to promote vocational training among the Roma parents and other
members of the Roma communities;
 Co-operation of Roma NGOs carrying out professional activation should be developed with
vocational schools and employers, especially since apprenticeships and practical classes are
usually conducted by employers;
 Conducting effective career guidance in vocational schools, with particular attention to planning
individual educational and professional paths of students/learners, significantly increases the
chances of graduates on the labour market;
 There is a need to harmonize the actions taken at local level: some municipalities are active,
others are not.
Given that 92% of the Roma community live in urban areas (major cities) their access to educational tools at the general level and at the professional level is much higher than the non-Roma population in rural areas. Another optimistic factor that can have a positive impact on the level of integration remains the demographics of this group with a significant proportion of young people. The amount of pro- employment applications submitted to government programmes aimed at the Roma is a reflection of the interest of local governments and Roma organisations for pro-employment activities.
An analysis of areas of intervention proposed under national strategies for Roma integration since 2001 indicates a progressive specialization and restriction from 8 to 4 main areas. In Poland, the new “Programme for integration the Roma community in Poland 2014-2020” will focus in only four intervention areas: education (including civic and historical education and promotion of Romani culture), health, housing and professional activity (8 areas in previous strategies 2001-2003 and 2004- 2013 have been aggregated into four areas).
When examining the previous experience of Roma social cooperatives one should keep in mind the past experience (3 EQUAL Initiative projects). The evaluation of these projects is critical due to the instability of the achieved results in the context of the funding for each operation. In most developed model solutions were not used in subsequent projects activating the Roma community in the labour market, and tied partnerships ended its activities at the end of project financing. The main diagnosed cause of this situation was: the lack of an experienced manager and the lack of understanding among members for the need to invest profits in the development of the cooperatives. Nonetheless, social cooperatives can become business incubators and can be adjust to Roma culture patterns (family business).
Bosnia and Herzegovina
Focusing on permanent employment through an integrated approach that would combine housing, education and employment is one of the lessons learnt from practice. The vocational education and training of Roma would need to be further developed under the Action Plan for Roma Employment.
CAHROM (2016)8
55

One of the priorities is also the solving of identity and other documents which still create considerable obstacles for Roma to access their rights, including in the fields of education and employment.
Finland
Finnish Roma pupils have discovered vocational studies. Over the last ten years, seeking vocational education has more than doubled. Enrolment rates in upper secondary schools continue to be very low among Roma pupils. Specific pupils' career guidance counselling has produced some positive results.
The first monitoring report of the National Policy for Roma came up with the following self-assessment of the vocational education and training policy:
 Supporting and enhancing the participation of Roma in qualification-oriented vocational education and training
The general level of education of the Roma population can be raised by using the existing educational services and by developing the implementation of education and training aimed at Roma. It will be necessary to provide part of the adult Roma population with an opportunity to complete their comprehensive school studies.
To enhance their access to vocational education and training and to support their studies, the basic vocational education aimed at adult Roma should include study-enhancing operational models developed within the preparatory training and careers guidance system. The opportunities afforded by the competence-based qualifications system should be utilised by taking into account students’ varying learning readiness and by providing individual study plans.
On the basis of experience gained in various educational projects aimed at Roma, there is a need for motivating them and supporting them in their studies, in addition to helping them in learning to learn. Their participation in education and training is often hampered by other factors complicating their lives, which is why counselling is in a key position.
 Enhancing opportunities for vocational education and training, as well as vocational choices for the Roma population
The lack of vocational role models in the Roma community and a lack of awareness of various professions and the education or training required for them have been recognized as factors that prevent the integration of Roma into the educational system and the labour market.
The importance of vocational and study counselling for the Roma population has been emphasized in surveys on educational projects aimed at adult Roma in particular.
Workers with a Romani background are needed in social welfare and health services and education-al services, for example. They have been shown to play a key role in enhancing the social inclusion and interaction of the Roma population. The number of Roma working in these areas should be supported through various forms of education and training. Furthermore, the participation of Roma, according to their individual skills, in various vocational fields and educational levels should be supported through educational guidance and vocational counselling.
CAHROM (2016)8
56

 Enhancing vocational education and training for adult Roma - Need for development
It is necessary to provide part of the adult Roma population with an opportunity to complete their comprehensive school. Educational structures that enhance the learning skills necessary in vocational studies need to be developed to help Roma gain access to vocational education and training and to support their studies. These include, for example, study guidance and preparatory training along the same lines as the study guidance and preparatory training for vocational studies given to pupils who are about to complete their comprehensive school. According to lessons learned in educational projects aimed at Roma, motivation-enhancing encouragement and support are also needed.
Actual vocational education and training aimed specifically at Roma was initiated in Finland in the late 1970s, in the form of short-term labour market training. The emphasis in vocational education and training was mainly on the traditional Romani means of livelihood or development work based on them. Past vocational adult education and training did produce some results, in the sense that many middle-aged Roma actually do have an occupation, but the education activities have proceeded in fits and starts and have not always guaranteed permanent employment for Roma. On the other hand, short-term education and training was aimed at enhancing the Roma population’s motivation for seeking access to further studies.
Very little vocational labour market training aimed exclusively at Roma has been offered in recent years. The positive aspects of vocational education and training aimed specifically at Roma include the lowering of the threshold for education and training and the peer support provided by the group. Such vocational education and training aimed at the Roma population has been included in various projects, and also in the NOSTE Programme, which offers youth instructor and clothing design training programmes, for example.
It is not possible or expedient to provide separate education or training in all areas, which leaves the alternative of supporting the participation of Roma in general education or training and vocational labour market training. The Roma population also considers participation in general vocational education and training important. It provides them with more options to choose their occupation and facilitates integration into working life. The educational model developed in projects aiming at the development of education for Roma, where study guidance and preparatory training is specifically aimed at Roma, and where each student can, according to an individual study plan, seek access to integrated vocational education and training within the general education system, has proved a viable method of implementation.
The importance of vocational and study counselling for the Roma population has often been emphasized in surveys on educational projects aimed at adult Roma in particular.
“The former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia”
Regardless of the fact that many institutions and international organisations are working together to improve education and employment of Roma, more needs to be done to speed up the whole proces. Results start being visible in the field, but needs are still present. Whilst a national action plan was adopted in the field of Roma employment with the objective, inter alia, to raise the education and qualifications of Roma, budgetary allocation would need to be more targeted at making Roma better informed about employment opportunities and legislation, at enhancing employment prospects, and at emerging Roma from underground economy.
CAHROM (2016)8
57

The European Training Foundation (ETF) argues that despite the continuous legislative improvements and changes through recent educational reform, the new legislation still has some of the old weaknesses which limit the effectiveness of the education policy. Most of the weaknesses are systemic ones, with unclear division of responsibilities and competencies between the several newly established institutions (for instance, the Bureau for Development of Education and Centre for Vocational Education and Training) and lack of synchronization between laws. In spite of a number of successful interventions, certain issues in the remained unregulated or insufficiently regulated.
The ETF study also found that the Law on Secondary Education is not coordinated with the other laws, such as the Law on Vocational Education and Training and the Law on Local Self-government. Local self- government units have insufficient information about the local labour markets, and vocational education and training is not a priority for them. Programmes and strategies (e.g. the Strategy for Reduction of Poverty and Social Exclusion) do not make any specific reference to vocational education as a potentially powerful tool for increasing social inclusion and cohesion.
The project providing scholarships, mentoring and tutoring for Roma pupils in their 1st, 2nd, 3rd and 4th years of secondary education, supported by the Roma Education Fund (REF), has had satisfactory results so far. The progress, attendance and attainments of the pupils were all increased, cooperation between the school, parents and children has also been improved, pupils were socialized, and the availability of textbooks and transportation to schools have also been improved. As reported in one of the schools, the progress of pupils, in general, is slower when parents are with lower education, poorer families and rural areas65.
Other follow-up measures to improve the situation would include:
 The promotion of active measures for employment among unemployed Roma;
 The preparation of measures only for unemployed Roma through an analysis of their profile,
skills, and education level;
 Putting emphasis on the implementation of vocational and training activities from the National
Action Plan for Employment;
 Working with employers to employ more Roma.
Turkey
There is a need to adopt and implement the National Strategy Document for the Social Inclusion of Roma People. This thematic report might be timely to introduce in the action plan some of the good practices identified in other member States concerning vocational education and training, and more generally-speaking education (pre-school, primary, secondary and university) and employment. There is also a need to collect statistical data concerning the depth and width of the social exclusion towards Roma.
There are incentives for employers encouraging them to employ more people based on the categories of age, gender, vocational educational background, disabilities etc. Jobseekers among Roma people can benefit from these incentives individually if he/she matches with any of the corresponding categories. A possible recommendation would be to make Roma themselves one specific category for the employers to benefit from incentives.
65 Assessment based on an interview with a school pedagogue, from Prilep municipality.
CAHROM (2016)8
 58

4.2
Poland
 

 
 
Good practices identified
Reactivation and modernisation of vocational education and training;
Making vocational activation an obligatory part of projects financed from European Social Fund, including the obligation for at least 3-month paid internship for Roma in ESF supported projects; Availability of ethnic data based on the national census: Poland has managed to collect some ethnic based data illustrating the general situation of the Roma ethnic minority in Poland through the National Censuses conducted in 2002 and 2011 respectively, and through available studies undertaken by the Public Opinion Research Centre (CBOS). Regular collection of data provide the possibility to compare, analyse, draw trends for better policy and budget planning; Scholarship programme for Roma pupils who continue education beyond the primary level;
A thirteenth month salary (bonus) for those employed on regular basis with permanent state paid job;
Roma assistants (more than 100) employed in city municipality social welfare offices66;
Social cooperatives (if they follow certain criteria and conditions).
Bosnia and Herzegovina
 Harmonisation of the educational system, including Secondary Education and Training;
 Recommendation letters from authorities to help Roma accessing scholarships, jobs, etc.;
 Good cooperation with international organisations and donors;
 Though this was not the main topic of this thematic visit, the Polish experts were impressed by
the housing policy and measures for Roma developed by Bosnia and Herzegovina and concluded
that they should focus and invest more on Roma housing.
 Free school meals, free textbooks, and free transport for Roma children in primary schools;
 Sponsored vocational training programmes targeting Roma women.
Finland
 Support and counselling provided to Roma to pursue their studies or to get acquainted with regional possibilities to study in vocational institutions or in general upper secondary schools;
 Roma pupils and students’ career guidance;
 Individualised career guidance (for example under the Kainuu project, Kajaani municipality);
 Roma cultural mediators;
 Combatting bullying at school;
 Incentives to choose employment rather than social benefits;
 ROM-EQUAL project for qualification-oriented vocational education/training for Roma adults;
 Participatory approach involving and consulting Roma throughout the process, from the drafting
of projects and policies up to the monitoring of their implementation.
“The former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia”
66 The Roma assistant from Harangos association who was present at the meeting indicated that in five months she helped two persons finding a job, managed to have one child accessing kindergarten and helped several families for family planning, diet and other health care issues. Three Harangos’ association members are working as Roma school assistants, employed by Cracow municipality (schools) who are taking care of all together 180 Roma children (averagely they are therefore responsible for 60 children each, but not every of those children need a support of Roma school assistants).
CAHROM (2016)8
  Micro-credits to help Roma start an enterprise;
 Free-of-charge vocational training courses for the most vulnerable;  Incentives for entrepreneurs to hire Roma;
 59

    
  

Turkey
Good cooperation with international organisations and donors, including REF, UNICEF and IPA; On-the-job training with a strong focus on Roma youth and women;
Internship/traineeship programmes;
Needs assessment for unemployed young Roma;
Free books and transportation from the place of residence to the school for children enrolled in secondary education;
System of mentoring and tutoring;
Scholarships for the students from poor families, especially Roma students;
Introduction of Conditional Cash Transfers (CCTs) for children from poor families who regularly attend secondary schools. The transfer is given when a child from a family that receives social financial assistance is enrolled and regularly attends a school with the joint aims of strengthening the effectiveness and efficiency of the social safety net, as well as of enhancing the human capital of children from socially disadvantaged families;
Reduced criteria (points) for enrolment of Roma pupils in secondary school by 10% from the prescribed minimum points..

 
4.3
The catch-up education programme approved by the Education Board in 2008, which is directed at children 10-14 years of age who have never been enrolled at school or who have dropped out. This initiative which concerns mostly Roma children reinforces opportunities in access to education and to employment;
Inclusion of Roma women in the MS4ROW project in Dücze providing vocational training courses; Social Solidarity Centres (SSC) promoting social integration of Roma women in 15 regions and privding vocational training and social activities.
Possible follow-up
Tailored promotion of vocational education and training among Roma;
Promotion of any forms of co-operation with craft chambers at the level of regions by the network of Regional Plenipotentiaries of Voivodes on the National and Ethnic Minorities;
Putting emphasis on one of the measures of the “Programme for the integration on of the Roma community in Poland for the period 2014-2020” in the 3rd Chapter called “THE EMPLOYMENT”, i.e.: “Attendance of Roma taking advantage of training and courses to lift vocational qualifications” bearing in mind its specific objective which is to raise the level of vocational activity of the Roma at the level of 6 % growth. It can be achieved by gaining vocational skills and apprenticeships, retraining or raising vocational qualifications, professional internships, etc.
Poland
 

Bosnia and Herzegovina
 Develop measures to attract more Roam in vocational education and training;
 Provide all Roma with identity documents so as to reduce administrative barriers;
 Make other countries’ benefit of Bosnia and Herzegovina’s experience on Roma housing issues.
Finland
 Circulating to the CAHROM and to the experts of the thematic group an English version of the national report on the education of Finnish adult Roma once it is finalised and available;
CAHROM (2016)8
60

 Sharing the Finnish experience in attracting Finnish Roma students in vocational education/training with other member States where there is still a reluctance of Roma to enrol in such programmes.
“The former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia”
 Providing the Polish and other partner countries’ experts with contact details and website of the Roma Education Fund and Roma Memorial concerning scholarships for young Roma who want to continue their studies.
Turkey
 Adoption of the governmental Roma integration strategy and, if time permits, introduction in its Action Plan elements concerning vocational education and training resulting from the lessons learnt from this report;
 Organisation of a CAHROM thematic visit on access of Roma to employment in 2017 that would build on the conclusions of the present thematic report.
At the level of the Council of Europe:
 Contacting relevant persons at national, regional and local levels to include identified promising, good and replicable practices in its online database on Roma-related good practices;
 Using the main conclusions and lessons learnt from this thematic report in future education or employment related thematic groups (e.g. the forthcoming thematic visit on access of Roma to employment proposed by Turkey in 2017);
 Facilitate contacts between various participating countries of this thematic group and the Council of Europe Development Bank (CEB) for eventually exploring any projects related to vocational training, micro-credits or support to small enterprises and family-own businesses.
CAHROM (2016)8
61

Appendix 1: Official invitation received from Polish authorities on 13 October 2015
Zeskanowano za
pomocą urządzenia wielofunkcyjnego Xerox.pdf
Appendix 2: List of experts participating in the CAHROM thematic visit
POLAND List of
experts of the CAHROM thematic group on vocational training and education Nov 2015.doc
Appendix 3: Agenda of the CAHROM thematic visit to Cracow, Poland, on 26-28 November 2015
FINAL AGENDA ENG VERSION 15 11 15.docx
Appendix 4: Other examples of projects and initiatives related to vocational education and training in Council of Europe member States that are not covered by this thematic report
CAHROM (2016)8
       ALBANIA: FRANCE:
GERMANY: HUNGARY:
SLOVAKIA:
Albanian Vocational Education Training Programme (AlbVet) – Social Inclusion, 201267; Skills accreditation for people who are not graduated and dropped out of school (Validation des Acquis de l’Expérience-VAT);
The Stichting Sinti Werk provides basic education for young people who dropped out of school;
The alternative vocational school “Roma chance” in Szolnok set up in 1996 provides vocational training and remedial education for Roma and non-Roma, aged 12-22 with basic instructions and vocational training; the “Kayli Jag” Roma school in Budapest is a two-year training course for children not enrolled into state secondary schools68; Vocational training in the Liptovsky Mikulas and Rimavska Sobota districts.
 67
68
https://books.google.fr/books?id=Y4coNcT0uhkC&pg=PA88&lpg=PA88&dq=vocational+training+roma&source=bl&ots=9godmq Flhp&sig=hRRbYZ_BVROQvcz9mqA1TYQv5bk&hl=fr&sa=X&ved=0CFMQ6AEwB2oVChMIqKzrjLWNyQIVCoYaCh2r- wjw#v=onepage&q=vocational%20training%20roma&f=false
information see: http://webcache.googleusercontent.com/search?q=cache:yWxJuBE18soJ:www.esn- eu.org/raw.php%3Fpage%3Dfiles%26id%3D152+&cd=6&hl=fr&ct=clnk&gl=fr
For further
     62

Appendix 5: Compulsory education69 comparative table
CAHROM (2016)8
    Country
Belgium
France Germany Hungary
Italy Netherlands
Norway
Russian Federation
Slovenia Spain Sweden
Age Range
6-18
6-16 6-16 3-16
6-16 5-18
6-15
6-17
6-15 6-16 7-16
Notes
     Finland
    7-15
   Beginning age is negotiable ± 1 year. Ends after graduation from comprehensive school, or at least 9 years.
    Varies slightly between states.
Since 2015, kindergarten is compulsory from age 3, although exceptions are made for developmental reasons
Students are allowed to leave early after obtaining their 'start qualification' (MBO level 2, HAVO or VWO degree) Total of 10 years while primary is year 1-7 (without the grades) and lower secondary (with grades) is year 8-10.
Student may leave after age 15 with the approval of parents and local authority.
              Poland
    6-18
   Polish law distinguishes between compulsory school (obowiązek szkolny) and compulsory education (obowiązek nauki).
  Portugal
   6-18
  It is the law that children living in Portugal (if there for 4 months or more) must go to school. Home schooling is available with registration at a school and quarterly examinations in the Portuguese curriculum only
            “The former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia”
    6-18
   There are 9 years compulsory primary education (from 0 to 8 class) and 4 years compulsory secondary education.
  Turkey
  6-18
 From the 1st to the 12th grade, education is compulsory. Starting in the educational year of 2012-2013, an education reform took effect to bring the compulsory education up to the end of high school. The system is commonly referred to as 4+4+4.
  United Kingdom
    5-18
   Requirement is for a full-time education, but attendance at a school is not compulsory (section 7 of The Education Act 1996).
  69 Source: Wikipedia https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Compulsory_education.
 63

Appendix 6: Eurostat statistical data
There is also strong and obvious relation between the level of education and rate of unemployment70: Eurostat Table 1: Unemployment rates, 2014, ranked on the average of male and female.
Eurostat Table 2: Unemployment rate by level of educational attainment, 2014 (in %).
70
CAHROM (2016)8
    http://ec.europa.eu/eurostat/statistics- explained/images/1/1c/Figure_9_Unemployment_rate_by_level_of_educational_attainment%2C_2014_%28%25%29.png.
  64

Eurostat Table 3: Youth unemployment, 2014 Q4 (in %)
CAHROM (2016)8
 65

 15 May 2018
STUDY VISIT TO THE UK FORCED MARRIAGE UNIT ORGANISED AS A FOLLOW-UP TO PREVIOUS COUNCIL OF EUROPE AND NATIONAL ACTIVITIES ON CHILD AND/OR FORCED MARRIAGE WITHIN ROMA AND TRAVELLER COMMUNITIES
London, United Kingdom, 7-8 December 2017
FINAL VERSION OF THE REPORT
FOR DISCUSSION AT THE 15th CAHROM PLENARY MEETING (ATHENS, GREECE, 22-25 MAY 2018)
Image: Poster of the 2nd International Roma Women’s Conference held in Athens, Greece in February 2010
CAHROM (2017)33
  
TABLE OF CONTENTS I. INTRODUCTION TO THE STUDY VISIT
1.1 Why was the study organised
II. DIFFERENCE BETWEEN EARLY/CHILD AND FORCED MARRIAGE
2.1 Child marriage (early marriage)
2.2 Forced marriage
III. COUNCIL OF EUROPE CONVENTIONS
3.1 Convention on Preventing and combating violence against women and domestic violence (Istanbul convention)
3.2 Convention on the Protection of children against sexual exploitation and sexual abuse (Lanzarote Convention)
3.3 Convention on Action against trafficking in human beings (Warsaw Convention)
IV. PRESENTATION BY THE UNITED KINGDOM HOME OFFICE DEPARTMENT FOR COMMUNITIES AND LOCAL GOVERNMENT, THE FOREIGN AND COMMONWEALTH OFFICE
FORCED MARRIAGE UNIT AND OTHER SPEAKERS FROM THE UK
V. DEVELOPMENTS SINCE 2015 AND COMMENTS FROM THE PARTIPATING COUNTRIES
4.1 Finland
4.2 France
4.3 Greece
4.4 Ireland (GRETA) 4.5 Italy
4.6 Poland
VI. GENERAL CONCLUSIONS AND RECOMMENDATIONS
APPENDICES
Appendix 1. Extracts concerning early marriage incidence for marginalised Roma women in Albania, Bosnia and Herzegovina, Kosovo*, Montenegro, Serbia and “the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia” from the 2017 UNDP/World Bank Fact sheets
“Roma at a glance”
Appendix 2: Agenda of the Study visit to the UK Forced Marriage Unit
Appendix 3: List of participants of the Study visit to the UK Forced Marriage Unit
page 3
page 3
page 4
page 4 page 4
page 5
page 5 page 5 page 6
page 7
page 14
page 14 page 15 page 24 page 29 page 30 page 32
page 34 page 37
page 37 page 38 page 38
2
CAHROM (2017)33

I. INTRODUCTION TO THE STUDY VISIT
The Study visit to the UK Forced Marriage Unit (FMU) was organised as a follow-up to the thematic visit by the Ad hoc Committee of Experts on Roma and Traveller Issues (CAHROM) on Child/Early and Forced Marriages within Roma Communities in the context of the Promotion of Gender Equality held in Bucharest, Romania on 27-29 April 2015.
As a reminder, the proposal for setting-up a CAHROM thematic group on addressing and combating early and/or forced marriages within Roma communities was put forward by Romania (as a requesting country) during the 7th CAHROM plenary meeting in May 2014. Italy, the Republic of Moldova, the Netherlands and Poland had expressed immediate interest to be partner countries. The United Kingdom confirmed its interest to be a partner country at the 8th CAHROM meeting in Sarajevo (28-31 October 2014) when this thematic group was reconfirmed and scheduled for April 2015. The CAHROM endorsed the thematic report at its 11th meeting in 2016 (see document CAHROM(2015)81).
As indicated in the thematic report, the Dutch and Italian experts of the CAHROM thematic group had expressed the wish to visit the Forced Marriage Unit in London so as to get more familiar with the British approach in dealing with forced marriages and the work of the Forced Marriage Unit. Among the proposed follow-up, a study visit to London had been proposed.
The Study visit was also a follow-up to the international “Seminar on Forms of Violence against Roma and Traveller Women and Girls” (including child and forced marriage) which took place in Strasbourg in December 2016. The proposal of a study visit to the UK had been further discussed at the Seminar following a presentation of the British approach.
In November 2017, Ms Sophie Lott, Specialist Case Worker and Designated Safeguarding Officer at the Forced Marriage Unit invited the Council of Europe, and experts from the countries having participated in the CAHROM thematic visit, as well as from any other interested countries to take part in a study visit at the FMU in London, on 7-8 December 2017.
France, Greece, Italy, and Poland designated experts for this follow-up study visit. This included a representative from the Ministry of Justice of Italy, the Adviser for Education and Children’s rights of France’s Inter-ministerial delegation for lodging and access to lodging (DIHAL), representatives from equality bodies from Greece and Poland, two Roma women having conducted research on this topic from France and Italy, a policeman from Poland, and the Italian JUSTROM national coordinator.
Unfortunately Albania, Bulgaria, the Netherlands and Romania were not in a position to provide experts for the selected dates.
The CAHROM Gender Equality Rapporteur (from Finland) and the Chair of GRETA (from Ireland) joined the group. The Secretariat of both GREVIO and the Parliamentary Assembly of the Council of Europe (PACE)2 were invited to designate an expert but no one could attend due to parallel commitments.
The travel and subsistence costs of the delegation were covered by a voluntary contribution from the Government of Finland to the Council of Europe Roma and Travellers Team budget.
The present report is makes partial reference to the report of the CAHROM thematic visit which remains a valuable source of information on the topic of child and/or forced marriage within Roma communities in countries covered by the report (Italy, the Republic of Moldova, the Netherlands, Poland, Romania and the United Kingdom, (see document CAHROM(2015)8).
In Appendix 1, you will find relevant extracts from the 2017 UNDP/World Bank Fact sheets “Roma at a glance”3 concerning early marriage incidence for marginalised Roma women in Albania, Bosnia and Herzegovina, Kosovo*4, Montenegro, Serbia and “the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia”.
1 Available on CAHROM website https://www.coe.int/en/web/portal/cahrom.
2 Ms Béatrice FRESKO-ROLFO (Monaco, EPP/CD) is preparing a PACE report on Forced marriage in Europe.
3 http://www.eurasia.undp.org/content/rbec/en/home/library/roma/regional-roma-survey-2017-country-fact-sheets.html
CAHROM (2017)33
     3

II. DIFFERENCE BETWEEN EARLY/CHILD AND FORCED MARRIAGES 2.1 Child marriage (early marriage)
Resolution 1468(2005) of the Parliamentary Assembly of the Council of Europe on forced marriages and child marriages defines child marriage as “the union of two persons at least one of whom is under 18 years of age”5. In this Resolution, the Parliamentary Assembly of the Council of Europe shows its deep concern about the violations of human rights and the rights of the child which are constituted by forced marriages and child marriages and draws attention on the fact that, under the cloak of respect for culture and traditions, there are authorities which tolerate forced marriages and child marriages, although they violate the fundamental rights of those involved.
In most of the reports, notably those from the United Nations Population Fund (UNFPA), which are covering child marriage in several South East European countries6, it is defined as the “union of two persons, officially or unofficially, at least one of whom is under eighteen years of age”.
“Early marriage” is commonly used in place of “child marriage”, for example in UNICEF documents7.
➢ In the opinion of the experts of the CAHROM thematic group, the appropriate term to designate this practice is “child marriage” instead of “early marriage”; the first expression reflects accurately the gravity of the facts, i.e. a child is the victim of this practice.
Although the minimum legal age for marriage varies across Europe (usually between 16 and 18), the UN Committee on the Elimination of Discrimination against Women (CEDAW) and the UN Committee on the Rights of the Child (CRC) recommend that governments set the minimum legal age for marriage to 188. According to this standard, the results that follow consider all marriages between people below the age of 18 as early marriages.
2.2 Forced marriage
Resolution 1468(2005) of the Parliamentary Assembly of the Council of Europe on Forced marriages and child marriages defines forced marriage as “the union of two persons at least one of whom has not given their full and free consent to the marriage. Since it infringes the fundamental human rights of the individual, forced marriage can in no way be justified”.9
Forced marriage can therefore be defined by the lack of consent – either as decided by an adult woman or by virtue of her being under the age of the legal consent (usually 18 but may vary pending national legislation) in the decision to enter a marriage with a particular spouse. Several parameters can however vary from a country to another such as the age of legal consent, age of sexual consent, matrimonial age...
➢ The CAHROM group of experts considers that the key parameter to define forced marriage is the lack of free consent of the person. Not every child marriage is a forced marriage, unless a third party (usually an adult) is involved. When two young people get “married” or decide to be in an official or unofficial union, it does not have to be considered as a forced marriage or union.
Participants took note that in the United Kingdom, child marriage is de facto considered to be forced marriage as a child cannot make an informed decision about committing to marriage.
4 "All reference to Kosovo, whether to the territory, institutions or population, in this text shall be understood in full compliance with United Nations Security Council Resolution 1244 and without prejudice to the status of Kosovo."
5 Council of Europe Parliamentary Assembly Resolution (2005)1468 on Forced marriages and child marriages, available at http://www.refworld.org/docid/43f5d5184.html.
See for instance UNFPA report “Child marriage in Kosovo - Overview” from November 2012 at http://eeca.unfpa.org/sites/default/files/pub-pdf/unfpa%20kosovo%20overview.pdf.
7 The state of the World’s children 2006, page on early marriage: http://www.unicef.org/sowc06/profiles/marriage.php.
8 “Protecting the girl child: Using the law to end child, early and forced marriage and related human rights violations”, Equality Now, January 2014, http://www.equalitynow.org/sites/default/files/Protecting_the_Girl_Child.pdf .
9 See PACE Resolution 1468(2005) at http://www.refworld.org/docid/43f5d5184.html.
CAHROM (2017)33
      6
    4

III. COUNCIL OF EUROPE CONVENTIONS
The Council of Europe Convention on Preventing and Combating Violence against Women and
3.1
Domestic Violence (known as the Istanbul Convention) covers the issue of Child/Forced marriages
a. violence against women is understood as a violation of human rights and a form of discrimination against women and shall mean all acts of gender-based violence that result in, or are likely to result in, physical, sexual, psychological or economic harm or suffering to women, including threats of such acts, coercion or arbitrary deprivation of liberty, whether occurring in public or in private life;
b. domestic violence shall mean all acts of physical, sexual, psychological or economic violence that occur within the family or domestic unit or between former or current spouses or partners, whether or not the perpetrator shares or has shared the same residence with the victim;
c. gender shall mean the socially constructed roles, behaviours, activities and attributes that a given society considers appropriate for women and men;
d. gender-based violence against women shall mean violence that is directed against a woman because she is a woman or that affects women disproportionately.
It includes articles on making Child/Forced marriage illegal and punishable by law.
- Article 32 – Civil consequences of forced marriages.
Parties shall take the necessary legislative or other measures to ensure that marriages concluded under force may be voidable, annulled or dissolved without undue financial or administrative burden placed on the victim.
- Article 37 – Forced marriage.
Parties shall take the necessary legislative or other measures to ensure that the intentional conduct of forcing an adult or a child to enter into a marriage is criminalised.
The status of signature / ratification / entry into force of the (envisaged) participating countries:
CAHROM (2017)33
    Country
Albania
Bulgaria
Finland
France
Greece
Ireland
Italy
The Netherlands Poland
Romania
United Kingdom
Signature Ratification
Entry into force
    19/12/2011
21/04/2016
11/05/2011     17/04/2015   01/08/2015
         11/05/2011 11/05/2011 05/11/2015 27/09/2012 14/11/2012 18/12/2012 27/06/2014 08/06/2012
04/02/2013 04/07/2014
01/08/2014 01/11/2014
            10/09/2013 18/11/2015 27/04/2015 23/05/2016
01/08/2014 01/03/2016 01/08/2015 01/09/2016
                    3.2 Council of Europe Convention on the Protection of Children against Sexual Exploitation and Sexual Abuse, known as the Lanzarote Convention (it does not explicitly cover child / forced marriage but interpretation of some articles could be extended to cover it)
Article 18 – Sexual abuse
1.
Each Party shall take the necessary legislative or other measures to ensure that the following intentional
conduct is criminalised:
a. engaging in sexual activities with a child who, according to the relevant provisions of national law,
has not reached the legal age for sexual activities;
b. engaging in sexual activities with a child where:
– use is made of coercion, force or threats; or
– abuse is made of a recognised position of trust, authority or influence over the child, including within
the family; or
– abuse is made of a particularly vulnerable situation of the child, notably because of a mental or
physical disability or a situation of dependence.
5

The status of signature / ratification / entry into force of the (envisaged) participating countries:
CAHROM (2017)33
 Country
Albania
Bulgaria
Finland
France
Greece
Ireland
Italy
The Netherlands Poland
Romania
United Kingdom
Signature     Ratification   Entry into force
    17/12/2008
25/10/2007
25/10/2007
25/10/2007
25/10/2007
25/10/2007
07/11/2007     03/01/2013   01/05/2013
14/04/2009 15/12/2011 09/06/2011 27/09/2010 10/03/2009
01/07/2010 01/04/2012 01/10/2011 01/01/2011 01/07/2010
                         25/10/2007 25/10/2007 25/10/2007 05/05/2008
01/03/2010 20/02/2015 17/05/2011
01/07/2010 01/06/2015 01/09/2011
                3.3 Council of Europe Convention on Action against Trafficking in Human Beings, also known as the Warsaw Convention (it does not explicitly cover child / forced marriage but interpretation of some articles could be extended to cover it)
a. "Trafficking in human beings" shall mean the recruitment, transportation, transfer, harbouring or receipt of persons, by means of the threat or use of force or other forms of coercion, of abduction, of fraud, of deception, of the abuse of power or of a position of vulnerability or of the giving or receiving of payments or benefits to achieve the consent of a person having control over another person, for the purpose of exploitation. Exploitation shall include, at a minimum, the exploitation of the prostitution of others or other forms of sexual exploitation, forced labour or services, slavery or practices similar to slavery, servitude or the removal of organs;
b. The consent of a victim of “trafficking in human beings” to the intended exploitation set forth in subparagraph (a) of this article shall be irrelevant where any of the means set forth in subparagraph (a) have been used;
c. The recruitment, transportation, transfer, harbouring or receipt of a child for the purpose of exploitation shall be considered "trafficking in human beings" even if this does not involve any of the means set forth in subparagraph (a) of this article;
d. "Child" shall mean any person under eighteen years of age;
e. "Victim" shall mean any natural person who is subject to trafficking in human beings as defined in this
article.
The status of signature / ratification / entry into force of the (envisaged) participating countries in the Study visit:
    Country
Albania
Bulgaria
Finland
France
Greece
Ireland
Italy
The Netherlands Poland
Romania
United Kingdom
Signature
22/12/2005 22/11/2006 29/08/2006 22/05/2006 17/11/2005 13/04/2007 08/06/2005 17/11/2005 16/05/2005 16/05/2005 23/03/2007
Ratification
Entry into force
    06/02/2007
17/04/2007
30/05/2012
09/01/2008
11/04/2014
13/07/2010     01/11/2010
01/02/2008 01/02/2008 01/09/2012 01/05/2008 01/08/2014
                      29/11/2010 22/04/2010 17/11/2008 21/08/2006 17/12/2008
01/03/2011 01/08/2010 01/03/2009 01/02/2008 01/04/2009
                    6

IV. PRESENTATION BY THE UNITED KINGDOM HOME OFFICE DEPARTMENT FOR COMMUNITIES AND LOCAL GOVERNMENT AND THE FOREIGN AND COMMONWEALTH OFFICE FORCED MARRIAGE UNIT AND OTHER SPEAKERS FROM THE UK10
Introduction to the UK context
In her introduction Ms Julia Wilcox from the Department for Communities and Local Government outlined that the perception the wider society has towards Gypsies and Travellers is still very negative. They view them as aggressive, disrespectful of the law and criminals.
The UK uses Gypsies/Roma/Travellers in its documents. The first group is the Romani Gypsies who arrived in the UK five centuries ago and want to be called “Gypsies” in the UK context or sometimes “Roma/Gypsies”. Another group is the Travellers who are of Celtic descent constitute a second group. A third group is made of newly arrived Roma from the Balkans or Central Eastern Europe (more often designated as “Roma”).
They are a self-described ethnicity so if they do not declare themselves as such, they are not included in the statistics. Officially there is no definition of national minorities; categories a) and b) above are considered as British citizens. However, for planning purposes, self-described ethnicity is taken into account.
It appears that in Traveller communities, domestic violence and marriage between first cousins is common. When a woman wants to leave the community, the men physically keep them from leaving. Someone from the community is needed to speak about issues to the community.
UK policy and legal frameworks
The 2007 Forced Marriage (Civil Protection) Act brought into being the use of Forced Marriage Protection Orders (FMPO). FMPOs are civil court orders with legally binding requirements to protect a person at risk. They have been used to both restrict the actions of those presenting a risk of forced marriage to another, to prevent marriages from occurring and can also be used to ensure someone is safely returned to the United Kingdom from overseas. They can be used pre-and post-marriage. Police, social services and any 3rd party given permission by court can obtain and use this tool to assist those at risk. FMPOs conditions include:
- Protect victims from being taken overseas/or being them back;
- Stop them for being forced into marriage whether religious or otherwise;
- Stop them being hurt/harmed or threatened;
- Stop them being harassed.
FMPOs are critical in cases where victim is in a country that FMU cannot assist in; freedom of movement is restricted or where the FMU has no contact address. Failure to comply resulted in a “contempt of court” and was punishable by up to 2 years in prison.
Following a detailed consultation, on 8 June 2012, the UK Prime Minister announced that the Government would make forcing someone to marry a criminal offence.
The 2014 Anti-Social Behaviour, Crime and Policing Bill:
- criminalises of the act of forcing someone to marry against their will,
- criminalises the act of luring of a person to a territory of a state for the purpose of forcing them to
enter into marriage without consent,
- criminalises the act of using deception with the intention of causing a person to leave the UK with the
intention of forcing that person to marry,
10 Presentations by Mr Neil DAY, Forced Marriage Unit, on learning disability cases in the UK – supporting the most vulnerable, by Mr Jason DOONDEEA, Forced Marriage Unit, on immigration and forced marriage – how to support those already forced into marriage, and by Ms Aissa GAYE, Home Office, on how forced marriage fits into the wider remit on VAWG strategy have not been summarized in the present report due to lack of support documentation.
CAHROM (2017)33
 7

CAHROM (2017)33
- if a person lacks the capacity to consent, the offence is also capable of being committed by any conduct carried out for the purpose of causing the victim to marry, whether or not it amounts to violence, threats or any other form of coercion,
- criminalises the breach of a Forced Marriage Protection Order (FMPO).
The Foreign and Commonwealth Office and Home Office have set up a specific website on forced marriage11: This website provides:
- a definition of “forced marriage”,
- Information for people directly affected by forced marriage,
- Brief information about the Forced Marriage Unit (FMU) - a joint Foreign and Commonwealth Office
and Home Office unit set up in January 2005 to lead on the Government’s forced marriage policy,
outreach and casework, and FMU contacts,
- Legislation on forced marriage, in particular The Anti-social Behaviour, Crime and Policing Act 2014
which makes forced marriage a criminal offence to force someone to marry,
- Statistics on Forced Marriage collected by the FMU. The Forced Marriage Unit statistics for 2017 highlights that the number of cases handled with children aged 15 and under was at 15.6% and 16-17
year olds was 14.1%12. By comparison, see previous years’ statistics:
o Statistics on forced marriage for 2015 ; Statistics on forced marriage for 2014 o Statistics on forced marriage for 2013 ; Statistics on forced marriage for 2012
- Guidance for professionals
o Multi-Agency Statutory Guidance for dealing with forced marriage 2014
o Multi-Agency practice guidelines: Handling cases of forced marriage 2014
o 2010 Review of implementation of statutory guidance across public agencies in England and
Wales
o Guidance for Members of Parliament and constituency offices
o Guidance for Registrars
- eLearning training for professionals,
- Information about an Outreach programme run by the FMU across the UK to raise awareness of
forced marriage and about the 2015/16 FMU Domestic Programme Fund,
- Publications and other resources
o What is a forced marriage? (leaflet)
o Forced Marriage Protection Orders / Forced Marriage Protection Orders (leaflets) o Marriage: it’s your choice: (cards)
o Forced Marriage poster English available in 9 other languages (but not in Romani) o Forced Marriage: A Survivors Handbook (handbook)
o Campaign videos (see the website).
The Forced Marriage Unit (FMU), established in 200513, is now the Government’s main delivery arm for developing effective Government policy; awareness-raising; and domestic and consular casework. The FMU provides direct assistance to victims, as well as undertakes a full programme of outreach activity to practitioners and communities to ensure that people working with victims are fully informed of how to approach such cases. Overseas the FMU provides consular assistance to victims prior to or after marriage to secure their return to the United Kingdom. The Forced Marriage Unit (FMU) provides support at every stage by:
- helping to protect children – the FMU helps those working in education and safeguarding children know how to spot the earliest signs a child may be at risk and know what action to take – this has included revised statutory guidance for professionals and multi-agency guidelines for handling forced marriage. The FMU is also working with NGOs like Freedom Charity to raise awareness in schools through the use of the Freedom mobile phone ap, the accredited lesson plans of forced marriage and a free copy of the "But it’s not fair’ Aneeta Prem book to all libraries, police forces and schools that request them for every pupil (a fictional story written for children aged between 11-16 on how to help a friend at risk);
11 https://www.gov.uk/guidance/forced-marriage. 12https://assets.publishing.service.gov.uk/government/uploads/system/uploads/attachment_data/file/705621/2017_FMU_statistics_FI NAL.PDF
13 https://www.gov.uk/forced-marriage.
                      8

CAHROM (2017)33
- assisting young people at risk of being taken abroad and forced into marriage – in 2012, the FMU ran a major summer awareness campaign highlighting the right to choose and the help that is available. In 2014 the FMU had an awareness campaign before school holidays all through social media – reflecting the need to use avenues and formats which children and teens would use themselves. The FMU also worked with National Society for the Prevention of Children Cruelty (NSPCC) to create a short animation aimed at 13-17 year olds explaining the change in Law and the difference between arranged and forced marriage. In addition to this, the FMU also undertakes approximately 120 outreach events annually, including in schools and colleges;
- raising awareness across all communities – the FMU has rolled out a nation-wide engagement programme focused on prevention and education, delivered through regional road shows and debates – this has been in conjunction with Karma Nirvana a leading NGO whose national helpline specifically supports those at risk of Honour-Based-Violence (HBV) and/or forced marriage;
- ensuring that victims receive the right support in a joined up way – the FMU has developed and expanded its current training for frontline professionals ensuring all the relevant agencies are included - the CPS, the police, the judiciary, health agencies, social services, and Independent Domestic and Sexual Violence Advisors – ensuring that every local authority nominates a Single Point of Contact;
- assisting those who have already become victims overseas – the FMU continues to fund a comprehensive package of support for those who are repatriated, inclusive of funding NGO Southall Black Sisters to provide one to one care and support for victims repatriated – this includes, housing, counselling, legal protection, engaging again with education and employment and helping them to access benefits they are entitled to.
For example, the FMU issues special permits to allow victims of trafficking to stay in the country. They can also write a letter to ensure benefits are not suspended if the victim is taken overseas against her will.
In addition, the FMU collects statistics14 from calls to its National Helpline15. Through its national helpline and email address the FMU reassures, assists, provides options and remains victim focused. It works with police, social workers, teachers, welfare officers, health professionals and many others in United Kingdom to protect people at risk. It provides support, guidance, information and contacts and arranges safe accommodation in the United Kingdom.
When the victim has been taken overseas, the FMU provides the following support:
- Signposting to BHC/Embassies,
- Arrange safe accommodation overseas,
- Assistance with their return to the UK, providing local knowledge linked to exit visas,
- Close work with police and staff at airports addressing preventative measures and safety/support
whilst victims are in the airport and then managing risks for victims upon their return,
- Awareness of local laws in order to provide advice on any travel limitations,
- Organise repatriation - and rescues in extreme cases,
- Accompanying victims to the airport – especially in the case of minors,
- Organise emergency flights/ travel documents with safe pick-up and transport from airport.
The FMU also provides after-care for repatriated victims. An aftercare project is being delivered by the NGO Southall Black Sisters which provides emotional and practical support for victims that have been repatriated to the United Kingdom. Without support, victims can experience pressure to return home. This project aims to bridge the gap that victims experience in support and practical advice and enable them to develop a plan for the future. Funding for repatriation run for up to six months.
The FMU has partly funded a useful free app developed by Freedom Charity for both potential victims and those concerned for others. Some of the features of this free app are:
- GPS Tracking,
- Advice for professionals – spotting the signs,
- Advice and checklist for friends and friends of victims,
- Links to nearest police station and hospitals,
14 See those statistics under sub-chapter 3.6.
15 +44 (0)207008 0151 from 9am-5pm Mon-Fri and GRC out of hours.
 9

CAHROM (2017)33
- Information also on sexual abuse and FGM,
- Direct dial to Police, NSPCC, Freedom charity and the FMU helpline at the Foreign Office,
- Does not look like Forced Marriage App,
- Free to download on IPhones and Blackberries.
The FMU has published inter alia the following:
- Booklet “What is a forced marriage”,
- Survivors’ Handbook;
- Statutory Guidance;
- Guidance for Registrars;
- Guidance for MPs and Councillors.
The Multi-Agency Practice Guidelines16 provides a list of warning signs (that are not exclusive to forced marriage though):
- Anyone, male or female, adult or minor, when facing a threat of forced marriage may become anxious, depressed and emotionally withdrawn with low self-esteem,
- there may also be more overt (but less common) signs in cases involving females; for example cut or shaved hair (as form of punishment), being taken to the doctors to be examined to ensure she is a virgin or presenting to hospital/doctors with symptoms associated with poisoning.
This is a positive evolution as professionals are trained to spot warning signs.
In her presentation, Ms Sophie LOTT, Specialist Case Worker and Designated Safeguarding Officer, Forced Marriage Unit, described the work and resources of the FMU as explained above but also highlighted the following points:
- the UK counts between 5 and 10 Roma cases per year,
- According to UK law, a marriage conducted without the valid consent of one or both parties and
where duress is a factor is considered to be a forced marriage,
- The Mental Capacity Act, no coercion or consent needed as lack of mental capacity,
- There are different types of pressures used to force a girl/woman into marriage: physical,
psychological/emotional, financial (dowries) or sexual,
- When one feels they can’t say no it’s forced. An arranged can become a forced marriage,
- Forced marriage is perpetuated because of so-called perceived cultural or religions ideals but abuse is
never part of any culture,
- Marriage for citizenship can sometimes be forced,
- Forced marriages are often to protect family reputations and honour. Clans marry not individuals,
- Honour based violence: the perpetrators are manifold, the whole community, family or clan,
- The role of police is safeguarding not arresting,
- The role of local authorities is important and they need adequate trained,
- Clear guidelines and statutory guidance are essential,
- Measures of the long-term impact of forced marriages should be made,
- Early interventions needed to raise awareness,
- Community engagement instead of administrative interventions. Groups will feel less targeted,
- Forced marriages could also happen because a career is needed to mind a learning or physically
disabled person. Are learning or physical disabilities in Roma communities stigmatised? Does it make it look better if they are married? Will the spouse take care of the disabled person?
Remarks and recommendations
There are not many reported cases of child/forced marriages in the Roma community living in the UK and actions need to be developed to deal with this community. Their real social needs have to be defined in order to tailor the support to the community.
There is a need to equip the girls to make adult decisions.
A major problem is that the financial burden of poverty and exclusion lies on the State, and in the long-run it is unsustainable.
16 A full list of warning indicators can be found on page 13 of the Multi-Agency Practice Guidelines. 10
  
The Council of Europe representative also recommended the UK Forced Marriage Unit to make a comparative analysis between the situation in England, Wales, Scotland and Northern Ireland since the Scottish and Northern Irish legislative and policy frameworks are slightly different from the ones in England and Wales.
Presentation by Ms Meena PATEL, Southall Black Sisters on end-to-end support for victims, funded by the UK Forced Marriage Unit to assist in returning repatriation cases
Southall Black Sisters provide one to one care and support for victims which includes, housing, counselling, legal protection, engaging again with education and employment and helping them to access benefits to which they are entitled as well statutory services like social services and the police. They receive about 3500 cases a year. They function on a holistic multi-agency approach.
Services offered include:
Repatriation,
Individual counselling and group therapy,
Shelters (a shelter for victims of forced marriages was recently opened near Bologna, Italy), Access to justice for women abandoned in other countries,
Forced Marriage Guidance.
Many points were raised during the discussions among which:
• It is frequent that women want to stop the forced marriage but not criminalise their parents or family. They are worried about the repercussions for their family and do not want to dishonour them,
• Abuse starts from early childhood. Girls are formatted to think that they will be married off at a young age,
• There is a need for prevention and risk assessment,
• Housing is a major issue compounded by the fact that there are not enough shelters. Ideally women
should not stay longer than 6 months,
• Forced marriages also affect men, specifically men with disabilities to shift caring over to the spouse
and gay men to “cure the disease” of homosexuality. The Finnish participant mentioned that Finland
has a programme to assist men,
• Like in some South-Asian communities, there is the same notion of shame and dishonour in Roma
communities,
• The Forced Marriage Bill, if it passes through Parliament, will provide a stronger legal framework,
• The men’s mindset should be changed through education,
• Safeguarding other siblings is very important.
Southall Black Sisters pulled out of the FMU due to a difference of ideology. They don’t believe that mediation can be part of the process in cases of domestic violence whereas the FMU believes that mediation should be tried first.
Presentation by Ms Sara BROWNE from IKWRO (the Iranian and Kurdish Women’s Rights Organisation) highlighting the UK Force Marriage perspective with reflections from their annual report.
IKWRO Council of Europe presentation.pptx
During her presentation Ms Browne provided the group with some valuable information. The criminalisation of forced marriage in the UK in 2014 closed legal loopholes permitting child marriages. This protection has increased by 53% the number of women going to the police to report cases. From 2010 to 2016, 24 774 cases were recorded by police. However, many cases don’t go to prosecution due to a lack of training of law enforcement officers on how to treat them. Moreover, there is cultural aspect to this issue and the police can be wary about getting involved as they may be accused of racism. A campaign was carried out to change mentalities.
She suggests that women are the key to ending the cycle and has made the following recommendations:
CAHROM (2017)33
 11

CAHROM (2017)33
- Expanding knowledge about honour based violence as it is often misdiagnosed and the context not understood,
- Training professionals and awareness raising through, for example, school conferences, campaigning,
- Making the law known to perpetrators and victims,
- The role of schools is inestimable and a huge opportunity to reach the proper audience,
- Taking a holistic approach. Schools, health sector, social services, police, judiciary all need to have
clear instructions,
- Funding NGOs in urban and rural areas,
- Overseeing police work,
- Ending parental consent as consent can mean coercion,
- Addressing judicial consent as the context is wider,
- Criminalising coercive control,
- Ending grey areas of the law concerning child’s consent to marry once they reach 16. There must be
full and informed consent,
- Using a rights-based approach,
- Providing appropriate and comprehensive support to women who file complaints,
- Making education compulsory until 18,
- Need for a Law on underage childbirth, to whom does the child get registered? Who has parental
authority?
She informed us that a Government bill on forced marriages is scheduled to come out in May 2018. She also mentioned the lack of data due to the code of silence. The available data only represents a fraction of the real magnitude of honour based violence and forced marriage as it is based on complaints to the police and that not all cases are reported. There is a report about findings on how police should change the procedures.
Funding is another serious issue for the work of NGOs. The authorities rely on them to shoulder them with the work but funding suffers constant cuts not to mention the potential implications of BREXIT. Ms Browne is concerned that the sharing of learning could be curtailed and that EU citizens seeking refuge in the UK will face challenges.
To conclude, Ms Browne spoke about the IKWRO True honour Awards 2018 and recalled that the end objective of IKWRO is to ensure free and informed choices by women and girls and enable them to live a life free of violence. He invited participants to nominate possible candidates, A Roma Finnish designer involved with PLAN was suggested by Ms Henna Huttu, Finnish CAHROM member and Gender Equality Rapporteur.
Presentation by Ms Esther MORRIS, Specialist Police Officer, Bedfordshire Constabulary about the role of police in cases of forced marriages, using examples of Roma cases. Their response, both in terms of how the civil interventions have worked and the change in the law
There are Police units dealing exclusively with forced marriages and Honour Based Violence (HBV);
The role of police officers is to safeguard anyone from abuse;
18% of Bedfordshire Police workforce is from ethnic minorities;
The College of Police trains new recruits and serving police officers on Forced Marriage (FM) and Honour Based Violence (HBV) but in reality not all the officers are aware of the procedures to follow;
Judges and all new and serving court staff are trained as well;
There are specialised judges for cases of FM and HBV;
The police will take the vulnerable victims away from the perpetrators;
The police hold talks in schools and colleges with staff and students and at hospitals with midwives;
The Bedfordshire Police has a Perpetrator programme for women. If the woman has no criminal record, she will go on the programme for a first offence. This programme covers women who force other women or girls into marriage.
Training law enforcement officers is essential as there is often a lack of understanding of the cultural context. A video entitled “Banaz, a love story” tells the true story of girl who didn’t get help from the police as a result of that lack of understanding.
12

CAHROM (2017)33
Ms Morris gave the example of a case of assault by a Roma mother on her 11 year old daughter a few years ago. At that time nothing was uncovered but when the girl was 14 she was beaten again by her mother. It turned out that the mother herself was married at the age of 14 which underlines the issue of perpetuation. The girl was afraid she would be sent back to Romania by her father to marry so a forced marriage protection order was issued to protect her.
She also emphasised the point that positive links need be established between the police and the Roma communities in order to have increased mutual trust.
Presentation by Ms Tracy HALL, Police legal expert, on Forced Marriage Protection Orders – How civil interventions work in the UK vs. Criminalisation.
Forced marriage protection orders (FMPO) cost money so they are not always issued;
Good relations between police and court;
Police officers can give the evidence to the judge to get the court order if the social services don’t. The FMPO includes an all ports alert which allows for an oversight to ensure the child stays in the country. (e.g. passport can be seized from the victims and the parents);
Careful investigation is carried out before court orders are annulled;
Assistance to stay in the community is offered so there is no need to necessarily leave;
The police encounter cases where girls are blackmailed. They are told that if they refuse the marriage their younger sister will be taken instead. This is why the FMCO also works to prevent FM for siblings.
By having specialised officers a bond is built between the police and the community;
The point is not to arrest people but to help and assist them;
To protect the identity of victims of forced marriages, they benefit from a lifetime law of anonymity;
Civil injunctions or court orders to ban media to publish articles which could be damaging to the victims can be issued.
Presentation by Ms Polly HARRAR, The Sharan Project, that focuses on empowerment of women following forced marriage and experiences of domestic violence in a cultural context
Sharan is a leading UK charity supporting women who have been or are at risk of being disowned by their families and communities due to harmful practices to include, but not limited to forced marriage, domestic violence, honour abuse and other forms of cultural conflict. Sharan provides support and advice to women, particularly from South Asian backgrounds, who are unable to remain within their family environment.
Consequences of Forced Marriage:
Being forced into a marriage is often the beginning of a victim suffering: •Repeated violence and physical abuse within the marriage
•Repeated sexual abuse and rape within the marriage
•Abuse of children of the marriage
•Social isolation
•Forced withdrawal from education or employment
•Psychological consequences, such as anxiety and depression. PTSD •Self-harm or suicide
•Financial and material abuse (Dowry)
Multi-agency training:
Training delivered to Police Forces, Home Office, LGBT Networks, Crown Prosecution Services, Social Workers, Healthcare Professionals, University & School Staff, Community Groups, etc.
Remarks and conclusions:
In the UK17, the minimum age of consent is 18, however, we do have a ‘loophole’ to allow persons aged 16 to marry with the consent of their parents18 – this can lend itself to many of the discussions around trafficking.
17 It refers here to the legislation in England, Wales and Northern Ireland which have a minimum age of 18, and with parental consent, this is reduced to 16; however, in Scotland the minimum age remains 16. For regulations concerning marriages and civil partnerships in various parts of the UK, see https://www.gov.uk/marriages-civil-partnerships. For Marriage Law in Scotland, see http://www.gov.scot/Publications/2012/12/9433/272402.
    13

It should be highlighted that in some cultures a religious ceremony e.g. Nikah, can take place with a child at any age, in some known cases, from birth, to ensure the marriage is ‘validated’ at a later date, e.g. once age of consent has been achieved. The impact on children in the UK who experience this is complex and often leads to a premature acceptance of marriage throughout their childhood. This crosses many cultures and communities.
There is definitely a need to close the gap of early/child marriages (not registered) that remain a hidden practice in the UK, Europe and globally.
V. DEVELOPMENTS SINCE 2015 AND COMMENTS FROM PARTICIPATING COUNTRIES FINLAND
There are about 10,000 Roma (Kaale) in Finland and the country is currently drafting a Romani political programme. It also published in 2013, a Survey on domestic violence and early or forced marriages.
However, there are no targeted measures as they are rather mainstreamed services, knowledge-based, functions and processes.
A holistic approach needs to be developed to ensure the full protection of human rights of Roma including in the field of sexual and reproductive health.
Many and various issues plague the Roma communities and they must be addressed by using adapted tools in a manner in which the community can relate. The most effective way is for people who know and understand the communities to go on the field and meet them.
Such issues include gay Roma men who cannot leave the community and who are forced to marry women and have children to “cure” their “illness”. This point includes both the issues of forced marriage and homophobia which are still very taboo.
However, understanding the Roma point of view for child/forced marriages is essential to convince them that it is not necessary. They believe that marriage affords security to young Roma women and men and that it is society at large that deems that marrying between 15 and 17 is too early.
The notion of child/forced marriage does not exist. There is no normative law regulating it. Rather, there is a tradition of shotgun weddings whereby young men “grab” the girls at important community “get-togethers” and the couple elopes. There is no tradition of dating or big weddings and no dowries are given. Indeed, parents don’t have to accept the elopement and can take their daughter back. (while in Poland among the Polish Roma there is no way for a girl to return home even if there is no consent from the parents as in traditional communities elopement is de facto equal to marriage).
There is a strong taboo around sex and moral rules make it difficult to discuss the issue. There is a strong social control over the girls and their sexuality and when a girl becomes sexually active she must start wearing a traditional dress. It is a form of branding.
Recently a story broke out about an older man kidnapping a mildly handicapped girl, he confined and neglected her, took her identity papers and forced sex and pregnancies on her. The Roma community was completely against it.
Generally, Roma girls marry to gain their freedom, not to have sexual relations. They marry early as older unmarried women are stigmatised. If the women suffer from domestic violence they keep silent and will do their utmost to stay inside the community. Leaving the community or divorce is an option of last resort when staying becomes a matter of life and death.
18 https://www.girlsnotbrides.org/british-legal-loophole-continues-sanction-child-marriage/ 14
CAHROM (2017)33
    
This fear of leaving the community or divorcing is explained by the fact that the men get custody of the children because it is widely believed that they own them. Furthermore, as the Roma women often marry into communities which are remote from their own, they don’t have much mobility. There is a form of social control as they would lose their social support network if they left their husband’s community. Furthermore, it is considered that a Roma woman without a family is nothing.
Remarks / recommendations
- Tailoring services and using qualified Roma men to work with Roma men on this sensitive issue.
- Carrying out telephone interviews to reach the women.
- Creating shelters and having Roma women volunteer with the helplines for Roma women.
- Carrying out an impact assessment on the legislation on allowances as it transpires that the well-
intended higher allowances for single mothers actually make them more vulnerable and can become an issue to access housing. Financial exploitation is a form of violence and women need to gain control of their finances.
- Finally, Finland is welcoming more and more refugees from Afghanistan and the Middle East and could draw on the UK model to help prevent possible cases of forced marriage.
FRANCE
Early and forced
marriage within Roma and Traveller communities_ case study in France by Diana Kirilova.pdf
In her 2017 research on forced marriages in various Roma and Traveller communities in France, Diana Kirilova explained that Roma did not want to be told what to do and that, although a Romni herself, it was sometimes very difficult to openly speak with the girls.
Her research was carried out among various groups of Roma and Travellers in France in an attempt to understand what marriage means to these groups. Its focus was early or forced marriage, and how such marriages took place in these communities. What is the purpose and experience of early or forced marriages in these communities? How are these marriages perceived by the families?
In reality, based on what the families were saying, it emerged that they did not consider marriage at the ages of 13, 14 or 15 to be early or forced marriages. The community places much importance on marriage and the girl’s virginity; the spouse should be chosen from the same Roma group, and divorce is highly unusual and unwelcome. Differences in the communities lie in the way the marriage proposal is made, the preparation and organisation of the dowry, and the age at which young people marry.
In France, civil marriage is allowed as of the age of 18. Some Roma parents wrongly think that the law says 16.
Marriage is viewed as the union of two clans as opposed to two people. We are talking in fact about unions and not officially registered marriages. These unions provide a social status which is central to the functioning of Roma communities. Roma do not recognise the official status of civil marriages. Lastly, girls marry very young because virginity is highly-valued.
Like in many other European countries, there is a lack of official and evidence-based information about Child/Forced marriages or domestic violence as Roma see it as a family issue and complaints are rarely filed. This is why from the criminal law standpoint the issue is not considered by the Police. The detection of Child/Forced marriages is indirectly related with schooling as it is often through school presence or lack thereof that alarm bells sound. Unfortunately, it is difficult to detect school absenteeism with migrant populations as a result of evictions and frequent relocations.
A working group on early marriage and consequences on children will be established but in order for it to function effectively it needs to include all relevant stakeholders such as administrative, regional and local authorities, judiciary and police services, medical and health sector, children’s services, social services and NGOs among others.
CAHROM (2017)33
   15

The working group on the accompaniment of people evicted from settlements has recently made its findings available and following its meeting, three thematic groups were launched: training of professionals (noting a difference between social workers working in settlements and those who do not enter settlements); child protection; relations between children and parents.
Remarks / recommendations
- The right questions need to be posed in order to devise a relevant strategy on Roma forced/child marriages:
- What is the goal we are aiming for? What do we want to achieve?
- Where do we draw the line between traditions and human rights?
- A balance is needed between the legal framework and an intercultural approach (Customs vs.
Republican laws).
- The legal framework of living in France needs to be clarified.
- Making regulations evolve to manage new situations and training social workers accordingly.
- Customising the approach to the communities.
- Developing contraceptive and sexual education together with the communities.
- Developing parentality programmes to prevent Child/Forced marriages through the schools
- Developing programmes to reach the people living in settlements.
- Ensuring the child protection legal framework affords equal treatment to all children no matter
where they live or come from (no stigmatisation) and report unusual situations,
- Enhancing collaboration between social services in France and the country of origin.
- Using education to open minds and present alternatives to marriage to have “security”.
- Raising awareness that Child/Forced marriage perpetuates poverty to the next generation as they
don’t have the tools necessary to live a financially stable life.
- Combining policies for effectiveness.
- Raising awareness of the majority population as to why a separate provision for Roma, Travellers and
Gypsies is needed to gain support for inclusion strategies.
Ms Béatrice DUPOUX, Adviser for Education and Children’s rights, Interministerial delegation for lodging and access to lodging (DIHAL) of homeless or poorly lodged people, "Illegal settlements / resorption of slums " Unit at the Ministry of the Cohesion of territories, presented the situation in France. As France did not participate in the thematic visit on child/early and forced marriages within Roma communities in the context of the promotion of gender equality in 2015, full information is included in this report.
A. The general legal framework on forced marriages
According to the Article 16 of the Universal Declaration of Human Rights, forced marriage is a violation of fundamental human rights, including freedom and physical integrity. Everyone has the right to choose her husband or his wife. Marriage is prohibited without the mutual, free and voluntary consent of each of the future spouses.
What does the French law say concerning forced marriage?
• With regard to minors, article 144 of the Civil Code states that "marriage cannot be contracted until eighteen years of age". However, there are some exceptions "for serious reasons" (article 145 and article 148) where the authorization of the Prosecutor of the Republic is required, as well as the consent of the minor and his/her parents or legal representatives, who must all together be present. Annulment of marriage exists in the case of the absence of consent (absolute nullity) or defect of consent (relative invalidity) [Art. 14612, art. 1805, art. 1815, art. 18411]. The Prosecutor of the Republic or a juvenile court judge can help the minors.
• Article 146 of the Civil Code specifies that "there is no marriage where there is no consent" and that such consent shall be free. In order to ensure the freedom of consent, the law requires the appearance of the spouses in person before the civil officer. No one can marry by proxy (Article 146-1 "The marriage of a French person even contracted abroad requires his/her presence".
CAHROM (2017)33
 16

• Article 181 of the Civil Code specifies that if one of the two spouses has been coerced, the so-called "forced" marriage may be annulled. The wife must prove the existence of moral or physical compulsion. The application for annulment must be made within the period of 5 years from the date of marriage. For minors, the cancellation of marriage is automatic.
• Article 202-1 of the Civil Code specifies that "Whatever the personal law is, marriage requires the consent of the spouses".
• Articles 222-8, 222-10, 222-12 and 222-13 of the Criminal Code create aggravating circumstances where violence is exercised "against a person in order to compel him / her to enter into a marriage or to enter into a union or by reason of his refusal to contract this marriage or union ". The legal concept of "violence" has broad acceptance: article 222-14-3 (a) states that "violence under the provisions of this section shall be repressed irrespective of their nature, including in the case of psychological violence. «Crimes such as violence, murder, torture or acts of barbarism and abduction are more heavily punished" when they are committed against a person because of his / her refusal to enter into a marriage or to conclude a union.
• Forced marriage is often accompanied and/or followed by violence within the couple and by forced sexual intercourse. The status of spouses is an aggravating circumstance of many crimes and offences.
• In the eyes of the French law, rape is an aggravated crime when it is committed within the couple or against a minor of fifteen years. The penalty laid down in the Criminal Code for rape is 20 years in jail, when committed by the husband or concubine of the victim, or the partner linked to the victim by a civil solidarity pact (article 222-24)
o If the female victim is a minor under the age of 15, the law considers that she cannot give consent for sexual intercourse, and the perpetrator will be prosecuted for rape.
o If the female victim is a minor of 15 years and over, or a major, it will be necessary to establish duress, violence, threat or surprise of the perpetrator to condemn him for rape or sexual assault.
• Article 515-13 of the Civil Code says that for victims of forced marriage, "an order of protection may be issued urgently by the judge to the major person threatened with forced marriage” (under the conditions laid down in article 515-10)
• Since 2013, article 222-14-4 of the Penal Code states that "the fact, in order to compel a person to enter into a marriage or to conclude a union abroad, to use fraudulent maneuvers in order to determine him/her to leave the territory of the Republic shall be punished by three years of imprisonment and a 45 000 € fine.
What to do and who to contact if someone is aware of a threat or a forced marriage situation?
For minors:
• The Prosecutor of the Republic or the juvenile court judge in the regional court of first instance of the place of residence, He/She may pronounce a prohibition to leave the French territory.
• The social and medico-social services, including the “mother and child welfare services” (PMI, “services de protection maternelle et infantile”), set up by the sub-regions (département).
For majors:
• The family court may issue an emergency order of protection to the person endangered by a forced marriage, with a temporary ban on leaving the territory of the endangered person. For foreign women benefiting from a protection order, a residence permit is issued or renewed as of right. Women victims of domestic violence are exempt from payment of the tax on the issuance or renewal of the residence permit
17
CAHROM (2017)33

CAHROM (2017)33
• When abroad, the French consular authorities will take appropriate measures to ensure, with their consent, the return to French territory of persons of French nationality or who habitually reside on French territory (including those held abroad against their will for more than three consecutive years), if such persons have been victims abroad of voluntary violence or sexual assaults committed in connection with a forced marriage or because of their refusal to submit to a forced marriage.
In any case:
• Dial 3919, the free Call-centre number against violence towards women. This number is dedicated to women victims of violence, to their personal circle, to the professionals concerned. It is a national and anonymous listening number accessible from a fixed station and a mobile phone in the mainland and in the overseas departments. The number is open from Monday to Friday from 9 am to 10 pm, Saturdays, Sundays and public holidays from 9am to 6pm. It makes it possible to ensure a first level of listening and information, and, according to the requests, makes an orientation to the national telephone numbers, local support and support devices according to the thematic concerned. The 3919 is not an emergency call number.
• The 119 “Allo, enfance en danger”: this national number is dedicated to the prevention and protection of children in danger or at risk. It is accessible 24 hours a day, 7 days a week and free of charge.
• If you need to talk to someone or a professional you trust (doctor, social worker, lawyer), or to contact an association specialized in the fight against rape and violence against women that will accompany you, you can use the call-free number or visit the website
• One should report the facts to the police or the “gendarmerie”. One will be the subject of special attention from the police services or gendarmerie units which have put in place mechanisms for reception and assistance to the victims (social interveners, psychologists...)
The action carried out by the DIHAL as part of its mission to support the resorption of slums
As part of its mission of monitoring the implementation of the interministerial circular of August 26, 2012 on anticipation and accompaniment of the operations of slums and illegal settlements evacuation, and more recently the circular of January 25th, 2018 on resorption of slums, the DIHAL was seized by a variety of partners of the need to find answers and ways to act on the issue of early (even forced) marriages.
  18

CAHROM (2017)33
In addition, specialized structures on the issue of violence against women confirm that early (and forced) couple layouts require special attention. Statistically, the risk of children abuse is higher, as well as domestic violence (especially if the age difference is important between men and women); Besides, the assignment to household chores by the mother-in-law or the husband can be considered, sometimes, as a form of slavery.
As an answer to the importance to encompass all the issues related to settlements, by clearly naming things and avoiding the possible pitfalls of stigmatization, culturalist approach and negative exploitation of the question, the DIHAL has held a first meeting with a wide variety of professionals who were invited to react to the presentation of two studies:
• One carried out under the direction of the project manager of "illegal settlements" for the Ile de France area.
▪ The other reflecting the work supported by the Council of Europe on the promotion of the gender equality within Roma communities (seminar of December 2016 on violence against women and children with particular attention regarding the fight against forced and early marriages and pregnancy, humans trafficking and domestic violence)
The synthesis of this first share of information and questions has highlighted 3 themes : issues related to the framework of child protection, issues related to prevention among young people and their parents, issues related to the training of professionals who have to deal with situations of early marriage. The debate was taken forward on the basis of volunteering participation through thematic working groups.
The objectives were the following:
• To outline the problem
• To identify the difficulties raised by the practice of early marriage in order to act in accordance with
the laws of the Republic (including the framework of child protection).
• To identify regulatory amendments that would require an evolution.
• To propose measures and tools for better mobilization of the framework for child protection.
• To propose measures and tools facilitating the accompaniment of individuals by social workers.
True to its approach to fight against great precariousness and poverty, and against situations intrusive to human dignity, the DIHAL has ensured that knowledge and experience from professionals such as representatives of the people concerned can be shared.
The following elements faithfully restore the workshops and as such do not engage the DIHAL. This is not, in any case, a scientific study or a comprehensive overview of the French situation.
Elements of understanding and analysis
The treatment of the issue of early marriages has no ethnic or Roma focused approach and as it doesn’t want to stigmatize any particular community. However, the knowledge of certain customs and lifestyles, provides elements of understanding and must prevent hasty and excessive judgments and categorization in the social treatment of situations. Presumably, the precarious living situation, as well as the strong marginalization suffered by the group in the countries of origin and in France may strengthen these practices.
❖ What are we talking about?
A form of customary marriage or union between minors or between a minor and an adult, without any administrative act which institutionalizes the couple in the eyes of the family, the group, the community, but which remains unofficial regarding the French law. This practice of early cohabitation is considered as non- marginal19 by social workers who accompany people in the settlements.
19 It should first be clarified that the following elements have been collected from persons with knowledge of the occupants of the slums and/or expertise in their accompaniment towards insertion. However, it was not possible to obtain reliable quantitative data on the subject.
   19

CAHROM (2017)33
Symbolically, the pairing off is closely linked to the loss of virginity for young girls (it can be the immediate consequence, or the cause).
It is accompanied by financial commitments between the families, which binds more strongly the two people and the two entire families.
Young couples most often occur around 15-16 years of age but may happen as early as 12 or 13 years of age (mostly for girls).
Quite frequently it brings together very young girls to much older adults, sometimes men of about 30 to 35 years of age.
The union:
• is sometimes organized by parents of young children in France or in the country of origin; as a result,
it may not be consented / agreed.
• is desired by young people, and consummated, so that it is irrevocable in the eyes of families; they can run away, sometimes for a very symbolic duration of a few hours, and generally for no more than 2 or 3 days.
• May be the result of a strategy of avoidance by a young man or girl of another union desired by the parents, but that they don’t want.
❖ What are the direct consequences for young women and young men?
The young woman has to leave her family to join her husband’s; this may mean moving to another slum, or returning to the country of origin. In the family in-law, the young woman is devoted to housework, usually under the authority of her mother-in-law.
"Newlyweds" take the adult status and are required to fulfill financial autonomy, sometimes through dangerous and/or illegal activities.
School drop-out is almost systematic and immediate, for young men (required to make a living), and young girls (probably in order to avoid contacts with other young men). Social accompaniment does not prevent the phenomenon, even when it proposes a less stringent framework regarding the school common law duties.
A first pregnancy occurs very quickly and it is not uncommon for a young woman to be mother of several children while she is 20. The fear of infertility is important and hopefully leads women to go to hospital spontaneously.
❖ Sociological and cultural analysis to help understanding
The code of honour provides that the head of the family gives his daughter in marriage.
The sexual act seals the marriage. It is a mature and responsible act, with a strong commitment of both people. The loss of virginity out of the bonds of marriage is a dishonour.
The geographic origin of the families as well as the groups they belong to set the functioning of the community. The average age of the early marriage thus varies from one region to another.
There are customary courts, the so-called “kris”, which rule conflicts and negotiate arrangements between families when problems happen in the unions. The Romanian Court recognizes their decisions.
Parental guidance during adolescence is non-existent or very poor so young people have to discover what it means to be an adult when stepping into the status.
20

❖ To which regulatory framework should we refer?
The legislative framework for the protection of the child
It is given by the law of March 14th, 2016 which aims to take better account of children’s needs and to improve national and local child protection public policies governance. Article 1 recalls the main fundamentals: "Child protection aims to ensure that the basic needs of children are taken into account, to support their physical, emotional, intellectual and social development and to preserve their health, safety, morality and upbringing, in the respect of their rights. "It includes preventive actions in favour of the child and his parents, the organization of the identification and treatment of situations of danger or risk of danger to the children, as well as the administrative and judicial decisions taken for his protection. (...) The modalities for the implementation of these decisions must be tailored to each situation and objective by imperative visits to the child's living places, in his presence, and based on the resources of the family and the environment of the child. They involve taking into account the difficulties that parents may face in the exercise of their educational responsibilities and the implementation of appropriate support actions by ensuring, when appropriate, partial or total child care. In all cases, the child is associated with the decisions that affect him according to his degree of maturity. "These interventions can also be geared towards adults under the age of twenty and one who are experiencing difficulties that could seriously endanger their balance." The aim of child protection is also to prevent the difficulties that minors may encounter when they are temporarily or permanently denied family care.
The decree of October 28th, 2016 related to the units in charge of gathering and evaluating disturbing information concerning minors. It specifies how the evaluation should be carried out: by a multidisciplinary team of identified and trained professionals. Its objectives are to improve the quality of the assessment of the situations and to allow professionals to have shared references. It seeks harmonization of practices and an equal treatment of situations by providing a national framework at all key stages / steps. The assessment has to cover the other minors present in the home. It is carried out within a period of maximum three months between the receipt of the worrying information (period which may be reduced depending on the situation). The composition of the multidisciplinary team is determined by the situation of the minor and the difficulties he encounters. This team can resort to experts or specialized services when the evaluation concerns a specific problem.
The other legal frameworks
Since unions are not sealed by any administrative or official approach, the articles of the Civil Code relating to marriage are not functional and do not allow the use of a notification of the law.
The central question is the one of consent and situations need to be analyzed in the light of this principle. However, when you are very young, the ability to consent is problematic, as is the loss of freedom to come and go for the girl who integrates her family in-law. Legally, the age of consent is set at 15 years. There is currently a debate on the lowering of this age that may lead to a legislative change.
For young couples, the possibility of being accompanied implies clarification on the issue of parental responsibility. In the case of early union and departure of the girl from the family home, a request for delegation of parental authority must be carried out by the family of the girl to the judge for Family Affairs, the latter being able to issue a delegation total or partial. Failing this, it seems possible to rely on a signed attestation from both parents provided by the Romanian authorities.
Concerning health services, a minor is attached to the health card (“carte vitale”) of one or both parents. It is not possible to attach the young woman to her partner.
Temporary or permanent housing for a couple of minors (or couples in which one at least of the people is under 18) is not possible.
21
CAHROM (2017)33

CAHROM (2017)33
❖ The challenges the accompaniment teams have to face with the practice of early unions:
If the framework of reference is the one of child protection, and if it remains an essential tool of identification and analysis, the feedback of difficulties in its application by social professionals and educators is a reality; they may feel isolated and helpless to deal with certain practices and situations.
Several elements can explain these difficulties:
• a strong distrust to any official body by people who live in settlements. It is strengthened by an excessive fear of separations between mother and child and of child abduction.
• the fact that the girl is under the authority of the mother-in-law makes it difficult to individualize accompaniment in which the girl should be able to express directly and freely her choices.
• the observation that the units in charge of gathering and evaluating disturbing information not always treat them, or do not follow the usual criteria that lead to a follow-up by the services of child social assistance (ASE). Hence, situations that should not be are ignored, by unawareness and misconceptions of the populations concerned; strong prejudices give rise to schematic and erroneous interpretations in the name of "cultural custom".
• the complexity of the situations, due to the tension between the aspirations of young people and the pressure exercised by the group, can lead to a form of isolation, and young people hesitate to apply for protection in the case of unwillingly to be married, having difficulties to live with the in-laws, be pressured to give birth, be dispossessed of maternity, wishing to abort, suffering marital rape, facing homosexuality, etc.).
• The mobility of populations, due to repeated evictions or chosen way of life (pendular migration, change of region in France).
❖ Recommendations
In terms of prevention
1. Develop sexuality and contraceptive education programmes:
• They should take into account the fact that the young people are very discreet, shy, and sensitive with respect to these issues; therefore, they should avoid anatomical and physiological approaches and prefer an emotional and sensitive approach. The materials and programs should help to lead a dialogue on relationship in the couple, and help the representations to evolve and to be more friendly and respectful.
• These actions must be disseminated in the context of schooling.
• The entrance to the secondary school (11 – 12 years-old) seems to be the best time to act
2. Develop parenthood programs by relying on existing networks and structures working on parentality (CAF Family benefits Fund).
3 Strengthen the attendance and participation of Mother and Child protection services on the settlements to prevent late hospital consultations in particular.
In terms of gathering and evaluation of “disturbing information”
1. Formalize clear and objective indicators for the child protection generalist teams:
• unions in which the girl is under 15 and the young man under 18.
• disappearance of the girl or of the two young people for over 2 or 3 days.
• lack of official document specifying who are the legal representatives of the minors.
• pregnancies.
22

CAHROM (2017)33
However, the modes of regulation in communities are very strong; as such, they provide a comforting framework for young people who are never alone; Hence, to determine the level of risk, the indicators used by the child protection should be modulated and should take into account the quality of the relationship between the young persons and the community. The protection of children must be mobilized in case of rupture with the community.
2. Speed up the treatment of the “disturbing information”:
Their follow-up may be delegated to authorized and trained associations.
It is also important that their treatment should not be performed by the team in charge of accompaniment, so that the latter preserves the trustful relationship established with the family.
3. Establish a multidisciplinary social assessment to allow the evaluation of the follow-up to a disturbing information
4. Use the disturbing information as a tool for dialogue and support
If the situation is not deemed serious, the information is interesting and can be used, despite the limitations it may have when it is led by professionals unfamiliar to the populations, because it offers a period of 3 to 6 months to improve the situation and make it compliant with the legal framework (strong signal in the eyes of the family and the camp), to open a time of negotiation (on the follow-up of schooling particularly), and to give the girl the opportunity to become aware of the legal framework that protects her.
In terms of accompaniment
1. Importance of systematically implementing a follow-up to the pregnancy (health and psychological support)
The hospital is an appropriate structure to build trust and confidence. Depending on the seriousness of the situation, the team can activate a “disturbing information” procedure. However the balance is subtle to maintain the bond of trust because the disturbing information may be perceived as criminal.
2. Importance of psychological support for young parents
They are committed to their roles but the weight of their responsibilities can render them very fragile, and sometimes conflicts with loyalty to parents; cases of depressions can be observed.
3. Importance of keeping a link with the girl starting her life as a couple and moving in with her in-laws, including when this leads her to leave the insertion program (sometimes she will resume contact with the services several years after her marriage).
4. Usefulness of strengthening the accompaniment based on social and family intervention technicians funded by the CAF (family allowances services) or the Councils:
They can bring a very concrete and very effective help (access to nurseries, school attendance), as well as the services of specialized prevention of the Councils.
5. Importance of developing closer cross-border collaboration and work with the community of origin:
Indeed, when the community feels the mobilization of social actors, the girl (or the family) may move and return to the country of origin. If the social monitoring is effective in that country too, unacceptable situations can be taken into account.
23

In terms of professional training (lines, priorities, modalities, focuses).
The main thread should be recalled, in initial or lifelong training, that on the territory, all children should get the same protection.
1. A subtle balance has to be found between:
• an intercultural approach (which must enable professionals to adapt the usual modalities of intervention that often do not cater to the specificity of the populations and ways of living)
And
2. Focus on training professionals who do not work (or only occasionally) work with people living in slums because of the weight of pre-conceived notions about these populations (child protection and care services, family allowances services, etc.)
3 Implement training at all levels and across the territory: mentoring of inspectors, operators, actors in the field like social workers, etc.
The training should focus on diagnosis, evaluation, transmission of information, quality of reports; this last step is essential to make a decision on care measures.
Inter-professional training (educators, social workers, schools, health professionals) and multi-disciplinarity of stakeholders (researchers, social workers, juvenile judges) should be preferred to enrich the prism for understanding and analysis. At the scale of a territory, involve child protection service, Youth Judicial Protection Service, educators and all actors concerned for an effective follow-up of the situation.
GREECE
Greek Legislation and policy framework concerning Early Marriages
As Greece did not participate in the CAHROM thematic visit on child/early and forced marriages within Roma communities in the context of the promotion of gender equality in 2015, full information about the situation in Greece is included in this report.
The Greek Constitution is above the national laws. Its Article 28 states that the generally recognized rules of international law, as well as international conventions from the time they are sanctioned by statute, become operative according to their respective conditions. This shall be an integral part of domestic Greek law and shall prevail over any contrary provision of the law.
Legal framework
International and European conventions
Children
Law 2101/1992 ratifies the International convention on the Rights of the Child
So Greece, as its Constitution commands, ought to guarantee the children’s rights against early marriages as well, applying protective measures and promoting effective policies.
More specifically Paragraph 1 of Article 2, emphasizes that respect and protection of the value of the human being constitute the primary obligations of the State. More specifically the article requires the state to guarantee children’s rights, for each child which is under the state’s jurisdiction, without any discrimination based on race, colour, gender, language, religion, political or other beliefs of the child, or of his/her parents, or
• a “culturalist” approach which might generate new representations and misleading answers which artificial. The historical, anthropological, socio economic context, as well as codes and beliefs, must be known.
CAHROM (2017)33
    24

CAHROM (2017)33
of his/her legal representatives, or on national, nationalist, social origin, or on financial status, inability, birth or on other status.
Thus, this article constitutes a foundation against the practice of early marriages and at the same time as a constitutional provision, it abides by the conventions.
Law 3625/2007 incorporates the Optional Protocol for the Protection of the Rights of the Child. It focuses on child trafficking, child prostitution and the selling of children's organs. It also provides for the prohibition of corporal violence against children
Constitution
Article 7, p.2, and article 16, p. 2: provide restrictions and punishments prohibiting any kind of torture, maltreatment, humiliation or other offence undermining their human dignity, development of private economic initiative at the expense of freedom, they also impose a negative obligation of respect of human dignity by the state and the positive protection against its violation by others.”
Article 21 p 1: refers to underage adolescents, below the age of 18
Article 25, p. 1: provides the rights of man as an individual and as a member of the society are guaranteed by
the State
The above articles are the base for the prohibition of early marriages. A considerable proportion of girls are victims of the violation of their rights in relation to decisions regarding their lives, body and personality. They are resigned to their fate by traditions and customs, subject to adults’ agreements. Furthermore, early marriage constitutes forced marriage decided by the girls’ family and in general those who participate in this agreement do not ask for the girls’ approval.
(Often early marriage - which is in many cases a form of forced marriage -undermines human dignity and degrades the girls. It renders them objects in order to serve conservative customs and convictions. In other cases, they serve other purposes except those of custom, such as a response to poverty. More precisely, they are “used” by their parents so as to find a way out of poverty. Families earn money by “selling” them to grooms who pay considerable amounts of money and parents both secure their survival and are relieved from the burden of another family member.
That is why this practice serving all those purposes is forbidden from the Greek Constitution which orders the prevention of such violations and the protection of human dignity.
Taking all the above into consideration, we observe that the Greek Constitution, although lacking a specific prohibition, provides fertile ground for the establishment of specific policies and legislative measures against the phenomenon of early marriages, as it deems among the other protective provisions, of adolescents under the age of 18. So it is up to the State to enforce this legislation.
Family Law
In Greece, issues related to marriage are regulated by the Greek Civil Code and more specifically by the
Family Law. According to the Chapter 2 of the Family Law 1329/1983. Article 12 : includes articles 1351,1352 of the Civil Code
Article 14 annihilation of a marriage : includes 1378, 1350, 1351, 1352, 1354, 1356, 1357, 1360,1374, 1375 of the Civil Code
Civil Code
   25

CAHROM (2017)33
Article 1350 Conditions for the Marriage: both persons who are to marry have to be over the age of 18, otherwise they have to receive permission from the court that requires the existence of a serious reason, The act of marriage constitutes a contract of civil law and it consists of two essential elements: the first one is the consent of the spouses for the conclusion of the marriage and the second one is the ceremony.
Articles 1351 and 128: Minors under the age of 10 are completely incapable and cannot marry in any way whatsoever while the Civil Code permits the marriage between 10 and 18 with the foregoing exceptions.
Article 131 section 1: In case there is any suspicion that one of the intending spouses is not aware of his/her acts, the marriage is deemed invalid.
Article 1367, p. 3, provides that the procedure of religious wedding is defined by the rules of the doctrine or religion if these rules are not contrary to the Greek public order and they are recognized in Greece. It is a fact that the jurisdiction of the Mufti is unquestionable according to article 1367 of the Greek Civil Code. That means that the Greek Civil Code recognizes and legalizes the jurisdiction of Mufti relating to issues among Greek Muslims of his region Muftis‟ region includes only the area of Western Thrace where the Sharia law is applied. On 9 January 2018, Greece passed a law to limit Sharia law following a complaint at the European court of Human Rights. Members of the Muslim community will now be able to seek recourse in Greek courts in divorce, child custody and inheritance matters rather than take their case to Islamic jurists.
Penal Code
Article 121: a person between the ages of 8 and 18 years is considered a minor
Article 324 Abduction of Underage Children: refers to the kidnapping of minors and according to it anyone who takes away a child from his parents or anyone entitled to take care of him/her, or anyone who supports the voluntary running away of a minor from his parents, is punished with imprisonment
Articles 327 Involuntary Abduction: refers to female victims, anyone who with the intention of marriage kidnaps or illegally detains a woman without her consent or a woman incapable of resisting for any reason, is punished, in case of a contracted marriage
Article 328 Voluntarily Abduction refers to the voluntary abduction of an unmarried and minor woman. Anyone who kidnaps or detains, with the purpose of marriage, a minor and unmarried woman with her consent, but without the approval of the people who are her guardians or who have the legal right to take care of her, is punished with imprisonment, even if he intended to marry the woman. If the marriage has taken place, the prosecution starts only after its annulment.
Article 339 Seduction of Underage Children includes penalties regarding the seduction of underage children. According to this specific article:
Whoever realizes any lewd act with a person younger than the age of 15 years old, or misleads that person into such an act, is punished under Article 351.
Article 351 as follows:
A) If the victim is under 12 years of age, with imprisonment of at least 10 years.
B) If the victim is between 12 and 14 years of age, with imprisonment up to 10 years and;
C) If the victim is between 14 and 15 years of age, with at least 2 years imprisonment.
Lewd acts among children under 15 years old are not punished, unless the difference between their ages is more than 3 years, so only reformatory or therapeutic measures are imposed.
If the offender and the victim commit marriage, penal prosecution is not applied and if it is applied it does not continue, but it is declared as inadmissible. The penal prosecution is applied or continues after the cancellation of the marriage.
Anyone who incites or misleads a person under 15 years o age, to attend any lewd act, even if not involved or participating in it, is punished with imprisonment of at least 2 years.
 26

Policy Framework in Greece
Special Secretariat for the Social Inclusion of Roma Law 4430/2016
The Law 4430/2016 art. 42 is the founding law of the Special Secretariat for the Social Inclusion of Roma. The Special Secretariat for the Social Inclusion of Roma is under the authority of the Minister of Labour, Social Security and Social Solidarity, responsible for Social Solidarity issues and it is the National Contact Point for promotion of the National Strategy for the Roma as hereby being transferred from the National Centre for Social Solidarity (EKKA). From the entry into force of the present, any competencies of other services are repealed, and as provided by the present Law are attributed to the Special Secretariat for the Social Inclusion of Roma
Its main tasks are:
a. The configuration of guidelines for each policy area related to the social inclusion of Roma and proposing policies to the Minister of Labour, Social Security and Social Solidarity, responsible for Social Solidarity issues. b. The close cooperation with other competent Ministries, relevant bodies at national, regional and local level and with private entities for the design and implementation of interventions regarding Roma issues and for the coordination and interdisciplinary monitoring of policies for Roma, such as access to education, employment, health care and housing.
c. The establishment and development of a GIS system for the documentation, monitoring and evaluation of policies and the parallel mapping of the characteristics of the Roma population living in camps and settlements cut off from the wider urban and social fabric.
d. The provision of guidance and technical support to stakeholders for the design and evaluation of interventions regarding Roma issues and the conduction of workshops and events for this purpose.
e. The carrying out of field surveys and studies regarding the living conditions of the aforementioned vulnerable social group and the problems associated with housing, education, health and work.
f. The collection of any information or element required for shaping a national policy for the aforementioned vulnerable social group from any public or private body dealing with Roma issues.
Article 48
Board of Experts
1. A Board of Experts is established by the Minister of Labour, Social Security and Social Solidarity, competent for Social Solidarity issues, and consists of: a) the Special Secretary for the Social Integration of Roma, as Chairman, b) the representatives – Focal Points of the other competent Ministries, c) the Ombudsman, d) a representative of the Union of Municipalities of Greece (KEDE), e) a representative of the Greek Union of Regions (ENPE) and f) two persons designated by the Roma communities, because of their special knowledge and experience in social inclusion. Secretarial support for the Board shall be provided by employees of the Ministry of Labour, Social Security and Social Solidarity, as defined in the ministerial decision of the above paragraph. The mandate of the Board of Experts is set to four years.
2. The Board of Experts has as its main task: a) to provide scientific data and support through research, analysis and data collection and b) to draft recommendations intended to analyze the Roma issues.
Priorities
The empowerment of Roma women through education and acquisition of occupational skills
General Secretariat for Gender Equality (GSGE)
The GSGE of the Ministry of Interior has developed the “National Action Plan on Gender Equality 2016- 2020” (NAPGE) in order to combat discrimination against women and girls. The NAPGE has 6 strategic objectives:
CAHROM (2017)33
  27

Social inclusion and equal treatment of women facing multiple discrimination
Included actions such as
• Encouraging Roma women victims of gender violence to report incidents and perpetrators,
• Roma Teens Sensitization Seminars for Developing Skills for Equal and Healthy Love Relationships,
• Synergies with the Ministry of Education about Gender Based Violence (GBV),
• Educational campaigns in Roma communities on the effects of early / forced marriages on the lives of girls and boys,
• Strengthen awareness-raising activities in education to encourage girls and boys to resist early / forced marriages,
• Training of cultural mediators to inform parents about the prohibition of early / forced marriages based on current legislation.
2. Combating violence against women.
3. Labour market, work-family reconciliation
4. Education, training, media, culture, sports
5. Health
6. Equal participation of women in decision-making positions
The NAPGE includes a variety of horizontal interventions in public policy and vertical specialized policies aimed at women and men in areas where inequalities are identified.
Roma women, as citizens of the Greek state, benefit from all above horizontal and vertical policies of the strategic objectives of NAPGE.
As concerns violence against women, a specialized vertical policy, a network of 62 structures has been gradually put in operation since 2011. More analytically, a
twenty one (21) shelters for Abused Women and they
As to horizontal actions, in synergy with the Special Secretariat for the Social Inclusion of Roma, the GSGE has proposed the incorporation of the following actions to the imminent Action Plan of the Special Secretariat for the Social Inclusion of Roma:
• The conduct of 3 pilot social anthropological researches in the Regions of Attica, Thessaly and Eastern Macedonia-Thrace
• Informational seminars to health professionals, educators, teachers, members of local Roma unions, civil servants in Administration Regions in 6 Regions with the largest Roma communities
• Mapping Roma women unions/ associations
• The development of a training tool
1.
CAHROM (2017)33
 and email-address sos15900@isotita.gr, have been operating since March 2011. They provide advice, support and counselling to women victims of gender based violence, 24/7, 365 days a year. It is a low-cost,
(Greek and English) psychological and social support, legal counselling and counselling in labour issues and, when necessary, legal aid in cooperation with local Bar Associations, to women victims of gender-based
bilingual (Greek and English) SOS helpline 15900
    nationwide, confidential helpline. Moreover, (40) forty
Counselling Centres nationwide
provide bilingual
   violence. Additionally, there are
(Greek and English) services of shelter, psychological and social support.
provide bilingual
 28

CAHROM (2017)33
• Training the consultants of Roma centers, so as to empower Roma women
• Evaluation of the Program "Roma and Vulnerable Support Centers" from a gender perspective
NGOs
The non-governmental organisation KEAN, Cell of Alternative Youth Activities has implemented the early marriage prevention network project in Greece. The project is co-funded by the Rights, Equality and Citizenship Programme of the European Union. The other partners are from Bulgaria, Belgium, Spain and Slovenia.
 From 23to 27 October 2017, trainers from KEAN visited the "1st High School (Gymnasium) of AnoLiosia", from 25 to 30 September 2017 the students of the First and Second Grade of the "3rd Junior High School (Gymnasium) of Aspropyrgos", from 15 to 24 March 2017 the students of the "1st High School (Gymnasium) of Zefyri". They implemented a series of experimental workshops for the prevention of early marriages, which were addressed to the students of the First Grade of the Junior High School.
 In total, 179 students participated actively in the workshops which were conducted by the trainers of KEAN - a sociologist and an educator, inside the school facilities, within the framework of the project.
During the workshops, the students had the opportunity to learn to recognize all forms of violence, to use non- violent communication, to resolve gender -based conflicts in non-violent ways and to identify unacceptable behaviour and distinguish equal from unequal relations.
Through activities and games, children developed team working skills, improved and increased their critical thinking skills and unfolded their creativity and at the same time they understood the consequences and limitations inherent to early marriages and were given significant knowledge and skills to protect them from being involved in early marriages.
Deliverables in brief
 • A toolkit
• An analysis Report
• 3 experiential workshops for the prevention of early marriages, Ano Liosia, Aspropyrgos, Zefiri
Conclusions / Remarks:
- In Greece underage marriage is not recognised so mapping is not possible,
- On 9 January, a law passed to limit Shariah law. Members of the Muslim community will now be able
to seek recourse in Greek courts in divorce, child custody and inheritance matters rather than take
their case to Islamic jurists. This law will give women and girls better protection of their rights,
- Abduction of underage children including voluntary ones exist,
- There is a lack of data on cases of forced marriages of Roma women as they are seldom reported,
- The Code of silence remains strong so awareness-raising activities reaching out to Roma children on
the topic of violence and early marriage is essential to progressively change mentalities,
- It is sometimes challenging to reach the Roma women, as experienced by the Administration, as Roma men often take over the discussions. It is therefore difficult for the women to talk honestly and
openly. Administrations should also reach out to the young Roma women.
IRELAND (GRETA)
The Chair of GRETA, Ms Siobhán Mullally, reiterated the fact that child/forced marriages were sometimes linked to human trafficking and that work with GRETA should be strengthened in this respect as Roma are also victims of human trafficking.
She insisted that no cultural generalisations should to be made.
  29

CAHROM (2017)33
 ITALY
 Firstly, marriages can be celebrated only between two persons of age; if one of the two persons contracting into marriage has not come of age, the marriage is invalid; in exceptional cases and following the authorization from the Civil Tribunal and a hearing with the Public Prosecutor's Office and the parents, the marriage of a person who has not yet come of age, can be given based on an admissible reason, provided that this person has reached the age of 16.
Article 84 of the Italian Civil Code provides for a complex procedure to authorize the marriage of a person over the age of 16 and under the age of 18. Therefore from a legal point of view it is never allowed to celebrate a marriage in which one of the two contractors is less than 16 but Italy does not yet have a law that refers to the problem of forced marriages.
Marriages celebrated by ministers of religious cults other than Catholic (Orthodox, Muslim, Jewish, or other recognized religions) are subject to some basic rules laid down in the Civil Code. A civil ceremony must take place before the religious ceremony in order to ensure the legality of the marriage. It is usually performed by the mayor or civil registrar at the local town hall in front of two witnesses. This means that any marriages celebrated on Italian territory within religious communities (Roma or others) are never considered as valid marriages within the Italian legal system.
It follows that any religious celebration in which one of the two spouses is less than 16 years old is unlawful and involves the existence of offenses committed by adults by “selling” their child.
The crimes alleged in the case of a forced marriage of a child under the age of 16 years are as follows: private violence, family abuse, and sexual violence. In Italy, anyone who commits sexual acts with a person who at the time has not reached the age of 14, irrespective of the consent of the victim, is considered guilty of sexual violence under article 609 of the criminal code. In other words, when faced with a minor of 14 years, it is always considered that the adult is guilty of the crime of sexual violence. Therefore a person who, under the cloak of religion, marries a child on Italian soil is not recognized as a husband, but, in addition, is prosecuted for the offense of sexual violence under article 609. The parents of the child sold as a bride can also be prosecuted.
However, other connected crimes can also be hypothesised, such as domestic violence, ill-treatment in the family, and kidnapping - article 605 of the Criminal Code (if it proved that the minor has been deprived of her freedom of movement to force her to live in a certain context). Under-reporting is a matter of concern coupled with the difficulty to detect cases. Therefore a lack of data on these specific crimes is to be reported.
As noted by many, when families emigrate from other countries, they tend to reproduce their habits and customs in the host soil, including lifestyle habits that conflict with fundamental human rights; with the second generation born in Italy, arranged marriages can occur (in which the woman, even though she is older, is forced to marry the boyfriend imposed by her parents, but somehow she accepts the situation), as well as forced marriages, in which the woman, older or younger, is forced to marry the person who is imposed by her parents, behind threats of various kinds. In this regard, the experience of the FMU is very useful in the development of policies.
Forced marriages between adults can be registered with the civil status registers, but they can be annulled if it is proven that the consent was violently removed (Article 122 of the Civil Code). In this case, the crimes of private violence and ill-treatment in the family can also be hypothesised. However, it is difficult for a woman to be able, on her own, to report such a serious matter, partly because the event occurs within a closed community that does not allow women to act freely.
Italy has ratified the Istanbul Convention and Article 32 and 37 are fully implemented. Parliament is currently studying the bill to criminalise child/forced marriage and include the offence in the Criminal Code. The sentences will include imprisonment of 3 to 7 years if the violence or abuse of authority is perpetrated by the parents or adoptive parents. The local referent or law enforcement authorities will review the situation on the ground and coordinate the information and action with the Ministry of Justice. At the moment crimes of forced
30

CAHROM (2017)33
marriages fall under the remit of other crimes such as reduction into slavery, human trafficking or violence against women.
On 13th October 2016 the Senate of the Italian Republic approved the 1-000637 motion with which the Government pledged to take all appropriate steps for the full implementation of the UN Human Rights Council resolution "Child, early and forced marriages ", as well as to evaluate, in a synergic exchange with the Parliament, the opportunity to envisage, as a new criminal offense, forced marriage and the illegal conduct and actions connected to it, in order to protect victims and particularly vulnerable subjects. Three bills have been presented to Parliament since 2013:
1) Bill AS 638 which aims at criminalising forced marriage, with a prison term from one to five years, specifically for the crime of arson in response to an offense to the family's honour, traditions or religion, or murder committed by the former spouse or partner;
2) Bill AS 2441 which aims at criminalising coercion to marriage or civil unions: there is a prison sentence of three to eight years for anyone who uses violence or threats or relies on religious precepts to exploit a situation of vulnerability, forcing others to contract marriage or civil union, even in a foreign country; 3) Bill AS 2683, which aims at introducing article 609 of the Criminal Code, which condemns, with a prison sentence from three to seven years, anyone who uses violence or threats or through the abuse of authority or abuse of domestic relationship compels a minor to contract a personal obligation, with or without third parties, even in a foreign country, from which derives one or more typical obligations of marriage. Furthermore, article 609 of the Criminal Code provides for a prison sentence between five and ten years, offences committed by the parent(s), including the adoptive parent(s), or the partner, relatives up to the fourth degree, the guardian or anyone who has a domestic relationship with the child; the sentence is imprisonment from seven to twelve years if the victim is less than 10 years old. The loss of parental responsibility is also envisaged. Plea bargaining for the crime of forced marriage is excluded and a permanent Observatory for the prevention and detection of forced marriages would be established; the Observatory would be coordinated by the Ministry of Justice have an integrated action plan for monitoring the prevention and detection of forced marriages also by assisting and offering social and educational rehabilitation to victims. Finally, the services responsible for issuing residence permits in each province and metropolitan city, will appoint one or more police officers as contact point(s) for cases of forced marriages, in order to facilitate relations with representatives of local authorities and non-profit organizations operating in the sector.
In terms of progress at the national level, specific mention should be made of: Italy’s ratification of the Council of Europe Conventions on: preventing and combating violence against women and domestic violence (Act 77/2013); and the Protection of Children against Sexual Exploitation and Sexual Abuse (Act 172/2012), respectively.
Internationally, Italy is also actively engaged in the international campaigns for the eradication of FGM and CEFM, as recalled on the occasion of last consideration before UN CEDAW Committee (May-July 2017). More specifically,
- Since UN HRC29, Italy co-facilitated Resolution (A/HRC/RES/29/8) on “Strengthening efforts to prevent and eliminate child, early and forced marriage”, adopted without a vote and co-sponsored by approx. 85 UNMS.
- This area has been also considered within the framework of the National Action Plan on Women, Peace and Security, in accordance with UNSCR 1325(2000).
- The Italian Development Cooperation supports through annual voluntary contributions, the activities of UNWOMEN, UNFPA (continues to be one of the major donors of the Joint UNFPA/UNICEF programme “Female Genital Mutilation/Cutting: Accelerating Change”) and relevant development cooperation initiatives have been also carried out in various priority countries.
Conclusions / remarks
If adopted by Parliament, it would seem that Bill AS 2683 would be the most effective because it also provides for the establishment of the Observatory in addition to criminalising forced marriage and the aggravating circumstances described above.
 31

CAHROM (2017)33
In Italy there are two moments of relevance with regard to birth registration: the declaration of birth, which is made at the Hospital. It is automatic for each and every new baby-born provided the birth is made in hospitals; the second moment is then followed by the “recognition”20, which in the case of parents under the age of 16, requires the intervention of a guardian to become valid.
As many Roma marriages are not declared, it is very difficult to uncover child/forced marriages as a complaint must be filed or an arrest made within the family unit (forced begging, stealing etc.) to establish that the couple is in a union. Under-reporting remains a matter of serious concern as the code of silence prevails. Under these circumstances it is difficult to prosecute the perpetrators.
On a positive note, through daily experience, one can report increasing awareness of the rights and possibility for a better life for women and girls – education, awareness and, more specifically, human rights education is key and must be part of a continuous process. Young Roma women are less likely to accept violence and the use of social media is an effective and far-reaching tool for emancipation.
Data shows that for both Roma and migrants, an additional deterring factor is the difficulty of keeping constant relations with physicians and hospitals due to their reduced knowledge of the Italian language and the tendency to resort to emergency medical assistance, only.
- Facilitating access to health-care and relevant support services in a sustainable way would allow for the detection of cases of forced marriages. Furthermore, access to the same practitioners and a regular relation with medical staff and medical services would establish a relationship of trust and the data collected could serve to obtain baseline information.
- Introducing measures to escort women to health centres without the presence of the men is essential.
- Closing loopholes making Roma legally invisible like when they are sedentary.
- Creating Youth clubs for Roma and non-Roma to reach out to both communities and establish a bond,
mutual trust, openness and camaraderie between the younger generations.
- Include Child/Forced marriage in National strategy for Roma inclusion.
In conclusion, there is no universal solution to the issues. Despite the good/best practices put in place at juvenile Courts in Italy, the issues at stake remain how to facilitate the identification of cases of child/forced marriages; and how to ensure an integrated multi-agency approach in line with the Istanbul Convention and the principles contained, inter alia, in the Joint CEDAW-CRC General Recommendation No. 31/201421 (see also CEDAW GR No.29).
If adopted by Parliament, it would seem that Bill AS 2683 would be the most effective because it also provides for the establishment of the Observatory in addition to criminalising forced marriage and the aggravating circumstances described above.
POLAND
Ms Wieslawa Kostrzewa-Zorbas, Counsellor in the Chancellery of the Prime Minister updated the participants about the latest developments. In her work in the Department of the Civic Society she deals with ethnic and national minorities and the Action Plan for Equal treatment. She recalled the fact that the Roma Genocide Remembrance Day was first adopted in Poland.
Poland has ratified the Istanbul Convention, and the notion of forced marriage is included in its criminal code. Polish law is already in compliance with the provision.
20 See (in Italian) about recognition at: http://www.paolazamperini.it/dichiarazioe-di-nascita-riconoscimento-ed-iscrizione-allasl/
21 Para. 24: The payment of dowries and bride prices, which varies among practising communities, may increase the vulnerability of women and girls to violence and to other harmful practices. The husband or his family members may engage in acts of physical or psychological violence, including murder, burning and acid attacks, for failure to fulfil expectations regarding the payment of a dowry or its size. In some cases, families will agree to the temporary “marriage” of their daughter in exchange for financial gains, also referred to as a contractual marriage, which is a form of trafficking in human beings. States parties to the Optional Protocol to the Convention on the Rights of the Child on the sale of children, child prostitution and child pornography have explicit obligations with regard to child and/or forced marriages that include dowry payments or bride prices because they could constitute a sale of children....
    32

CAHROM (2017)33
In the context of Roma child and forced marriages phenomenon, among policy measures, the Family 500+ Programme introduced in 2016 should be mentioned. The Family 500+ Programme consists of a monthly payment of PLN 500 (€115) for every second and subsequent child until the child reaches the age of 18. The benefit is also extended to the first child in families with monthly income below PLN 800 (€200) per capita, or below PLN 1200 (€274) if there is a disabled child in the family. The implementation of the programme results in visible decrease of relative poverty, in Roma communities among others. On the other hand, it may also cause increase of early birth giving in Roma communities and additional pressure on Roma girls in this regard.
Otherwise, there are no new developments as concerns legislation and policy frameworks on child/early or forced marriages but the Polish police is interested in learning from the UK police’s experience and methods on detecting and dealing with reported and non-reported cases of child/forced marriage in a coordinated, multi-agency manner. Mr Pawel Karnas, Police plenipotentiary on human rights, liaison officer and educator took part in the study visit as he is responsible for police training as regards minorities and anti- discrimination.
Police experience on the ground highlights several important issues hampering the identification of forced marriages and thus the prosecution of the perpetrators. Among these issues is the lack of complaints filed and girls lying about their age. Most cases are accidentally stumbled upon and the data collected is more anecdotal then evidence-based. Public institutions are obliged to report suspicions of child/forced marriages but again there is no systematic way of identifying them.
Often times, it is difficult to differentiate marriages of convenience from forced marriages. Furthermore, the legislative framework framing their scope of intervention needs to be clarified. Clear procedures on how to deal with and prevent cases of child/forced marriages need to be established.
Generally speaking, not many discrimination complaints are received from the Roma community.
The whole system of the Polish law offers a wide range of instruments to ensure in practice full respect for the principle of equal treatment. In case of violation of this principle, the Polish law guarantees adequate compensation both for moral and pecuniary damage. The Polish equal treatment legislation is composed of various legal acts which have been drafted in line with the EU anti-discrimination directives. As a matter of principle, Roma, both men and women, can benefit from the Polish legal instruments on equal footing with other Polish citizens.
For complete information on Poland, please refer to document CAHROM(2015)8 Thematic report on child/early and forced marriages within Roma communities in the context of promotion of gender equality.
Remarks / Recommendations / Conclusions
- Working with Roma men is crucial to address the topic and the empowerment of Roma women seems to be a remedy for many forms of discrimination and exploitation
- Training probation officers to detect and prevent child/forced marriages as the very young girls often come from dysfunctional families,
- Common sense to be used in judgments,
- Stricter application of legal provisions (including jail sentence) for marrying a girl under 15,
- Victims of child/forced marriages to be treated with dignity and respect,
- Finding a common ground and outlook on the subject to reach out to the Roma communities. People
working with the Roma communities should understand their point of view and not be moralizing
and patronizing,
- Field work is essential; workers need to meet the Roma community.
To conclude on a positive note, although the Roma communities in Poland are quite traditional, mentalities are slowly changing. The average age of marriage has increased to 16 and marriages with girls under 16 are not favourably perceived within the community even though perpetrators are not publicly denounced. Young Roma women are more aware of their rights and possibilities and a higher percentage of girls as compared to boys complete primary education.
 33

34
CAHROM (2017)33

VI. GENERAL CONCLUSIONS AND RECOMMENDATIONS22
At the close of discussions several similar recommendations were made by the participants as some of the challenges are shared.
First of all, the answer for the question about the limit between tradition and culture and violation of right is fundamental. The traditional value - family – is crucial for Roma communities and perceiving those marriages as “early” is a non-Roma perspective. Therefore actions planned to protect victims of forced marriages must take into consideration that, although victims, they will still want to protect their families.
All the participants mentioned the lack of data and the inability to produce reliable mapping. This is the result of the small number of official complaints received and the difficulty in getting accurate and real numbers of cases of forced/child marriages. Nonetheless, unofficial information from the field shows the significant number of early pregnancies (Italy). An example of a systemic approach to this problem is Finland’s survey from 2013 on early marriages and domestic violence. Sources of data mainly come from education and healthcare services. The report on Roma inclusion in cities - Mapping of the situation of Roma in cities in Europe23 – published by Eurocities concludes that there is need to find a way to collect data about the situation of Roma and use it to improve policy responses to the challenges Roma face, while at the same time protecting Roma against the risk of data misuse.
The darker side of that phenomenon is the link between forced marriages, human trafficking (HT) and domestic slavery, mentioned both by Italian and French experts. Furthermore, victims of forced/child marriages are vulnerable and powerless and by consequence often subject to domestic violence by their fathers, husbands and family in-law.
It was underlined that child marriages were often connected to poverty, but not necessarily. It is also connected to ensuring the girl is virgin as an important factor is the dowry, which can vary between €40,000 and €100,000 sometimes even more, that needs to be collected by the husband’s family and reimbursed by the bride’s family, in case of divorce or lack of virginity, which complicates matters. In Finland, in case of divorce, the children stay with the father as it is considered that he “owns” them. This is another hindering factor for Roma women who decide to leave their husband.
It was also mentioned by the British and Finnish experts that forced marriages can also sometimes take place as a result of a need for a carer to mind a learning or physically disabled person.
A tool to support Roma women is to provide them with access to medical treatment, which can, in parallel be a source of estimate of the scale of cases of early marriages / early pregnancies / early births. In some communities marriages are kept between close family members; this can have a negative impact on the health of the children because of inbreeding. Some communities try to find distant Roma communities for the marriages in order to mix the genetic pool but in such cases girls are left stranded, far away from their families.
Typically, the victims of early marriages are Roma girls, but they can also be boys or homosexuals, who are not accepted within the Roma communities.
Effective solutions are needed to encourage women to break the code of silence. Among the proposed recommendations are early awareness-raising activities in primary school and youth clubs for Roma (especially in Roma settlements) or integrated for Roma and non-Roma to change the mentalities. An important role to play here is Roma mediation or, actually, Roma mediators. But equally important, if not more, is the crucial need for a multi-agency network to assist the women after they have filed a complaint as often times there is no co-ordinated protection for them.
22 See also conclusions and recommendations from the CAHROM thematic report CAHROM(2015)8. 23 Mapping of the situation of Roma in cities in Europe, Eurocities, August 2017
CAHROM (2017)33
    35

Other recommendations included:
- Criminalising child/forced marriage as it is proven that it is an effective deterrent;
- Involving qualified Roma men in awareness-raising activities, namely to work with other Roma men,
thereby tailoring the services to the recipients;
- Training probation officers to deal with and prevent cases of child/forced marriages as the very
young girls often come from dysfunctional families;
- Using common sense in judgments so as not to “punish” the girls further. Respecting the dignity of
victims;
- Using the healthcare sector to make an impact through awareness-raising and to obtain baseline
information;
- Creating Roma women NGO, such as IKWRO (the Iranian and Kurdish Women’s Rights Organization).
The participants all agreed that the outlook from civil servants is different from that of the Roma and a common ground should be found when working on solutions. More humanity and sensitivity is needed and in that sense it is essential to meet the people at risk in order to have a better grasp of the situation on the ground. Strategies which are drafted solely based on desktop research cannot realistically include all the human aspects around the issue of child/forced marriage in Roma and Traveller communities.
There was also agreement on finding a balance between the legal framework and a cultural and intercultural approach. Human rights should always supersede customs and traditions when the latter disrespect these rights. As stated by Human Rights Watch in their report of 2013 - The Trouble with Tradition “When values trample over rights”24, “discriminatory elements of traditions and customs have impeded, rather than enhanced, people’s social, political, civil, cultural, and economic rights”.
To conclude, there is no universal solution as no one solution fits all.
Practical tools used by the FMU
The authorities of the participating countries to the study visit could draw from the work of the FMU and envisage adapting the following tools to their own administrative and legal framework:
- Use of the health sector to detect signs of child/forced marriages,
- Spreading information through meetings, written material, online resources, phone apps,
- Mediation depending on the situation of the girl using Roma mediators or social workers,
- Helplines through community centres and Roma mediators,
- Coordinated multi-agency action once call has been recorded.
National Strategies for the Inclusion of Roma should specifically include the issue of child and/or forced marriages. Furthermore, as the issue of child/forced marriage is linked to gender equality, trafficking in human beings and violence against women and domestic violence, discussions could be envisaged with GRETA (Group of experts on Action against Trafficking in Human Beings) GREVIO (Group of experts for monitoring the implementation of the Council of Europe Convention on Preventing and Combating Violence against Women and Domestic Violence) and the Gender Equality Commission about explicitly including it in their strategies.
Joint initiatives with other Council of Europe entities could also be envisaged for more impact.
24 Human Rights Watch 2013 report - The Trouble with Tradition “When values trample over rights”24, “discriminatory elements of traditions and customs have impeded, rather than enhanced, people’s social, political, civil, cultural, and economic rights”.
CAHROM (2017)33
   36

Commonalities and differences in the countries
The sharing of experiences also highlighted commonalities and differences between the countries present. Fundamentally, child marriage is common in Roma and Traveller communities. This practice stems from the fact that preserving the virginity of the girl is essential as it is a sign of respect for the groom's family and is a prosperity issue for the wedding itself given the existing dowry system. If it turns out that the girl is not a virgin, she is considered tainted goods and besides being shamed and dishonoured, her family will have to repay the dowry to the groom’s family.
Roma and Traveller communities are difficult to access unless you are Roma yourself. And even then the community is weary and negotiations are sometimes necessary. The communities are closed to the outside world as a way to preserve themselves. The Roma men often oversee women’s contacts with the outside so girls cannot speak openly. Reaching out to them can be challenging even for other Roma women.
The code of silence prevails due to varying factors: fear of reprisal, fear of being ousted from the community, lack of support from the outside, honour of the family.
The differences lie in the reasons behind the girls accepting early marriage. For example in Finland, the girls marry early for security whereas in Italy it would seem they marry so they can engage in sexual activity. Some communities are very traditional whereas others are more open.
******
37
CAHROM (2017)33

CAHROM (2017)33
APPENDICES
Appendix 1: 2017 UNDP / World Bank Fact sheets – “Roma at a glance”25 (extracts)
Roma Data: Estimates are produced by the World Bank and United Nations Development Programme, based on the UNDP-WB-EC Regional Roma Surveys (2011 and 2017). The sampling frame for Roma settlements was based on information from the most recent population census available in the country, using the lowest administrative units with the equal or higher than national average proportion of Roma population on its total population. By following a similar procedure as the 2011 survey, the 2017 Regional Roma Survey allows for a level of comparability across time. At the first stage of sampling, a list of settlements from census data was used. In a second stage, external or outsider’s identification (local people, NGOs, and experts) was used to pinpoint areas where Roma households are located in a given municipality. In a third stage, the explicit willingness of the household’s head to participate in a survey on Roma population (internal or self- identification) was requested. The sample was purposefully not representative of all Roma in these countries, but rather focused on those communities where the Roma population’s share equals or is higher than the national share of Roma population, the “marginalised Roma”. The “non-Roma” refer to non-Roma population living in close vicinity to the marginalised Roma and are not representative of the total population in the country. The sample size for each country in each year is around 750 Roma households and 350 non-Roma households. All figures shown are based on unweighted survey data. Data for Kosovo* is only available for 2017.
Hilton/UNDP
ALBANIA: KEY INDICATORS, 2017
Early marriage incidence for marginalised Roma women is persistent and the highest in the Western Balkans region. Fifty percent of marginalised Roma women aged 20-49 years in Albania reported to have been married before they were 18 years old compared to 7 percent of neighbouring non-Roma women.
BOSNIA AND HERZEGOVINA: KEY INDICATORS, 2017
Early marriage incidence for marginalised Roma women is persistent. Twenty-seven percent of marginalised Roma women aged 20-49 years in Bosnia and Herzegovina reported to have been married before they were 18 years old compared to 11 percent of neighbouring non-Roma women.
KOSOVO26: KEY INDICATORS
Early marriage incidence for marginalised Roma women is persistent and high. Thirty percent of marginalised Roma women aged 20-49 years in Kosovo reported to have been married before they were 18 years old compared to 9 percent of neighbouring non-Roma women.
MONTENEGRO KEY INDICATORS
Early marriage incidence for marginalised Roma women is persistent and among highest in Western Balkans region after Albania and Serbia. Forty-one percent of marginalised Roma women aged 20-49 years in Montenegro reported to have been married before they were 18 years old compared to 8 percent of neighbouring non-Roma women.
SERBIA KEY INDICATORS
Early marriage incidence for marginalised Roma women is persistent and the second-highest in the Western Balkans region after Albania. Forty-four percent of marginalised Roma women aged 20-49 years in Serbia reported to have been married before they were 18 years old compared to 9 percent of neighbouring non- Roma women.
“THE FORMER YUGOSLAV REPUBLIC OF MACEDONIA” KEY INDICATORS
Early marriage incidence for marginalised Roma women is persistent and high compared to non-Roma female counterparts. Thirty-three percent of marginalised Roma women aged 20-49 years in “the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia” reported to have been married before they were 18 years old compared to 10 percent of neighbouring non-Roma women.
25 UNDP World Bank Country Fact sheets Roma at a glance http://www.eurasia.undp.org/content/rbec/en/home/library/roma/regional-roma-survey-2017-country-fact-sheets.html
26 "All reference to Kosovo, whether to the territory, institutions or population, in this text shall be understood in full compliance with United Nations Security Council Resolution 1244 and without prejudice to the status of Kosovo."
   38

Appendix 2: Agenda of the Study visit to the UK Forced Marriage Unit, London, 7-8 December 2017
FINAL Agenda for
study visit to the UK Forced Marriage Unit London 7-8 Decembre 2017.doc
Appendix 3: List of participants of the Study visit to the UK Forced Marriage Unit, London, 7-8 December 2017
List of participants
Study visit to UK Forced Marriage Unit, London, 7-8 Dec 2017.doc
CAHROM (2017)33
    39

 CAHROM (2018)12
AD HOC COMMITTEE OF EXPERTS ON ROMA AND TRAVELLER1 ISSUES (CAHROM) __________
CAHROM THEMATIC VISIT ON
ENHANCING THE EFFECTIVE REALIZATION OF ROMA CHILDREN’S COMPULSORY SCHOOL EDUCATION AND ADDED VALUE OF ENSURING ACCESS TO VOCATIONAL EDUCATION FOR ROMA YOUTH
Chişinău and Vulcăneşti, Republic of Moldova, 24-26 April 2018
FINAL THEMATIC REPORT
approved by the experts of the thematic group and endorsed by the CAHROM at its 16th plenary meeting (Strasbourg, 16-19 October 2018)
Strasbourg, 30 November 2018
   1 The term “Roma and Travellers” is used at the Council of Europe to encompass the wide diversity of the groups covered by the work of the Council of Europe in this field: on the one hand a) Roma, Sinti/Manush, Calé, Kaale, Romanichals, Boyash/Rudari; b) Balkan Egyptians (Egyptians and Ashkali); c) Eastern groups (Dom, Lom and Abdal); and, on the other hand, groups such as Travellers, Yenish, and the populations designated under the administrative term “Gens du voyage”, as well as persons who identify themselves as Gypsies. The present is an explanatory footnote, not a definition of Roma and/or Travellers.

General conclusions on the topic
Specific conclusions of the thematic group of experts Lessons learnt by the experts
Good practices identified
Envisaged short-term and mid-term follow-up
TABLE OF CONTENTS
I. INTRODUCTION
1.1 Context of the thematic report and visit
1.2 Introduction to the situation in the Republic of Moldova, hosting country
1.3 European and international texts of reference
1.4 Composition of the thematic group of experts
1.5 Programme of the thematic visit and main issues addressed
II. SIZE, COMPOSITION, LANGUAGE, LIFESTYLE AND SITUATION OF THE GROUPS COVERED BY THE REPORT
III. COMPULSORY AND VOCATIONAL EDUCATION LEGISLATIVE AND POLICY FRAMEWORK AND PRACTICES
IV. CONCLUSIONS, LESSONS LEARNED, GOOD PRACTICES IDENTIFIED AND ENVISAGED FOLLOW-UP
4.1 4.2 4.3 4.4 4.5
APPENDICES:
Appendix 1: Appendix 2: Appendix 3: Appendix 4: Appendix 5: Appendix 6:
Appendix 7: ADDENDUM:
page 3
page 3 page 7 page 9 page 9 page 10
page 10
page 10
page 11
page 11 page 14 page 14 page 15 page 17
page 19
Official invitation letter received from the Moldovan authorities
Programme of the CAHROM thematic visit in the Republic of Moldova
List of experts and participants in the thematic visit
European and international standards and reference texts
Size, composition, language, lifestyle and situation of the groups covered by the thematic visit Compulsory education including vocational - legislative and policy framework and practices in countries participating in the thematic visit
UNICEF materials on project conducted in Vulcănești village
Experts’ and participants’ presentations and other relevant documents page 20
2
CAHROM (2018)12

I. INTRODUCTION
1.1 Context of the thematic report and visit
The issue of the level of education among Roma communities in Europe has been a matter of serious concern and efforts, both at national and international levels for decades2. Education has become a priority and one of the main areas of member states’ interventions in the framework of all existing national Roma integration strategies, and the subject of high financial and organisational investments. Unfortunately, the results are still a far cry from satisfactory. Moreover, as many countries do not collect educational data-related to Roma pupils and youth, it is hard to gauge the progress made where actions have been taken in the field of education, but also to obtain such basic information as the level of enrolment of Roma children in compulsory schooling and their transition to secondary education. Ignoring the school compulsory education in case of Roma pupils is blatant proof of the systemic marginalisation of Roma across Europe.
Compulsory education is usually presented as the indispensable minimum requirement to acquire the necessary knowledge and skills for basic social inclusion, employment and active citizenship, while the prognosis of labour market specialists leave no illusions as to future job requirements: in the forthcoming 20 to 30 years at least half of today’s existing jobs will disappear, and they are, unsurprisingly, mainly the low-skilled ones. The new types of jobs will be connected to high competencies, flexibility in the labour market and combined with lifelong learning: 65% of children entering primary school today will ultimately end up working in completely new job types that do not yet exist. In such a rapidly evolving employment landscape, the ability to anticipate and prepare for future skills requirements, job content and the aggregate effect on employment is increasingly critical for businesses, governments and individuals in order to fully seize the opportunities presented by these trends - and to mitigate undesirable outcomes3. In the case of Roma children, discussions and efforts still focus on the issue of completing primary education. How will the younger generation of Roma secure job opportunities, especially given the fact that Roma constitute the youngest population in Europe?
According to the European Union Agency for Fundamental Rights (FRA) Roma survey – data in focus. Education: the situation of Roma in 11 EU Member States4 from 2011 many alarming facts are visible:
 On survey average: 17 % of Roma children were never in education with the highest rates in Greece (44%), Portugal (32%), France and Romania (24%) and with the lowest rates in Hungary (3%), the Czech Republic and the Slovak Republic (1%).
 On survey average: 27 % of Roma children have not completed primary education with the highest rates in France (44%), Spain (43%), Romania (35%), and Bulgaria (31%) and with the lowest rates in the Slovak Republic (17%) and the Czech Republic (10%).
2 From the list of CAHROM thematic reports and the countries involved in the thematic groups, one can easily deduct the main priorities and challenges. The most numerous thematic visits - 10 out of 30 in total in the period of 2012-2017 - were related to education: on reducing school drop-outs and absenteeism of Roma pupils ( the Netherlands, 12-14 March 2012), on inclusive education as opposed to special schools (Czech Republic, 1-3 October 2012), on inclusive education as opposed to special schools (Slovak Republic, 3-5 October 2012), on school drop-out and absenteeism of Roma girls (Finland, 24-26 October 2012), on inclusive pre-school education for Roma children (Czech Republic, 19-21 November 2014), on schooling of Roma migrant and Travellers children (France, 5-7 October 2015), on vocational training/education for Roma (Poland, 26-28 November 2015), on testing systems and diagnoses for Roma children with allegedly mild mental disabilities (Hungary, 9-11 March 2016), on Roma mediation with a focus on school mediators/assistants (Lithuania, 25-27 April 2017) and on the teaching of Roma history, including the Roma Holocaust, in textbooks and school curricula (Slovak Republic, 7-9 November 2017). Endorsed thematic reports are available on: https://www.coe.int/en/web/portal/cahrom
3 The Future of Jobs. Employment, Skills and Workforce Strategy for the Fourth Industrial Revolution, World Economic Forum, 2016, p. 3. http://www3.weforum.org/docs/WEF_Future_of_Jobs.pdf
4 Bulgaria, Czech Republic, France, Greece, Hungary, Italy, Poland, Portugal, Romania, Slovak Republic and Spain.
CAHROM (2018)12
     3

CAHROM (2018)12
 On survey average: 47 % of Roma children have completed primary education with the highest rates in the Slovak Republic (67%), the Czech Republic (66%), and Hungary (63%) and the lowest rates in France (30%) and Greece (29%).
 On survey average: 10 % of Roma children and youth have completed secondary and higher education with the highest rate in the Czech Republic and Poland (20%), the Slovak Republic (15%) and Hungary (13%) and with the lowest rates in France (4 %), Spain (3%), Greece (2%) and Portugal (1%).
 On survey average: 27 % finished school after the age of 16 or were still in education after the age of 16 with the highest rates in the Czech Republic (47%), Hungary (44%), Poland and the Slovak Republic (41%) and with the lowest rates in Spain (18%), Italy (16%), Portugal (10%) and Greece (4%).
 On survey average: 56% of Roma children leave school before the age of 16 with the highest rates in Bulgaria (67%), Spain (66%), and Italy (63%) and the lowest rates in Hungary (53%), the Czech Republic, Greece and Romania (52%), France (49%) and Poland (45%).
One of the basic problems seems to be the realisation of compulsory school education and its enforcement by states, according to law obligations vary from country to country: starting age of 3 to 7, ending age of 15 to almost 19 (graph 1) and duration of compulsory education between 9 to 13 years (graph 2)5:
Compulsory education age (incuding pre-school)
19 18 17 16 15 14 13 12 11 10 9 8 7 6 5 4 3 2 1 0
14 13 12 11 10
9 8 7 6 5 4 3 2 1 0
*differences on local level, most common chosen here
5 Data for school year 2017/2018: European Commission/EACEA/Eurydice, 2017. Compulsory Education in Europe – 2017/18. Eurydice Facts and Figures. Luxembourg: Publications Office of the European Union, p. 4 https://webgate.ec.europa.eu/fpfis/mwikis/eurydice/images/d/df/Compulsory_Education_2017_18.pdf
                                                                 HUN
CHE*
CYP
AUT
BGR
CZE
GRC
LVA
MLT
NLD
SRB
TUR
MKD
BEL*
BIH
DNK
ESP
FIN
FRA
DEU*
HRV
ISL
IRL
ITA
LIE
LTU
MNE
MDA
NOR
PRT
ROU
SVK
SVN
UKR
SWE
EST
LUX
GRB*
ALB
Duration of compulsory education (in years)
POL
                                ALB BIH EST
HRV
LIE
SRB
MNE
SVN
SWE
AUT
CYP
CZE
DNK
ESP
FIN
FRA
ISL
IRL
ITA
LTU
NOR
SVK
BGR
CHE*
GRB*
GRC
LVA
MLT
ROU
UKR
LUX
TUR
BEL*
DEU*
MDA
POL
PRT
AUT
MKD
HUN
NLD
  4

Graph 2 clearly shows that the duration of compulsory education differs: 9 years (in 9 countries), 10 years (13 countries), 11 years (in 8 countries), 12 years (in 7 countries) and 13 years (in 4 countries). However that fact has not impact on the opportunities, or rather the lack thereof, offered to Roma pupils to pursue quality education which can assure them access to the labour market, economic independence and integration. Moreover, the compulsory duration of school duty should, at least, offer them vocational skills should they, for any reason, not want or are not able to pursue their education to the tertiary level.
According to the Midterm review of the EU Framework for National Roma Integration Strategies up to 20206: Regarding progress in access to education, participation of Roma in early childhood education has improved since 2011 in most of countries from 47% in 2011 to 53% in 2016: Attendance of compulsory secondary education has also improved, from 86% to 90%; and secondary school drop-out rates have decreased from 87 % to 68 %, leading to an average increase of Roma staying in secondary school. However, the share of Roma students attending classes where “all classmates are Roma” has increased (from 10% to 15%).
The reasons for schools drop-outs reported in the above mentioned FRA survey are:
 Of economic nature: high costs, need to work, etc. – on survey average: 37% with highest rate in
Greece and Romania (55%);
 Of practical nature - restricted access due to: distance, lack of documents, illness, dismissal, failure, etc.
- on survey average: 14%;
 Of personal nature: marriage, pregnancy7 – on survey average: 8% with highest rate in Poland (18%);
 Of the individual conviction that the achieved level of education is sufficient: on survey average: 28%
with highest rate in Slovak Republic (41%), followed by Bulgaria (38 %), Czech Republic (36%), France (30%) and Hungary (29%).
Based on those results the obstacles in enrolment of Roma children in education system can be defined as those connected to a system and/or infrastructure: lack of documents, distance and lack of public transportation, connected costs (textbooks, school starter kit, etc.) and to an individual perception within the Roma families (motivation, need/will to engage children in contributing to household incomes, subjective sense of school environment openness and safety – especially important in case of Roma girls, etc.
In light of this information it is worthy to mention a few attempts to limit the school drop-out rates.
In June 2017, Bulgaria introduced a vast survey on school drop-outs and the continuation of education after completing primary school. Findings from that search are as follows:
- 130,000 children do not attend school in Bulgaria, the majority of them are Roma children;
- students dropping out after completing primary education are the largest group of drop-outs: 6.33% of students (2,763 out of 42,221) who graduated from primary school are not enrolled in secondary or
high schools (compared to 3-4% in previous years);
6 Material sent by Non-discrimination and Roma coordination Unit, Directorate-General Justice and Consumers to Member States in March 2018 for the meeting of National Roma Contact Point, 16 March 2018, Brussels.
7 According to Eurostat, Romania, Bulgaria, Hungary and Slovakia are the countries with the highest proportion of births of teenage mums , respectively: 12.3%, 11,9%, 9% and 8,4%. As it relates to Greece and the Netherlands, EU countries participated in the visit, the rate of teenage birth giving is: 3.2% (Greece) and 1,3 % (Netherlands). In 2015 the highest number of birth given by girls aged 10-14 was in Romania - 351, followed by Bulgaria - 138 and France -117; in case of Greece - 30 and the Netherlands – 0.
CAHROM (2018)12
   5

- the presence / absence of a secondary school in the respective locality is a statistically significant factor affecting enrolment in secondary education: the percentage of non-enrolled primary school pupils who are the only ones living in their respective location is almost doubled: 8.97% compared to 5.03% of the primary school graduates in the cities;
- drop-out students are not evenly distributed across schools and regions, and there is an over- concentration in certain municipalities and schools.
As a follow up, the inter-institutional mechanism for returning children back to school was established with representatives of all related state agencies and NGOs at the national and local levels (11,602 specialists organised in 1,103 teams): teachers, parents, police officers, social workers, health mediators, etc. Those teams visited homes of children not attending school and spoke to the parents. As a result, many of the children returned to school. However, according to information from the Bulgarian Ministry of Education, many of them attended school for several months but ended up not returning. Nonetheless, it shows that constant and recurring pressure can be effective up to a certain point.
Spain also worked on collecting data on schooling. According to the Executive Summary: Roma Students in Secondary Education in Spain. A Comparative Study, 64% of Roma youth fail to complete their compulsory secondary education studies (ESO) compared to 13% for the population as a whole. Moreover, the illiteracy rate of the Roma community stood at 8.7% in 2011 compared to 2.19% for the whole of Spain. By age 16 the Roma enrolment rate declines to 55%, far below the 93.5% for the rest of the population. In 2007, only 2.6% of the Roma population had gone on to higher education compared to 22% of the population as a whole. (...) at age 15-16 the vast majority of Roma who remain in school are enrolled in middle level vocational training or an Initial Professional Qualification Programme (PCPI). The situation is even worse in the case of Roma girls and young women. (...) As for the level of education achieved by Roma youth aged 16 to 19, 62.7% have completed primary school, 24.8% have earned their ESO diploma and only 7.4% completed non-compulsory secondary education (high school or intermediate-level vocational training). At these ages, the difference with the general population is quite significant; for that same age bracket, 47% of the general population earned their ESO diploma and 24.7% finished non-compulsory secondary education. (...) As regards the youngest age bracket (between 15 and 19), 43.3% of the Roma population neither studies or works, 30.4 percentage points above the national rate (which stands at 12.8%). In the next age bracket considered (20 to 24) the gap with the national indicator narrows: 48.5% of Roma youth are not engaged in any sort of training or labour activity compared to 27.4% of the general population. For both age groups, the percentage of Roma women who neither study nor work is higher than Roma men with differences ranging from 6.7 percentage points for the youngest bracket to 8.8 for the 20 to 24 year old group 8.
One of the Spanish NRIS objectives is to raise the number of students completing ESO. In 2007 the figures were 78.1% for boys and 71.7% for girls - the goal by 2020 is to reach 90% range for boys and girls. The Fundación Secretariado Gitano launched in 2009 the Promociona Programme , financed by the European Social Fund, with the ultimate goal to reduce early school leaving, to help young Roma to achieve higher academic standards at the end of primary education, to complete the compulsory secondary level of education and to continue middle and/or higher studies and vocational training in order to improve access to the labour market for Roma youth. Figures of the above mentioned Promociona programe for the 2014/2015 school year show that stable
8 Fundación Secretariado Gitano, Executive Summary: Roma Students in Secondary Education in Spain. A Comparative Study, p.7, p. 14, see: Addendum. 6
CAHROM (2018)12
    
investment and pressure for schooling bring results: out of 1 276 students from 373 schools enrolled into the programme - 75% of the boys and 89.5% of the girls (a total of 82.25 %) earned their secondary school, and 87.8% of the boys and 75.3% of the girls (a total of 81.55%) programme participants continuing post- compulsory studies.
One of the recommended tools as (relatively) efficient for the education of Roma pupils, especially in relation to school enrolment and for the creation of Roma role models, are Roma school mediators. Of a total of 6,082 Roma mediators working in CoE members states9 2,368 work as Roma school mediators (39 %), and in the countries which participated in the thematic visit, the number of mediators working specifically as school mediators is as follows:
- Republic of Moldova: 010 (est. number of Roma population: 107,100)
- Bosnia and Herzegovina: 14 (est. number of Roma population: 58,000)
- Greece: 4211 (est. number of Roma population: 110,00712)
- Hungary: 19213 (est. number of Roma population: 750,000)
- The Netherlands: 0 (est. number of Roma population: 40,000)
- Poland: 9214 (est. number of Roma population: 25,000)
- Slovak Republic: 1,28715 (est. number of Roma population: 490,000)
- Ukraine: 216 (est. number of Roma population: 260,000). -
1.2 Introduction to the situation in the Republic of Moldova – hosting country
According to the UNDP report 2007: Roma in the Republic of Moldova 21 % of adult Roma are illiterate (compared to 2% of non-Roma) that means that one fifth of the Roma population is excluded from social and economic life. Apart from the group of illiterate Roma, only three out of ten Roma have primary education, and another three out of ten have secondary education/gymnasium level (including incomplete or vocational education). The Education Index is one third lower for Roma (0.641) than for non-Roma (0.910) and is the most important difference between Roma and non-Roma in Moldova, as compared with other components of Human Development Index. This suggests that closing the education gap could effectively contribute to the human development of Roma and bring them closer, in terms of human development, to the majority population17. 43 % of Roma children age 7-15 do not attend school; primary education (7-11) covers less than 70% Roma pupils, and secondary (12-15) less than 50%. Persons with college and higher (academic) education are estimated as 4% of Roma. Reasons for school drops outs are similar to those presented by FRA, mentioned above: economic (34%) , no need for further education (14%), the need to bring income to the household (85%), marriage (8%), illness (7%), distance (5%), discrimination (2%), nonetheless it must be noticed here, that
9 Data collected for the purpose of CAHROM thematic visit on Roma mediation (with a focus on school mediators/assistants), held in Vilnius, Lithuania, on 25-27 April 2017, and updated in November 2017 during 14th CAHROM plenary, see report from the visit https://www.coe.int/en/web/portal/cahrom 10 Roma community mediators have been institutionalised in the Republic of Moldova. However, they are not labelled as school mediators and work mainly as health and social mediators. The total number of Roma Community Mediators hired by local governments varies from year to year (2013 - 15 mediators hired in 2013, 48 in 2014, 15 in 2015, 9 in 2016).
11 In Greece there are in total 127 Roma mediators. They do not have a particular “specialization” like “school mediators” or “health mediators”. They are working in all areas, accordingly to local needs. However, 42 of them are working in practice in school environment.
12 Data collected by Greek authorities on the basis of mapping of the Roma settlement, conducted by the Special Secretariat on Roma Social inclusion.
13 Another 119 work as Roma employment mediators in Hungary.
14 Another 20 work as Roma health mediators in Poland.
15 Another 229 work as Roma health mediators, another 860 as Roma employment mediators and another 533 as community mediators in the Slovak Republic.
16 Another 19 work as Roma health mediators in Ukraine.
17 Roma in the Republic of Moldova, UNDP Moldova, 2007, p.62.
CAHROM (2018)12
   7

when it comes to answers to detailed questions approx. 1/3 of Roma respondents refused the answer or answered “I do not know”. Study on the situation of Romani women and girls in the Republic of Moldova , UNDP Moldova in co-operation with UN Women and OHCHR, 2014, excerpt data concerning the differences between Roma girls and boys: only 52% of Roma girls and 55% Roma boys are involved into primary education, only 14% of Roma girls and 17% Roma boys are involved into secondary professional education, only 63% of adult (16+) Roma women are literate18.
A comprehensive UNICEF report: Roma children and Their Access to Services. Participatory Assessment of Barriers. Qualitative Sociological Survey gives a decent overview of the educational situation of Roma children in the Republic of Moldova, with a focus on barriers in access to education: Schooling is perceived by Roma as a tool in which children learn to read and write, with their school education usually ending at primary classes. Cases of further education in the secondary school or university are an exception. Enrolment of girls and boys is uneven, and is higher among boys. Education is not highly valued for the Roma, even if some Roma people realize the benefits of education. People who manage to go beyond the Roma’s normal “educational limit” are frequently rejected by Roma. A parent of a Roma family is a passive actor of the education process. Attendance of preschool institutions by Roma children is not accepted nor promoted in their community. Non-schooling of Roma is due to a number of reasons, both objective and subjective. The main causes of dropout at an early age are migration and early marriages. (...) The survey answers showed that family and money are the fundamental values of the Roma community. (...) The most frequent reason for the schooling of children was acquisition of basic writing and reading skills. (...) Some young Roma people and non-Roma parents believe that education can protect children from non-standard and antisocial behaviour (...) In most cases, vulnerable Roma families face difficulties in providing children with school supplies. (...) Rent payment for books or purchases of exercise books and supplies are an obstacle to the child’s schooling. (...) The survey showed low preparation levels of Roma children for school. Compared with their peers, Roma lack the age-specific knowledge. (...) Failure to attend a preschool institution affects the following enrolment in school. Some teachers mentioned the poor development of motor skills, poor memory training of some children, lack of awareness of the collective behaviour rules, etc. (...) The schooling in Roma communities involves a different approach than schooling in non-Roma communities, where parents show a high interest in enrolling their children in schools. (...) In Soroca, at the beginning of each school year, since 2007, an official count of school-age children is conducted in order to identify the number of children present at that time in the town and to persuade parents to educate their children. (...) Another issue was the transfer of responsibility and task of schooling of Roma children from one authority to another. (...) community actors pointed out that Roma leaders themselves, including the community mediator, do not provide a strong example to the Roma people in schooling their children. Girls that were educated in these families continued the tradition of dropping out of school after the age of 12 to 14. In the same context, it was noted that the involvement and effort of Roma leaders in the schooling of Roma children are lower compared to other community actors. (...) Another feature of the Roma’s lifestyle that impacts school attendance is the perception of Roma children’s wishes as a supreme value: if the child does not wish to go to school/kindergarten, the parent does not insist (...).
One positive factor that influenced the education of Roma children at all levels is the inclusion of Roma issues on the agenda of various national and international organizations that organize activities with parents and teachers for the inclusion of Roma children in schools19.
18 Study on the situation of Romani women and girls in the Republic of Moldova, UN Women, UNDP, OHCHR, 2014, p. 30.
19 All the quotations in this paragraph, marked in italics, come from: UNICEF, 2016, Participatory Assessment of Barriers Hampering the Access of Roma Children and their Families to Services, Chisinau, UNICEF Moldova Office, pages: 31-69.
CAHROM (2018)12
    8

This survey tabled, according to all responses, several measure of school enrolment that can be both, pull factor or barrier, depending on circumstances: infrastructure and equipment of the institution, parents’ interest in education, quality of training, attitude of teachers and interaction with peers.
Pull factors are as follows: trained parents and relatives, free food, practical and extracurricular activities.
Apparently barriers in regards to Roma children involvement into schooling system are: traditions and lifestyle (e.g. involvement of girls in household and/or care for other younger children or the risk that they may be “stolen”, involvement of boys in income generating activities, including begging), migration (however, according to some experts and parents, children’s migration with their parents has some positive effects as it protects children from common risks associated with lack of parental supervision, like drugs abuse, etc.), non- attendance of preschool institutions (enrolment of a child in a kindergarten is a disgrace to the Roma family and is perceived as that family is unable to support their child, and mother is usually labelled a “bad mother”), language barriers, poor living conditions (including the lack of season-specific clothing and footwear), adverse weather conditions, flawed documentation of Roma, complicated curriculum, schedule of classes, lack of school transport, mixed classes (in sense of pupils’ age) and, finally, unfounded blaming. The rationale behind those factors, grassroots examples and conclusions are explained in details in above mentioned report.
According to specialists, whenever we are speaking about social integration there are two main and interrelated platforms of integration: education and labour market. As long as Roma are not present at schools - as a consequence - they are not present in labour market. Thus, the integration remains only a postulate.
1.3 European and international texts of reference
See Appendix 4.
1.4 Composition of the thematic group of experts
Experts participating in the visit represented a wide range of entities dealing with Roma issues and/or education at different levels: institutions responsible for national minorities and/or persons responsible for implementation of the Roma inclusion strategies. The list of the experts participating in the thematic group is listed below and their contacts details can be found in Appendix 3.
Experts from the REPUBLIC OF MOLDOVA, requesting/hosting country
Mr Nicolae RADIȚA Ms Olga PETUHOVA
Ms Aida DŽAFEROVIĆ Ms Eleni KALLINIKOU
CAHROM member, National Centre of Roma CAHROM substitute, Bureau of Inter-Ethnic Relations,
Ministry of Civil Affairs, BOSNIA AND HERZEGOVINA
CAHROM member, Expert within the Special Secretariat on Roma Social Inclusion, Ministry of Labour, Social Insurance and Social Solidarity, GREECE
CAHROM (2018)12
     Experts from BOSNIA AND HERZEGOVINA, GREECE, HUNGARY, THE NETHERLANDS, POLAND, UKRAINE, partner countries
 9

Mr Iván SÖRÖS Mr Ed HUIJBERS
Ms Alina RESPONDEK Ms Natalia TKACHENKO
Head of Department for Children’s Chances, Ministry of Human Resources, State Secretariat for Social Inclusion, HUNGARY (excused for the thematic visit)
School attendance officer, Municipality of Veldhoven, THE NETHERLANDS
Foundation for the Development of the Education System,
POLAND
Head of the Division for International Cooperation of National Minorities Issues, Department for Religious Affairs and Nationalities, Ministry of Culture of Ukraine, UKRAINE
1.5 Programme of the thematic visit and main issues addressed
The agenda (see Appendix 2) included meetings and discussions with several relevant ministries and State agencies (State Chancellery, Ministry of External Affairs and European Integration, Ministry of Education, Culture and Research, Ministry of Health, Labour and Social Protection, Ministry of Internal Affairs, Coordinating Council of Audio-visual and Bureau of Interethnic Relations). During the first day representatives from UNICEF Moldova presented the programme they carried out in partnership with the Youth Resource Centre DACIA (NGO) in Vulcănești village – location of the field visit on the next day (Promotion of increased participation of Roma children in education; see Appendix 7). Vulcănești is inhabited by approx. 1,500 people with a 90 % Roma community and is characterized by the lowest rate of school attendance. The field visit was conducted with a view to having direct contact with Roma representatives and local and regional school authorities. The details of the educational situation in Vulcănești are described in the above mentioned Appendix). A debriefing session between the experts of the thematic group was organised in the morning of the third day.
The agenda followed the guidelines developed by the CAHROM and allowed the possibility for partner countries to introduce their experience and exchange views with local interlocutors.
Some of the main issues addressed during the thematic visit included: the need for pre-school education (and the reluctance from some parents), the need to properly equip Roma pupils with basic tools, including textbooks and starter kits, transportation, meals, etc., seasonal migration of Roma families which severely influences school attendance, Roma school mediators system, problem of lack of ID papers, lack of knowledge of the official language among some Roma children, lack of basic data, including the number of Roma children enrolled in the school system (estimates vary between 100 and 5,000!), early marriages – phenomenon still valid within Moldovan Roma communities, etc.
II. SIZE, COMPOSITION, LANGUAGE, LIFESTYLE AND SITUATION OF THE GROUPS COVERED BY THE REPORT
Following the decision taken by the CAHROM at its 12th meeting in November 2016, information about the size, composition, language and situation of the groups covered by the thematic report is no longer included in the core of the document but figures (see Appendix 5).
III. LEGISLATIVE AND POLICY FRAMEWORK AND PRACTICES
See Appendix 6.
10
CAHROM (2018)12

IV. CONCLUSIONS, LESSONS LEARNED, GOOD PRACTICES IDENTIFIED AND ENVISAGED FOLLOW-UP 4.1 General conclusions on the topic
The experts unanimously concluded that a strong message to all CoE member States that schooling is a legal obligation and thus, must be enforced by the States for all its citizens, including Roma citizens. In this regard the question of possible penalties applied for not fulfilling the period of compulsory education duty was discussed and perceived as a possible and potentially effective measure to pressure Roma parents to send their children to school. The case of Drosero Roma settlement in Xanthi (Eastern Thrace), where Roma parents were imposed fine for not sending their children to school, led to a large number of registrations of Roma children into school which is a positive example in this regard. Furthermore, the lack of enforcement of legal obligations is further evidence of the marginalisation and treatment of Roma as “second class” citizens in practice. Education should be at the core of any action taken within national strategies or sectorial action plans on education. The implementation of Roma strategies/action plans should be supported by adequate legislation and institutional mechanisms, including qualified staff, a sustainable budget, etc. that enable effective enforcement.
Poverty is not the single reason for school drops-out
Secondly, poverty is a fact but not the only reason for school absenteeism of Roma pupils and this argument should not be overused while speaking about Roma, neither by the authorities nor by the Roma themselves and should not be used as an “easy excuse” or justification for school drops-out. Nonetheless, poverty still remains an obstacle for schooling as it is related to other phenomena like poor housing conditions, migration, and so on which consequently affects school duty.
A remaining obstacle is the lack of ID papers, including birth certificates, which is an issue in the Republic of Moldova and Ukraine (and in some other European countries) as in practice it closes access to public services, including education. However, positive actions in this regards have been taken by other countries (Romania or Montenegro) and have resulted in gradually solving this problem.
Lack of data on education hinder monitoring of schooling and educational situation of Roma
The lack of data on education was mentioned many times, this issue is raised by different experts during every visit, regardless of the visit’s topic. A tool which could improve the systemic approach to data collection is a mapping of Roma settlements, illustrating different areas of interventions, including education.
CAHROM (2018)12
  School duty is a legal obligation and thus must be enforced by the state for all its citizens, including ethnic Roma citizens
      Lack of ID papers can negatively influence access to education services. Progress in several countries achieved in this regards should be followed by other countries.
    11

The local level is crucial for the effective implementation of Strategies or Action Plans, adapted to the local needs. They should be characterized by a holistic and dynamic approach, tailored to the local situation. At the local level co-operation is needed between key stakeholders: schools and Roma school mediators, department/person within the local authorities responsible for education, social workers, police officers, etc. Those local “teams” should pay attention also to Roma parents who are often not supporting their children or even not sending them to school. The link between compulsory school duty completion and child benefits should be considered.
Greece is good example since the Social Solidarity Income (SSI) – a welfare programme targeting low income households - is linked with a children’s school attendance; since November, 1st, 2018, the SSI database in digitally inter-connected with the school database myschool. Parents are obliged to secure their children’s attendance to school in order to benefit from SSI. A similar solution is considered in Poland.
In the Netherlands, municipalities are responsible for enforcing the law and employ school attendance officers to ensure compliance with the Law. Parents bear primary responsibility for complying with the Compulsory Education Act, i.e. for enrolling their children into school and for ensuring their daily presence at school. When children, Roma or otherwise, are persistently absent, the school attendance officer takes action – if necessary legal – to ensure they go to school. As a last resort, the attendance officer can report the case to the Public Prosecutor; judicial proceedings can lead to a fine or even a custodial sentence on the parents. Fines to Roma parents remain usually unpaid; they are not a suitable answer as they increase family debt and poverty. This is why, in Veldhoven, the fine was replaced by a work penalty (parents who do not send children to school must work on a Saturday). The Dutch model to link family benefits with community work could also be envisaged.
Promotion of Roma role models within the Roma communities and the majority
Roma role models should not only be promoted with the majority in order to change stereotypes, but first and foremost - amongst the Roma community to change their mind-set towards their children’s education – as formal education is not a high priority in Roma culture. Apart from objective reasons (like poverty, inadequate housing etc.) there are also internally motivated reasons for the reluctance towards pre-school education, completion of school duty and continuation into higher education. Roma parents are very often passive actors in the educational process of their children. This issue must be addressed by educational authorities.
Good examples of role models can be Roma school assistants/mediators. States in which the institution of Roma school assistants/mediators does not yet exist, should consider it, and pay special attention to keep the positions of community assistant/mediators separate from school assistants/mediators. School mediators, apart from being facilitators for school, also act as a bridge with Roma parents and can influence their attitude towards continuing school and can fight against negative phenomena within the community, such as early marriages which in practice terminate the education process, especially among Roma girls. The role of trans- generational exchanges among Roma women and girls can also contribute to the process of education. Awareness raising for Roma parents – as responsible for the education of their children and for the completion of school duty, starting with compulsory pre-school education and finishing at the age of 15-19 (depending on
country, see: graph 1. in introductory part) – is needed.
CAHROM (2018)12
  Local level crucial for enforcement of school duty regardless of ethnicity
    12

Teacher training and multi-disciplinary teams
Furthermore, the lack of training of some teachers to work with pupils of different cultural backgrounds can influence the involvement and attendance of Roma pupils and the attitude of the Roma parents towards the majority society, school institutions and education duty. Teacher training should encompass, among others, information on Roma culture and traditions, a human rights component, the cultural diversity of different groups, the rights relating to the protection of national minorities, etc.
The presented Dutch approach of multi-disciplinary teams, described below under “good practices” can be an efficient tool for monitoring the educational situation of individual Roma pupil and at the same time – for tutoring and mentoring Roma youth.
After-class activities for Roma children
The system of after-class activities exists in many countries. Its goal is to level out specific shortages of Roma pupils as they often cannot be helped within their family environment in this regard. It should be enriched with informal education activities concerning career counselling, especially in case of Roma youth. Vocational advisers speaking about how vocational training can build a good bridge towards employment, related economic independence and the ability to provide for the family and offer Roma youth better knowledge about the labour market and job prospects.
High drop-outs rates at secondary education level although partly compulsory
The thematic visit was dominated by the issue of compulsory education since the data presented showed that on the level of secondary education, including vocational schools, the presence of Roma students is rather symbolic and perceived as not compulsory in practice. This attitude is shared by both the Roma community and very often the authorities. The lack of discussion on vocational education within the context of Roma is thus the diagnosis of an (alarming) situation. Secondary education, which is partly compulsory, is in practice not enforced at all.
Lack of professional skills and the need for “second chance” programmes for Roma youth
The lack of education automatically leads to a lack of any professional skills and a lack of access to the labour market. Therefore a system of “second chance” schools – combining literacy and vocational skills - should be considered and promoted among Roma, in particular for those who dropped out and who would like to return to school and acquire either a higher education or professional skills. Here, the possibilities of the EU European Social Funds and Erasmus+ can be used (and were used in several countries). The experts agreed that more synergy is needed between Roma-related issues and the use of EU funds at the national level, especially in relation to Roma teenagers that are neither in education nor in employment (NEET). According to the European Commission report on implementation of National Strategies of Roma Inclusion – since 2011 the number of Roma NEET increased from 56 % to 63 % in 2016 – and it affects mainly Roma youth, who makes up the largest part of Roma communities. As those funds enable also trans-border cooperation – the exchange of experiences and sharing of good practices is possible.
CAHROM (2018)12
            13

In this regard is it very important to focus on presenting to the Roma pupils the possibilities offered by a vocational education, in relation with access to the local labour market and relatively early economic independence which is in line with early marriages and early childbirth, occurring in some Roma communities. It is also in line with the Roma tradition of “family business” and should be promoted by guidance counsellors and career advisers at an early stage. It should be also connected with training on self-employment and entrepreneurship. Also worth considering and to be included in the training, if it exists, is the possibility of micro-credits for Roma women and Roma youth to start their own businesses.
Job counselling at the early educational stage and cooperation with local entrepreneurs
Job information and counselling at an early educational stage is especially relevant in the case of Roma pupils. Paid internships for Roma youth would also be an effective tool to attract them – co-operation with local entrepreneurs should be established and a system of incentives for them prepared (part or full subsidy by the state, tax exemptions, etc.). Such systems operate in Bosnia and Herzegovina, the Netherlands, Greece and Germany.
4.2 Specific conclusions of the thematic group of experts
Field visit
The experts appreciated the visit however the results were far from expected: the Roma parents’ lack of interest for education was visible given the rather low number of Roma pupils present at school; there were no parents at the meeting organised by the school (partly due to the fact that UNICEF organised a conference in Chişinău on the Vulcănești project on the same day, and partly because of migration, but those present in the village were not interested in exchange). Discussions with Roma adults revealed that they ignored the fact that education is a legal obligation. Both educational authorities and school staff seemed to be helpless to deal with this phenomenon even though UNICEF is present in this locality and supports the school in question since late 2016. The school building was renovated to some extent but is still is far from offering decent conditions (the toilets are outhouses with no doors, and no running water etc.). The option of transferring pupils from the school in Vulcănești to the one in Ciorești (neighbouring village) is being considered but it was clear that there is no definite position. Although roads and basic infrastructure in Vulcănești are lacking there were a lot of luxury villas and no “poor” houses. This led experts to the conclusion that, at least in case of this village, poverty is definitely not the reason of school drop-out and despite efforts – the sentiment of impunity and lack of responsibility is obvious. In fact, during the discussions it was mentioned that the poorer parents in the community generally send their children to school but the rich families do not. Clearly, legally binding compulsory education is not enforced in case of Roma although there is a system of adequate (and gradual) sanctions.
4.3 Lessons learned by the experts
During the exchange and discussions on national practices it became clear that there is no single solution or universal approach. There is a visible need to diversify teaching strategies applied to Roma children’s (inclusive) education. The approach should be both, nationally and locally tailored and adapted to the local needs and dynamics.
CAHROM (2018)12
   14

According to the Dutch expert with regard to the Republic of Moldova – parents should be clearly held responsible for their children’s education and completion of compulsory school duty without exception. His view is shared by other experts, namely the Greek and Polish. Referring to the situation in the city of Veldhoven - researching the possibility of using Roma mediators should be considered.
The Ukrainian expert underlined that Roma education should not be dealt with by only one agency and must be addressed in a comprehensive manner. Providing effective education to Roma is directly linked to the provision of housing, documents, employment, and so on.
The constructive and effective approach to solving the problem is interrelated and should be addressed by all relevant "players": central – the Ministry of Education, the Ministry of Culture, the Migration Service, the National Police, the Ministry of Social Policy, and local authorities, teachers, parents, NGOs, etc. The cooperation among schools is crucial; parents and Roma mediators should play an active role in this process. The state should intervene at the earliest possible stage to ensure the successful transition of Roma children from one educational level to another with a focus on secondary and vocational level.
Considering the issue of compulsory education in the light of the experts’ presentations, exchange, discussions and field visit, they have formulated one rudimentary question that should be considered seriously and responsibly by state authorities: If Roma parents are not treated like all other parents, with the same rights and obligations, what are we teaching the Roma children? If their parents are outside the law, how can respect of the law and responsibility be instilled in these children? These values are essential to help them have a better future, and equal treatment is the best way towards inclusion.
4.4 Good practices identified
In the Republic of Moldova
 Strong commitment of the Government of the Republic of Moldova for the implementation of the Roma Action Plan 2016-2020,
 Support from Roma NGOs for the Action Plan and their high and effective involvement in solving problems related to facilitation of Roma access to education,
 Mobile registration and medical teams,
 Instructions and respective Action Plan for Prevention and Reduction of Drop-out and Absenteeism in
general schools approved by Order Nr. 559 of 12 June 2015 of the Ministry of Education, Culture and
Research,
 Establishment of resource centres for inclusive education in 31 educational institutions all over the
country,
 Example of election of two Roma women as local councillors at the local council level,
 UNICEF project in Vulcănești - the goal was to improve the school enrolment of Roma children in the
village through (provision of computers, books, play room, after-school classes and second chance schooling for children who have not finished compulsory education to take the 9th grade graduation exams, activities with parents, separately for mothers and fathers, work with teachers and bringing new teachers into the school. See details: Appendix 7), while local authorities, in cooperation with Roma NGO, made some renovation of the school building (a new roof, heating system, new windows).
15
CAHROM (2018)12

The following good practices have been identified by the Moldovan authorities from the partner countries:
 School attendance officer applying a multidisciplinary approach in their activity (the Netherlands),
 Computerized schooling record for each child (the Netherlands),
 Financial motivation for teachers to train on and apply inclusive teaching methods (Hungary),
 Practice of “second chance” schools offered to Roma children (Greece),
 Roma educational assistants (Poland, Greece),
 Integration dayrooms run both by schools and Roma NGOs (Poland).
In Bulgaria (which did not participate in the thematic group/visit)
 National survey on school drop-outs - Bulgaria introduced (2017) a vast national survey on school
drop-outs and on the continuation of education after the completion of primary school in order to diagnose the scale and reasons of high school drop outs rates. More details on the preliminary results of the survey are included in the introductory part of this report.
 
  
In Poland
 Educational data collection system20 – the System of Educational Information (SIO), according to legal
provisions, allows to collect data on pupils of national and ethnic minorities, at all education levels (pre-school – primary – secondary, integrated and special schools), for whom schools provide additional classes (namely national/ethnic minority mother tongue languages , geography and history of country of origin)21. In case of Roma pupils, the above-mentioned additional classes are not available, so this legal opportunity encompasses a wide range of activities, related to the “specific educational needs of Roma pupils”, such as: engaging Roma school assistants and support teachers, offering additional support classes, excursions, purchase of textbooks and school supplies, etc. These activities and support are adjusted to the locally identified needs of Roma pupils.
 Education. Practical guide for Roma parents (2012, in Polish and in 2 Roma dialects) on education concerning benefits of pre-school education and education in integrated schools22 :
20 See Addendum for education-related data for Roma pupils in Poland.
21 It means that this data does not show the total number of pupils in the education system, but the ones for who parents wish to have additional activities to maintain their cultural identity.
22 http://mniejszosci.narodowe.mswia.gov.pl/mne/romowie/edukacja-dzieci-romskic/7573,Podreczniki-i-publikacje.html
CAHROM (2018)12
 In Greece:
 The Second Chance Schools programme in Greece,
 The existence of the legislative framework, as Greece is currently ready for the implementation of
 actions/projects,
 The establishment of Multi-centres (Polikentra) within Roma Branches of the Community Centres that
 provide a wide range of services that respond to the needs of support of education, social care and
 other relevant supporting services,
 The inclusion of teachers to the staff of Roma Branches of the Community Centres.
 In Hungary
 the operation of child-care warning system, social workers or child-care professionals in schools and
 kindergarten where needed, are being employed from January 2016 as a PILOT and extended in 2018.
 16

In the Netherlands
 Multi-disciplinary teams, electronic data, multi-problem Roma family approach (in the municipalities of Veldhoven, Nieuwegein and Ede). The basic multi-disciplinary team which uses an integrated approach consists of: a policy maker (integral safety), an integral safety officer, a school attendance officer (integral safety) and two specialized social workers. They have knowledge of Roma communities and individual families and work with Roma families on a daily basis. They supervise multi-problem families and react according to their needs; they consult on a weekly basis and can react immediately if necessary. Every family has a restricted electronic file containing information that allows assessing progress, including on the educational situation of children. On a case-by-case basis, some other experts can be invited for consultations (e.g. experts on debt aid, work and income consultants, staff from the housing commission, staff from the registration office, tax authorities, district supervisor, council for child protection, health service, etc.) – according to the individual needs. The focus of the multi-disciplinary teams is as follows: physical environment, care and well-being, income and education, crime and law enforcement, resilience.
 Activities for young mothers – the programme (closed) of information sessions to all young mothers on skills concerning their new duties, etc.
4.5 Envisaged follow-up At the level of CAHROM
•

The experts’ recommendation for Roma mapping, shortly following the thematic visit in the Republic of Moldova, was already addressed during the 15th CAHROM plenary session, held on 22-25 May 2018 in Athens, Greece, and existing examples were presented (by Greece, the Slovak Republic, Hungary and “The former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia”). The Committee decided to continue discussing mapping and data collection and proposed it as a topic for one of the forthcoming CAHROM thematic visits (2019 or 2020) – Georgia, Hungary, the Republic of Moldova, Poland, Portugal, Spain, “the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia” and Ukraine confirmed their interest to participate in such a thematic group;
A request was addressed to the CAHROM Bulgarian member to highlight the results of the Bulgarian survey conducted on the reasons for drops-out at the secondary education level. Such a presentation took place at the 16th CAHROM plenary meeting (Strasbourg, 16-19 October 2018).
By the Republic of Moldova
 Authorities are preparing the establishment of multidisciplinary teams similar to those existing in the Netherlands, to be put in practice at the national level for all children, including Roma; Roma community mediators are envisaged to be a part of those Teams;
 Intensification of measures aimed at informing and strengthening awareness among Roma parents of the need to enrol children in educational institutions;
 Effective application of measures, including punitive measures, provided for in the legislation to Roma parents neglecting their duty to educate their children;
 Recruitment of all 48 Roma community mediators in 44 settlements populated predominantly by Roma people.
17
CAHROM (2018)12

By Bosnia and Herzegovina
• Continuation the harmonization of legislation that facilitates the registration of all citizens in BiH, with special emphasis on the Roma;
• Ensuring a higher level of coordination with relevant educational authorities and institutions in charge of social protection by working on an inter-sectoral approach for the purpose of better monitoring and additional financing of Roma educational needs;
• Increasing the coverage of Roma children by pre-school education and provide funds for this purpose;
• Increasing the inclusion of Roma children in primary education and prevent school drop-outs;
• Developing measures to attract more Roma in vocational education and training;
• Providing a sustainable system of scholarships for Roma students;
• Providing financial and legal opportunities to engage Roma mediators/assistants;
• Ensuring systematic data collection and monitoring the realization of Roma education needs.
By Greece
 Developing synergies with European programmes, cooperation and consultation (e.g. ERASMUS +) in general;
 Drafting of an Action Plan for Education Issues upon consultation with all competent authorities;
 Pilot project of Task Forces composed of Roma mediators and Roma scientists visiting school units with
Roma students in order to animate them to complete their studies;
 Submission of proposals to EU programmes against school drop-out.
Hungary
 The 2018-2020 Action Plan for the Hungarian Social Inclusion Strategy is under preparation (in the phase of consultancy);
 The implementation of the measures of the National Hungarian Social Inclusion Strategy and the national strategy of preventing early school leaving are being monitored continuously.
The Netherlands
 Next steps to be worked out with relevant Dutch authorities, including the Dutch CAHROM member.
Poland
 The paper on the compulsory education of Roma children and the drop-out rate in secondary education, based on existing data and findings of that particular visit, was prepared and sent to the Ministry of Interior and Administration, as well as to the Ministry of Education as a follow up of the thematic visit and as material for further steps to be taken in this field.
Ukraine
 The electronic educational data collection enabling the assessment of pupils’ progress and of the actions taken will be considered;
 The concept of so-called “Night and Sunday schools” for those pupils that have not completed primary education;
 An awareness-raising campaign among the Roma people is needed in order to create the desire for socialization and integration into society, including high-quality vocational education.
18
CAHROM (2018)12

APPENDICES:
Appendix 1: Official invitation letter received from the Moldovan authorities
Appendix 1 Official invitation letter.pdf
Appendix 2:
Final agenda.docx
Appendix 3:
LIST OF EXPERTS.doc
Appendix 4:
Programme of the CAHROM thematic visit in the Republic of Moldova
List of experts and participants in the thematic visit
European and international standards and reference texts
CAHROM (2018)12
    Appendix 4 INT
STANDARDS AND REFRENCE TXT.docx
Appendix 5: Size, composition, language, lifestyle and situation of the groups covered by the report
Appendix 5
SITUATION OF ROMA IN APRTICIPATING COUNTRIES.docx
Appendix 6: Compulsory education including vocational education: legislative and policy framework and practices in countries participating in the visit
Appendix 6
LEGISLATIVE AND POLICY FRAMEWORK AND PRACTICES.docx
Appendix 7: UNICEF materials on project conducted in Vulcănești village
Appendix 7 UNICEF project in Vulcanesti.docx
   19

ADDENDUM: Experts’ and participants’ presentations and other relevant documents
Republic of Moldova
PPP MOLDOVA
COUNCIL OF EUROPE kosher.ppt
Bosnia and Herzegovina
Bosnia and Herzegovina.pptx
Greece
CHISINAU_GREECE_ CAHROM MEMBER.pptx
Hungary
Hungary.pptx
The Netherlands
Veldhoven Netherlands.pptx
Poland
Poland final version.pptx
Ukraine
EDUCA TION UKRAINE.ppt
CAHROM (2018)12
        ENG educational
data on Roma pupils in Psokilcahn_d-._xplsrxaktyczny_informator_dla_rodzicow.pdf
Edukacja_dzieci_rom
 20

 MINISTERS’ DEPUTIES Recommendations CM/Rec(2023)4 5 April 2023
Recommendation CM/Rec(2023)4
of the Committee of Ministers to member States on Roma youth participation
(Adopted by the Committee of Ministers on 5 April 2023 at the 1462nd meeting of the Ministers' Deputies)
The Committee of Ministers, under the terms of Article 15.b of the Statute of the Council of Europe,
    Considering that the Council of Europe aims to achieve greater unity between its members, by promoting,
 among other things, youth policies based on shared principles;
 Having regard to the Convention for the Protection of Human Rights and Fundamental Freedoms
  (ETS No.
 particular Article 7 (
of health exclusion
35), in
the right of children and young persons to protection   the right to protection
the right to social and medical assistance
the right to protection against poverty and social
5, the Convention), in particular Article 1 (obligation to respect human rights), Article 11
 (freedom of assembly and association) and Article 14 (prohibition of discrimination), the protocols to the
 Convention and the Roma case law of the European Court of Human Rights;
 Having regard to the member States’ obligations under the European Social Charter (ETS No.
the right of equality before the law and equal protection of the law); Article 6 (promoting intercultural dialogue and mutual respect); Article 12 (measures in the fields of education and research to foster knowledge of the culture, history, language and religion of their national minorities and of the majority); Article 14 (right to learn their minority language); and Article 15 (obligation of member States to create the conditions necessary for the effective participation of persons belonging to national minorities in cultural, social and economic life and in public affairs);
Recalling the member States’ obligations under the European Charter for Regional or Minority Languages (ETS No. 148);
Taking into account the member States’ obligations towards children and youth under the United Nations Convention on the Rights of the Child;
Having regard to “The Strasbourg Declaration on Roma” (2010) of the Council of Europe member States;
Having regard to relevant recommendations and resolutions of the Committee of Ministers of the Council of Europe, in particular:
 Recommendation CM/Rec(2022)10 of the Committee of Ministers to member States on multilevel policies and governance for intercultural integration;
 Recommendation CM/Rec(2022)6 of the Committee of Ministers to member States on protecting youth civil society and young people, and supporting their participation in democratic processes;

Website: www.coe.int/cm
), Article 11 (
  ) and Article 13 (
Charter (revised) (ETS No. 163), in particular Article 30 (
) as well as under the European Social
  ) and Article 31 (the right to housing), in addition to the Roma case law of the European
 Committee of Social Rights;
  Recalling the Framework Convention for the Protection of National Minorities (ETS No.
Article 4 (
157), in particular
  Recommendation CM/Rec(2020)2 of the Committee of Ministers to member States on the inclusion
  of the history of Roma and/or Travellers
in school curricula and teaching materials
;

CM/Rec(2023)4 2
 Recommendation CM/Rec(2018)4 of the Committee of Ministers to member States on the participation of citizens in local public life;
 Recommendation CM/Rec(2017)4   youth work;
 Recommendation CM/Rec(2016)7
young people’s access to rights;
 Recommendation CM/Rec(2015)3 of the Committee of Ministers to member States on the access of
young people from disadvantaged neighbourhoods to social rights;
 Recommendation CM/Rec(2012)2 of the Committee of Ministers to member States on the
participation of children and young people under the age of 18;
 Recommendation CM/Rec(2009)13 of the Committee of Ministers to member States on the
nationality of children;
 Recommendation CM/Rec(2008)5 of the Committee of Ministers to member States on policies for
Roma and/or Travellers in Europe;
 Recommendation Rec(2006)14 of the Committee of Ministers to member States on citizenship and
participation of young people in public life;
 Resolution CM/Res(2020)2 on the Council of Europe youth sector strategy 2030;
Having regard to relevant recommendations and resolutions of the Parliamentary Assembly of the Council
of Europe, in particular:
 Resolution 2414 (2022) “The right to be heard – Child participation: a foundation for democratic societies”;
 Resolution 2368 (2021) and Recommendation 2198 (2021) “Preserving national minorities in Europe”, the reply to this recommendation adopted by the Committee of Ministers (Doc. 15464 (2022)) and the corresponding report of the Parliamentary Assembly (Doc. 15231 (2021));
 Resolution 2364 (2021) “Ethnic profiling in Europe: a matter of great concern”, as well as the corresponding report of the Parliamentary Assembly (Doc. 15199 (2020));
 Resolution 2262 (2019) “Promoting the rights of persons belonging to national minorities”, as well as the corresponding report of the Parliamentary Assembly (Doc. 14779 (2018));
 Resolution 2153 (2017) “Promoting the inclusion of Roma and Travellers”;
Having regard to the Model Framework for an Intercultural Integration Strategy at the National Level (2021); Having regard to the Council of Europe’s Strategy for the Rights of the Child (2022-2027);
Having regard to the Council of Europe Strategic Action Plan for Roma and Traveller Inclusion (2020-2025);
Having regard to Resolution 366 and Recommendation 354 (2014) of the Congress of Local and Regional Authorities, “Empowering Roma youth through participation: effective policy design at local and regional levels”;
Having regard to the European Commission against Racism and Intolerance’s (ECRI) General Policy Recommendation No. 13 on combating antigypsyism and discrimination against Roma (2011, amended in 2020), which defines antigypsyism as a specific form of racism;
Taking note of the findings of the “Study on the active political participation of national minority youth in the Council of Europe member States”, adopted in June 2021 by the Steering Committee on Anti-Discrimination, Diversity and Inclusion (CDADI), the report “Roma Youth Participation and Inclusion in Standards, Policies, and Programmes in Europe”, commissioned in 2020 by the Task Force on Roma Youth Participation, and the study “Roma youth participation in Europe: Challenges, needs and opportunities”, conducted by the Phiren Amenca International Network in 2020, which each highlight the urgency of ensuring substantive participation of young Roma people in democratic processes and policy making at the local, national and international levels;
 Recommendation CM/Rec(2017)10 of the Committee of Ministers to member States on improving access to justice for Roma and Travellers in Europe;
 of the Committee of Ministers to member States on
 of the Committee of Ministers to member States on research on
   Recommendation Rec(2001)17 of the Committee of Ministers to member States on improving the economic and employment situation of Roma/Gypsies and Travellers in Europe;
 
3 CM/Rec(2023)4
Bearing in mind the right of young Roma people to participate in all spheres of life in society, including in democratic processes and structures at the local, national, regional and international levels;
Reaffirming that the equal, equitable and effective access of young Roma people to human rights constitutes a fundamental element of the member States’ commitment to the Council of Europe’s principles of human rights, democracy and the rule of law;
Concerned that young Roma people face systematic discrimination in their access to social, economic, cultural, political and civil rights, while – at the same time – intersectional oppressions add further specific forms of discrimination and obstacles for young lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, intersex (LGBTI+) Roma, Roma with disabilities, migrant Roma or Muslim Roma;
Noting that, in some countries, Roma people face obstacles to their access to nationality, despite being born in or having longstanding ties to a country, which impedes stateless Roma youth’s full participation in society and reinforces the risk of intergenerational statelessness;
Stressing that structural racism negatively impacts Roma youth’s participation in civic and political processes and structures, self-esteem, pride and well-being, their transition to adulthood, their trust in the fairness of institutions, and their readiness to embrace their roots and cultures;
Deeply concerned by the lack of opportunities, resources and safe spaces that young Roma people face in learning, expressing and fostering their identities, history and culture;
Recognising that knowledge of Roma history is necessary to increase awareness among young non-Roma and Roma people about historical patterns of structural racism and antigypsyism and their present-day consequences;
Recognising young Roma people’s capabilities, skills, interests, motivation and contributions to the progress of our societies;
Stressing that young Roma people, Roma youth organisations and formal and informal groups of young Roma people have a pivotal but so far unacknowledged role as change makers in Roma communities and societies at large;
Bearing in mind that mainstream “one-size-fits-all” policies are neutral in form but biased and inequitable in application and outcomes, deepening structural inequalities as they are not inclusive of the specific needs of young Roma people;
Stressing the importance and urgency of using a double-mainstreaming approach in youth and Roma policies, as well as mainstream legislation, policies, measures and programmes;
Acknowledging that young Traveller people also face specific structural forms of discrimination and exclusion and similar policy gaps;
Taking into account the priorities, demands and aspirations established and expressed by young Roma people and Roma youth organisations during consultation processes, activities and events organised within the Council of Europe framework;
Reaffirming that the Council of Europe youth sector aims at enabling young people across Europe to actively uphold, defend, promote and benefit from the Council of Europe’s core values of human rights, democracy and the rule of law,
Recommends that governments of member States:
1. ensure substantive, fair and systematic participation, representation and inclusion of young Roma people in all spheres of society and decision-making processes and structures that impact their lives at the local, national and international levels;
2. mainstream and include systematically and explicitly the needs and priorities voiced by young Roma people in all policies, standards and programmes that impact them at the local and national levels;

CM/Rec(2023)4 4
3. assess relevant mainstream and targeted policies, as well as democratic structures, in view of mapping and redesigning them to ensure Roma youth’s effective participation, representation and inclusion;
4. combat all forms and manifestations of structural anti-Roma racism and antigypsyism and their impact on Roma youth participation;
5. ensure young Roma people’s full and effective access to and fulfilment of all fundamental human rights and freedoms;
6. ensure free and non-discriminatory access to quality education, training and employment opportunities for all young Roma people;
7. support and strengthen the capacity of Roma youth-led organisations, groups and initiatives and Roma youth-focused organisations and youth centres as spaces for exercising citizenship, promoting youth work and non-formal education/learning and for expressing and fostering their cultural identity, language and history;
8. invite civil society, including mainstream youth councils and organisations, and other relevant stakeholders, to contribute to the implementation and evaluation of this recommendation;
9. adopt policies, measures and programmes and allocate adequate funding to implement the guidelines set out in the appendix to this recommendation;
10. ensure that all policies, measures and programmes related to this recommendation respect the diversity of Roma communities addressing, in particular, the intersectional discrimination faced by Roma girls, Roma women, LGBTI+ Roma, Muslim Roma and young Roma people living in isolated and rural communities;
11. ensure that this recommendation, including its appendix, is translated and widely disseminated among the relevant authorities and stakeholders, with a view to raising awareness of the need to promote and protect Roma youth participation;
12. examine, within the Committee of Ministers, the implementation of this recommendation every five years after its adoption.
Appendix to Recommendation CM/Rec(2023)4
Guidelines on Roma youth participation
I. Scope and purpose
1. This recommendation aims to call attention to the structural racism, inequities and policy gaps that member States need to address in order to ensure substantive participation, representation and inclusion of young Roma people in public and political life, in spaces of media, arts and culture, and in decision-making processes and structures, including municipal and national youth councils, youth assemblies, school parliaments, student unions, non-governmental organisations (NGOs) or political parties, at the local, national and international levels, and their involvement in research.
2. This recommendation is a result of the Council of Europe Youth Department’s work with Roma1 youth and, thus, primarily addresses the needs of young Roma people. However, young Traveller people also face structural inequities and discrimination as well as similar policy and leadership gaps; member States are therefore called on to ensure that the appropriate measures and guidelines included in this recommendation and its appendix, as well as other specific policies and measures voiced by Traveller youth, support the participation of young Traveller people.
1 The term “Roma and Travellers” is used at the Council of Europe to encompass the wide diversity of the groups covered by the work of the Council of Europe in this field: on the one hand a) Roma, Sinti/Manush, Calé, Kaale, Romanichals, Boyash/Rudari; b) Balkan Egyptians (Egyptians and Ashkali); c) Eastern groups (Dom, Lom and Abdal); and, on the other hand, groups such as Travellers, Yenish, and the populations designated under the administrative term “Gens du voyage”, as well as persons who identify themselves as Gypsies. The present is an explanatory footnote, not a definition of Roma and/or Travellers.
 
II. Principles
3. This recommendation uses as a basis human rights and democratic principles, which have been protected by international legal instruments, including the documents named in the preamble. The measures listed in this recommendation also stress the importance of double-mainstreaming, affirmative action and anti-racist, gender-sensitive and intersectional approaches in all laws, policies, programmes and measures that impact the lives of young Roma people, including the measures listed below.
4. This recommendation builds on and strengthens the principles of the Revised European Charter on the Participation of Young People in Local and Regional Life, notably the need to provide for rights, means, opportunities, support and spaces for participation and measures to remove structural anti-Roma racism and antigypsyism.
III. Measures
5. Ensure substantive, fair and systematic participation, representation and inclusion of young Roma people in all spheres of society and decision-making processes and structures that impact their lives at the local, national and international levels.
Member States should:
a. develop indicators and monitoring and reporting mechanisms on young Roma people’s participation and carry out or fund periodic research and assessments on the participation of Roma youth, including by assessing the availability, accessibility, acceptability and quality of participation and by collecting disaggregated and intersectional data;
b. ensure participation of young Roma people in the design, implementation, monitoring and evaluation of youth-focused, Roma-focused and relevant mainstream policies and measures and in the decision-making processes;
c. establish fair and substantive partnerships with young Roma people, organisations and informal groups, including representatives of isolated communities (for example mediators, facilitators, youth workers), for programme and policy development and implementation;
d. support young Roma people in participating, being represented and taking leadership in political parties and processes, including political youth structures, at the local, national and international levels;
e. prevent any constraints and ensure that young Roma people enjoy the right to freedom of assembly and association in all member States;
f. support and finance programmes, including affirmative action and national historical restitution funds, to ensure the participation and representation of young Roma people in the academic, media, cultural, artistic and other spheres of society;
g. implement courses on anti-racism, intersectional discrimination and intercultural learning for representatives of institutions to ensure that young Roma people and their voices are valued, respected and included in decision-making and democratic processes;
h. support programmes, professional training, mentoring and affirmative action measures to facilitate and undertake hiring and retention of Roma youth in public institutions as civil servants, for example by providing specific workplaces or reserved positions;
i. ensure equal access of Roma youth to internships, traineeships and fellowships in official institutions at the national and local levels, including by providing them with adequate information, guidance in the application process, retention plans and financial means;
5 CM/Rec(2023)4

CM/Rec(2023)4 6
j.
k.
l.
m.
n.
support mainstream youth organisations and youth councils in assessing their practices in the field of diversity and inclusion; inviting and taking in young Roma people in their structures, leadership and activities; and strengthening their awareness, practices and skills to employ anti-racism and intercultural learning;
support youth assemblies, councils, school and student councils and unions, NGOs, youth structures of political parties and other relevant youth structures and consultative bodies in strengthening their diversity and inclusion practices, for example by ensuring equal voting rights, representation of Roma youth and access to information in the Romani language;
allocate funding and other resources (experts, equipment, spaces) to establish or strengthen sustainable Roma youth organisations and diverse youth structures, groups and organisations inclusive of Roma youth;
co-operate with intergovernmental and international organisations to provide funding and other resources to Roma youth organisations and groups to sustain themselves, their programmes and the participation of their members in international forums and consultation processes;
ensure that relevant information about programmes and services designed for young people are also available in the Romani language, are Roma-/gender-sensitive and include young Roma people living in isolated and rural communities;
6.
Roma people in all policies, standards and programmes that impact them at the local and national levels.
Mainstream and include systematically and explicitly the needs and priorities voiced by young Member States should:
a.
b.
c.
d.
e.
7. impact
ensure that relevant mainstream and targeted policies include needs voiced by young Roma people and specific objectives, indicators, funding, targets and activities advancing their rights and address structural anti-Roma racism and antigypsyism;
consider the specific realities of young Roma people, their family histories, intersectional identities, social and economic status, experiences, obstacles and struggles in the design, implementation and funding of mainstream laws, policies, measures and programmes, including those focusing on youth, Roma inclusion, gender equality, health, housing, employment or education;
establish additional and specific measures, budgets, indicators and targets advancing the rights and the particular needs and priorities of young Roma people, including in times of social, economic or health crisis;
strengthen mainstream laws and policies to also benefit young Roma people, including through affirmative action programmes such as reserved seats in secondary and tertiary education and a fair distribution of resources and opportunities;
evaluate periodically mainstream laws and policies, including those focusing on education, health, housing or employment, to assess whether and how race-neutral/one-size-fits-all mainstream laws and policies meet the specific needs and realities of Roma youth; collect disaggregated and intersectional data; adopt instruments and ensure funding that allows for such assessments and policy revisions;
Combat all forms and manifestations of structural anti-Roma racism and antigypsyism and their on Roma youth participation.
Member States should:
a. address, through legislation, policies, measures, programmes and funding, all the manifestations of structural racism and antigypsyism that young Roma people face at institutional, economic, cultural and societal levels, including institutional racism, interpersonal racism, everyday racism, unconscious biases and intersectional discrimination, as well as the historical inequities that continue to produce consequences on Roma youth participation;

b.
c.
d.
e. f.
g.
h.
i.
j.
work with equality bodies and national human rights institutions, in co-operation with Roma associations or individuals, to strengthen their tools and actions to prevent and combat discrimination, intersectional discrimination and other manifestations of structural racism and antigypsyism – phenomena that hamper Roma youth participation;
engage existing governmental bodies, research institutes and Roma youth in the design of indicators and reporting mechanisms as well as the recurrent collection of disaggregated and intersectional data on all manifestations of structural racism and antigypsyism;
equip civil servants and other employees of institutions, including police officers, prosecutors, judges, education communities and social workers, with competences to prevent and combat institutional racism, including by providing mandatory formal anti-racism and human rights education and by creating monitoring tools to guarantee the implementation of anti-racist practices;
sanction civil servants and other employees performing public services who commit acts of discrimination or violence, such as school segregation or police abuse;
fund programmes to support young people, both Roma and non-Roma, with competences and information to recognise, understand, report and respond to structural anti-Roma racism and antigypsyism;
develop and implement inclusive, gender-sensitive, anti-racist and diverse curriculums, textbooks, school spaces and training of school personnel at all levels of formal education with the end goal of eradicating anti-Roma racism, gender inequality and intersectional discrimination;
incorporate a balanced and contextualised teaching of Roma history and culture in national and regional school curriculums, reflecting both Roma’s national presence and their shared history as a people of Europe;
ensure normative acknowledgement, remembrance, memorialisation and history teaching about the Roma victims of the Holocaust and other forms of State-sponsored injustices, such as slavery, forced transfer of Roma children from their parents to foster care/adoption, forced sterilisation of Roma women, and the Big Round-up in 18th century Spain; such steps should also acknowledge and promote Roma heroes and heroines, Roma resistance and the history of Roma contribution and labour and its dignity. Furthermore, organise and fund commemorative events led by young Roma people and organisations;
support and adequately fund programmes aiming to promote a positive image of young Roma identity and culture and to fight against stereotypes and biases in media, social media, arts and culture, including by incorporating Roma culture and history in school curriculums and textbooks, formal and non-formal education/learning materials, Roma museums, cultural campaigns and arts and media projects that showcase Roma role models, heroes and heroines, Roma resistance, the history and dignity of Roma labour.
7 CM/Rec(2023)4
Ensure young Roma people’s full and effective access to and fulfilment of all human rights and
8.
fundamental freedoms.
Member States should:
a. prevent and combat all discriminatory practices and unfair distribution of resources and opportunities in the access of Roma to human rights;
b. acknowledge, define and address intersectional or multiple discrimination through laws, policies and programmes;
c. encourage partnerships between Roma youth organisations and equality and national human rights bodies to systematically assess and address Roma youth’s equal access to human rights;

CM/Rec(2023)4 8
d.
e. f.
g.
h.
i.
j.
k.
l. m.
n.
o.
9.
Roma youth-focused organisations and youth centres, as spaces for exercising citizenship, promoting youth work and non-formal education/learning and for expressing and fostering their cultural identity, language and history.
Member States should:
a. appoint Roma advisors and/or establish special units within State agencies that manage government funding and international partnership grants to reach out to Roma youth organisations and assist and encourage them in application processes;
support and enhance the access of young Roma people to information regarding rights and opportunities in education, housing, employment and cultural and social life, including by establishing national Roma contact points within ministries of youth or other relevant institutions;
ensure free legal consultation and aid to young Roma people who face discrimination and obstacles in accessing human rights;
combat digital exclusion by supporting and funding education in digital literacy, establishing local digital access points and providing access for isolated communities and “digital deserts” to the internet;
combat income and wealth disparities and improve the social and economic conditions of young Roma people, including by providing quality and non-discriminatory employment, access to professional and vocational training, and a fair redistribution of resources;
combat period poverty and provide young Roma people, particularly Roma girls and young Roma women, with access to information about sexual and reproductive rights, health screenings and vaccination;
tackle the economic barriers that impact the access of Roma children and youth to education, including by establishing national Roma education funds and providing monthly scholarships for clothes, food, school materials, accommodation and transport to school;
establish specific measures, budgets, indicators and targets advancing the needs of young Roma people who are not in education or training and migrant/mobile young Roma people and their families;
secure the right of young Roma people and Roma children to health, and work with municipalities and local authorities to stop the exposure of Roma and other communities to environmental racism and hazards;
enhance young people’s knowledge regarding their rights through citizenship and human rights education, notably with the leadership of Roma youth organisations;
support and fund campaigns and other relevant programmes to raise awareness among young Roma people and their communities about the manifestations and impact of structural racism and antigypsyism, notably in school environments;
fund programmes that strengthen the capacity of Roma youth organisations, youth mediators and community leaders to stand up for their rights, including in the areas of environment, justice, health, education, employment, culture, leisure and sport;
assist young Roma people in exercising their right to vote and in participating in electoral politics, including by preventing voter intimidation, suppression and disenfranchisement, which sometimes occur due to the lack of identification documents and of affirmative action that would encourage them to exercise their political rights;
Support and strengthen the capacity of Roma youth-led organisations, groups and initiatives and

b.
c.
d. e.
ensure capacity-strengthening programmes, funding and organisational space for existing Roma youth-led organisations, groups and initiatives and Roma youth-focused organisations and youth centres and ensure their independence and sustainability in running Roma youth programmes and activities, including community building;
ensure funding, organisational space, capacity-strengthening programmes and technical support for new Roma youth-led organisations, groups and initiatives and Roma youth-focused organisations and youth centres;
provide funding and support to ensure partnerships and joint initiatives between mainstream youth organisations or youth councils and Roma youth organisations;
support and strengthen the capacity of Roma youth-led organisations, groups and initiatives and Roma youth-focused organisations and youth centres as spaces for non-formal education/learning, culture and youth work;
Non-formal education/learning and youth work.
10.
Member States should:
9 CM/Rec(2023)4
a. fund and facilitate the access of young Roma people to non-formal education, youth work and youth services and mobility programmes through affirmative action and outreach work, among other measures;
b. support and fund non-formal education/learning programmes, including initiatives aiming to increase awareness and knowledge about structural racism and antigypsyism and Roma history, identity and culture;
c. establish, fund or support youth centres and cultural spaces, including in or near Roma communities;
d. create and fund programmes to support young Roma people in becoming certified as youth workers, peer educators and trainers;
e. ensure the prerequisites for equal participation of young Roma people in mobility programmes, including by ensuring access to information in the Romani language about the programmes and engaging in outreach campaigns in Roma communities;
f. support partnerships between Roma youth organisations and mainstream youth organisations or councils to include young Roma people in non-formal education/learning activities and spaces;
g. support youth activities and initiatives that promote intercultural dialogue and understanding between young people from different ethnic backgrounds within and between countries;
h. work with intergovernmental and international organisations to provide funding and other resources to Roma youth organisations and groups to participate in international non-formal education/learning and youth work programmes and projects.

CM/Rec(2023)4 10
GLOSSARY
Antigypsyism: for the purpose of this recommendation, “antigypsyism” should be understood as defined by General Policy Recommendation No. 13 on combating antigypsyism and discrimination against Roma (2011, amended in 2020) of the European Commission against Racism and Intolerance (ECRI). ECRI defines antigypsyism as “a specific form of racism, an ideology founded on racial superiority, a form of dehumanisation and institutional racism nurtured by historical discrimination, which is expressed, inter alia, by violence, hate speech, exploitation, stigmatisation and the most blatant kind of discrimination”.
Double mainstreaming: for the purpose of this recommendation, “double mainstreaming” shall be understood as an approach for which the complementarity between targeted and mainstream policies and processes is essential when addressing the needs of young Roma people. The double-mainstreaming approach also recognises and insists on the basic requirement to include and address the rights, specific needs and priorities of young Roma people in policies, processes and structures for Roma and those for youth. Furthermore, as the 2021 report of the Council of Europe Task Force on Roma Youth Participation underscored, the-one-size-fits-all mainstream policies, processes and structures have not customarily been inclusive of Roma youth; they are neutral in form and do not exclude young Roma people, but at the same time they do not acknowledge or address young Roma people’s specific needs, which are often rooted in a history of structural anti-Roma racism and antigypsyism and, thus, they have resulted in inequitable outcomes. Therefore, the double-mainstreaming approach can also be understood and applied in relation to neutral/one-size-fits-all mainstream policies, political parties and civil society, which also need to include young Roma people and their needs.
Educational communities: for the purpose of this recommendation, the term “educational communities” refers to all the actors and stakeholders who play a role in educational processes and activities, both in formal and non-formal education settings. In the formal education sector, this concerns not only teachers and students, but also all the personnel involved in the managerial, administrative, logistical and safety infrastructure of the school environment, the parents/families of students and the institutions responsible for the curriculums, quality evaluation and the education system overall. This also reflects the principles of a whole-school approach to democratic and human rights principles, which puts theory into practice, from the content of lessons through to the school culture and management structure. In the non-formal education/learning sector, the educational community includes the facilitators, trainers or youth workers directly in contact with young people in educational activities, and the supervisors and colleagues (staff or volunteers) who interact with the young people occasionally or on a regular basis, such as the leadership of youth organisations or managerial and administrative staff in youth centres or other places where non-formal education is provided. They all play a role in preventing and combating institutional racism in a consistent and credible way and contributing to an environment where the human rights of everyone are respected.
Everyday racism: for the purpose of this recommendation, “everyday racism” shall be understood as experiences of indignities, unfair treatment or disrespect faced by young Roma people on a frequent and unstructured basis, and often in subtle and covert but distressing ways. This type of perceived everyday racism differs from discrimination, legally understood as human rights violations or the distinction, exclusion, restriction or preference based on ethnic origin. Everyday racism refers to situations where Roma people are underestimated, overlooked, feared, ignored, shunned, disrespected, stigmatised or over-scrutinised because of their ethnic origins in day-to-day encounters and settings, including schools and public places.
Institutional racism: for the purpose of this recommendation, “institutional racism” shall be understood as laws, policies, practices, processes and structures within and across public and private institutions that amount to discrimination, disadvantages, exclusion or inequitable outcomes for Roma people in their access to human rights and the quality of, services, social benefits and opportunities. Among the most overt and severe forms of institutional racism against Roma children and young Roma people perpetrated by representatives of State institutions are school segregation, police registries of Roma people and other discriminatory acts that constitute an abuse of institutional power.

11 CM/Rec(2023)4
Intersectional discrimination: for the purpose of this recommendation, “intersectional discrimination” shall be understood as the experiences of Roma people who are victims of combined, concomitant and inseparable manifestations of discrimination on the basis of ethnicity, gender, social status, religion and/or other identities/grounds, and/or who face structural inequities due to multiple overlapping systems of oppression, such as racism, sexism or heterosexism, anti-Muslim racism, classism or ableism.
Structural racism: for the purpose of this recommendation, “structural racism” shall be understood as all of the laws, policies, State practices and structures, public and private institutions; ideologies and narratives; education, culture, media and other spheres of society; and social relations that have perpetually favoured or resulted in power, hegemony and advantages for dominant populations, and have sustained human/racial hierarchies. This continuous and often invisible system of oppression has intersected with other oppressions, such as classism or sexism, in fostering, generating and reinforcing discrimination, violence, neglect, and prejudice against Roma, racialised poverty and inequities, unjust distribution of resources, power, participation and representation, as well as adverse outcomes for Roma people. Structural anti-Roma racism has upheld human hierarchies and reinforced, reproduced and strengthened prejudice to justify and legitimise injustices and violence against Roma.
Substantive participation: for the purpose of this recommendation, “substantive participation” shall be understood as the guarantee that all the necessary conditions – rights, spaces, means, support, opportunities, affirmative action, tools and removal of structural barriers – have been met so that young Roma people can be involved in, participate in and contribute in meaningful ways to all democratic processes and structures that affect their lives, and to be given due representation, leadership, power, voice, value, respect and trust. Thus, substantive participation does not imply solely physical presence, although that also remains a desideratum for many young Roma people; substantive participation also means that policy makers, youth structures and other relevant stakeholders proactively and fairly provide comprehensive representation; establish a dialogue; ensure the availability, accessibility, acceptability, quality and continuity of participation; and share leadership, authority, resources and power with young Roma people. This approach recognises that the conventional democratic processes, policies and structures have been neither inclusive of, nor efficient for, young Roma people.

 COUNCIL OF EUROPE GENDER EQUALITY STRATEGY 2014 2017
 
COUNCIL OF EUROPE GENDER EQUALITY STRATEGY 2014 2017
Council of Europe

 French Edition:
Stratégie du Conseil de l’Europe pour l’égalité entre les femmes et les hommes 2014-2017
The opinions expressed in this work are the responsibility of the authors and do not necessarily re ect the o cial policy of the Council of Europe.
All requests concerning the reproduction or translation
of all or part of this document should be addressed to the Directorate of Communication (F-67075 Strasbourg Cedex or publishing@coe.int). All other correspondence concerning this document should be addressed to the Directorate General of Democracy.
Cover design and layout: Documents and Publications Production Department (SPDP), Council of Europe
© Council of Europe, February 2014 Reprinted June 2015
Printed at the Council of Europe

Foreword
Achieving gender equality is central to the protection of human rights, the function- ing of democracy, respect for the rule of law and economic growth and sustainability. The Council of Europe’s pioneering work in the  elds of human rights and gender equality has resulted in a solid legal and policy framework which has contributed to advancing women’s rights and to bringing member states closer to de facto gender equality. Some of the milestone achievements in this respect include the drafting of two legal trea- ties: the Council of Europe Convention on Action
against Tra cking in Human Beings and the Council of Europe Convention on Preventing and Combating Violence against Women and Domestic Violence (Istanbul Convention).
The Council of Europe seeks to combat gender stereotypes, sexism and vio- lence against women in its many forms. It aspires to change mentalities and attitudes, promote balanced participation of women and men in political and public life and encourage the integration of a gender perspective into all pro- grammes and policies. A change in gender relations, women’s empowerment and abolishing negative traditional gender stereotypes are key to achieving gender equality. We share the belief that when women have equal chances with men to be socially and politically active, economies and societies thrive, and overall, women’s more balanced participation in decision-making con- tributes to positive transformative processes for societies.
  fPage3

The Council of Europe Transversal Programme on Gender Equality aims to increase the impact and visibility of gender equality standards, supporting their implementation in member states through a variety of measures, including gender mainstreaming and action in a number of priority areas. The Council of Europe Gender Equality Strategy (2014-2017), a balanced,  exible and focused document, which builds upon the strengths, speci cities and the added value of the Council of Europe, will guide the activities of the Organisation and the Transversal Programme in the area of gender equality for the next four years. The overall goal of the Strategy is to achieve the advancement and empower- ing of women and the e ective realisation of gender equality in the Council of Europe member states through activities around  ve strategic objectives:
1. combating Gender Stereotypes and Sexism;
2. preventing and combating Violence against Women;
3. guaranteeing Equal Access of Women to Justice;
4. achieving Balanced Participation of Women and Men in Political and Public Decision-Making;
5. achieving Gender Mainstreaming in all policies and measures.
The Strategy places strong emphasis on the implementation of existing standards. Adopted by the Committee of Ministers of the Council of Europe, it is the most symbolic expression of engagement by our member states and demonstrates their commitment to advance the gender equality agenda as part of our e orts to uphold the principles of democracy and human rights.
Thorbjørn Jagland Secretary General of the Council of Europe
Strategy 2014-2017 f Page 4

Introduction
G ender equality means equal visibility, empowerment, responsibility and participation for both women and men in all spheres of public and pri- vate life. It also means an equal access to and distribution of resources
between women and men. Although the legal status of women in Europe has undoubtedly improved during recent decades, e ective equality is far from being a reality. Even if progress is visible (educational attainment, labour market participation, political representation), gender gaps persist in many areas, maintaining men in their traditional roles and constraining women’s opportunities to a rm their fundamental rights and assert their agency.
The most pronounced expression of the uneven balance of power between women and men is violence against women, which is both a human rights violation and a major obstacle to gender equality.
A change in gender relations, women’s empowerment and abolishing nega- tive traditional gender stereotypes are key to achieving gender equality and bene ts entire societies, including men, and for the next generation. As extensive research has shown in a multitude of contexts, when women have equal chances with men to be socially and politically active, economies and societies thrive. Overall, women’s more balanced participation in decision- making contributes to positive transformative processes for societies, such as changes in laws, policies, services, institutions, and social norms.
 fPage5

The essential contribution of women to communities, societies and economies, as well as the high costs of gender inequality need to be fully recognised, especially in the current context of economic crisis. Inequalities at all levels of society are on the rise. The crisis and the consequent austerity measures have hit women hard in many countries through job losses, pay cuts, reduc- tions in public services and shrinking resources for vital support services to women who have su ered violence.
Discrimination against women has a structural and horizontal character that pervades all cultures and communities, as well as all sectors, levels and areas, throughout life.
Gender inequalities tend to
add up during the course of life, so that certain disadvan- tages experienced in earlier stages of life cause subse- quent disadvantages in later stages by limiting options for choice. Women are often subjected to discrimination on several grounds such as those referred to in Article
The most pronounced expression of the uneven balance of power between women and men is violence against women, which is both a human rights violation and a major obstacle
to gender equality.
14 of the European Convention for Human Rights and Article 4.3 of the Council of Europe Convention on preventing and combating violence against women and domestic violence (Istanbul Convention).
For all these reasons, it is important to address discrimination against women in a systematic and comprehensive way, in order to achieve full and substan- tive gender equality. This calls for a dual-track approach to gender equality work which includes:
f speci c policies and actions, including positive action when appropriate, in critical areas for the advancement of women and for gender equality;
f the promotion, monitoring, co-ordination and evaluation of the process of gender mainstreaming in all policies and programmes.
Strategy 2014-2017 f Page 6

Achieving gender equality is central to the protection of human rights, the functioning of democracy, respect for the rule of law and economic growth and competitiveness.
The Council of Europe’s pioneering work in the  elds of human rights and gender equality has resulted in a solid legal and policy framework which, if implemented, would considerably advance women’s rights and bring member States closer to de facto gender equality.
The Council of Europe Transversal Programme on Gender Equality launched in 2012 aims to increase the impact and visibility of gender equality standards, supporting their implementation in member States through a variety of mea- sures, including gender mainstreaming and action in a number of priority areas. To achieve its aim, the Programme needs the continuous political and  nancial support which is essential to mobilise all Council of Europe decision-making and advisory and monitoring bodies, involving them in the development, implementation and evaluation of the gender equality agenda. The Council of Europe Gender Equality Commission is at the centre of this e ort.
This Strategy builds upon the vast legal and policy acquis of the Council of Europe as regards gender equality as well as upon the results of the last Council of Europe Conference of Ministers responsible for equality between women and men held in 2010 and links them to both the current economic context and the political leverage within the Council of Europe. It outlines the goals and priorities of the Council of Europe Programme on Gender Equality for the years 2014-2017, identi es the working methods and the main partners as well as the measures required to increase the visibility of the results. A table indicating current, future and proposed activities will be attached to this Strategy to show the immediate link between the strategic objectives and the speci c measures and means used to achieve them.
Introduction f Page 7

 Achieving gender equality is central to the protection of human rights, the functioning of democracy, respect for the rule of law and economic growth
and competitiveness.
 
Chapter I
Goal and strategic objectives
T he overall goal of the Strategy is to achieve the advancement and empow- ering of women and hence the e ective realisation of gender equality in Council of Europe member States by supporting the implementation
of existing standards.
This will be accomplished through the realisation of  ve strategic objectives which will also integrate the issue of multiple discrimination while taking into account the speci c rights and needs of women and men throughout the life cycle.
Strategic objective 1:
Combating gender stereotypes and sexism
￿ Gender stereotyping presents a serious obstacle to the achievement of real gender equality and feeds into gender discrimination. Gender stereotypes are preconceived ideas whereby males and females are arbitrarily assigned characteristics and roles determined and limited by their sex. Sex stereotyping can limit the development of the natural talents and abilities of boys and girls, women and men, their educational and professional experiences as well as life opportunities in general. Stereotypes about women both result from and are the cause of deeply engrained attitudes, values, norms and prejudices
      fPage9

against women. They are used to justify and maintain the historical relations of power of men over women as well as sexist attitudes which are holding back the advancement of women. Council of Europe action will focus on:
f Promoting Gender Equality Awareness, in particular through the development of training and communication initiatives targeting a broad range of professionals (including civil servants), with special attention to the prevention of all forms of violence against women;
f promoting and disseminating education syllabuses and teaching practices which are free from explicit and implicit gender stereotypes as well as the implementation of the other measures proposed in the Committee of Ministers’ Recommendation on gender mainstreaming in education;
Promote a positive and non-stereotyped image of women and men in the media.
f combating sexism as a form of hate speech and integrating this dimension into Council of Europe action aiming at combating hate speech and discrimination while actively promoting respect for both women and men;
f identifying practical measures to:
￿ promote a positive and non-stereotyped image
of women and men in the media,
￿ abolish women’s image of inferiority and submission as well as stereotypes about men’s masculinity,
￿ further balanced participation of women and men in decision-making positions in the media, in particular in management, programming and regulatory bodies;
f promoting the role of men in achieving gender equality. Strategy 2014-2017 f Page 10

   Strategic objective 2:
Preventing and combating violence against women
￿ Violence against women remains widespread in all member States of the Council of Europe, with devastating consequences for women, societies and economies. Opened for signature in May 2011, the Council of Europe Convention on Preventing and Combating Violence against Women and Domestic Violence (the Istanbul Convention) is the most far-reaching inter- national treaty to tackle this serious violation of human rights. Action in this area will seek to:
f support member States to sign and ratify the Istanbul Convention through the provision of technical and legal expertise;
f enhance the implementation of the Istanbul Convention by involving all relevant bodies and entities of the Council of Europe;
f collect and disseminate information on legal and other measures taken at national level to prevent and combat violence against women, providing visibility to good practices;
f promote the Istanbul Convention beyond the European Continent, making available expertise and sharing of good practice in the context of co-operation with non-member States and other regional and international organisations.
Strategic objective 3:
Guaranteeing Equal Access of Women to Justice
￿ Persisting inequalities between women and men, gender bias and stereo- types also result in unequal access of women and men to justice. A study into women’s access to the European Court of Human Rights drew attention to the low number of applications  led by women, pointing out that this possibly re ected obstacles experienced by women at national level. Reasons advanced include lack of awareness, con dence and resources, gender bias and cultural, social and economic barriers. These barriers are particularly important in the case of women victims of violence or in situations of vulnerability, such as women victims of various forms of discrimination.
       Goal and strategic objectives f Page 11

Council of Europe action in this area will seek to:
f analyse national and international frameworks with a view to gathering data and identifying the obstacles women encounter in gaining access to the national courts and to international justice;
f identify, collect and disseminate any existing remedies and good practices aiming at facilitating access of women to justice, including out-of-court and quasi-legal stages of protection of women’s rights (inter alia through Ombudspersons and other human rights institutions);
f make recommendations to improve the situation.
Persisting inequalities between women and men, gender bias and stereotypes also result in unequal access of women and men to justice.
Strategic objective 4:
Achieving balanced participation of women and men in political and public decision-making
Pluralist democracy requires balanced participation of women and men in political and public decision-making. Council of Europe standards provide clear guidance on how to achieve this.
Action will seek to:
f achieve balanced participation of women and men in political or public life in any decision-making body (the representation of either women or men should not fall below 40%);
f monitor progress on women’s participation in decision-making, ensure the visibility of data and good practices in member States. This will be done in particular through the collection and dissemination
of information on the implementation of the Committee of
Ministers’ Recommendation on balanced participation of women
and men in political and public life, including decision-making;
        Strategy 2014-2017 f Page 12

f identify measures aiming to empower candidate and elected women, to facilitate and encourage their participation in elections at the national, regional and local levels. This would include measures which relate to electoral systems, parity thresholds, public funding of political parties and working conditions of elected representatives, while also encouraging women to participate in the electoral process by voting;
f achieve balanced participation in Council of Europe bodies, institutions and decision-making processes as well as in senior and middle management functions within the Secretariat.
Strategic objective 5:
Achieving Gender Mainstreaming in all policies and measures
￿ Gender mainstreaming is the (re)organisation, improvement, develop- ment and evaluation of policy processes, so that a gender equality perspec- tive is incorporated in all policies at all levels and at all stages, by the actors normally involved in policy-making.
In its Recommendation to member States on gender equality standards and mechanisms, the Council of Europe Committee of Ministers recalls the importance of adopting methodologies for the implementation of the gender mainstreaming strategy, including gender budgeting, gender-based analysis and gender impact assessment. Experience shows, however, that even the most committed member States are  nding it di cult to achieve gender mainstreaming.
The Council of Europe will strive to achieve gender mainstreaming in:
f its various policy areas, in particular the areas of justice, law enforcement, local government, media, culture, education, minorities, migration, Roma people, children’s rights, bioethics, social cohesion, youth and sports,  ght against corruption, tra cking in human beings and drug abuse;
f the development and implementation of co- operation programmes, projects and activities;
        Goal and strategic objectives f Page 13

f the policy processes and functioning of the various bodies and institutions, in particular through the mobilisation and contribution of:
￿ the Committee of Ministers, the Parliamentary Assembly, the Congress of Local and Regional Authorities of the Council of Europe, the European Court of Human
Rights and the Commissioner of Human Rights;
￿ the steering committees and other intergovernmental bodies;
￿ the monitoring mechanisms;
￿ Partial Agreements.
f the Council of Europe sta  policies.
The Council of Europe will also continue to actively promote gender main- streaming by gathering information on and disseminating good practices in its member States.
 The Council of Europe will also continue to actively promote gender mainstreaming by gathering information on and disseminating good practices in its member States.
Strategy 2014-2017 f Page 14

Chapter II
Institutional setting, resources and working methods
T he transversal nature of the Gender Equality Programme presupposes that all Council of Europe decision-making, advisory and monitoring bodies should support and actively contribute to the achievement of the
goal and the strategic objectives of the Gender Equality Strategy. They will be invited to take initiatives within their respective mandate’s remit and taking due account of their status and resources. To stimulate and facilitate this process, the following elements complete the Council of Europe institutional setting:
f The Gender Equality Commission: an intergovernmental group
of experts open to all Council of Europe member States where participation of 16 elected representatives is covered from the Council of Europe budget. Under the aegis of the European Committee for Human Dignity, Equality and Social Cohesion (CDDECS), its mission is to steer the Gender Equality Transversal Programme, advise and involve its various components, as well as liaise with relevant intergovernmental bodies, providing expertise and a forum for exchange on good practices and issues of concern.
 fPage 15

fThe Committee of Ministers’Thematic Co-ordinator on Gender Equality and Tra cking in Human Beings facilitates discussions in the Committee of Ministers on issues related, inter alia, to the Gender Equality Transversal Programme.
f The National Focal Points appointed at national level provide an important link between the Council of Europe and the actors and mechanisms that are responsible for gender equality at national level, that is, from government, parliament, local and regional authorities, civil society and the private sector. They are also expected to promote international standards at national level with a view to bridging the gap between legal and real equality in a given country. The Network of Focal Points is also a platform for thematic discussions and exchange of good practices.
f The Gender Equality Rapporteurs appointed within intergovernmental bodies and other Council of Europe structures shall identify ways to integrate the gender perspective in the functioning, programmes
and activities of these structures. In co-operation with the Gender Equality Commission, they shall identify opportunities of developing measures or new activities to promote gender equality.
f The Gender Mainstreaming Team is a group of Council of Europe sta  members serving in the various sectors and bodies of the Organisation. Its task is to share information and expertise, provide visibility to
results, identify opportunities for joint action and make proposals to facilitate the implementation of the Gender Equality Programme.
In order to assess progress in the implementation of the strategy, the Gender Equality Commission will regularly take stock of results achieved and will prepare an annual report (to be brought to the attention of the Committee of Ministers through the relevant steering committee).
Strategy 2014-2017 f Page 16

Chapter III
Partnerships
A ll the main international partners of the Council of Europe have adopted Gender Equality Strategies or Action Plans. This has created a sound basis for partnerships and, in some cases, an institutionalised co-operation,
enabling the identi cation of opportunities for joint action, complementarity and synergy.
The European Union, UN-Women and the OSCE have been involved in the development of this Strategy. They are therefore invited to contribute to its implementation as appropriate, in particular by holding regular consultations with the Council of Europe, participating in meetings and events and programming and implementing joint initiatives. The Council of Europe will seek to reinforce its co-operation with other UN agencies and bodies (in particular OHCHR, CEDAW, UNICEF and UNESCO) and other international organisations (such as the OECD, the World Bank, Organisation Internationale de la Francophonie).
The Gender Equality Programme will also seek to involve, engage and use the experience and expertise of civil society organisations in the development, implementation and assessment of policies, programmes and activities. Other natural partners in the implementation of the Gender Equality Strategy include:
f Parliaments;
f National Governments;
f Local authorities and their associations;
f Gender Equality bodies;
f Human Rights institutions;
f Professional networks (in particular in the judiciary and in the
journalism, education, health and social services  elds); f Trade unions and employers associations;
f The Media;
f The Private Sector.
 fPage 17

Chapter IV
Communication
A communication plan will be developed with the aim of:
f increasing the visibility of Council of Europe standards, studies, guidelines, events and their results;
f raising awareness on speci c issues with a view to changing attitudes, mentalities and behaviours;
f facilitating the exchange of information between the various components of the programme and with partners;
f giving visibility to good practices and data collected at national, regional and local level.
This communication plan will be accompanied by a training plan targeting the Gender Equality Rapporteurs, Council of Europe sta  and other experts involved in the Organisation’s work.
 fPage 18

Prems 096215
 ENG
 www.coe.int
The Council of Europe is the continent’s
leading human rights organisation.
It comprises 47 member states, 28 of which
are members of the European Union.
All Council of Europe member states have signed up to the European Convention on Human Rights,
a treaty designed to protect human rights, democracy and the rule of law.
The European Court of Human Rights
oversees the implementation of the
Convention in the member states.
  
 COUNCIL OF EUROPE COMMITTEE OF MINISTERS
Recommendation No R (2000) 4
of the Committee of Ministers to member states
on the education of Roma/Gypsy children in Europe
(Adopted by the Committee of Ministers on 3 February 2000
at the 696th meeting of the Ministers' Deputies)
The Committee of Ministers, under the terms of Article 15.b of the Statute of the Council of Europe,
Considering that the aim of the Council of Europe is to achieve greater unity between its members and that this aim may be pursued, in particular, through common action in the field of education;
Recognising that there is an urgent need to build new foundations for future educational strategies toward the Roma/Gypsy people in Europe, particularly in view of the high rates of illiteracy or semi-literacy among them, their high drop-out rate, the low percentage of students completing primary education and the persistence of features such as low school attendance;
Noting that the problems faced by Roma/Gypsies in the field of schooling are largely the result of long-standing educational policies of the past, which led either to assimilation or to segregation of Roma/Gypsy children at school on the grounds that they were "socially and culturally handicapped";
Considering that the disadvantaged position of Roma/Gypsies in European societies cannot be overcome unless equality of opportunity in the field of education is guaranteed for Roma/Gypsy children; Considering that the education of Roma/Gypsy children should be a priority in national policies in favour of Roma/Gypsies;
Bearing in mind that policies aimed at addressing the problems faced by Roma/Gypsies in the field of education should be comprehensive, based on an acknowledgement that the issue of schooling for Roma/Gypsy children is linked with a wide range of other factors and pre-conditions, namely the economic, social and cultural aspects, and the fight against racism and discrimination;
Bearing in mind that educational policies in favour of Roma/Gypsy children should be backed up by an active adult education and vocational education policy;
Considering that, as there is a text concerning the education of Roma/Gypsy children for member states of the European Union (Resolution of the Council and of the Ministers of Education meeting with the Council on School Provision for Gypsy and Traveller Children, of 22 May 1989; 89/C 153/02), it is urgently necessary to have a text covering all of the member states of the Council of Europe;
Bearing in mind the Framework Convention for the Protection of National Minorities and the European Charter for Regional or Minority Languages;
Bearing in mind Recommendations 563 (1969) and 1203 (1993) of the Parliamentary Assembly of the Council of Europe in which mention is made of the educational needs of Roma/Gypsies in Europe;
Bearing in mind Resolutions 125 (1981), 16 (1995) and 249 (1993) and Recommendation 11 (1995) of the Congress of Local and Regional Authorities of Europe on the situation of Roma/Gypsies in Europe;
Bearing in mind General Policy Recommendation No. 3 of the European Commission against Racism and Intolerance on "Combating racism and discrimination against Roma/Gypsies in Europe";
Bearing in mind the work carried out by the Council for Cultural Co-operation (CDCC) to respond to Resolution 125 (1981), and in particular, the publication of the report "Gypsies and Travellers" (1985), updated in 1994 ("Roma, Gypsies, Travellers", Council of Europe Publishing);
Having welcomed the memorandum prepared by the Specialist Group on Roma/Gypsies entitled "Roma Children Education Policy Paper: Strategic Elements of Education Policy for Roma Children in Europe" (MG-S-ROM (97) 11),
Recommends that in implementing their education policies the governments of the member states:
- be guided by the principles set out in the appendix to this Recommendation;
- bring this Recommendation to the attention of the relevant public bodies in their respective countries through the appropriate national channels.
Appendix to Recommendation No. R (2000) 4
Guiding principles of an education policy for Roma/Gypsy children in Europe
I. Structures
1. Educational policies for Roma/Gypsy children should be accompanied by adequate resources and the flexible structures necessary to meet the diversity of the Roma/Gypsy population in Europe and which take into account the existence of Roma/Gypsy groups which lead an itinerant or semi-itinerant lifestyle. In this respect, it might be envisaged having recourse to distance education, based on new communication technologies.
2. Emphasis should be put on the need to better co-ordinate the international, national, regional and local levels in order to avoid dispersion of efforts and to promote synergies. 3. To this end member states should make the Ministries of Education sensitive to the question of education of Roma/Gypsy children.
4. In order to secure access to school for Roma/Gypsy children, pre-school education schemes should be widely developed and made accessible to them.
5. Particular attention should also be paid to the need to ensure better communication with parents, where necessary using mediators from the Roma/Gypsy community which could then lead to specific carreer possibilities. Special information and advice should be given to parents about the necessity of education and about the support mechanisms that municipalities can offer families. There has to be mutual understanding between parents and schools. The parents’ exclusion and lack of knowledge and education (even illiteracy) also prevent children from benefiting from the education system.
6. Appropriate support structures should be set up in order to enable Roma/Gypsy children to benefit, in particular through positive action, from equal opportunities at school.
7. The member states are invited to provide the necessary means to implement the above-mentioned policies and arrangements in order to close the gap between Roma/Gypsy pupils and majority pupils.
II. Curriculum and teaching material
8. Educational policies in favour of Roma/Gypsy children should be implemented in the framework of broader intercultural policies, taking into account the particular features of the Romani culture and the disadvantaged position of many Roma/Gypsies in the member states.
9. The curriculum, on the whole, and the teaching material should therefore be designed so as to take into account the cultural identity of Roma/Gypsy children. Romani history and culture should be introduced in the teaching material in order to reflect the cultural identity of Roma/Gypsy children. The participation of representatives of the Roma/Gypsy community should be encouraged in the development of teaching material on the history, culture or language of the Roma/Gypsies.
10. However, the member states should ensure that this does not lead to the establishment of separate curricula, which might lead to the setting up of separate classes.
11. The member states should also encourage the development of teaching material based on good practices in order to assist teachers in their daily work with Roma/Gypsy pupils.
12. In the countries where the Romani language is spoken, opportunities to learn in the mother tongue should be offered at school to Roma/Gypsy children.
III. Recruitment and training of teachers
13. It is important that future teachers should be provided with specific knowledge and training to help them understand better their Roma/Gypsy pupils. The education of Roma/Gypsy pupils should however remain an integral part of the general educational system.
14. The Roma/Gypsy community should be involved in the designing of such curricula and should be directly involved in the delivery of information to future teachers.
15. Support should also be given to the training and recruitment of teachers from within the Roma/Gypsy community.
IV. Information research and assessment
16. The member states should encourage innovative research/small-scale action projects in order to find local responses to local needs. The results of such projects should be disseminated.
17. The results of educational policies for Roma/Gypsy pupils should be carefully monitored. All the participants involved in the education of Roma/Gypsy children (school authorities, teachers, parents, non- governmental organisations) should be invited to take part in the monitoring process.
18. The evaluation of the results of educational policies towards Roma/Gypsy children should take account of many criteria, including personal and social development, and not be limited to estimates of school attendance and drop-out rates.
V. Consultation and co-ordination
19. The involvement of all parties concerned (ministry of education, school authorities, Roma families and organisations) in the design, implementation and monitoring of education policies for Roma/Gypsies should be promoted by the state.
20. Use should also be made of mediators from within the Roma/Gypsy community, in particular to ease the contacts between Roma/Gypsies, the majority population and schools and to avoid conflicts at school; this should apply to all levels of schooling.
21. The Ministries of Education, in the framework of the awareness-raising action mentioned in point I, paragraph 3, above should facilitate the co-ordination of the efforts of the different parties involved and permit the channelling of information between the different levels of education authorities.
22. Member states should further encourage and support the exchange of experience and good practice

DECLARATION OF
ROMANI WOMEN NETWORKS
“I AM A EUROPEAN ROMA WOMAN” CONFERENCE Athens, January 11-12 2010
Following the international conferences on Romani women in Bucharest 2006 and Stockholm 2007, Romani women and their supporters gathered in Athens at the “I am a European Roma Woman” Conference on 11-12 January 2010 to take stock of the increased and alarming human rights violations occurring against Romani women and to agree on taking joint action to achieving the full enjoyment of Romani women’s human rights.
Romani women in Europe face multiple discrimination, based on their ethnicity and their gender. This negatively impacts all areas of their daily life, including housing, healthcare, employment, education, political or civic participation and family relationships. Furthermore, they have often been victims of atrocious human rights violations: trafficking, racially-motivated violence, hate crimes and coercive sterilisation.
While the situation of Romani women has been brought to the attention of international organisations, this has not initiated a functional political process able to effect a concrete, measurable improvement on the lives of Romani women.
To the contrary, the occurrences of discrimination, violence and abuse often go unpunished and the motivations behind them remain unchallenged. This climate of impunity often has a lasting and a dehumanizing impact on the Romani women who are victims.
After reviewing the human rights situation of Romani women, participants in this conference underline the following findings:
- The continuous failure of states to afford human dignity to Romani women and acknowledge them as full citizens. Serious concerns remain about the climate of impunity and states’ failure to bring justice and provide remedies to Romani women victims.
- The failure of the governments of the Czech Republic, Slovakia and Hungary to adequately acknowledge and compensate the victims of coercive sterilisation.
- The ongoing school segregation and systematic placement of Romani children in schools for the mentally disabled throughout Europe.
- The high rate of school drop outs among Romani girls and boys during compulsory educational, compounded by the failure of the Ministries of Education to adequately address this and to promote a diverse school environment.

- The failure of state and non-state actors to seriously discuss and address the practice of early marriages in the context of patriarchal dominance and poverty, with a view towards prioritizing the rights of Romani children.
- The lack of action and involvement of local authorities and local actors to address problems and concerns of Romani women.
- The media’s negative and stereotypical portrayal of Romani women by the media and the failure to objectively present situations involving Romani women and Romani communities. Their approach often heightens ethnic division and further stigmatizes Roma communities.
- The lack of specific policies and programmes aimed at improving the situation of Romani women.
- The lack of data disaggregated by ethnicity, gender and other grounds across Europe, which allows the plight of Romani women to remain hidden.
In light of these findings, the participants propose the following recommendations:
- Governments should uphold their obligations under international and European treaties and ensure that Romani women can enjoy and exercise their fundamental rights. Governments must take unequivocal measures with respect to rights violations of Romani women, by convicting and punishing perpetrators and compensating victims.
- While limited compensation and recognition has been awarded in Hungary and the Czech Republic to victims of coercive sterilisation, Hungary, the Czech Republic and Slovakia must acknowledge the past and ongoing occurrences of coercive sterilisation and take active measures to compensate the victims, sanction perpetrators and initiate medical reform in the area of patients’ rights.
- The government of the Czech Republic is obliged to take active measures to end segregation and placement of Romani children in special schooling, in accordance with the 2007 ECHR decision, D.H. and Others vs. the Czech Republic.
- All European countries should take measures to prevent all forms of segregation in housing and education, while promoting the principles of equality and integration.
- School personnel and Ministries of Education should facilitate the completion of mandatory education for Romani children, take active measures to encourage their participation in higher education and

combat discrimination in education. Governments should develop a specific approach to the education of Romani girls with the participation of the Roma community, based on national examples such as the Romanian model of Roma teaching assistants and school mediators.
- Roma activists should work with Romani communities to raise awareness of their children’s rights and their parental responsibilities.
- Local authorities should engage in developing local action plans and allocate budgets to address issues concerning Romani women and girls.
- Roma activists and human rights organisations should actively engage with Roma communities to raise awareness about their human rights and facilitate access to public services and law enforcement mechanisms.
- International organisations should support Roma journalism in order to facilitate a learning process with mainstream journalists about the situation of Romani women and to promote objective journalism.
- Governments should organise hearings in the national parliament about the situation of Romani women. This would help to prioritise issues facing Roma women on the national agendae, raise awareness about the reality of their situation and change the tone of the national debate about Romani women among politicians, the general public and representatives of the media.
- Governments should take steps to monitor and evaluate the situation of Romani women at the national level through the development and use of methodologies for data collection, disaggregated by ethnicity, gender and other grounds, as a basis for targeted and comprehensive measures which impact all areas of life.
- Governments should encourage economic empowerment through supporting small scale business programmes for Romani women.
Romani women activists and networks participating in this conference stand ready to support and advise international organisations, national governments and local authorities in the development and implementation of these recommendations, or other efforts to improve the situation of Romani women in Europe. Participants look forward to efforts to improve the situation of Romani women and facilitate further dialogue on the situation of Romani women, particularly welcoming the follow up conferences proposed by the governments of Finland and Spain.

 IRWC(2023)1
9TH INTERNATIONAL ROMA AND TRAVELLER1 WOMEN CONFERENCE: BUILDING EQUALITY TOGETHER
30 November - 1 December 2023 Skopje, North Macedonia
DRAFT CONCEPT NOTE
Strasbourg, 13 September 2023
  BACKGROUND INFORMATION
  Since 2007, the Roma Women’s conferences have provided the opportunity for Roma and
  Traveller women to address, on the international stage, the issues affecting their own and
 their families’ lives. They have also provided a space where Roma women have kept each
 other informed of issues concerning them and exchanged experiences.
The biannual International Roma Women’s Conferences have three aims: first, to review the current situation of Roma and Traveller women and girls in Council of Europe member states; second, to review how gender equality and Roma and Traveller integration policy measures as well as international standards have been implemented by member states in co-operation with civil society; and lastly, to indicate the way forward for the implementation of the Council of Europe Strategic Action Plan for Roma and Traveller Inclusion (2020-2025)2 in order to combat antigypsyism and discrimination against Roma and Traveller women and girls, support their access to inclusive quality education, training and employment as well as foster their democratic participation and equality.
The conferences offer a unique platform for Roma and Traveller women to exchange and share their knowledge and experiences on current issues affecting them, reflect on the causes
1 The term “Roma and Travellers” is used at the Council of Europe to encompass the wide diversity of the groups covered by the work of the Council of Europe in this field: on the one hand a) Roma, Sinti/Manush, Calé, Kaale, Romanichals, Boyash/Rudari; b) Balkan Egyptians (Egyptians and Ashkali); c) Eastern groups (Dom, Lom and Abdal); and, on the other hand, groups such as Travellers, Yenish, and the populations designated under the administrative term “Gens du voyage”, as well as persons who identify themselves as Gypsies. The present is an explanatory footnote, not a definition of Roma and/or Travellers.
2 Council of Europe Strategic Action Plan for Roma and Traveller Inclusion (2020-2025), available at:
https://edoc.coe.int/en/roma-and-travellers/8508-council-of-europe-strategic-action-plan-for-roma- and-traveller-inclusion-2020-2025.html
    
of current problems and propose possible solutions, make recommendations to decision- making stakeholders, and develop bilateral or multi-lateral co-operation. The conferences thus build capacity and empower Roma and Traveller women.
To date, the Council of Europe has organized 8 International Roma Women’s Conferences:
    1 3-4 December 2007
2 11-12 January 2010
3 23-25 October 2011
4 16-17 September 2013
5 6-7 October 2015
6 6-7 November 2017
7 25-27 March 2019
CONTEXT
Stockholm Athens Granada Helsinki (Espoo) Skopje
Strasbourg Helsinki
Our Voices Heard
I am a European Roma Women
I am an International Roma Women Acting Now for an Equal Future
International review Advancing Despite Everything!
Women and Political Representation: the case of Roma and Traveller Women Access to justice and Rights
                           8
 24-26 November 2021
    Strasbourg
  Protecting the Human Rights and Dignity of Roma and Traveller Women in Times of Crises
    Women throughout Council of Europe member States still face inequalities in many respects. Antigypsyism, racism, discrimination, exclusion and extreme poverty are factors which reinforce the disadvantages faced by Roma and Traveller women.
A recent study of the Council of Europe3 concludes that the situation of Roma and Traveller women has not really advanced over the past decades and that “the violations of their human rights are still perpetuated, which indicates a need for special legal and/or strategic provisions to ensure efficient protection of the target groups.”
Conditions for inclusion and opportunities for full participation in society of Roma and Traveller women and girls are hindered by unequal access to education, high unemployment rates, scarce opportunities for employment, and economic development. A low level of education, high unemployment rates, and weak employment opportunities deprive Roma women and girls of real opportunities for integration and full participation in society.
Starting with 2007, when the First International Roma Women Conference took place in Stockholm, the Council of Europe has provided a forum for discussion on the challenges that Roma and Traveller women are facing. The International Roma Women Conferences have been taking place every other year since, with the most recent, the 8th one, taking place in November 2021 in Strasbourg and focusing on the topic of protecting the human rights and dignity of Roma and Traveller women in times of crises.
3 Empowerment of Roma and Traveller women: a change under construction - Towards a Roadmap for Advancing Gender Equality of Roma and Traveller Women in Council of Europe member States, 2021.
 2

In 2016, the Roma and Travellers Team started the implementation of the Joint Programme of the European Union and Council of Europe on “Roma and Traveller Women’s Access to Justice” (JUSTROM). It responded to gaps emphasized by monitoring bodies of the Council of Europe such as the European Commission against Racism and Intolerance (ECRI) and to needs expressed by Roma and Traveller women during the previous International Roma Women Conferences (IRWC). The findings, results and lessons learnt from the JUSTROM Programme are also feeding into the development of Council of Europe standards, such as the Recommendation CM/Rec(2017)10 of the Committee of Ministers to member States on improving access to justice for Roma and Travellers in Europe
In 2021, based on the recommendations collected from various activities as well as from the Council of Europe’s monitoring bodies, the Steering Committee on Anti-Discrimination, Diversity and Inclusion (CDADI) and the Committee of Experts on Roma and Traveller Issues (ADI-ROM) were tasked to prepare and propose by the end of 2023 a Draft Recommendation to the Committee of Ministers on equality for Roma and Traveller women and girls to be adopted by the Committee of Ministers.
The 15th meeting of the Council of Europe Dialogue with Roma and Traveller civil society held on 6-7 June 2023 provided an opportunity for a substantive exchange of views on the challenges faced by Roma and Traveller women and girls and on solutions which can be proposed to Council of Europe member States, and served as a consultation platform for discussing the draft Recommendation on the topic of equality for Roma and Traveller women and girls, drafted by the ADI-ROM Working Group in charge of preparing it.
To effectively improve the situation of Roma and Traveller women, international and national standards need to be implemented by the national authorities, and civil society is essential in monitoring their implementation. By building alliances between minority and mainstream women’s lobbies, a more inclusive and intersectional approach may be fostered towards gender equality advocacy. Together, these alliances can develop effective work aimed at achieving meaningful and lasting change that benefits all women.
The 9th International Roma and Traveller Women Conference will serve as a forum for an exchange between Roma and Traveller Women civil society and mainstream other minority women’s lobbying on building alliances with the goal of achieving a coordinated, inclusive and overarching central support and monitoring system in the implementation of key standards of the Council of Europe and other international organisations and of national authorities promoting gender equality for all women, taking into account the intersectionality and multiple discriminations faced by Roma and Traveller women.
A stock taking of current problems which Roma and Traveller women face will be carried out through exchanges with and between Roma and Traveller women civil society organisations. Capacity-building and empowerment of Roma and Traveller women in Europe will be fostered with a view to reinforcing the protection and promotion of their human rights and dignity.
         OBJECTIVES OF THE 9TH INTERNATIONAL ROMA AND TRAVELLER WOMEN CONFERENCE
 3

The Conference will contribute at supporting the implementation of the Council of Europe Strategic Action Plan for Roma and Traveller Inclusion (2020-2025) and creating synergies with similar policies adopted by the international stakeholders such as the United Nations, the OSCE and the European Union.
TOPICS ADDRESSED AT THE CONFERENCE
Plenary sessions
 Overview and perspectives about Roma and Traveller women in view of international and national stakeholders (Council of Europe, European Commission, UNDP, OSCE and Government of North Macedonia)
 Overview of the results of previous IRTWC and roadmap of the draft Recommendation of the Committee of Ministers to the member states on the topic of equality for Roma and Traveller women and girls
 Building alliances between women networks and ensuring legal and policy standards are applied for Roma and Traveller women and girls
 Status play of policies on improving the situation of Roma and Traveller women and girls on the agenda of international and European organisations
 National perspectives and practices on measures aimed at addressing the vulnerable situation of Roma and Traveller women and girls.
Workshops
 Workshop 1 - Combating antigypsyism and discrimination against Roma and Traveller women and girls and supporting real and effective equality
Antigypsyism is one of the most impactful mechanisms of Roma exclusion. It recognizes the interdependence of inclusion and anti-discrimination and therefore recommends that initiatives to improve the situation and integration of Roma should include measures combating discrimination and addressing antigypsyism, in addition to measures promoting the social and economic inclusion of Roma in areas such as education, health, employment and housing.
This workshop aims to discuss challenges faced by Roma and Traveller women and girls throughout Europe, take stock of multidisciplinary measures adopted by various state or non-state actors and put into perspective good practices in combating antigypsyism with a particular emphasis on Roma women and girls.
 Workshop 2 - Supporting democratic participation of Roma and Traveller women and promoting trust and accountability
Roma and Travellers, particularly women and youth, encounter a variety of social barriers and prejudices that severely impede their capacity to effectively participate in public and political life. They are consequently largely absent from the local or national political arenas and decision-making processes affecting them. This invisibility undermines their potential to reverse embedded marginalisation and discrimination. This workshop aims to discuss challenges faced by Roma and Traveller women, take stock of measures to enhance political participation and representation to bring Roma women closer to local, national and European decision-making bodies and improve
   4

their active participation and interaction with public administration and their presence in the public sphere and share good practices in this regard.
 Workshop 3 - Supporting access to inclusive quality education and training for Roma and Traveller women and girls
Common challenges for many educational institutions across Europe when it comes to Roma and Traveller children including girls include non-enrolment, early school leaving, school dropouts, and irregular attendance. School segregation appears to be a major factor contributing to low educational performance. The practice of separating groups of pupils into specific schools or classes despite the existing anti-discrimination legislation and policies may even be on the rise. School segregation is a serious violation of the rights of children, and the development of international human rights standards has contributed to fighting school segregation in many countries.
This workshop aims to discuss challenges faced by Roma and Traveller youth, children and girls in the area of education, take stock of measures removing obstacles to equal access to quality education and share good practices in advancing inclusive education for Roma children and girls.
PARTICIPATION
40 international Roma and Traveller women civil society participants will be selected through an open call published on the website of the Council of Europe’s Roma and Travellers Team. Participants will be Roma and Traveller women, representatives of Roma and Traveller women organisations and experts from international, national and local civil society organisations. Participants must be competent to work in English, French or Romani, which are the working languages of the meeting;
15 Roma women representatives of North Macedonian civil society, NGOs and associations;
Representatives of EU, OSCE, UNDP, and other international organisations, relevant State authorities and representatives, international independent experts, academics, women organisations and lobbies;
Members of other departments of the Council of Europe and of the Inter-Secretariat Task Force who are mainstreaming Roma and Traveller women and girls’ issues into their respective areas of work.
DATES AND VENUE
The conference will take place on 30 November – 1 December 2023, for one day and a half, in Skopje, North Macedonia.
Travel and subsistence expenses, as well as visa fees, if necessary, related to the participation in this 9th IRTWC will be reimbursed to the 40 international Roma and Traveller women according to the Council of Europe’s rules and regulations on reimbursement of such expenses.
      5

 COUNCIL OF EUROPE ADOPTED TEXTS AND PUBLICATIONS
 Council of Europe Strategic Action Plan for Roma and Traveller Inclusion (2020‐2025) [Romani]
 First Implementation Report of the Strategic Action plan for Roma and Travellers Inclusion (2020-2025)
 Recommendation CM/Rec(2022)5 of the Committee of Ministers to member States on passing on remembrance of the Holocaust and preventing crimes against humanity
 Recommendation CM/Rec(2020)2 of the Committee of Ministers to member States on the inclusion of the history of Roma and/or Travellers in school curricula and teaching materials [CM/Rec(2020)2 in other languages]
 Council of Europe Strategic Action Plan for Roma and Traveller Inclusion (2020‐2025) CM(2019)161 approved by the Committee of Ministers of the Council of Europe on 22 January 2020 at the 1365th meeting of the Ministers’ Deputies
 Recommendation CM/Rec(2017)10 of the Committee of Ministers to member States on improving access to justice for Roma and Travellers in Europe
 Recommendation CM/Rec(2012)9 of the Committee of Ministers to member States on mediation as an effective tool for promoting respect for human rights and social inclusion of Roma
 Declaration of the Committee of Ministers on the Rise of Anti-Gypsyism and Racist Violence against Roma in Europe
 Recommendation CM/Rec(2009)4 of the Committee of Ministers to member states on the education of Roma and Travellers in Europe
 Recommendation CM/Rec(2008)5 of the Committee of Ministers on policies for Roma and/or Travellers in Europe
 Recommendation Rec(2006)10 of the Committee of Ministers on better access to health care for Roma and Travellers in Europe
 Recommendation Rec(2005)4 of the Committee of Ministers on improving the housing conditions of Roma and Travellers in Europe
 Recommendation Rec(2004)14 of the Committee of Ministers on the movement and encampment of Travellers in Europe
 Recommendation Rec(2001)17 of the Committee of Ministers on improving the economic and employment situation of Roma/Gypsies and Travellers
 Recommendation Rec(2000)4 of the Committee of Ministers on the education of Roma/Gypsy children in Europe
 Recommendation Rec(83)1 of the Committee of Ministers on stateless nomads and nomads of undetermined nationality
 Resolution Res(75)13 of the Committee of Ministers containing recommendations on the social situation of nomads in Europe
 Antigypsyism- Causes – Prevalence – Consequences – Possible responses (2022)
 Research on the barriers of Roma Women’s Access to Justice in four countries:
Bulgaria, Greece, Italy and Romania (2022)
 Empowerment of Roma and Traveller women: a change under construction - Towards
a Roadmap for Advancing Gender Equality of Roma and Traveller Women in Council of Europe member states (2021)
                                            6

   Introduction
4th International Conference of Romani Women 17-18 September 2013, Helsinki
Final report
On the 17-18 September 2013, the Government of Finland organised in Helsinki the 4th International Romani Women’s Conference in cooperation with the Council of Europe. More than one hundred Romani women from various European countries gathered to take stock of past initiatives and developments at policy and Roma community level and to contribute to a Strategy on ways to advance the status of Romani women in Europe.
The 4th International Romani Women’s Conference in Finland is part of a series of similar initiatives facilitated and supported by the Council of Europe jointly with various national governments since 2003. Within these forums, Romani women had the opportunity to raise concerns, exchange experiences and mobilise jointly over common purposes. They have also expressed several times the need for sustainable ways of cooperating with each other and for acting as a network over various priority issues or threats. Thus, after the 3rd International Romani Women’s Congress in Spain in 2011, Romani women have worked jointly with the Council of Europe and the Finnish Government in developing mechanisms for wider consultations with Romani women, which have contributed substantially to drafting the agenda of the 4th International Conference. Romani women participating at the conference contributed to the development of a Strategy on the advancement of Romani women and girls in Europe, 2014-2020. In addition, a platform initiative called Phenjalipe (“Sisterhood”) was launched at the conference with the aim to support the implementation of the strategic outcome document and to further facilitate exchanges of information and coordination at regional level on issues related to Romani women and girls.
The Strategy, which is a policy document drafted based on discussions and recommendations by Romani women at the Helsinki Conference and taking account of various international initiatives and human rights standards, aims to be a policy tool to be used by Romani women in their advocacy and policy development work with various partners; by national and local governments; by intergovernmental organisations and other relevant stakeholders. The Strategy will be attached to this report.
Priority areas of the Helsinki Conference
The conference hosted three parallel workshops focusing on: “Education as a precondition for the fulfilment of the rights of Romani women”; “Advancement of the rights and gender equality of Romani women in society and community mobilisation” and “Enhancement of active citizenship, participation and networking of Romani women”.
1

I. Workshop on EDUCATION as a precondition for the fulfilment of the rights of Romani women
The workshop on education addressed a number of obstacles in the access to education of Romani women and girls. It also discussed the importance of integrating more effectively elements of the Romani identity in the school curricula of various school subjects, while promoting an open and inclusive education system which allows for modern or even alternative forms of education, adapted on local educational needs of children, especially girls.
Thus, access to education of Romani girls is many times hindered both by internal or external obstacles. Poverty and social exclusion have been identified as real obstacles preventing many Romani girls from attending school. Poverty prevents Romani parents from sending their children to school, as they cannot afford all costs related to the education of their children. The impact of poverty has in many situations a disproportionate impact on Romani girls’ education, since they are more likely to miss out because of household responsibilities or cultural values and practices. Discrimination against Romani girls manifests itself in a complex way, as it extends from hindering access to Romani girls to any education, to harassment and bullying at school by non-Romani peers and school personnel, from poor school infrastructure and poor quality of education manifested through low level of literacy, low school performance and high dropout rates to more severe forms of discrimination such as segregation and misplacement of Romani girls in schools for mentally challenged.
Early marriage of Romani girls was indicated as an obstacle to pursuing higher education in traditional Romani communities. Early marriage is being tolerated and largely ignored by state authorities, despite the fact that girls and possibly boys are under the legal age on the account that “it’s in their tradition” and thus an illegal act is justified in the context of so called cultural heritage. The dropping out of married girls from school is viewed as a “natural” consequence, which goes usually unchallenged and unpunished.
Existing legal and policy tools at country level, including targeted actions on Romani education are not effective in counteracting social exclusion and systemic discrimination of Romani girls and boys in the area of education. Anti-discrimination laws provide remedies for individuals suffering from discrimination. But acts of discrimination such of school segregation is not the act of one teacher or even one school, it is moreover the result of a more systemic practice which cannot be solved by bringing to court a school or even the Ministries of Education.
Most participants at the Helsinki Conference raised concern over the fact that many institutions dealing with education are not employing a proper methodology in dealing with multi-ethnic groups. More so, the act of education is missing a perspective about who Roma are, about their contribution to society, their language and cultural values and traditions.
One of the conclusions of the workshop was that a real change in the area of education of Romani girls and women requires a long-term and multifaceted approach and commitment of educational institutions and other sectors of the government and society at various levels, including inside the Romani community but also through the revision and monitoring of their impact. Romani women have provided an important number of recommendations for local and national governments as well as for other stakeholders and actors in the area of education, as they follow:
2

 Recommendations to national and local authorities Government authorities should:
 Take measures to encourage regular attendance at schools and the reduce dropout rates in girls. Take appropriate measures to increase literacy among Romani girls, combat absenteeism and dropout among Romani girls and boys while reintegrating those who have already dropped out;
 Take urgent measures to end segregation in schools where Romani children learn, and to integrate them into inclusive quality schools and classes;
 Take measures to prevent and combat stereotypes, prejudice, and discrimination experienced by Romani girls in schools and ensure that Romani children are educated in an inclusive educational environment, free of discrimination and harassment;
 Address the problem of Romani children left behind by migrant parents, by ensuring enrolment, attendance and academic performance, as well as the necessary psycho-social and reintegration assistance and other support to them as needed;
 Eliminate financial and administrative or other obstacles to the access of Romani girls to education and thus ensure the provision of adequate, appropriate and affordable education. Introduce quota systems for minority children as a way to ensure access of Romani girls to secondary and higher education;
 Identify Romani girls from marginalised communities and systematically support them in ensuring that they begin school at the same age as other children, and subsequently continue to the level that they choose;
 Employ and train Romani women teachers and teaching assistants or mediators to strengthen school integration of Romani children and contribute to increasing the number of Romani professionals;
 Develop and adopt “Life-long learning” programs for Romani parents and mothers in order to facilitate social inclusion of both parents and children; develop vocational education for Romani women adult on real needs;
 Revise training for teachers to include anti-discrimination, gender-sensitivity and intercultural training. In addition, pedagogical training should consider, where relevant, modern and or alternative tools such as visual aid training, community field training, regional teaching methods’ workshops, exchange programs etc.;
 Revise school curriculum to include elements of the Romani past and present history, culture and traditions for primary, secondary and higher education;
 Collect and disseminate best practices about inclusive, gender sensitive and intercultural “teacher training” approaches;
 Consider alternative education as a way to ensure access of all Romani girls, regardless of their circumstances, including but not limited to: television, mobile and distance learning;
 Implement positive measures in order to increase the number of Romani children attending and completing post-secondary and university education;
 Carry out actions aimed at increasing Romani parents’ awareness of the importance of nursery school, of preventing dropping-out, and of giving priority to their children’s education; engage in effective community action together with Romani parents to address existing gaps and challenges;
3

 More resources should be created to highlight relevant role models and include them in the education curriculum;
 Collect disaggregated data by gender and ethnicity with regards to Romani girls’ literacy and participation levels to ensure effective school participation and prevent drop-put rates, as well as to assess impact various challenges on Romani girls’ education as supposed to boys and non-Romani students;
 Make a greater commitment to mainstream gender and Romani women and girls’ educational priorities in the national and local integration strategies for Romani inclusion;
 Develop evaluation and monitoring systems about the way gender and Romani women’s issues are mainstreamed into the Romani, social inclusion and gender equality policies and measures;
 Make available and use structural funds for promoting and supporting Romani girls’ education;
 Improve cooperation with Romani communities; adopt a positive approach to change perceptions about Romani communities;
 Support Romani women to develop initiatives at local and regional level;
 Romani women and girls should be provided with human rights education as a
means of empowering them to claim and defend their rights.
 Recommendations to the European Union
Education is a strong part of the overall EU development framework beyond 2015, with a specific emphasis on improving equity and quality. The EU has made a firm commitment to human development and social inclusion in the development budget and indicated a disburse of €2.5 billion in support of basic education and Technical and Vocational Education and Training in the 2014-2020 period. An additional €1.5 billion is expected to be allocated to support the EU Higher Education cooperation and mobility programme.
The European Union should:
 Ensure that by 2030 every child, including Romani girls completes at least basic education and has basic literacy and numeracy skills;
 Work with partner countries and development partners – and other actors such as the private sector and youth representatives – to ensure a coordinated approach for improving results in the education of Romani girls and aligning support with national education plans. This includes continuing to support the Global Partnership for Education and working on international aid effectiveness strategies;
 Work to define segregation as illegal discrimination under EU and European law.
 Recommendations to the Council of Europe
 Work with governments to change stereotypes and negative prejudices against Romani girls in the act of education;
 Support activities which teach parents, teachers and students about the genocide of Roma;
4

II.
 

Train school personnel/teachers on anti-discrimination and inclusive education to prevent segregation, improve access of Romani girls to education, and support an inclusive school environment;
Ensure that the Congress of Local and Regional Authorities and in-house initiatives facilitate the development of local action plans on Roma integration that are gender sensitive and take account of the situation of Romani girls and the impact of poverty on their access and follow through in education;
Ensure that CAHROM keeps on its agenda Roma women issues and organise regular thematic visits and reports on Roma education, with a particular focus on the situation of Romani girls.
Workshop on Enhancement of active citizenship, participation and networking of Romani women
Participants in this workshop expressed an overall concern that Romani women are generally excluded from the social, economic and political life because of discrimination and their poor level of education or relevant training, gender stereotypes and traditional roles, lack of security of tenure, segregation in housing and education and lack of power resources. Their role as a caretaker and keeper of values and family heritage are often disregarded by their family members and society at large. Their level of political participation is extremely low, with minor representation at local level as councillors. In terms of mobilization, there have been attempts to organise under a network umbrella, but currently there is no operational network or activity, which is representing Romani women’s interests at international level. There are instead Romani women’s NGOs acting locally or nationally, which are not necessarily driven by a strategic vision but rather by institutional survival.
There are still many structural inequalities that limit Romani women’s ability to attain equitable participation in society. The lack of self-esteem, the scarcity of role models, the lack of peer support and the gap between grassroots Romani women and those working on higher levels, all prevent them from taking up power engaging positions. There is therefore a need to work towards developing a more active and engaged citizenship, through dialogue, raising awareness of social issues, and encouraging participation by citizens in informing the development of social policies and practices; to create what bell hooks (2003) calls a ‘teaching community’, where people can genuinely participate, listen, and learn from one another.
The promotion of active citizenship behaviour can sustain processes of social cohesion and contribute to improve quality of life and social wellbeing. The practice of active citizenship is therefore a question of being empowered to handle the practice of democratic culture, and feeling that one has a stake in getting involved in the communities in which one lives, whether by choice or force of circumstance. The concept of active citizenship ultimately speaks to the extent to which individuals and groups feel a sense of attachment to the societies and communities to which they theoretically belong, and is therefore closely related to the promotion of social inclusion and cohesion as well as to matters of identity and values.
In the case of Romani women, in order to understand the concept of active citizenship, one needs to assess not only how they participate as citizens, but also the ways in which concerns that impact primarily upon women have been systematically ignored or trivialized within discourses around citizenship.
5

The challenges expressed by Romani women at the Helsinki Conference lie at local level. Attempts of improving living conditions on the grassroots level of Roma will only succeed if Romani women are participating as full citizens in equal stakeholdership.
Some of the conclusions expressed in the workshop underlined the need for activities to focus on the training, support and mobilization of grassroots young women – both Roma and non- Roma. Young Romani women have the potential to explore different ways to challenge negative stereotypes and thus they should be supported to engage in an active dialog with local authorities and generate partnerships while supporting a more effective and gendered local governance. Therefore, it is important to support and enable confidence in young Romani women to play an active role. Continuous coaching and support of young Romani women can contribute to mobilizing and empowering communities, while supporting and ensuring sustainable development of both individuals and communities.
 Recommendations to national and local authorities
Government
authorities should:
 Review, reform and correct any legislation, policy or practice that has a disproportionately negative impact on Romani women and girls and ensure that adequate mechanisms exist for preventing and combating discrimination, including on multiple grounds in Romani women’s access to education, employment, health care, social protection, housing etc.;
 Mainstream Romani women’s concerns into gender, Roma and social inclusion policies, programmes and actions, including though the creation of committees/working groups on Romani women’s issues in local and national governments;
 Take concrete measures aimed at enabling Romani women and young girls to take an active part of decision-making processes and relevant policy developments at local, regional and national level and thus ensure their effective participation in the social, economic, cultural and political life;
 Develop plans and programmes to ensure the effective participation of Romani women in public and political life. These plans should include the adoption of positive measures such as quotas, the development of educational and training programmes to build capacity in Romani women and young girls, measures to ensure diversity and multiculturalism among public administration staff, and the allocation of sufficient resources to realise identified objectives. An annual national program for Romani women’s political participations should also be considered;
 Establish a mechanism to monitor progress achieved in increasing Romani women’s and young girl’s participation and their equal and meaningful representation in public and political life at all levels;
 Address obstacles preventing the effective participation of Romani women in public and political life through revision or adoption of laws, policies and programme measures;
 Romani women who become community leaders should be supported and promoted to become positive role models in their community and society at large;
 Support adult education and life-long learning of Romani women to be able to take active part in society and become autonomous;
6

III.

 
  
 
Involve Romani men and leaders in programmes and workshops in order to achieve a change in traditional perceptions and practices and to eradicate discrimination against Romani women from within communities;
Promote and support the empowerment of Romani women and girls, by supporting measures on their economic and human rights empowerment at large; Ensure that Romani women realise their economic rights by developing policies aiming to build their capacity and creating new employment opportunities for them as alternatives to traditional gendered occupations;
Support measures, including training in diversity, business initiatives or quota systems to enhance their Romani women’s full participation in society and ensure their equal participation;
Facilitate Romani women, especially at local level and where relevant, to access to microcredits to enable small business initiatives, and design training programmes on how to use microcredits and run businesses effectively;
In collaboration with Romani and women’s rights organisations, seek to ensure fully the cultural rights of Romani women, including through the promotion and support of intercultural dialogue and inclusive education in school curricula and though institutional and inter-stakeholders cooperation at various levels;
Support Romani women’s NGOs and groups to engage with local and national authorities as policy development partners, representing the interests of Romani women, girls and Roma communities;
Promote and support exchanges of best practices on good governance on gender/Romani women’s mainstreaming in policy and practice (e.g. the Socrates programme of 1994 on adult education involving eight Member States1).
Workshop on the Advancement of the rights and gender equality of Romani women in society and community mobilization
Participants at the Finnish Conference pointed to the extreme poverty and social exclusion experienced by Romani women and girls across European countries. Their experience is substantively different to that of Romani men and non-Romani women. They face the additional burden or racism as well as gender discrimination, which push Romani women at the margins of society. Low educational attainment and high rates of irregular attendance and school dropout, high unemployment rates and poor employment opportunities especially for Romani women in rural areas reap Romani women and girls of realistic possibilities for integration and full participation in their societies. Increased racism and anti-Gypsyism in the context of global economic crisis and international mobility of Romani families affect the safety of Romani women and girls and making them increasingly vulnerable to social exclusion, exploitation, trafficking and violence. Traditional family roles, many Romani women find themselves in, create additional mechanisms of exclusion. Early and child marriages are still recurrent in traditional Roma communities. While there is a positive ascending trend in the gender relations between Romani women and men, there is yet a long way to go for Romani women to become autonomous and feel that they can make choices outside pre-assumed ascribed gender roles.
Romani women often feel left out from consultation and decision-making processes on legislation, policies and programmes, including on those that are specifically designed to address their situation. Many Romani women working at the local level were concerned that their knowledge and expertise about the human rights concerns of their communities are
 1 Denmark, France, Greece, Ireland, Norway, Portugal, Spain and the United Kingdom.
7

overlooked both by local and national level politicians. Many are discouraged that even when communities are consulted, it is often through a male leader who is not necessarily sensitive and informed about the situation and particular experiences of Romani women.
Conference participants highlighted the importance of mainstreaming Romani women’s concerns and priorities. Thus, the mainstreaming of gender and Romani women’s concerns and priorities, both in policy and practice would enable public policy responses to advance equality and to combat discrimination. Gender mainstreaming introduces a culture of impact assessment, monitoring and review into the public policy process and thus enhances the effectiveness of Romani women specific policies; it also eliminates barriers for Romani women experiencing inequality, reduces poverty, boosts economic growth and strengthens citizenship. Mainstreaming creates means for the empowerment of Romani women and their autonomy.
Romani women have discussed at length about the need for increased community mobilization and capacity building of Romani women’s NGOs and groups, as well as about networking and partnership with relevant actors. Romani women stressed the need to create and increase networks of Romani women, whereby they can act together to make Romani women’s issues a priority for national and local governments, international organisations and human rights institutions and women’s groups. They also discussed about the importance of providing expert opinions and substance to policy and programme development processes as well as to human rights monitoring bodies.
Participants addressed as well the need to include and take account of multiple identities, experiences and belonging of Romani women (such as Romani women Travellers, IDPs and Refugees, LGBT, Sinti, Ashkali, Egyptians, etc.) and to strengthen solidarity and cooperation among various Romani women’s groups across Europe, thus closing existing gaps in engagement and participation by various women’s groups in several countries.
Romani women participants in the Finnish conference concluded that supporting the establishment of a pan European Romani women’s platform or network could help mobilise Romani women in various countries, build solidarity and partnership to address Romani women’s inequalities, challenges and priorities at national and international level and increase visibility on Romani women’s issues at country and international level.
 Recommendations to national and local authorities Government authorities should:
 Mainstream gender and Romani women’s concerns in all policy and programmes at national and local level. Allocate adequate resources to projects to address the priorities of Romani women. Where they have gender-sensitive or minority- specific budgets, governments should ensure that these include and target Romani women;
 Identify and address obstacles preventing Romani women’s participation in decision-making by a systematic and consistent approach;
 Promote and support the development or strengthening of local Romani women’s associations, groups and networks that can mobilise and articulate their voice in appropriate forums as well as act as partners for the local and national authorities;
 Take measures to build the capacity of local Romani women groups and organisations. Support training, facilitation of networking opportunities, mobilization of grassroots women activists and youth;
8

 Promote and support Romani women’s active participation in local authorities’ activities, including in local politics (ex. by voter registration and by standing as candidates for elections);
 Public administration institutions at all levels (local, regional, and national) should be encouraged to employ Romani women in order to ensure diversity and affective participation in local and national governance;
 Invest in Romani women’s economic, educational and political empowerment.
 Develop mechanisms that permit working with Romani parents to overcome the disadvantaged situation of Romani girls and boys in the field of education focusing particularly on the culturally determined barriers in the education of Romani girls in
some Roma communities;
 Support catch up educational and long life learning programs for Romani women;
 Increase the number of Romani girls and women studying in universities and
colleges through scholarship schemes and other positive action measures;
 Increase the number of Romani women health mediators, teaching assistants and social workers employed and ensure sustainability of their positions in all countries where such programs exist, without limiting their access to labour
market to these positions;
 Create community-based and community-run programs to create work
opportunities for Romani women;
 Create alternative forms for employment and self-employment for Romani women;
promote Romani women entrepreneurship through the structural funds;
 Preparing programs fostering agriculture and farming activities as an occupation
for rural Romani women.
 Recommendations to intergovernmental organisations They should:
Mainstream Romani women’s issues throughout their gender equality mechanisms, objectives and activities;
 Support and develop approaches on gender mainstreaming/mainstreaming Romani women’s issues in policy and programmes by addressing the inequalities, concerns and priorities of Romani women and girls;
 Support the capacity building and empowerment of Romani women activists and NGOs through training, workshops, exchange programmes and study visits, institutional and programme development support/grant schemes;
 Support projects at local level on Romani women’s rights and empowerment;
 Support Romani women’s engagement with ongoing local level initiatives on women, Roma and/or Romani women implemented particularly by local
authorities;
 Support networking and cooperation of Romani women’s associative movements
at international level;
 Develop and promote best practices on mainstreaming Romani women into policy
and practice and Romani women’s empowerment;
 Support disaggregated data collection by gender and ethnicity to include Romani
women and girls;
 Council of Europe should work with governments and media, to raise awareness
on Roma culture and history to counter negative myths and stereotypes and bring together Roma and non-Roma communities.
9

 Recommendations to Romani women’s NGOs and networks They should:
 Develop and/or strengthen expertise on mainstreaming gender/Romani women’s concerns and priorities into policy and action through developing gender/Romani women’s indicators, mainstreaming approaches into sectorial policies etc.;
 Create sustainable partnerships for the mainstreaming of Romani women’s issues in local and national level policies;
 Work to empower Romani women and communities at local level;
 Raise awareness of Romani women about their rights and obligations and support their capacities to/facilitate their access to public services and decision making
process at local and/or national level;
 Support the creation of national and international networks and forums of Romani
women and girls ensuring participation of Romani women and girls of various belongings and experiences.
In the light of discussions in the three workshops, Romani women have highlighted concerns and proposed recommendations for related areas. Thus, this report contains also recommendations on related fields.
EMPLOYMENT
Romani women throughout the three workshops raised concerns about the restriction of Romani women’s access to the labour market, prevailing discrimination and higher risk of unemployment. Romani women are often the first ones to lose their jobs in times of economic crisis and frequently find themselves confined to specific low-skill, low-status and low-paid sectors of employment and in the informal sector. Barriers to Romani women’s access to labour markets include lack of education, lack of awareness of job opportunities, remoteness of the work location, lack of public infrastructure for child care, cultural traditions and gendered societal roles, gender- and minority-based discrimination in hiring, promotion and pay. Fear was expressed that in informal labour markets, Romani women are often excluded from basic labour protection and employed under not only poor but also insecure, difficult, harmful or even dangerous working conditions.
 Recommendations to national and local authorities They should:
 Allocate resources to expand the employment opportunities available to Romani women, including through education, literacy, vocational training (including skills to run small businesses), credit and market access so that they can realise their economic rights, and both seek and create new forms of employment within and beyond their communities;
 Ensure that Romani women realise their economic rights by developing policies geared to build their capacity and creating new employment opportunities for them as alternatives to traditional gendered occupations;
 Create community-based and community-run programs to create work opportunities for Romani women;
 Create alternative forms for employment and self-employment for Romani women; promote Romani women entrepreneurship through the structural funds;
10

 Promote and support the use of Roma crafts, particularly those practised by women, as a basis for small business development;
  Preparing programs fostering agriculture and farming activities as an occupation for rural Romani women;
 Public administration institutions at all levels (local, regional, and national) should be encouraged to employ Romani women.
HEALTH CARE
Romani women raise concerns about obstacles for Romani women to access health care. They often receive improper or low-quality of healthcare or live in places where no health services are available. The activities of health-care providers, including hospitals, should prevent discriminatory practices against Romani women such as the refusal of treatment, isolation in separate wards or medical interventions without Romani women’s consent, such as forced sterilisation.
 Recommendations to national and local authorities They should:
 Evaluate and, where needed, improve Romani women’s access to information about service provision, social and child services and health care;
 Ensure that health services are suitable as far as possible and accessible to mobile households. Consideration must be given to already existing positive practices, such as employing female Romani medical staff and health mediators to work closely with Romani communities who can help build bridges between Romani women and health and social service providers;
 Consider implementing trust-building activities for health care providers and for Romani women;
 Ensure that Romani families, especially in segregated settlements and travelling/migrant communities, have access to local health services, including provision of outreach and mobile facilities and of interpreting services where necessary;
 Ensure that health services reach Romani women and children and include preventive care, especially immunisation for young children, and that health information is readily available.
HOUSING AND ACCOMMODATION
In the context of increasing number of evictions, forced returns of Roma to home countries and lack of facilities for Traveller communities, many housing and accommodation concerns were raised throughout the Helsinki conference. Romani women experience poverty, prejudice, marginalisation and gender-based restrictions to a greater extent than Romani men that can frequently result in increased challenges relating to the right to adequate housing. In poor Romani neighbourhoods, there is often a lack of indoor kitchen, toilet, shower/bath or electricity, which poses serious challenges to Romani women and children, including in their health status.
 Recommendations to national and local authorities They should:
11

 Map and assess the housing and accommodation related challenges faced especially by Romani women and children, including their possibilities to access water, food, health care and education;
 Develop strategies to end Roma residential segregation, to replace or improve the quality of existing housing, or to provide access to housing with all basic amenities (fresh water, drainage, gas, electricity, garbage collection, and paved roads) so as to facilitate social inclusion;
 Ensure access to adequate accommodation on suitable sites for travelling/migrant families with basic amenities and effective site management, ensuring consultation with settled residents in the area to address any concerns and promote social cohesion;
 Regularise the tenure of Roma in their homes or on sites, avoid forced evictions, and provide alternative accommodation of minimum housing standards in cases where forced evictions are unavoidable;
 Identify land where temporary accommodation of Roma can be installed while respecting environmental and sanitary regulations.
GENDER VIOLENCE & TRAFFICKING
Domestic violence against Romani women and girls is rarely discussed and disclosed due to the fear that it might bring a further stigma to Roma in general. Equally, Romani women are particularly vulnerable to trafficking in persons, particularly those living in situations of poverty or conflict, or in remote and border regions. Many are trapped by false promises of a better future abroad and find themselves in hopeless situations far away from their homes and their already established networks of support. Disadvantaged Romani women and girls may also be particularly vulnerable to other contemporary forms of slavery, including forced labour, debt bondage, child labour, sale of children, forced prostitution and forced and early marriage.
 Recommendations to national and local authorities They should:
 Put in place systematic measures to identify practices of violence and take robust action to eradicate violations;
 Strengthen bilateral, regional and international cooperation aimed at the elimination of trafficking in persons, targeting Romani women and children;
 Regional institutions should be established with concrete plans of action to combat and prevent all forms of violence/trafficking in persons and, which should include explicit attention to Romani women and girls;
 Develop and implement counselling and support programmes, which are culturally sensitive and accessible to Romani women;
 Practices that lead to and/or perpetuate gender inequality or/and violate the rights of Romani women and girls, including child marriage, should be tackled, through involving the Romani communities concerned and with the effective participation of Romani women;
 Government and law enforcement officials, social workers, health professionals and other relevant actors should receive training on gender equality and non- discrimination, violence against women, including domestic violence, and on the particular situation of Romani women and girls.
12

MEDIA AND FREEDOM OF SPEECH
Private and public media actors often perpetuate existing misconceptions and stereotypes about Romani women, portraying them ignorant, only capable to act as housewives or shown as sexual objects. Romani women expressed concern over the increasing phenomenon of hate speech and anti-Gypsyism, through which public actors incite to violence, hatred or discrimination, and express public insults and defamation or threats against Roma. Hate speech often leads to hate crimes with irreversible harm and suffering onto Romani individuals, especially on Romani women and girls.
 Recommendations:
 Exercising the right of freedom of expression should be restricted according to international legal standards in order to combat racism to protect the human dignity of Romani women and men;
 Governments should ensure that there is legislation and guidelines for the media with regard to non-discrimination and the appropriateness of references and language and they are effectively enforces;
 Media reports should be monitored by independent oversight bodies to ensure compliance with standards, and penalties should be imposed for breach of standards;
 Media should evaluate and increase the representation of Romani women in their staff and in all categories;
 Efforts should be made to ensure positive representation of Romani women in broadcast programming. This includes programme content that portrays Romani women positively and raises awareness of the diversity of Romani women’s perspectives and personal experiences.
THE NEED FOR DISAGGREGATED DATA
While there are encouraging efforts at European policy level on emphasizing the needs and concerns of Romani women2, Romani women pointed out that advocacy and policy efforts on Romani women and girls are hindered in the absence of reliable data on their socio-economic situation. There is a dire need for accurate data disaggregated by ethnicity, gender and age to allow for a greater understanding of the issues affecting Romani women and girls and enable targeted interventions. This might require explicit recognition by certain governments of the existence of Roma as an ethnic group on their territory. The reason for data collection, the process and the way that the information collected will be used should be fully transparent. Using equal opportunity and non-discrimination indicators is essential to develop, monitor and regularly review effective and targeted programmes to improve the situation of Romani women and tackle discrimination against them.
 Recommendations to national and local authorities They should:
2The 2011 EU Council Conclusions on the EU Framework for National Roma Integration Strategies underline that “Special attention should be paid to the interests and difficulties of Romani women and girls, who face the risk of multiple discrimination, and thus a gender perspective needs to be applied in all policies and actions for advancing Roma inclusion...”
 13

 In order to have appropriate planning, designing, implementation and monitoring of specific integration and inclusion policies and programmes for Roma, especially Romani women and girls, governments should undertake data-gathering exercises that are designed and implemented in consultation with Romani women;
 Disaggregated data collection should serve to assess the prevailing situation; assess the resources that are available and to examine actual access to and use of such resources; and conduct outcomes and impact assessments;
 Data collection should be conducted in an ethnically sensitive manner and on a voluntary basis, with full respect for the privacy and anonymity of the individuals concerned, in accordance with international standards of personal data protection. The creation of national status reports or white papers on the status of Romani women and girls should be also considered.
Follow-up to the Helsinki Conference
The Turkish Romani woman participant at the Helsinki Conference expressed the wish that the Turkish government could host the 5th International Romani Women’s Conference. As the result, the Council of Europe is planning to organize, together with the newly created Phenjalipe informal network of Romani women, a brainstorming meeting in March 2014 with the Turkish authorities with the view to discussing the possibility for Turkey to host the 5th International Conference of Romani women in Istanbul in 2015.
By the time of approval of this report by the conference participants and Phenjalipe members (March 2013), a number of additional follow-up activities have taken place, some of them have been facilitated by the Council of Europe with the financial support of the Finnish Government.
On 4 October 2013, Phenjalipe attended its first public event at the ROMACT and ROMED2 launching event in Hungary, attended by 100 national and international stakeholders.
On 8 November 2013, Phenjalipe organised a side event on “Mainstreaming Romani women’s priorities” at the Supplementary Human Dimension Meeting of the OSCE-ODIHR on the occasion of the 10th anniversary of the OSCE Action Plan on Roma and Sinti.
On 26-27 November 2013, the Council of European under its ROMED2 programme with the European Union organised in Lisbon together with a group of Romani women the first Romani women’s encounter in Portugal.
On 17 February 2014 an expert meeting of Romani women was held in the Council of Europe to further revise the outcome document of the Helsinki Conference, the Strategy of the Advancement of Romani Women and Girls 2014-2010 and to develop a bi-annual Action Plan (2014-2016) for the realisation of the strategy objectives. As a result a Working Group of Romani Women was established for the implementation of the Strategy.This meeting was followed by a meeting on “Mainstreaming gender in Council of Europe/European Union programmes ROMACT and ROMED2” on 18 February 2014.
On 24 February 2014, the Council of Europe organised jointly with the United Nations Human Rights Office of the High Commissioner in the Republic of Moldova, the UN WOMEN, the OSCE Contact Point for Roma and Sinti Issues and the Moldovan Roma NGO Tarnă Rom, a Roundtable on “Romani women’s political participation at national and local level” in Chişinău. The Lithuanian CAHROM member attended this meeting as an observer.
14

Lithuania has indeed proposed to set-up a CAHROM thematic group on Romani women’s empowerment and gender dimension of Roma inclusion policies and to be the requesting country for a CAHROM thematic visit of experts in Vilnius on 4-6 June 2014. Finland and Spain might be among the partner countries of this thematic group.
On the occasion of the International Women’s Day (12 March 2014), Phenjalipe, the European Roma and Travellers Forum (ERTF) and the Council of Europe under its Dosta! campaign, will be holding a meeting on the status of Romani women in Strasbourg. The aims of the meeting are to raise awareness on the ongoing obstacles and challenges of Romani women in their daily lives, take stock of positive developments at policy and community level and to encourage Council of Europe action for the advancement of the status of Romani women and girls. The meeting will discuss the situation of Romani women in Council of Europe member states and will address specific issues such as the overrepresentation of Romani women and girls among victims of trafficking, early marriages, representation of Romani women in elected bodies and public administration as well as the role of Romani women as transformers of their life and the lives of their families.
The conclusions of the Helsinki conference, the Strategy on the advancement of Romani women and girls in Europe 2014-2020 and the bi-annual Action Plan for the implementation of this Strategy in 2014-2016 will be presented and discussed at the 7th CAHROM meeting to be held in Strasbourg on 14-16 May 2014.
15

 
 DIRECTORATE GENERAL FOR INTERNAL POLICIES
POLICY DEPARTMENT C: CITIZENS' RIGHTS AND CONSTITUTIONAL AFFAIRS
GENDER EQUALITY
Empowerment of Roma Women within the European Framework of National Roma Inclusion Strategies
STUDY
Abstract
This study focuses on the concept of empowerment of Romani women to analyse the existing living conditions of Romani women, interpret the national Roma inclusion strategy and to scrutinise good practices. The analysis shows that the present living conditions of Romani women in European Member States call for intervention. Romani women’s empowerment and gender mainstreaming approaches have to be fostered in National Roma Inclusion Strategies.
PE 493.019 EN
    
This document was requested by the European Parliament's Committee on Women’s Rights and Gender Equality.
AUTHOR(S)
Mr Niall Crowley
Ms Angela Genova Ms Silvia Sansonetti
RESPONSIBLE ADMINISTRATOR
Ms Erika Schulze
Policy Department C ­ Citizens' Rights and Constitutional Affairs European Parliament
B­1047 Brussels
E­mail: erika.schulze@europarl.europa.eu
EDITORIAL ASSISTANCE
Ms Marcia Maguire, Ms Kerstin Rothbart
Policy Department C ­ Citizens' Rights and Constitutional Affairs
LINGUISTIC VERSIONS
Original: EN
ABOUT THE EDITOR
To contact the Policy Department or to subscribe to its newsletter please write to:
poldep­citizens@europarl.europa.eu
European Parliament, manuscript completed in September 2013. © European Union, Brussels, 2013.
This document is available on the Internet at:
http://www.europarl.europa.eu/studies
DISCLAIMER
The opinions expressed in this document are the sole responsibility of the author and do not necessarily represent the official position of the European Parliament.
Reproduction and translation for non­commercial purposes are authorized, provided the source is acknowledged and the publisher is given prior notice and sent a copy.
   
Empowerment of Roma Women within the European Framework of National Roma Inclusion Strategies
____________________________________________________________________________________________
CONTENTS
LIST OF ABBREVIATIONS 6 LIST OF TABLES 7 EXECUTIVE SUMMARY 8
Recommendations for National Governments 12 Recommendations to the European Parliament 12 Recommendations for the European Commission 13 Recommendations for the European Council 13
1. THE EUROPEAN UNION STRATEGY AND THE ROMA 15
1.1. Background 15
1.1.1. Definition of Roma 15
1.1.2. Data and differences among communites 15
1.1.3. Discrimination of the Roma and Romani women 15
1.1.4. Legal status of the Roma across EU Member States 16
1.2. EU Institutions and the Roma 17
1.2.1. The European Parliament for the Roma and Romani women empowerment 17
1.2.2. Romani women empowerment in the EU Framework 19
1.2.3. National Roma Integration Strategies 20
1.2.4. Other activities on the European level addressing Romani women and their living conditions 21
2. THE SITUATION OF ROMA WOMEN IN MEMBER STATES 23
2.1. Discrimination of women within the Roma communities 23
2.1.1. Gender inequality 23
2.1.2. Control of women’s body 23
2.1.3. Women’s subordination to the family 24
2.1.4. Intimate partnership violence 25
2.1.5. Trafficking and sexual exploitation 25
2.2. Education 25
2.2.1. Direct and indirect discrimination by the main society 25
2.2.2. Discrimination within the Roma community 25
2.3. Employment 26
2.3.1. Access to employment and working conditions 26
2.3.2. Internal community discrimination 26
2.4. Physical and mental health 26
2.4.1. Reproductive health 27
2.4.2. Forced sterilisations 27
2.5. Accessing housing 27
2.5.1. Women are particularly victims of this situation 28
3

Policy Department C: Citizens' Rights and Constitutional Affairs
____________________________________________________________________________________________
3. THE EMPOWERMENT OF ROMA WOMEN PIVOTAL FOR THE INCLUSION OF THE ROMA IN MEMBER STATES: NATIONAL STRATEGIES 29
3.1. Romani women empowerment as community empowerment 29
3.1.1. The definition of empowerment 29
3.1.2. Theoretical background 30
3.1.3. Developing empowerment 31
3.1.4. Measuring women’s empowerment and challenges 32
3.2. The importance of empowerment of Roma women in the national Roma
strategies 32
3.2.1. The analysis 32
3.2.2. Results 33
3.2.3. Romani women’s empowerment in the NRIS 38
3.2.4. Empowerment as processor or as an outcome of measures 39
3.2.5. Gender equality and discrimination 42
3.2.6. Gender differnces in education 42
3.2.7. Gender differences in employment 43
3.2.8. Gender differences in health 43
3.3. Roma women in the CSWDs on the Country Strategies for the Inclusion of the Roma in Member States 44
3.3.1. The analysis of NRIS in the CSWDs 44 3.3.2. Roma women empowerment in the CSWDs 45
4. STAKEHOLDERS MAPPING AT NATIONAL LEVEL 51
5. GOOD PRACTICES IN ROMA WOMEN’S EMPOWERMENT 52 5.1. Introduction 52
5.2. Assessing the Good Practices: the EIGE framework applied in the context of Roma women empowerment 52
5.2.1. Introduction 52
5.2.2. Study­tailored assessment criteria 53 5.3. The assessment criteria: from theory to practice 54
5.3.1. It works well 54
5.3.2. Transferability 55
5.3.3. Learning potential 55
5.3.4. The assessment criteria grid 55
5.4. The good practices for Romani women’s empowerment 55
5.4.1. Good practice for empowerment in education 55
5.4.2. The good practice for empowerment in employment job quality and good working conditions 56
5.4.3. The good practice for empowerment in health 57
5.4.4. The good practice for empowerment in housing 58
5.4.5. Good practice for Romani women’s political empowerment 58
4

Empowerment of Roma Women within the European Framework of National Roma Inclusion Strategies
____________________________________________________________________________________________
6. CONCLUSIONS
6.1. Background
6.2. Innovative approach: empowerment
6.3. Empowerment: a complex process and an outcome
6.4. Romani women’s empowerment in the NRISs
59
59 59 59 59
6.5. Preconditions of empowerment of Romani women: health policies as a negative example 59
6.6. Housing policies have a high potential of indirect positive effects (mainstreaming empowerment) 60
6.7. Gender mainstreaming of the NRISs: good practices 60
6.8. The role of public authorities 60
7. RECOMMENDATIONS 61
7.1. Recommendations for National Governments 61 7.2. Recommendations to the European Parliament 61 7.3. Recommendations for the European Commission 62 7.4. Recommendations for the European Council 62
REFERENCES 64 ANNEX A: STAKEHOLDERS MAPPING AT EU 27 MEMBER STATES’ LEVEL 76 ANNEX B: ASSESSMENT CRITERIA GRID 81 ANNEX C: GOOD PRACTICES ASSESSMENT FICHES 82
5

Policy Department C: Citizens' Rights and Constitutional Affairs
____________________________________________________________________________________________
LIST OF ABBREVIATIONS
CSOs Civil Society Organisations
CSWD Commission Staff Working document
EC European Commision
EP European Parliament ESF European Social Fund
EU European Union
GII Gender Inequality Index
NCP National Contact Point
NGOs Non­Governmental Organisations
NRIS National Roma Inclusion Strategy
UNDP United Nations Development Programme
6

Empowerment of Roma Women within the European Framework of National Roma Inclusion Strategies
____________________________________________________________________________________________
LIST OF TABLES
Table 1: 34
Gender and empowerment in the NRISs
Table 2: 46
Gender and empowerment in the NRISs according to the CSWDs
Table 3:
Judgement criteria
54
7

Policy Department C: Citizens' Rights and Constitutional Affairs
____________________________________________________________________________________________
EXECUTIVE SUMMARY Background
In the EU there are about 6 million Roma who differ in terms of languages, social, cultural and religious attitudes, model of settlement and legal status. Discrimination traps Romani communities in a vicious circle of poverty (more than 90% of Romani people in Europe live in poverty) and social exclusion. Prejudices and negative stereotypes on Roma are deeply rooted in Europe. The situation is even worse for women who suffer from severe forms of discrimination also within their own communities.
The attention of the European Union institutions regarding Romani’s conditions has been materialized in many concrete actions, among them the most recent and relevant steps taken are the adoption of the “Ten principles for Roma inclusion” on April 2009 (annexed to the Council conclusions of June 2009, that include also a special attention to the gender issue), and the adoption of the EU Strategy for Roma Inclusion approved by the Parliament on March 2011 and adoptd by the European Council on June 2011. More recently the European Commission has taken one furthers step proposing a “Council recommendation on effective Roma Integration measures in Member States”.
Aim
This report presents the results of the analysis on the empowerment of Romani women in EU Member States, as outlined by the National Roma Inclusion Strategies, within the framework of European Roma inclusion strategies. It aims to provide background information to the Women’s Rights and Gender Equality Committee (FEMM) of the European Parliament.
The report’s main objectives are:
 To provide a knowledge of Romani women’s conditions in EU member states based on the most recent data;
 To discuss the attention that the 28 National strategies for Roma inclusion pay to the needs of Romani women and the measures to their empowerment;
 To present selected good practices concerning Romani women’s empowerment in relation to the four key fields of intervention of the strategy for Roma inclusion identified by the European institutions: education, employment, health, and housing.
Methodology
The study applies an integrated methodological approach:
 Analysis of Roma women’s conditions is based on secondary data collected through the UNDP/WB/EC survey that was conducted in May­July 2011 on a random sample of Roma and non­Roma households living in areas with higher density (or
concentration) of Roma populations in the country1.
 Literature review concerning Roma women conditions in EU Member States.
1
 The other EU Member States involved in the survey were Bulgaria, Czech Republic, Hungary, Romania, Slovakia, and the non­EU Member States of Albania, Bosnia and Herzegovina, Croatia, FYR of Macedonia, Montenegro, Republic of Moldova and Serbia. In each of the countries, approximately 750 Roma households and approximately 350 non­Roma households living in proximity were interviewed.
8

Empowerment of Roma Women within the European Framework of National Roma Inclusion Strategies
____________________________________________________________________________________________
 Analysis of the 28 national strategies for Roma inclusion focusing on Roma women’s conditions and policies to empower them.
 Analysis and evaluation of good practices implemented in the EU Member States related to the four main areas of interest of the strategy: education, employment, health, housing.
Key Findings
A. Main Conclusions
1.
Romani women’s conditions in the EU Member States
 Discrimination traps Romani communities in a vicious circle of poverty (more than 90% of Romani people in Europe live in poverty) and social exclusion. Among Roma illiteracy is widespread; and children have poor school attendance. The situation is even worse for women who suffer from severe forms of discrimination also within their own communities, with Romani girls being often at higher disadvantage compared to Romani boys.
 Roma legal status
A considerable part of the Romani population in the European Member States does not have any legal status. This is a fundamental issue, as it strongly influences the rights to social security, to healthcare and to education, as well as the standards of living and possibilities to participate in public and political life of both Romani women and men. For stateless persons, this conditions increase their risk of being discriminated.
 EU institutions and Romani women’s protection
The legal framework for EU action against discrimination of the Romani communities is based on the constitutive documents and in the inspiring principles of the European Union. The European Parliament has adopted some resolutions to improve living conditions of Romani people in the EU.
 The EU Strategy on Roma Inclusion
Regarding the situation of Romani women, the strategy is to address and define the following objectives (among others): preventing human rights abuses and protecting victims with particular attention to the situation of Roma children and women; reducing health inequalities with special emphasis on the protection of vulnerable groups including women; ensuring gender equality mainstreaming by addressing the specific needs of Romani women while involving them in the development of policies; and by explicitly asking to stop the practice of child marriages’.
9

Policy Department C: Citizens' Rights and Constitutional Affairs
____________________________________________________________________________________________
 EU institutions and empowerment of Roma
The resolution on the EU Strategy on Roma Inclusion (March 2011) stresses the relevance of empowerment, albeit in a gender neutral way (gender is not explicitely mentioned with regard to empowerment).
 Staff Working Documents and steps forward
“The National Roma Integration Strategies: a first step in the implementation of the EU Framework”2 presents the collection of the Staff Working Documents analysing the National Roma Inclusion Strategies. The “Steps forward in implementing National Roma Integration Strategies”3 was instrumental in rethinking and developing national strategies in concrete terms, in particular by seeking to organise horizontal and vertical dialogue as well as coordination for the implementation of their strategies.
 Women discrimination of the Roma communities
Due to patriarchal traditions, Romani women and girls still do not enjoy full respect for their freedom of choice in matters concerning the most fundamental decisions of their lives, and they still face significant levels of discrimination and difficulties in all areas of life. Romani women/girls are still highly undervalued in their communities regardless of which group/subgroup they belong to.
Having a subordinate role in the families, a large number of Romani women suffer physical or sexual violence and a great number of them are victims of domestic violence, in many cases over long periods of time. Domestic violence takes various forms and modalities, and living in the extended families makes it more difficult to a woman­victim, as her freedom of movement is often limited. She is watched by family members, especially in critical situations, in order to prevent her from escaping from the abusive husband.
 Romani women’s educational level
Romani women’s educational level is lower than those of Romani men and than that of non-Romani women. This is due to direct and indirect discrimination by the main society as well as to early marriage and motherhood.
 Romani women’s employment
Romani women’s low employment rate is related to their low education, high
family care responsibility and discrimination in accessing the labour market.
 Romani women’s health
Romani women’s socio economic conditions represent the strongest and most consisted predictors of poor health. Besides, Romani women face discrimination and inequalities in accessing health services. Romani women have been victim of forced sterilization in recent years in some EU countries.
2 European Commission (21 May 2012 a).
3
 European Commission (26 June 2012).
10

Empowerment of Roma Women within the European Framework of National Roma Inclusion Strategies
____________________________________________________________________________________________
2.
 Romani women’s housing conditions
Segregation and sub-standard, poor and extremely precarious living conditions characterise Roma housing. This condition affects Romani women’s opportunity for social and labour inclusion more than men, because of the family care responsibilities they have and difficulties to accept job not close to the house.
A new approach: Romani women’s empowerment
 In the patriarchal Roma system, Romani women experience oppression as men make the rules by which women have to live. Empowering women’s means giving them the capacity to define their own choices in life and to pursue their own goals.
 Romani women’s empowerment is a new approach to improving Romani women’s living conditions. It requires long term and high commitment, involving both top-down (state) and bottom up (CSO) strategies. Romani women’s empowerment addresses three different dimensions: personal, relational, and collective.
Romani women empowerment in NRIS
 Romani women’s empowerment is explicitly mentioned in 6 NRISs out of 28:
Croatia, Germany, Greece, Italy, Portugal, Slovakia, and Sweden.
 Empowering as the outcome of given process is mentioned in 20 out of 28
NRISs.
 Gender equality is mentioned in the general approach of most of the NRIS
concerning equal treatment but in few NRIS gender mainstreaming is applied.
 In the European Commission (EC) Staff working document, Romani women’s empowerment has never been explicitly mentioned, neither in the key elements nor in the identified gaps.
Good practices in Romani women’s empowerment.
3.
4.
Good practices have been found concerning Romani Women’s Empowerment in the EU Member States:
a. Education: “Empowering Romani parents to support upbringing and education of their children’;
b. Employment: ‘Empowering Romani people as beneficiaries of initiatives for labour market integration through participation in the design of active labour market measures, their implementation, monitoring, and evaluation’;
c. Health: ‘Empow-air: Empowering women against intimate partnership violence in Roma communities’.
d. ‘MentorprogramforfutureRomaniandmigrantwomenpoliticians’.
11

Policy Department C: Citizens' Rights and Constitutional Affairs
____________________________________________________________________________________________
B. Recommendations
In order to promote Romani women’s empowerment, an integrated approach that involves different levels of governance is recommended.
Recommendations for National Governments
1. Assume an evidence-based policy approach, grounded on the analysis of
gender disaggregated data concerning outputs and outcomes of policy.
2. Make the actual policy participatory approach operational by involving all stakeholders throughout the policy­making process. Romani women have to be involved in the analysis of their needs, in planning policy and related services, implementing actions, in monitoring and evaluating the outputs and the outcome of the services and of the policies. The active participation of Romani women’s CSOs at local, national, and European level, as well as of gender equality bodies and women’s rights organizations, is indispensable.
Specifically with regard to the five key policy areas:
3. Promote Romani women’s political participation by introducing Romani
women’s quotas at all governmental levels.
4. Housing policy: improve housing conditions and desegregation of Roma
communities by means of supporting active participation of Romani women’s CSOs;
5. Employment policy: enhance access to the labour market with measures countering Romani women’s horizontal (glass box) and vertical (glass ceiling) segregation;
6. Education policy: guarantee access to high quality educational programs for Romani women and girls;
7. Health policy: Support active participation of Romani women’s CSOs in the drawing­up, implementation and evaluation of health policy concerning Romani women;
Recommendations to the European Parliament The European Parliament should:
1. Promote the adoption of an integrated - gender mainstreamed - evidence- based – participatory policy approach in the National Roma Inclusion Strategy focused on Romani women’s human rights.
2. Raise the conditions of Romani women in discussions with national parliaments so that Member States are encouraged to include their empowerment as a key element in the national strategies to improve the overall condition of all Roma communities;
3. Call upon the Commission to observe that Romani women’s rights are reflected as a crucial dimension in the national strategies and that gender mainstreaming as a tool supports the reduction of gender inequality and discrimination against Romani women within the Roma communities and in the society.
12

Empowerment of Roma Women within the European Framework of National Roma Inclusion Strategies
____________________________________________________________________________________________
4. Cooperate with the Council and the Commission to develop more assertive and binding tools to promote Roma inclusion in EU Member States, for example by including appropriate objectives in the European Semester process as the situation of Roma minorities influences the economic and social performance of Member States.
Recommendations for the European Commission
1. Implement an integrated - gender mainstreamed - life course – evidence- based – participatory policy approach focused on Romani women’s human rights in the National Roma Inclusion strategies with in particular:
a. Specific attention to the interrelation between the four key areas (education, employment, health, housing) with a special attention on housing as starting point because of the influence that housing conditions and segregation have on education, employment and health. Moreover, integration implies also a strong relationship to gender equality policies.
b. Specific attention in policy making to the life-course of Romani women as their needs are different according to their age and because previous life experiences affect all the subsequent living conditions. The empowering approach has to address Romani women’s needs in different moments of their lives, through their young, adult, and older age.
2. Request Roma inclusion in EU Member States in a more sensitive and assertive way.
3. Foster specific tools targeted at Romani women’s empowerment in the National Strategies for Roma Inclusion.
4. Foster gender equality as a key objective to contrast the discrimination Romani women experience within their communities and as a part of the Romani women’s empowerment strategy in the National Strategies for Roma Inclusion.
5. Define a clear step by step EU Roma inclusion process, linking each local and national initiative to the fulfilment of EU community goals, and establish a clear definition of the procedures concerning the involvement of stakeholders; draw up objectives, implementation processes, monitoring, evaluation, and impact assessments and allocate resources through the EU budget.
6. Propose measures to eliminate health inequalities for Romani women as a prerequisite for Romani women’s empowerment.
7. Promote mutual learning processes among EU Member States with regard to EU good practices in Romani women’s empowerment.
8. Include specific objectives to tackle trafficking of Romani women in the National Strategy for Roma Inclusion.
Recommendations for the European Council
1. Invite Member States to adopt a policy approach focused on Romani women’s human rights and empowerment within the framework of the National Roma Inclusion Strategy by reminding that all the 10 Common Basic Principles on Roma Inclusion should be equally taken into consideration when designing, implementing and evaluating policies aimed at promoting Roma inclusion. More particularly, Member States should be invited to consider the following:
13

Policy Department C: Citizens' Rights and Constitutional Affairs
____________________________________________________________________________________________
“awareness of the gender dimension”, “involvement of civil society” and “active participation of the Roma”.
2. Encourage better cooperation among Member States in the framework of the open method of coordination for health and social inclusion for the exchange of good practices for Roma inclusion with special attention to Roma women’s empowerment in the four areas of intervention and with the aim of assuming an integrated approach between the different areas.
3. Invite Member States to assume, besides targeted actions, also a mainstreaming approach in the fields of education, employment, housing, and healthcare, towards Romani people and in particular towards Romani women’s empowerment with a view to effectively promote their social inclusion.
14

Empowerment of Roma Women within the European Framework of National Roma Inclusion Strategies
____________________________________________________________________________________________
1. THE EUROPEAN UNION STRATEGY AND THE ROMA
  KEY FINDINGS
 In the EU, 6 million Roma live in communities which differ in terms of languages, social, cultural, and religious attitudes; models of settlement; and legal status.
 Prejudices and negative stereotypes on Roma are deeply rooted in Europe.
 Romani women are exposed to multiple and intersectional discriminations.
 Combating social exclusion, discrimination, and inequality is an explicit commitment of the European Union.
 The European Parliament’s Resolution of March 2011 stresses the relevance of Roma empowerment, albeit in a gender neutral way.
 1.1. Background
1.1.1. Definition of Roma
The Council of Europe4 has introduced a definition of “Roma” which has been commonly adopted also by the European Union institutions5. It refers to Roma, Sinti, Kale and related groups in Europe, including Travellers and the Eastern groups (Dom and Lom); it covers the wide diversity of the groups concerned, including persons who identify themselves as Gypsies.
1.1.2. Data and differences among communites
Roma6 are estimated to be the largest minority group in the European Union (with 6 million people residing in most of the EU countries highly concentrated in Romania, Bulgaria, and Hungary7) and in Europe at large (10/12 million people)8. They live in communities which differ in terms of languages, social, cultural and religious attitudes, models of settlement and legal status. These differences are related to each group’s specific history, migration processes, present and past public policies and to the socio­economic conditions they experience.
1.1.3. Discrimination of the Roma and Romani women
In all the EU Member States, Roma are still exposed to multiple and intersectional discriminations on the basis of many grounds among which ethnicity and language are
4 5
6
7 8
 Council of Europe’s (18 May 2012).
See the definition presented on the European Commission’s webpage on the Roma (mentioned in the list of references): “the term "Roma" here refers to a variety of groups of people who describe themselves as Roma, Gypsies, Travellers, Manouches, Ashkali, Sinti and other titles. The use of the term Roma is in no way intended to downplay the great diversity within the many different Romani groups and related communities, nor is it intended to promote stereotypes.”
“In the Romani language, rom is a masculine noun, meaning "man, husband", the plural is roma. Romani is the feminine adjective, while romano is the masculine adjective. The term Roma is used as a noun for the whole community while Romani as an adjective. At the European Union level, policy­makers have chosen to use the term Roma to encompass different related groups throughout Europe (Roma, Sinti, Manouches, Kalés, Kaalés, Romanichels, Boyash, Ashkalis, Égyptiens, Yéniches, Travellers, Doms, Loms, etc...), nevertheless taking into account cultural diversity and lifestyles. When referring to EU policies the same distinction is kept (European Women’s Lobby Position Paper, 2012:3).
Council of Europe (latest update: 2010).
FRA/UNDP (2012).
15

Policy Department C: Citizens' Rights and Constitutional Affairs
____________________________________________________________________________________________
the pivotal ones9. Discrimination traps Romani communities in a vicious circle of poverty (more than 90% of Romani people in Europe live in poverty) and social exclusion. Among Roma, illiteracy is widespread; children have poor school attendance. The situation is even worse for women who suffer from severe forms of discrimination also within their own communities, with Romani girls being often at higher disadvantage compared to Romani boys10. Roma usually live in segregated, isolated districts where the living conditions are frequently poor, with problems of extreme overcrowding and lack of basic facilities. This contributes also to aggravating Romani people’s health conditions, especially for Romani women and children. Roma tend to under­use healthcare services because of the negative attitudes/racism/discrimination of some healthcare professionals that also affects their use of family planning services.
Prejudice and negative sterotypes
Prejudices and negative stereotypes on Roma are deeply rooted in Europe, and are reinforced by public leaders and opinion bodies using racist or stigmatising rhetoric that has also generated mob violence in recent years (this is the case of Hungary where in recent years Romani people have been the target of threats and intimidation by neo­Nazi groups11). Print and broadcast media tend to report on Roma only in the context of social problems and crime. Moreover, there is a diffuse lack of recognition of Roma history of past suffering, particularly during the Second World War, when for instance in Germany few thousand Roma survived the genocide in Nazi concentration camps12.
1.1.4. Legal status of the Roma across EU Member States
Another relevant issue is the legal status of Romani people. The legal status of the Romani minority differs across Europe from country to country and from group to group: it is related, on the one hand, to the period of migration of the groups, and on the other hand recognition in each country as an ethnic or national minority. Some groups of long­ established migration are citizens of the country where they live, where they are considered national minorities or ethnic minorities and have full citizenship they have freedom of movement within the Union13.
There are countries in which some groups are considered refugees or asylum-seekers and have no residence permit; in other countries they are considered asylum­ seekers/refugees but not in the condition to obtain the official status.
In the last two decades, Roma have migrated from Eastern European countries inside or outside the Union because of armed conflicts, forced migration or poverty conditions. These Roma communities are characterised by a precarious legal status bringing about a condition of limited access to rights and high vulnerability.
Roma are recognised as a national minority in Sweden, Norway, Belgium, Spain, Germany and United Kingdom, and as ethnic minority in Austria, Hungary, Romania, Slovakia and Poland. The lack of identification as ethnic minority affects their full access to the rights deriving from this status in all of the countries, and to specific policy and action against discrimination.
A considerable part of the Romani population in the European Member States does not have any authorized legal status. This is a fundamental issue, as it strongly influences rights to the social security and health system and to education, as well as the standard of
9
 See: Sigona, N. and Trehan, N. (eds) (2009); Griffiths, D., Sigona, N. and Zetter, R. (2005).
10 See section 2.1.3 for further details.
11 See for example: http://www.dw.de/hungarian­roma­flee­homes­fearing­vigilante­attacks/a­15024684
12 (Council of Europe, February 2012).
13 Liégeois J.P. (2007).
16

Empowerment of Roma Women within the European Framework of National Roma Inclusion Strategies
____________________________________________________________________________________________
living and possibilities to participate in public and political life of both Romani women and men. As stateless persons they have a higher risk of being discriminated. The FRA14 report 2012 states (referring to a declaration of the Commissioner for Human Rights) that “tens of thousands of Roma live in Europe without a nationality. Lacking birth certificates, identity cards, passports and other documents, they are often denied basic rights such as education, health care, social assistance and the right to vote, “.
Extreme poverty and marginalisation are the main barriers to access to documents and effective citizenship. An evident and strong commitment of all Member States would be necessary to tackle these structural discriminatory elements.
1.2. EU Institutions and the Roma
Over the last decade, European Union institutions and agencies have put the human rights
situation of Roma on their political agenda, acknowledging that: “Many Roma still face deep
poverty, profound social exclusion, barriers in exercising fundamental rights, and
discrimination, which often means limited access to quality education, jobs and services,
low income levels, sub-standard housing conditions, poor health and lower life expectancy”
15
The legal framework for European Union (EU) action against discrimination towards the Romani communities is based on the constitutive documents and in the inspiring principles of the EU. Combating social exclusion, discrimination, and inequality is an explicit commitment of the EU16. Therefore, the EU can take appropriate action to combat discrimination based on sex, racial or ethnic origin, religion or belief, disability, age or sexual orientation17. Discrimination against the Roma communities is a widespread phenomenon in the EU countries, in breach of the values of respect for human dignity, freedom, equality, human rights, on which the European Union is based18.
1.2.1. The European Parliament for the Roma and Romani women empowerment
European Parliament (EP) activities on the situation of the Roma
The European Parliament has taken action to improve the living conditions of Romani people in the EU. The initiatives of the last decade of the EP concerning the Situation of Romani people are the resolutions on:
 14 FRA/UNDP (2012), pp.:183­184
15 Council of the European Union (24 May 2011).
16 As set out, inter alia, in Article 3 of the Treaty on European Union (2012) as well as Articles 8, 9 and 10 of the
Treaty on the Functioning of the European Union (2012).
17 As stated in Article 19 of the Treaty on the Functioning of the European Union (2012).
18 As it follows from Article 2 of the Treaty on the European Union (2012) and from Article 21 of the Charter of
Fundamental Rights of the European Union (2010).
17

Policy Department C: Citizens' Rights and Constitutional Affairs
____________________________________________________________________________________________
 Roma in the European Union (April, 2005)19;
 The Situation of Romani Women in the European Union (June, 2006)20;
 A European strategy on the Roma (March, 2008)21;
 The Social situation of the Roma and their improved access to the labour market in
the EU (March, 2009)22;
 The Second European Roma Summit (March, 2010)23;
 Social Integration of Women belonging to Ethnic Minority Groups (September,
2010)24;
 The Situation of the Romani people and freedom of movement in Europe
(September, 2010)25;
 The EU Strategy on Roma Inclusion (March, 2011)26.
The March 2011 Resolution presents the:
“EU Strategy on Roma Inclusion as an EU-wide, indicative, inclusive and multilevel action plan, to be prepared and implemented at all political and administrative level building on the fundamental values of equality, access to rights, non-discrimination and gender equality and to be based on the tasks, objectives, principles and instruments defined by the Treaties and the Charter of Fundamental Rights, as referred to above, as well as the relevant EU legislation and is furthermore based on shared competences, as well as the supporting, coordinating and complementary actions of the Union”.
European Parliament for Romani women empowerment
In particular, as regards the situation of Roma women, the Resolution proposes the following objectives (among others):
 “Preventing human rights abuses and protecting victims, ensuring that legal aid and effective legal remedies are provided for them, with particular attention to the situation of Roma children and women, who are often subject to multiple discrimination,
 combating health inequalities by providing equal access to quality health care and health promotion, particularly in order to reduce health inequalities with special emphasis on the protection of vulnerable groups including women, children, the elderly and people with disabilities,
 ensuring gender equality mainstreaming by addressing the specific needs of Roma women while involving them in the development of policies; stopping the practice of child marriages”.
The resolution stresses the relevance of empowerment, even if the statement to this regard is gender neutral:
“empowering Roma civil society, including by means of a capacity-building policy and by strengthening administrative capacity at national, regional and local level as well as encouraging the civil and political participation of Roma people”.
19 European Parliament (8 April 2005).
20 European Parliament (1 June 2006).
21 European Parliament (31 January 2008).
22 European Parliament (11 March 2009).
23 European Parliament (25 March 2010).
24 Available at: http://www.europarl.europa.eu/ sides/getDoc.do?pubRef=­//EP//NONSGML+TA+P7­TA­European
Parliament (7 September 2010­0305+0+DOC+PDF+V0//EN).
25 European Parliament (9 September 2010).
26 European Parliament (9 March 2011).
 18

Empowerment of Roma Women within the European Framework of National Roma Inclusion Strategies
____________________________________________________________________________________________
As a consequence, on 5 April 2011 the European Commission adopted a Communication on a “EU Framework for National Roma Integration Strategies up to 2020” aimed at integrating the objectives of the EU Strategy for Roma Inclusion in the framework of the EU 2020 Strategy. The strategy is analysed in the next section in general and with specific attention to gender and empowerment
1.2.2. Romani women empowerment in the EU Framework
The EU Framework for National Roma Integration Strategies up to 2020 adopted by the European Commission is structured in 9 Sections:
1. Improving the Situation of Roma: a Social and Economic Imperative for the Union and its Member States,
2. A Need for a Targeted Approach: an EU Framework for National Roma Integration Strategies,
3. ExpressingtheEUAmbition:SettingRomaIntegrationGoals,
4. National Roma Integration Strategies: a Clear Policy Commitment from Member
States,
5. Achieving Concrete Results for Roma People, that is divided into two sections:
Making progress under the present programming period (2007­2013) and Beyond,
6. Promoting Roma Integration beyond the EU: the Particular Situation of Enlargement
Countries,
7. Empowering Civil Society: a Stronger Role for the European Platform for Roma
Inclusion,
8. MeasuringProgress:PuttinginPlaceaRobustMonitoringSystem,
9. Conclusion:10YearstoMakeaDifference.
It explicitly recognises gender differences only in relation to the objectives on health:
“This is why Member States should provide access to quality healthcare especially for children and women as well as preventive care and social services at a similar level and under the same conditions to the Roma as to the rest of the population. Where possible, qualified Roma should be involved in healthcare programmes targeting their communities.”
However, the Commission communication refers to the Common Basic Principles on Roma Inclusion27 which comprise the principle of gender equality, although formulated in a way that is insufficiantly binding:
1. “constructive,pragmaticandnon-discriminatorypolicies, 2. explicitbutnotexclusivetargeting,
3. inter-culturalapproach,
4. aimingforthemainstream,
5. awarenessofthegenderdimension, 6. transferofevidence-basedpolicies,
7. useofEUinstruments,
27 They were stated at the first Platform for Roma Inclusion on April 2009 and annexed to the Council conclusions of 8 June 2009. The Platform was launched in April 2009 in Prague and brings together experts from Member States, EU civil servants, the main international organisations, NGOs, representatives of Roma civil society as well as academics and experts in the field. The aim of the Platform is to provide an arena for exchanging knowledge, experience and good practice, for making commitments on specific initiatives and possibly for monitoring progress achieved towards the inclusion of Roma in Europe. For more information see the European Commission website: http://ec.europa.eu/justice/discrimination/roma/roma­platform/meetings_en.htm
In 2009 the European Commission published a handbook on how to implement activities and projects to favour Roma inclusion comprising the 10 Common Basic Principles on Roma Inclusion to promote them among policy makers.
 19

Policy Department C: Citizens' Rights and Constitutional Affairs
____________________________________________________________________________________________
8. involvementofregionalandlocalauthorities, 9. involvementofcivilsociety,
10. active participation of Roma”.
The document devotes an entire section to empowerment (Section 7: Empowering Civil Society: a Stronger Role for the European Platform for Roma Inclusion) which recalls the importance of the European Platform as a forum for debate and concerted actions of all relevant stakeholders at both EU level and Member states’ level. Empowerment is also addressed by the term “civic participation”. The involvement of Roma in decisions that concern them is considered in two sections:
In Section 1 (Improving the Situation of Roma: a Social and Economic Imperative for the Union and its Member States), the identification of Roma’s specific needs regarding equal access to employment, education, housing, and healthcare is indicated as a privileged route to meet the challenges of improving their living conditions.
In Section 3 (Expressing the EU Ambition: setting Roma Integration Goals), active participation of Roma families is considered as key to improve the education level of Romani children with as a minimum target Roma children complete at least primary school.
1.2.3. National Roma Integration Strategies
The Employment, Social Policy, Health and Consumer Affairs Council (EPSCO) unanimously backed the Framework on 19 May 201128. The European Council in its conclusions of 24 June 201129 welcomed the Communication which invited Member States to adopt or develop further a comprehensive approach to Roma inclusion and encouraged
“them to set achievable national goals in the fields of education, employment, healthcare and housing, as well as to put in place monitoring mechanisms and make existing EU funds more accessible for Roma inclusion projects, in accordance with the size and the social and economic situation of the Roma population living in their territories and taking into account the different national circumstances”30.
Since June 2011, the EU Member States have adopted their Roma Integration Strategies or have presented their sets of policy measures within their social integration strategies for improving the situation of Romani women. Every EU country has also indicated the National Contact Point (NCP) for the implementation of the Strategy or the Set of Policy Measures. The EC assessed these strategies and published its conclusions which were adopted on 21 May 201231.
     28 Council of the European Union (19 May 2011).
29 Council of the European Unin (23/24 June 2011)
30 Previous initiatives of the Council have been: the presentation of the Common Basic Principles for Roma
Inclusion (8 June 2009); the Conclusions on Advancing Roma Inclusion (7 June 2010) when the Europe 2020 Strategy was adopted; the adoption of the Fifth report on economic, social and territorial cohesion (21 February 2011).
31 See the References for the availability of National Roma Integration Strategies. For the respective assessments in the Staff working documents see European commission (21 May 2012 b).
20

Empowerment of Roma Women within the European Framework of National Roma Inclusion Strategies
____________________________________________________________________________________________
Financial support through EU’s structural funds
The EU’s cohesion policy complements the broader European policy agenda of non­ discrimination and social inclusion by co-financing a range of projects to support Roma inclusion.32 Many EU policies help to promote Roma inclusion and integration in the European society: The European Social Fund (ESF) which supports the improvement of living and working conditions of Roma, in particular by investing in education and skills development; The European Regional Development Fund (ERDF), the PROGRESS programme (including the 'For Diversity. Against Discrimination' information campaign), funded awareness­raising activities aiming at combating discrimination against Roma and supporting the networking of NGOs representing Roma and defending their rights; other European Commission activities and related funding mechanisms (Lifelong Learning Programme, Youth in Action Programme Culture, Public health Programme).
The overall European policy approach has been widely endorsed by eminent scholars studying the issue, however further actions for improvement have been highlighted33. Likewise, in the context of this study, it became evident that there is still room for strengthening the commitment towards gender equality in the Roma inclusion strategies as the gender equality principles on which the strategies are based have to be considered as not sufficiently binding with negative consequences for women’s empowerment.
1.2.4. Other activities on the European level addressing Romani women and their living conditions
European Parliament
After March 2011, the EP has never again directly addressed the issue of Roma, however the living conditions of Roma women have been taken in due consideration in other resolutions. It is possible to recall the following:
 On the impact of the economic crisis on gender equality and women's rights34;
 On strengthening the fight against racism, xenophobia and hate crime35;
 On women's rights in the Balkan accession countries (May, 2013)36;
 Impact of the crisis on access to care for vulnerable groups (July, 2013)37;
 On social housing in the European Union (June, 2013)38;
 Provisional edition Situation of fundamental rights: standards and practices in
Hungary (July, 2013)39.
European Commisison
The EC, following the requests of the EP resolution ”The EU Strategy on Roma Inclusion (March, 2011)”40 produced a number of documents in which the activities of Member States in relation to Roma living conditions are assessed and shows ways of how to improve the implementation of the strategies.
32 See: ec.europa.eu/regional_policy/activity/roma/index_en.cfm
33 Sigona, N. and Vermeersch, P. (eds) (2012); Sigona, N. and Trehan, N. (2011), Kocze A. and Popa R. L.,
(2009); Kahanec M., Zaiceva A., Zimmermann K. F. (2010); Demirovski, M. (2013).
34 European Parliament (19 February 2013).
35 European Parliament (14 March 2013).
36 European Parliament (4 April 2013).
37 European Parliament (18 June 2013).
38 European Parliament (30 April 2013).
39 European Parliament resolution 3 July 2013.
40 European Parliament (9 March 2011).
 21

Policy Department C: Citizens' Rights and Constitutional Affairs
____________________________________________________________________________________________
 “The National Roma Integration Strategies: a first step in the implementation of the EU Framework”41 presents the collection of the Staff Working Documents analysing the National Roma Inclusion Strategies.
 The “Steps forward in implementing National Roma Integration Strategies (June, 2013)”42 was instrumental in rethinking and developing national strategies in concrete terms, in particular by seeking to organise horizontal and vertical dialogue as well as coordination for the implementation of their strategies.
 To speed up the progress on Roma integration along the four pillars of access to education, employment, healthcare and housing, the Commission presented also a “Proposal for a Council recommendation on effective Roma Integration measures in Member States” (June, 2013)43.
 41 European Commission (21 May 2012 b).
42 Euroepan Commission (26 June 2013).
43 European Commission (26 June 2013).
22

Empowerment of Roma Women within the European Framework of National Roma Inclusion Strategies
____________________________________________________________________________________________
2. THE SITUATION OF ROMA WOMEN IN MEMBER STATES
  KEY FINDINGS
 The Roma patriarchal family model affects Romani women’s access to basic
human rights and exposes them to all forms of violence.
 Romani women’s educational level is lower compared to Romani men as well as
to non­Romani women.
 Direct and indirect discrimination by the main society. On one hand, early marriage and motherhood; on the other hand, affect Romani women’s level of education.
 Romani women’s low employment rate is related to low education, high family care responsibility, as well as discrimination in accessing the labour market.
 Romani women’s socio-economic conditions represent the strongest and most consisted predictors of poor health.
 Romani women have been victim of forced sterilization in some EU countries also in recent years.
 Romani women face discrimination and inequalities in accessing health services.
 Segregation and sub-standard, poor or even extremely precarious living
conditions characterise Roma housing.
 Housing segregation affects Romani women’s opportunity for social and labour inclusion.
 2.1. Discrimination of women within the Roma communities44
2.1.1. Gender inequality
Romani women are subordinated to men within the Roma patriarchal family system. Nonetheless, relations between men and women differ according to groups and nationalities. In most of the Roma communities, young women’s choices are overdependent from family and communities’ rules and interests.
2.1.2. Control of women’s body
In traditional patriarchal communities, young women are barred from public life: they cannot leave their communities without being watched by other family members. Virginity of the girl is very important for the honour of all family members and weddings are celebrated traditionally but in most of the cases not legally. Preservation of chastity is of special importance and in most of the subgroups evidence of preserved virginity are
publicly shown and specially celebrated45. The parents of the girl receive money from the boy’s family. An exploratory qualitative research in Rome, Italy, brought to the light that
44 Data concerning women discrimination withing their own communities are part of the results of the exploratory research run within the project ‘Empow­air, Empowering Women Against Intimate partnership violence in Roma communities’, involving Bulgary, Italy, Spain and Romania.
45 SURT (2012) Empow­air, Empowering Women Against Intimate partnership violence in Roma communities, National Bulgarian country report, p. 9­10
 23

Policy Department C: Citizens' Rights and Constitutional Affairs
____________________________________________________________________________________________
payment for a beautiful, virgin, young woman could reach 80,000 Euro46. Arranged marriage and child marriage are common practice, accepted by Roma women47.
2.1.3. Women’s subordination to the family
An exploratory qualitative research in Bulgaria shows that
«from early childhood a Romani girl is taught that the most important thing is family. Preparation for family life starts at very early age. Before starting to visit school, a Roma girl is supposed to know how to observe personal hygiene, how to maintain a house clean, how to sweep floors (in poor households) or to use a vacuum-cleaner (in richer households), how to do laundry (some subgroups insist male and female clothes to be washed separately), how to clean dust, to wash dishes, to assist in cooking, and to take care of smaller siblings or cousins. The young bride is usually expected to live in her husband’s parents’ house and to accept without objection the order and the power of her mother-in-law and her husband there. It is considered a serious offence by the young wife to disobey to the slightest extent her mother-in-law’s requirements on cooking, cleaning, washing and ironing, on the cares to be performed for the husband and his parents, as well as on the behaviour before other relatives. Any absence from home without permission or other disobedience leads to punishment. The young bride is expected to become pregnant and give birth as soon as possible. Delay of pregnancy may be used as a ground for dissolution of marriage and expulsion of the girl. Young girls are presumed guilty for not becoming pregnant immediately or fast enough. Birth of a child, especially son, increases first the social status of the husband and the girl’s mother-in- law, and just then her own»48.
Community expections towards women
The same research from Bulgaria explored the Community expectations towards women and concluded that
‘the young woman is expected to be a good and caring mother, housewife, wife and daughter-in-law and simultaneously to prove constantly her fertility. Usually this is proved by giving birth to second and third child within short periods of time. In most of the traditional families if the first children are girls, the young spouse can be required to give births until a son is born. The woman may be chased out of the family if she continues to give births to girls. Abortion is another evidence of female fertility and male potency and therefore in many traditional communities and families women are required to use no contraceptives. In 2009, young Roma women from Samokov with adequate education explained that neither their husbands, nor their mothers-in- law would allow the use of contraceptives due to “prestige” considerations. The good wife is expected to demonstrate her love for her husband and to be ready to “pay for his pleasure with her blood and pain”. In addition, complaints in the pub before friends that he needs once again money for abortion allow the man to demonstrate indirectly “how strong his semen is”, i.e. his sexual potency.’ Roma women are entirely responsible for household, taking care of all husband wishes, raising children and serving parents in law’49.
46 SURT (2012) Empow­air, Empowering Women Against Intimate partnership violence in Roma communities, National Italian country report, Angela Genova­ Fondazione Giacomo Brodolini
47 Amalipe Center for Interethnic Dialogue and Tolerance (2011).
48 SURT (2012) Empow­air, Empowering Women Against Intimate partnership violence in Roma communities,
National Bulgarian country report, p. 9­10.
49 SURT (2012) Empow­air, Empowering Women Against Intimate partnership violence in Roma communities,
National Bulgarian country report.
 24

Empowerment of Roma Women within the European Framework of National Roma Inclusion Strategies
____________________________________________________________________________________________
2.1.4. Intimate partnership violence
Intimate partnership violence is socially accepted as a legal exercise of men’s power. Access to social and protection services for Romani women is very difficult because of the general mistrust between public services and Roma communities and the fear of losing the support of the family and communities50.
2.1.5. Trafficking and sexual exploitation
Particularly low socio­economic conditions and low educational achievements bring about higher vulnerability for young Roma women51, and increase the risk of trafficking and prostitution. Roma are estimated to represent between 50 and 80 % of trafficking victims in Eastern European countries52.
2.2. Education
The survey on the situation of Roma highlights that only 15% of young Roma adults have completed upper secondary general or vocational education53. Gender­ disaggregated data on Eastern European countries show that Romani women’s educational level is lower than those of Romani men and than that of non­Romani­women. In Bulgaria, only 4.23 % of Romani women have completed secondary education, and only 0.24% have completed higher education54. 23% of Romani women have not received any kind of formal education: the share is almost six times as high as the share among women in the general population (4 percent)55. In Albania, almost one third of primary school aged Roma girls have not taken part in education, compared to 19 per cent of boys56.
2.2.1. Direct and indirect discrimination by the main society
Many elements contribute to the low level of education of Romani women: they are victims of direct and indirect discrimination by the mainstream society. Segregation in ‘special schools’ for children with developmental disabilities, or in Roma ghetto schools or in all­ Roma classes, are forms of systematic racial segregation in education that were subjects of proceedings before the European Court of Human Rights57. Moreover, housing conditions affect children’s school attendance because of the difficulties in getting to the school but also because of the threat or actual carrying out of evictions.
2.2.2. Discrimination within the Roma community
With regard to internal discrimination, the patriarchal family system and the highly differentiated gender roles in Roma communities overload women with family responsibility at an early age58. At the age of 16, 50% of Bulgarian Roma with the lowest educational level is in a committed relationship59. Child marriage affects girls’ school attendance, undermining their right to education and limiting their future employment opportunities.
50 SURT (2012) Empow­air, Empowering Women Against Intimate partnership violence in Roma communities, Toolkit.
51 Kocze A. And Popa R.L, (2009).
52 ERRC (March 2011).
53 FRA/UNDP /(2012).
54 Balogh, L. and Kocze, A., (2011).
55 Surdu M. and Surdu L. (2006).
56 UNICEF (2007).
57 In 2007, the European Court of Human Rights ruled that this pattern of segregation violated non­discrimination
protections in the European Convention on Human Rights. See:http://www.soros.org/initiatives/justice/litigation/czechrepublic See also: ‘From Segregation to Inclusion:
Roma Pupils in the United Kingdom. A Pilot Research Project’. November 2011 http://equality.uk.com/Education_files/From%20segregation%20to%20integration_1.pdf
58 Corsi M. et al., (2008) and SURT (2012) Empow­air Comparative research report, 2012.
59 Amalipe Center for Interethnic Dialogue and Tolerance, (2011).
 25

Policy Department C: Citizens' Rights and Constitutional Affairs
____________________________________________________________________________________________
Early school drop-out of Roma girls has been reported throughout Europe, including in Albania, Hungary, Lithuania, Portugal, Romania, Serbia and Kosovo.
Low education increases women’s vulnerability and is one of the main factors behind social exclusion and poverty.
2.3. Employment
2.3.1. Access to employment and working conditions
Many barriers limit the access of Romani women to the formal economy. Discrimination occurs when they are looking for employment. Moreover, the under-education of most Romani women is a structural limit for accessing the labour market. A research carried out in Bulgaria, Czech Republic, Hungary, Romania and Slovakia shows that one in four working Roma declares their working conditions to be less favourable than those of non­Roma doing the same job. Moreover, most of the university­educated Roma have found a job related to their ethnicity, such as community work, or are employed in public services dealing with Roma issues, trapped in a so­called ‘glass box’60. Roma are over-represented in under–qualified employment and in the informal economy61.
Moreover, indirect discrimination against Roma can find its way in the administrative and legal architecture of a country: for instance, the French regulative system for accessing employment uses exeptions in the application of the right to free movement of workers to limit job opportunities for migrating population from Bulgaria and Romania, mostly affecting Roma people62.
Typical Roma settlements, located in the marginalised outskirts of urban spaces or in economically deprived county areas, hamper the access to the labour market. Furthermore the lack of regular identification documents or proof of a permanent residence makes it very difficult or even impossible for them to access any job or social services.
2.3.2. Internal community discrimination
In addition to these external structural and cultural barriers, Roma women have to deal with that strongly limits their opportunities for paid employment outside of their community as well as for economic independence. In the patriarchal family system women are accountable for house and family care, even if Roma women frequently take part in small family-run economic activities such as working in markets, rural trade and seasonal agricultural work. Women’s low educational level precludes them any occupation in production or services. Roma women’s integration into the labour market was aggravated by the socio­economic transformations which took place in the 1990s in former Eastern European countries63.
Women’s family responsibilities and the lack of adequate public services to support childcare strongly affect women’s participation to the labour market.
2.4. Physical and mental health
Romani women’s socio-economic conditions represent the strongest and most consistent predictors of poor health. Pervasive poverty, geographic isolation, direct discrimination by healthcare providers, direct and indirect discrimination in governmental
60 ERRC, The glass box: exclusion of Roma from employment, Budapest,February 2007, p. 44.
61 Council of Europe, February 2012: p. 163.
62 Council of Europe (20 November 2008).
63 Council of Europe, February 2012.
 26

Empowerment of Roma Women within the European Framework of National Roma Inclusion Strategies
____________________________________________________________________________________________
policies, lack of citizenship and personal documents, communication barriers between Roma and healthcare providers represent the main barriers to equal access to health care64. On the other hand, in most Roma communities, women’s health and maternity choices are often managed at family and community level.
Data show higher rates of poor health and mortality among Roma than in society at large65.
Life expectancy of the Roma population in Eastern Europe is about 10 years less
than that of the overall population. In Slovakia, life expectancy of Romani women is 17 years lower than that of the majority population66. 51% of Roma women aged 16­50 living in settlements near Belgrade, Serbia, were found to be undernourished. Almost all women in Roma settlements around Belgrade smoke tobacco, many beginning at the age of 11 or 1267. In the survey68 on the status of Romani women in Romania, the percentage of Romani women evaluating their health as poor was higher compared to non­Romani women.
2.4.1. Reproductive health
Most Romani women from the sample (88%) are aware of contraceptive methods, but almost one third (36%) say they have never used any. In the sample, abortion is the main contraceptive method for 78% of Romani women. 71% of Romani women taking part in the survey have declared experiences of ethnic discrimination from medical staff.
Of particular importance is the status and care of pregnant and parturient Roma women. In Bulgaria and Hungary, as well as in other EU countries, pregnant Roma women are segregated from others in hospital wards with lower frequency in staff visits69.
2.4.2. Forced sterilisations
In 2007 and 2008, cases of forced sterilisations were reported. Presently, two trials regarding coercive/forcible sterilisation brought by Romani women are pending before the European Court of Human Rights against the Czech Republic70. In 2011, a similar case for Slovakia was judged by the European Court of Human Rights71. Between 1971 and 1991 in Czechoslovakia, now Czech Republic and Slovakia, the “reduction of the Roma population” through surgical sterilization, performed without the knowledge of the women themselves, was a widespread governmental practice. The sterilization would be performed on Romani women without their knowledge during Caesarean sections or abortions72.
2.5. Accessing housing
Residential segregation
Discrimination takes place when Roma try to access adequate housing, as well as in housing policy and practice. Residential segregation of Roma is evident in Bulgaria,
64 EUMC (2003) and Genova A. (2011).
65 Ringold D, Orenstein MA, and Wilkens E. (2003).
66 European monitoring centre on racism and xenophobia (2003).
67 OSI (2007).
68 Open Society Foundation (2006).
69 ECRI (2003).
70 European Women Lobby ­ references in Hungarian background report.
71 On November 8, 2011, the European Court of Human Rights issued its first judgment dealing with sterilization.
The court unanimously found that a Slovak woman of Roma ethnic origin had been the victim of coerced sterilization in violation of Article 3 (prohibition of inhuman or degrading treatment) and Article 8 (right to respect for private and family life) of the European Convention on Human Rights.
72 For more information see: http://romediafoundation.wordpress.com/2013/02/07/forced­sterilization­of­ romani­women­a­persisting­human­rights­violation/
 27

Policy Department C: Citizens' Rights and Constitutional Affairs
____________________________________________________________________________________________
Cyprus, the Czech Republic, France, Greece, Hungary, Italy, Lithuania, Poland, Portugal, Romania, Slovakia, Slovenia and Spain73. Segregation is accompanied by sub­standard, poor or even extremely precarious living conditions for the Roma who are often without access to electricity, garbage removal services, sewerage or water74. Forced evictions of Roma have taken place in many EU countries, and the absence of adequate public policies and services have worsened the living conditions of many Roma families.
2.5.1. Women are particularly victims of this situation
Substandard housing conditions affect the health status of all the members of family but in particular of women, children and the elderly. Roma women are the main caregivers of the family; therefore they spend most of their life in the house. Improvements in the location of Roma settlements may increase opportunities for social inclusion and reduce barriers in accessing public services and the labour market.
 73 FRA (2010).
74 FRA, 2012 p. 144
28

Empowerment of Roma Women within the European Framework of National Roma Inclusion Strategies
____________________________________________________________________________________________
3.THE EMPOWERMENT OF ROMA WOMEN PIVOTAL FOR THE INCLUSION OF THE ROMA IN MEMBER STATES: NATIONAL STRATEGIES
  KEY FINDINGS
 In the patriarchal Roma system, Romani women experience oppression (“power
over”) as men make the rules by which women have to live.
 Empowering women means giving them the capacity to define their own choices in life and to pursue their own goals. It also means generating change in the whole society and not only in the female population.
 Romani women’s empowerment is a new approach to improving Romani women’s living conditions. It requires long term and high commitment, involving both top-down (state) and bottom up (CSO) strategies. Romani women’s empowerment addresses three different dimensions: personal, relational, and collective.
 Romani women’s empowerment is explicitly mentioned in 6 NRISs: Croatia, Germany, Greece, Italy, Portugal, Slovakia, and Sweden.
 Empowerment as a process or outcome is mentioned in 20 out of 28 NRISs.
 Gender equality is mentioned in the general approach of most NRIS in relation
to equal treatment but only in a few cases gender mainstreaming is applied.
 In the 27 European Commission Staff working documents, Romani women’s empowerment is not explicitly mentioned, that is neither in the key elements nor in the identified gaps.
 3.1. Romani women empowerment as community empowerment
3.1.1. The definition of empowerment
The UN Millennium project (2005:p.33) states that ‘the core of empowerment lies in the ability of a woman to control her own destiny’ (Malhotra, Schuler, and Boender 2002; Kabeer 1999). This implies that to be empowered, women must not only have equal capabilities (such as education and health) and equal access to resources and opportunities (such as land and employment) but they must also have the agency to use those rights, capabilities, resources, and opportunities to make strategic choices75 and decisions (such as is provided through leadership opportunities and participation in political institutions). And for them to exercise agency, they must live without the fear of coercion and violence’.
The term ‘empowerment’ is widely used by several range of institutions such as the World Bank and Oxfam but “few of these share common definitions with different focus on process or on outcome, different scope and approach stressing the role of agency versus structure and the role of outsiders in empowerment processes” (Scrutton, Luttrell, 2009, p.27).
75 Strategic choices are those concerning livelihood such as where to live, whether to marry, who to marry,whether to have children, how many children to have, freedom of movement (Kabeer, 2001: 19).
 29

Policy Department C: Citizens' Rights and Constitutional Affairs
____________________________________________________________________________________________
Oppression and “power over”
The feminist approach has enriched the debate on empowerment highlighting that empowerment is not about replacing one form of power with another (Kabeer, 2001a). Four types of power relations have been drawn, stressing the difference between ‘power over’ (the ability to influence and coerce) and ‘power to’ (organise and change existing hierarchies), ‘power from’ (power from collective action) and ‘power within’ (power from individual consciousness) (Rowland 1997).
Women have experience of ‘power over’ in patriarchal systems, under which men make the rules by which women have to live (Townsend et al. 1997: 27). Women’s empowerment considers the power that women acquire to create new possibilities and actions without domination (Rowlands 1997: 13), to have decision-making authority, to solve problems, to be creative and enabling (Oxaal and Baden 1997).
Collective and individual empowerment
Empowering women means giving them the ‘capacity to define their own life-choices and to pursue their own goals’ (Kabeer 2001: 21). Women’s empowerment is the collective empowerment of a group that needs to tackle the same inequalities but at the same time, the power is acquired at the individual level, in terms of self-acceptance, self-respect, and self – esteem (Williams, Seed and Mwau 1994: 233).
Women’s empowerment is a complex process and at the same time an outcome that involves simultaneously three dimensions: ‘Personal: developing a sense of self and individual confidence and capacity, and undoing the effects of internalized oppression. Relational: developing the ability to negotiate and influence the nature of a relationship and decisions made within it. Collective: where individuals work together to achieve a more extensive impact than each could have had alone.’ (Rowlands, 1997: 13).
3.1.2. Theoretical background
Since the 1980s, empowerment has been a crucial aspect in many development organizations which consider ‘empowerment as an emancipation process in which the disadvantaged are empowered to exercise their rights, obtain access to resources and participate actively in the process of shaping society and making decisions’ (Luttrell, C., Quiroz, S., Scrutton, C., & Bird, K. (2009, p. ).
The empowerment approach has been introduced by emergent feminist writings and grassroots organizational experience of Third World women in particular within UNDP initiative DAWN (‘Development Alternatives with Women for a New Era’)76. They brought the attention on the so­called 'false consciousness' claiming that ‘gender-based subordination is deeply ingrained in the consciousness of both men and women and is usually viewed as a natural corollary of the biological differences between them. It is reinforced through religious beliefs, cultural practices, and educational systems (both traditional and modern) that assign women lesser status and power’77. The empowerment approach considers the issues of women’s gender subordination as embedded in a complex socio-political, economic and cultural context.
76 Development Alternatives with Women for a New Era (DAWN) is a network of feminist scholars, researchers and activists from the economic South working for economic and gender justice and sustainable and democratic development. More information are available at: http://www.dawnnet.org/
77 Sen G. and Grown C., (1988):p.26, Development, Crises and Alternative Visions: Third World Women's Perspectives, Hearthscan Publications Ltd..
 30

Empowerment of Roma Women within the European Framework of National Roma Inclusion Strategies
____________________________________________________________________________________________
Three main approaches
To better understand the empowerment approach, it is necessary to briefly outline its main background experiences. In gender and development studies78, empowerment has gradually taken the place of three main approaches: the ‘welfare approach’, the ‘women in development’ (WID) and the ‘gender and development approach’ (GAD). All of them are still well rooted in most of the development policy and therefore have not been totally overcome.The welfare approach mainly considers women for their reproductive role and does not question their traditional roles.
Women in development approach (WID)
The ‘women in development’ approach has promoted equity, and then focused on antipoverty and finally fostered efficiency approaches79 (Tasli, 2007). All of these approaches consider women as passive recipients and not active participants in the process of development (Razavi and Miller, 1995: 6­7).
The “gender and development” approach
The ‘gender and development approach’ (GAD) focuses on 'social relations of gender', seeing women as agents of change and promoting a gender mainstreaming approach in top­down interventions by the state (Razavi, Miller, 1995).
3.1.3. Developing empowerment
Empowerment operates simultaneously across three dimensions:
 “Personal: developing a sense of self and individual confidence and capacity, and undoing the effects of internalized oppression.
 Relational: developing the ability to negotiate and influence the nature of a relationship and decisions made within it.
 Collective: where individuals work together to achieve a more extensive impact than each could have had alone.” (Rowlands, 1997: 13) This dimension includes political structures, cooperative actions, at local or institutional level.
The main instruments
The main instruments to support women’s empowerment are: networking, political mobilization, and awareness-raising. Crucial is the role of public and political institutions as well as CSOs in supporting grouping of women. External support in organizing women empowering groups is important also in providing skills training.
78 Tasli, 2007.
79 ‘The equity approach is the first and the original WID approach. It is also the most critical among the three
WID approaches. The equity approach points out that women and men do not benefit equally from the economic growth. According to the equity approach, economic growth has even negative impacts on women. It therefore advocates the equal distribution of the benefits of economic growth between women and men. More importantly, the equity approach demands not only economic but also political and social equity. However, due to its critical features, the equity approach was soon replaced by the milder anti­poverty approach. This second WID approach is a diluted form of the equity approach. It simply shifts the focus from economic and political equity to poverty reduction for poor women. The anti­poverty was later followed by the efficiency approach. The efficiency approach reflects the concerns of the neoliberal policies. It considers women as an untapped resource for the economy’ (Tasli, 2007, p.2).
 31

Policy Department C: Citizens' Rights and Constitutional Affairs
____________________________________________________________________________________________
Women’s political empowerment
Women’s political empowerment aims to increase the number of women in formal and informal political institutions and includes the reform of political parties, quotas and other forms of affirmative action, training to develop women's political skills, working with women's sections of political parties, development of women's political organizations (Oxaal and Baden, 1997, p.12­13) but also active participation in civil society actions at local and international levels80 (Rowlands, 1997).
Moreover, the empowerment approach aims at generating change in the whole society and not only in the female population: "empowerment of women is a gender issue and not simply a women's issue [...]."Rowlands (1997: 131). Women’s empowerment processes require deep changes in gender relations and therefore they involve specific work both with men and women.
3.1.4. Measuring women’s empowerment and challenges
In 2010 the UNDP81 introduced the Gender Inequality Index (GII) to measure gender disparity on three main dimensions: reproductive health (maternal mortality rate, adolescent fertility rate), empowerment (share of parliamentary seats held by each sex, women’s educational attainment of secondary education and above), and labour market participation (women’s participation in the workforce). These three dimensions are crucial in analyzing improvements in Roma women’s empowerment.
Development policy has shown an increasing attention to the empowerment approach, nonetheless the main risk remains that it ‘became a buzzword (...) used to add glamour (rather than value) to interventions which actually seek to achieve a variety of economic and social outcomes, which, though they may be extremely desirable in themselves, do not necessarily challenge existing patterns of power’ (Sarah Mosedale 2005: 248).
The empowerment approach is a new paradigm to promote better living conditions of women, requiring long term and high commitment, involving top­down (state) and bottom­ up (CSO) strategies.
Education and knowledge play an important role in increasing women’s empowerment (Nikkhah, 2010), nonetheless women’s empowerment entails and fosters new gender relations and some unintended consequences82 have also to be considered (Rocca, 2009).
3.2. The importance of empowerment of Roma women in the national Roma strategies
3.2.1. The analysis
In the European Framework for National Roma Integration Strategies (NRIS), all Member States presented to the European Commission a strategy for Roma inclusion in 2011. The analysis aims to investigate the attention that the NRISs pays to the dimension of Romani women’s empowerment.
 80
81 82 ‘
Batliwala (1994) suggests to substitute the term ‘participation' with 'ownership' to stress the process of active involvement in the decision­making processes.
UNDP 2013
Efforts to help women empower themselves through vocational training, employment opportunities and social groups need to consider the potential unintended consequences for these women, such as an increased risk of domestic violence’ (Rocca, 2009).
32

Empowerment of Roma Women within the European Framework of National Roma Inclusion Strategies
____________________________________________________________________________________________
The analysis covered the 28 NRIS and focused on three main aspects:
1. TheexplicitattentiontoRomaniwomen’sempowerment; 2. Thepresenceofempowermentasageneralapproach;and 3. Thefocusongenderequality.
Romani women’s empowerment is the main aspect to investigate in the NRIS, however the analysis assumes that two variables are affecting it: the presence of an empowerment approach in all the strategy and the attention to gender equality. In the present study, it has been assumed that without an explicit interest in the empowerment approach and in gender equality it would have been difficult to develop an explicit interest for Romani women’s empowerment.
Moreover, the variables were analysed in relation to the key priority areas (education, employment, health, and housing) and in the different phases of the policy­making process.
3.2.2. Results
Results are shown in Table 1.
33

 
 
 
 
Policy Department C: Citizens' Rights and Constitutional Affairs
____________________________________________________________________________________________
3.2.3. Romani women’s empowerment in the NRIS
Romani women’s empowerment is explicitly mentioned in 6 NRISs: Croatia, Germany, Greece, Italy, Portugal, Slovakia, and Sweden.
Croatia’s NRIS stresses the need for a more active participation of Roma, especially of Romani women in all phases of the policy process. It aims at promoting gender equality in public life with a specific focus on political representation, increasing Romani women’s presence in public life at the national, regional, and local levels through the participation of Romani experts, activists, and consultation with Romani population. Objectives and measures in the strategy deal with ‘elements tied to the promotion of the human rights of women and gender equality, equal employment opportunities, gender­sensitive education, equality in decision­making processes in political and public life and elimination of violence against women’ (P.36).
Germany’s NRIS focuses on Romani women’s empowerment presenting a project that was in the planning stage when the strategy was submitted in 2011. The project ‘Social and Economic Empowerment of Roma Women’ (SEERW) aims to ‘support the socio­ economic integration of Roma women into society, inter alia through their acquisition of better qualifications for the labour market. The broadly conceived project also includes opportunities for support in the area of health, including medical advice on reproductive health, the health of children, personal hygiene and nutritional habits.’ (Annex 4, Health, p.3). Empowerment of Roma as well of immigrants is part of the underlying principle of the strategy which specifically mentions the important role of migration advisory services, which control and track the integration process and offer their services within a restricted timeframe of a maximum of three years: ‘Through the provision of professional advice tailored to the individual, which as a rule takes place shortly after their entry into the country, immigrants are empowered to act independently within their new living environment’ (p. 24). The service providers ‘seek to empower the immigrants to act independently within their new living environment and limit their dependency on state welfare benefits to the minimum amount necessary’ (p.25). Romani women’s empowerment is therefore part of the employment objectives.
Greece’s NRIS contains an objective specifically targeted at Romani women: ‘Development of actions to empower Roma women’ and envisaged some actions integrated with other measures (p.23). However, details of the actions are not presented and the relationship with the area of health and social care is not deeply discussed.
Italy’s NRIS specifically claims that it is not only necessary to solve the situation of double discrimination experience by women outside and inside their communities but also that women’s empowerment is ‘instrumental to the improvement of the condition of the person and also of the family structure, as a whole’ (p.21). The approach to Romani women’s empowerment in the present study is developed in relation to anti­ discrimination policies.
Portugal's NRIS considers Romani women’s empowerment in priority 8: ‘Recognising Roma family values in a framework of respect for and dialogue with the fundamental values of Portuguese society’ and claims that ‘remedies will therefore have to be found for the needs of Roma families, in particular by creating conditions which ensure that they acquire the basic competences required to develop autonomy, skills acquisition and the empowerment of women, in favourable family and community contexts’ (p.23). Moreover, in Priority 9, the focus on Romani women’s empowerment is central: ‘Investing in mediation and the formation of women's associations as vehicles for participation by Roma women and a necessary condition for their empowerment’. The Portugese NRIS highlights that ‘greater participation by women in the various spheres of social life fosters development of their self-esteem, autonomy, knowledge of and relationships with institutions, motivation and the skills to perform an occupation,
38

Empowerment of Roma Women within the European Framework of National Roma Inclusion Strategies
____________________________________________________________________________________________
etc., necessary conditions for their empowerment within the Roma community and society, whereby they develop additional skills to those they call upon in their traditional functions.’ (p.23). This statement is followed by some overall objectives that envisage: to train 20 female Roma socio-cultural mediators by 2020; to increase the awareness of gender issues by male and female Roma mediators by 2020; and incentivise the formation of Roma women's associations up to 2020. Investing in mediation and the formation of women's associations is considered a fundamental vehicle for participation by Roma women and a necessary condition for their empowerment (pp. 55­6). Romani women’s empowerment is considered within the areas of employment and equal opportunity policy.
Slovakia’s NRIS states that ‘the status of women in marginalized Roma communities with a traditional model of family organization, where the mother takes care of a large family and the household, low level of education of women and their low economic activity impact significantly not only their quality of lives, but also the quality of lives of their children, thus continuing the cycle of poverty. Empowering women and respecting their human rights (including reproduction rights) and equality constitutes one of the base attributes of human development; therefore, it is necessary to pay special attention to eliminating prejudices and inequality of women within marginalized Roma communities’ (p.44) and identifies the following objective: ‘focus on eliminating multiple discrimination of women and on bridging gender inequality both in private and public lives of marginalized Roma communities; support economic independence of Roma women through education on gender equality in collaboration with NGOs active in the field of gender equality’ (p.44). Romani women’s empowerment is part of the anti­discrimination objective.
Sweden’s NRIS focuses on Romani women’s empowerment in the context of a broader attention to empowerment and participation of Roma to the strategy: ‘the whole implementation of the strategy should be characterised by Roma participation and Roma influence, focusing on enhancing and continuously monitoring Roma access to human rights at the local, regional and national level’ (p.9). Romani women’s empowerment is part of the gender mainstreaming approach developed in the NRIS and it is discussed in relation to gender equality issue. In the rest of the NRISs, Romani women’s empowerment is not explicitly mentioned.
3.2.4. Empowerment as processor or as an outcome of measures
Empowerment as a processor and as an outcome is mentioned in most of the NRISs: 20 out of 28 deal with empowerment. In the analysis of the NRIS we consider as empowerment also the strong emphasis on participation as a part of the empowerment approach.
Austria’s NRIS supports cultural projects ‘to preserve the Roma’s culture and identity therefore also to empower the Roma as a European ‘ethnic group’ (p.29).
Belgium’s NRIS considers empowerment within the main general objectives: ‘Objective 1: to encourage participation and to increase empowerment of the Roma community within society’ (p. 25). Moreover, detailed measures are supported: 1) a Roma & Travellers’ Support Centre that ‘offers personalised support on Roma & Traveller­related issues, in an effort to reinforce the empowerment and integration process through education and training, to social service providers, official bodies, schools and local authorities on the one hand (information, advice, mediation, training, development of links) and to Roma & Travellers on the other (mediation, information, awareness raising, support)’. P.19
Bulgaria’s NRIS mentions empowerment as general framework in the NRIS: ‘Encouraging Roma community to participate actively in the cultural life of the society’. (P.17) and deals with it in defining the ‘mechanisms for implementation of the integration
39

Policy Department C: Citizens' Rights and Constitutional Affairs
____________________________________________________________________________________________
policy: the Government is pursuing a policy of promoting investment in human development and citizen’s active participation in overcoming the existing challenges’ (p.19).
Cyprus’s NRIS introduces empowerment as a general statement in the description of multicultural programme targeted to minority children: ‘creating opportunities for active participation in the decision-making process’ (p.4). Moreover in the section on education is explicitly stated that Roma have been and will continue to be involved in the ‘designing and monitoring relevant policies’ and that ‘close cooperation is encouraged between school personnel and the parents of Roma children in designing actions to address the specific needs of the children’ (p.5).
The Czech Republic’s NRIS considers empowerment as general approach in contrast with passive integration measures: ‘When implementing Roma integration, the Government will give preference to measures targeted at empowering members of Roma communities over measures based on the passive receipt of assistance. The government’s Roma integration policy therefore also entails involving the Roma in its drafting and implementation’ (Principle No 9 of the long­term strategy for Roma integration to 2025, annex).
Denmark’s NRIS, in line with its welfare policy, stresses active inclusion as a goal (p.4), the promotion of active active citizenship and combating discrimination (p.6), being an active citizen (p.8) and active employment policies (p.8).
Finland’s NRIS focuses on Roma political participation: ‘The task of the steering and monitoring group is to coordinate and monitor the implementation of the National Policy on Roma together with different ministries, local authorities, Roma organisations and other significant cooperation partners. The basic principle is that the Roma population, through their organisations, is given the opportunity to influence and participate in the implementation and follow­up of the Policy’ (p.2).
Hungary’s NRIS dedicates one part of the strategy to discuss the involvement of civil organisations and other stakeholders and presents some general statements: ‘the process of social inclusion, by virtue of the meaning of the concept, may only be based on a dialogue with the communities affected by inclusion, including the Roma, and their active participation. This is not just mere consultation but the empowerment of those living in poverty and the Roma community and its members in order to enable them to shape society through the active exercise of equal opportunities ... The promotion of the active participation, empowerment and commitment of the Roma involves fundamental tasks which must also be fulfilled at national, regional and local levels (as well as at EU level) in the course of decision­making, implementation and monitoring. It is desirable to carefully consider in the case of each measure how these fundamental goals may be achieved most effectively. As part of the process, it is particularly important to enhance the role of the Roma civil society and to encourage the civil and political involvement of the Roma through the capacity building of civil organisations, the national, regional and local reinforcement of public administration capacity, the involvement of the Roma in every area of political life and the enhancement of their representation in institutions as well as in the local, national and EU­level elected bodies. An institutionalised dialogue with the representatives of the Roma, too, is a tool which, in addition to reinforcing civil society, also promotes their involvement in and responsibility for policy­making. ... It would be beneficial for the effective targeting of funds, the reduction of administrative burdens and the prevention of the financial collapse of positive initiatives if civil organisations, in particular, Roma civil organisations and minority self­ governments, were involved not only in the implementation of measures and tenders but also in their planning and monitoring as well as in the preparatory phases.’ (p.96­ 97).
40

Empowerment of Roma Women within the European Framework of National Roma Inclusion Strategies
____________________________________________________________________________________________
Latvia’s NRIS does not explicitly mention empowerment but deals with ‘Fostering civic participation. Despite the fact that 12 Roma NGOs were registered in Latvia in 2011, representing the regional interests of the Roma community, the majority of these organisations are not sufficiently active in developing civic participation. Only certain representatives of the Roma community are involved and take part in various state authority consultative mechanisms. The majority of Roma NGOs lack administrative capacity and information in order to apply for project competitions and receive assistance in implementing projects, and they also lack the experience to enable them to implement projects fully according to the criteria that have been laid down. The following challenges have been put forward during the expert meeting and consultations in order to foster civic participation by Roma: 1) To develop cooperation between Roma and non­Roma NGOs, local authorities and state authorities. 2) To ensure the participation of Roma NGO representatives and experts in state authority consultative mechanisms. For example, to ensure representation of the Roma community interests of in the work of consultative board on issues of minority education of the Ministry of Education and Science. 3) To foster Roma NGO capacity building and participation in integration projects. 4) To encourage a discussion on more active inclusion of Roma integration issues in the uptake of the Structural Funds’ (p.7).
Lithuania’s NRIS introduces part of the empowerment concept in the general aim of the Action Plan for Roma Integration that aims ‘at promoting participation of Roma in public life, reducing social exclusion, enhancing consciousness within the Roma community as well as increasing public tolerance’ (p.1).
Poland’s NRIS discusses the limit in the experiences of Roma involvement in project planning and states that ‘increasing the share of the Roma representatives in the process of planning, implementation and evaluation of projects designed by the self­governments and non­Roma non­governmental organisations can be one of the key Programme challenges for the forthcoming years’ (annex 8 evaluation report 2010, p 9 ­ 10).
Slovenia’s NRIS focuses on empowerment in the introduction of the NRIS: ‘encouraging political participation of the Roma in the local community, which undoubtedly contributes to better social and cultural integration of the Roma community in the majority environment in Slovenia’ (p.4). Moreover it promotes ‘active participation of the Roma in activities aimed at improving their living conditions from various aspects (different forms of education in terms of spatial planning, which will enable Roma councillors to play an active role in the process of planning, construction and maintenance of their settlements in compliance with relevant regulations)’ (p.11). The empowerment approach is present in the employment priority area. The NSIR intends to increase the ‘participation of Roma in the drafting of such development programmes’ (p.19); with regard to the health priority area. it points to four specific targets, among which: encouraging participation of the Roma community in addressing health issues by transferring responsibility’ (p.25). Specific attention is dedicated to the political participation of Roma: ‘‘Experience in working with the Roma population indicates that efforts of national authorities and municipalities do not produce good results if Roma are not actively included in these activities. The Roma themselves thus become more and more aware of the fact that without their active participation and better organisation it will be impossible to improve their status. The Government Office for Nationalities has continuously participated in activities aimed at the inclusion of Roma councillors in local self­government and provided funds for training and education programmes for those Roma representatives who participated in elections to municipal councils and were actually elected, and for Roma activists’ (p.35). For this reason, specific trainings are envisaged ‘to enhance the capacity of Roma community representatives to actively participate in local self­managed community councils and enable prominent Roma representatives (representatives of associations and other organisations – Roma activists) to play a more active role in promoting the interests of the Roma population in all areas relevant to the community’ (p.37­38).
41

Policy Department C: Citizens' Rights and Constitutional Affairs
____________________________________________________________________________________________
Spain’s NRIS promotes ‘participation, with special attention to: The intervention of Roma and their bodies of representation in all stages of the political cycle (planning, execution, follow­up and review).­ Strengthening Roma confidence in institutions.­ Comprehensive focus on conceiving social policies and measures with Roma (between administrative levels, various departments and associations, social agents and the Administration)’ (p.32).
United Kingdom’s NRIS states that ‘giving young Gypsies and Travellers a chance to contribute in this way will give them a sense of ownership and empowerment that they seldom have’ (Annex 1: welsh plan. p.42)
3.2.5. Gender equality and discrimination
Romani women are considered as one of the most vulnerable groups in many NRIS. Gender equality in most of the NRIS is mentioned in the general approach concerning equal treatment as in the case of Germany: ‘the principle of equal treatment requires that people are not disadvantaged or favoured on account of their sex, parentage, race, language, homeland and origin, faith, religious or political opinions or a disability with regard to access to education’ (p.30).
Gender as a discrimination ground is considered in most of the NRIS with regard to multiple discrimination that Romani women face. Belgium’s NRIS, for example, states that ‘Roma, particularly Roma women, have to contend with two types of discrimination: not only are they the victims of stereotyping by their own community but they also have to contend with pigeonholing by the society in the country in which they are living. There are a great many obstacles that hamper the social integration of the Roma’ (p. 12)
The gender perspective is also applied in references to women’s rights, often associated with children rights, as in the case of Bulgaria: ‘Operational objective: Guaranteeing citizen rights, with an emphasis on the rights of women and children, protecting public order, prevention and combating any manifestations of intolerance and hate speech. Creating the mindset of recognition of the equality of the Roma women. Encouraging their full individual, social and economic participation in social Life’ (p16).
Denmark in the NRIS explicity mentions gender equality: ‘Gender equality between women and men is an overall objective of Danish policy. Consecutive Danish governments have continuously worked to review and improve the quality of legislation and other legally binding rules to achieve gender equality between women and men. Gender equality is regarded as a prerequisite for economic growth, democracy and welfare, and also as the basis for the full enjoyment of all human rights and fundamental freedoms in political, economic, social, cultural and civil spheres of life. Today, women and men in Denmark share the same formal rights, obligations and opportunities in society. However, Denmark aims at securing de facto gender equality as well de jure. This is clearly stated in section 1 of the Danish Act on Gender Equality, which states that “The purpose of this Act is to promote gender equality, including equal integration, equal influence and equal opportunities in all functions in society on the basis of women's and men's equal status.”’ (p.12­13).
Other NRISs adopt a gender neutral approach, never explicitly mentioning differences between men and women as in the case of France.
3.2.6. Gender differnces in education
Gender differences in educational levels are considered in all the NRISs and are related to Romani women’s early marriage and early motherhood. Denmark’s NRIS stresses that ‘traditionally, people with a Roma background marry early, but in Denmark many have
42

Empowerment of Roma Women within the European Framework of National Roma Inclusion Strategies
____________________________________________________________________________________________
abandoned this tradition, perhaps because of the adverse effects on especially the girls’ possibilities for getting an education’ (p.3).
The Czech NRISs envisages specifically targeted measures stressing the necessity to ‘‘Connect the implementation of educational activities with the provision of child care services so that Roma women can take part in these activities; because of their maternal responsibilities, they are often separated from further education opportunities for a long period.’’ (p. 27).
Germany states that special courses for women immigrants are the ‘principal means adopted by the Federal Government to support the integration policy. In addition to the 600­hour to 900­hour language course, immigrants are taught about the country, its history and social order in Germany as part of the 45­hour orientation course’ (p. 23). In the land of Berlin, the project ‘Educational opportunities for adults’84 organized German language beginner courses addressed to mothers of migrant children attending school.
3.2.7. Gender differences in employment
All NRISs highlight gender differences in employment. Estonia mentions that ‘Women are mostly blue-collar workers, e.g. sell goods at the market, do simple cleaning or kitchen works, or tell someone’s fortune. Fortune telling is used for earning a living by women with children who under the general unemployment situation often have no other possibility of maintaining their family. ­ Sources of income for spouses of Roma women often include the gathering of scrap metal, ancillary farm work and ancillary work in workshops’ (p.6).
Germany draws up some measures specifically targeted at Romani women to improve their contribution to the labour market: ‘The Federal Government shares in principle the view that micro-credit can make an important contribution to integration into the labour market, and therefore as early as the end of 2009 set up the ‘Mikrokreditfonds Deutschland’ [‘German Micro­credit Fund’] as a guarantee fund. Loans of up to EUR 20 000 are to be provided to small and young enterprises who are unable to get credit from their account­holding bank, in particular undertakings run by women and people from migrant backgrounds. The volume of the Fund stands at EUR 100 million’ (p.43).
Poland’s NRIS highlights that ‘More Roma women declare the willingness to find employment and feeling responsible for their families. This is a shift from the traditional family model where a husband works’ (Annex 8 evaluation report 2010, p. 13).
The Netherlands adopt a different approach, stating that ‘If you can work, you must work; this applies to everyone, regardless of age, ethnic origin or gender’ (p.4).
3.2.8. Gender differences in health
All the NRISs specifically deal with Romani women’s health conditions mainly focusing on maternal health. In some of the Eastern countries, this topic is explicitly discussed in relation to forced sterilization of Romani women such as in Slovakia. Health mediators are considered crucial in most of the NRIS. Bulgaria stresses that to reduce child mortality, ‘Mediators shall actively assist the general practitioners in detecting and registering pregnant women at an early stage (up to the 4th month of pregnancy), ensuring consultations with a specialist in obstetrics and gynecology and timely hospitalization for birth: conducting prenatal diagnostics of pregnant women at risk; (...) Improving the awareness about healthy nutrition of newborns and young children; (...)
84 ‘ Deutsch als zweite Fremdsprache’ [‘German as a second foreign language’] P.17
  43

Policy Department C: Citizens' Rights and Constitutional Affairs
____________________________________________________________________________________________
Delivering lectures and disseminating information materials, organizing training for women engaged in rearing young children’ (P.18­20).
Lithuania, to improve Romani women’s health, intends ‘to organise a cycle of lectures for Roma women and girls on sanitation and hygene’ (p.5­6).
Poland discusses Romani women’s health conditions stressing that ‘the Roma people’s health problems appear as a result of bad, and in many cases catastrophic social situations: no water­supply, no sewage system, no heating in the homesteads, disastrous technical conditions of the heating systems, no money for the heating, poor diet, limited access to the health benefits as well as no prophylaxis and lack of habit of monitoring Roma women’s pregnancies; these neglects often cause congenital defects’ (p.8); moreover it envisages the ‘employment of nurses of Roma origin who could significantly more easily convince the Roma women to regular medical check­ups’ to increase the frequency of the Roma women’s doctor appointments.
In Hungary, ‘Roma women constitute a particular target group; they should be targeted primarily with campaigns concerned with conscious family planning, teenage pregnancy and preparation for a healthy pregnancy’ (p.89). Moreover, ‘In the interest of reducing the higher­than­average number of abortions observed amongst disadvantaged families/women, we must devise a plan for providing personalised access to various contraceptive devices on a needs basis, free of charge or at a discount price. For the purpose of increasing the effectiveness of these devices, the individuals concerned should in every instance be given advice on family planning and contraception.’ (p. 89)
In some EU Member States Romani women face barriers in accessing health services because of the lack of health insurance such as in Hungary.
Human trafficking is not considered in all the NRISs. Denmark highlights that there are no data on victims of human trafficking based on ethinicity but only on nationality. Nevertheless, the ‘Danish Centre against Human Trafficking estimates that half of the prostitutes in the streets of Copenhagen from Romania are Roma. Prostitutes with a Roma background are also present at massage parlors outside Copenhagen. 19 women from Romania, Slovakia and the Czech Republic have been identified as victims of trafficking. Social workers found varying degrees of indicators of human trafficking present in 10 cases involving minors with a Roma background from Romania, Bulgaria, and Slovakia. (p.4).
Nevertheless, there are at least two NRISs that are worth mentioning because of their attention to other aspects of women’s health apart from maternal health. Belgium’s NRIS mentions psychological and psychiatric support of refugees and asylum seekers as well as ‘art therapy group for women in vulnerable circumstances (p.36).
Bulgaria’s NRIS highlights that ‘one third of the male Roma population and two fifths of the female population in the age bracket 45­60 have already lost partially or in full their work capacity due to poor health status’ (p.9).
3.3. Roma women in the CSWDs on the Country Strategies for the Inclusion of the Roma in Member States
3.3.1. The analysis of NRIS in the CSWDs
All Member States have developed or updated their National Strategies in the EU Framework for National Roma Integration Strategies. The NRIS were analysed by the European Commission according to the issues highlighted in the EU Framework under the four key priorities areas.
44

Empowerment of Roma Women within the European Framework of National Roma Inclusion Strategies
____________________________________________________________________________________________
The assessment also considered the approach to Roma inclusion since the aim of the EU Framework is to promote a change from scattered, project­based and unrelated interventions to a comprehensive approach embracing all four key areas through an integrated and coordinated effort.
Moreover, the assessment considers the structural requirements specified in the EU Framework such as involvement of all important national stakeholders, creation of a robust monitoring system, the appointment of a national contact point, ensuring the protection of fundamental rights and monitoring. Funds and sustainability were also reviewed.
Therefore, the Commission Staff Working Documents (CSWDs) analysed each NRIS with a focus on the 4 key areas of education, employment, health, and housing as well as on structural requirements and funds.85. For each of the 27 NRIS, the Commission elaborated a synthetic table of comments stressing the key elements and the identified gaps.
3.3.2. Roma women empowerment in the CSWDs
This analysis investigates to what extent the CSWDs pays attention to the dimension of Romani women’s empowerment when reviewing the NRIS.
Methodology
The analysis focuses on the 27 CSWDs. Three variables were considered:
1. ThefocusonRomaniwomen’sempowerment;
2. ThefocusonempowermentasstrategyoroutcomeintheCSWDs;
3. The focus on gender differences in the four key areas: education, employment,
health, and housing.
Moreover, the three variables were considered both in the ‘key elements’ and in the ‘identified gaps’. The ‘key elements’ of the CSWDs highlight crucial elements of the strategy, while the ‘identified gaps’ suggest those aspects that would need more focus and consideration.
The results from the analysis
Results from the analysis are shown in Table 2 and described in the following sections below.
 85 European Commission (21 May 2012 b).
45

 
 
 
Empowerment of Roma Women within the European Framework of National Roma Inclusion Strategies
____________________________________________________________________________________________
Romani women empowerment
In the 27 CSWDs, Romani women’s empowerment has never been explicitly mentioned, neither in the key elements nor in the identified gaps.
Only in the NRIS of Sweden and the UK, empowerment is explicitly mentioned in the key elements a development approach. In the case of Sweden, empowerment is related to the civil society, while in the UK, it is a key aspect of all the UK strategies86.
The analysis showed that in 10 out of 27 NRIS, gender equality is mentioned as a part of the key elements identified in the assessment of the EC.
Gender differences in the policy area of health
Gender differences with a specific attention to women’s health are mentioned mostly with regard to health policy. A specific focus on health measures targeted at Romani women is present in France, Greece, Hungary, Italy, Lithuania, Luxembourg, Slovenia, Spain, and Sweden. Despite the common focus on Romani women’s health, the specifically targeted measures differ according to the contents and the approach. More sèpecifically:
 France and Luxemboug focus on supporting access to health care for Romani women.
 Italy shows a strong attention on monitoring Romani women’s health needs.
 Lithuania envisages ‘Training for Roma women and girls on hygiene’.
 Slovenia presents ‘general measures aiming to improving health of the Roma,
especially women and children’.
 Hungary stresses the attention for the needs of Romani women and children.
 Spain envisages measures to intervene on very concrete situations (i.e. traffic
accidents, obesity, smoking etc. with a specific focus on Roma women.)
Gender differences in the policy area of education
Attention to Romani women is also present with regard to education in Italy and Spain. Italy focuses on education of young mothers to support the completion of compulsory education. Spain aims to increase the proportion of Roma girls and boys that have attended pre­school prior to their compulsory schooling and increase school completion of Roma girls and boys in primary education.
Gender differences in the policy area of employment
Italy, Romania and Slovenia deal with employment of Romani women with the aim to increase their employability. Moreover, Italy promotes active labour market policies to include Roma women in the labour market.
Gender differences in the policy area of housing
Gender aspects not mentioned in the housing area, neither in the key elements nor in the identified gaps.
86 The Swedish CSWDS states: ‘the 20­year strategy covers all 4 key areas, as well as culture/language and the empowerment of civil society’, while the UK one says that: ‘the fight against discrimination and empowering Roma and Travellers is a key aspect of all UK strategies’.
 49

Policy Department C: Citizens' Rights and Constitutional Affairs
____________________________________________________________________________________________
Gender differences in “Identified gaps”
The CSWDs identify specific gaps related to the gender equality approach in employment for the NRISs of Belgium, Lithuania, and Romania; only for Poland, the CSWD identified gaps from a gender equality perspective in the area of education.
50

Empowerment of Roma Women within the European Framework of National Roma Inclusion Strategies
____________________________________________________________________________________________
4. STAKEHOLDERS MAPPING AT NATIONAL LEVEL
  KEY FINDINGS
 NGOs identified in Bulgaria, Croatia, Finland, Germany, Greece, Hungary,
Romania, and Spain as Romani women’s NGOs.
 NGOs identified for the other EU Member States are Romani NGOs that are active on women’s issues.
 In Annex A, national stakeholders are presented.
51

Policy Department C: Citizens' Rights and Constitutional Affairs
____________________________________________________________________________________________
5. GOOD PRACTICES IN ROMA WOMEN’S EMPOWERMENT
  KEY FINDINGS
 Good practices were selected and analysed according to the EIGE definition of good practices in gender mainstreaming and the theoretical elaboration on the specific issue of the present study.
 ‘Empowering Romani parents to support upbringing and education of their children’ is a Croatian good practice in education which aims to increase the well- being and the successful development and learning of children by supporting and developing the capacity of parents and school and the cooperation between families and schools. Romani women were the large majority of the beneficiaries of the project.
 ‘Valore Lavoro’ is an Italian good practice in employment, aiming at improving and facilitating the labour market integration of Roma women through their involvement in decision-making processes.
 ‘Empow-air: Empowering women against intimate partnership violence in Roma communities’ is a good practice in health, involving Spain, Italy, Bulgaria, and Romania, which sought to expand the research regarding violence in intimate partnerships and to promote empowerment of Roma women to address situations of gender­based violence as well as to raise awareness.
 The ‘Hungarian Women’s Lobby and European Women’s Lobby mentor program for future Romani and migrant women politicians’ is an Hungarian good practice in Romani women’s political empowerment which aims at increasing the political participation of Romani and migrant women who are already involved in political life and who are interested in running for the European Parliament Elections in May 2014.
 5.1. Introduction
In this chapter the methodology for the assessment of good practices for the empowerment of Roma women is discussed and then the collected good practices are presented. Good practices cover three of the four areas of intervention envisaged by the national strategies for Roma inclusion: Education, Employment, and Health. As regards Housing, it has not been possible to find enough information on the assessment of existing initiatives from a women empowerment perspective. In addition to these good practices, an initiative promoted by the European Women’s Lobby in Hungary is discussed as a very good example of women’s empowerment. Detailed information on the selected good practices are available in Annex B.
5.2. Assessing the Good Practices: the EIGE framework applied in the context of Roma women empowerment
5.2.1. Introduction
The assessment criteria adopted to select and analyse the good practices for the present study draw on the definition provided by EIGE on good practices in gender mainstreaming
52

Empowerment of Roma Women within the European Framework of National Roma Inclusion Strategies
____________________________________________________________________________________________
on the one hand and on the theoretical elaborations on the specific issue of the present study, the empowerment of Romani women, on the other. As a result, the assessment criteria are study­tailored.
5.2.2. Study­tailored assessment criteria
To identify good practices in gender mainstreaming, EIGE has elaborated a methodology embedded in the definition of gender mainstreaming presented by the Council of Europe (1998) according to which:
‘Gender mainstreaming is ‘the (re)organisation, improvement, development and evaluation of policy processes, so that a gender equality perspective is incorporated in all policies at all levels and at all stages, by the actors normally involved in policymaking’87.
EIGE specifies that ‘gender mainstreaming is not a goal in itself but a strategy88 to achieve equality between women and men. It is also a process of change/transformation which implies that all actors involved in policymaking integrate gender equality concerns – meaning the systematic consideration of the differences between the conditions, situations and needs of women and men, of the relations existing between them, and of the impact of policies on the concrete situation of women or men – in the planning, implementation, monitoring and evaluation of all policies, programmes and activities so that both sexes can influence, participate in, and benefit equitably from all interventions. The main goal of gender mainstreaming is that both sexes may enjoy equal visibility, empowerment and participation in all spheres of public and private life’ (EIGE, 2011)89.
As a consequence EIGE defines a 'good practice in gender mainstreaming' as ‘any experience/initiative displaying techniques, methods or approaches which function in a way, and produce effects and results coherent with the definition of gender mainstreaming, which are considered to be particularly effective in delivering gender mainstreaming as a transformative strategy, and, therefore, deserving to be disseminated and proposed to other organisational contexts’ (EIGE, 2011)90. Therefore, good practices are not per se a tool for gender mainstreaming but they can be used in tools for gender mainstreaming to show that, in similar situations, greater gender equality is possible.
As regards the identification of good practices, EIGE suggests the following three assessment criteria:
 It works well;
 Transferability; and
 Learning potential.
Drawing on these three judgement criteria, it is possible to apply them to the specific context under scrutiny obtaining the new definitions contained in Table 1:
87 COE (1998).
88 From this point of view also positive actions should be regarded as part of the gender mainstreaming strategy,
because they are one policy tool that allow to make up for the lack of gender equality.
89 EIGE (2011)
The document is the result of the contribution provided by EIGE’s thematic network on Gender Mainstreaming and Expert’s Forum members, EIGE’s staff as well as from the findings of the Second Ex­Ante Evaluation of EIGE and the “Study on the use of “good practice” as a tool for mainstreaming gender into the policies and programmes of the Institutions of European Union and EU Member States”, commissioned to the Fondazione Giacomo Brodolini (FGB). EIGE’s work on collection and dissemination.
90 EIGE (2011).
 53

 
Empowerment of Roma Women within the European Framework of National Roma Inclusion Strategies
____________________________________________________________________________________________
2.
3.
5.3.2.
Once the effectiveness of the good practice is assessed, the adequateness to the context is veryfied. The good practice works well if it really tackles the most relevant issues as regards Romani women and girls empowerment in the context where it is applied.
Finally, the good practice should be able to mainstream Romani women’s and girls’ empowerment by indirectly affecting other spheres of Romani women’s and girls’ lives. In the context of the National Strategies for Roma Inclusion, the measure should address one of the relevant fields of intervention (education, employment, health, or housing), with effects in at least one of the other fields, i.e. has indirect empowering effects.
Transferability
The good practice can be considered to be transferable when there are different positive cases/examples of its application so that the key success factors can be identified and made available in other contexts. By comparing the positive examples of implementation, it is possible to understand under which conditions the practice works well (i.e. is effective). So, to assess transferability, it is necessary to sketch out the conditions that contributed to its success. Additionally, the condition of being easily adaptable to another context is related to the amount of resources that are needed to implement the practice in another context. More clearly, transferability is related to:
 the context analysis: specific conditions that contribute to the success of the initiative in the specific context;
 adaptability: the extent to which the initiative can be adapted to other contexts, examined following the assessment of the results of the context analysis.
5.3.3. Learning potential
A good practice of empowerment has a learning potential if there are general lessons that can be drawn from its application beyond its particular context. So, the good practice of empowerment is good for learning how to tackle the issue of Romani women’s and girls’ empowerment.
5.3.4. The assessment criteria grid
The assessment criteria grid presented in Annex B is composed of three columns: the first column contains the original EIGE three criteria; the second presents their operationalisation for the present study, while the third will include the assessment conducted for each of the operationalised criteria on each good practice.
5.4. The good practices for Romani women’s empowerment91
5.4.1. Good practice for empowerment in education
‘Empowering Romani parents to support upbringing and education of their children’
The initiative has been drawn up and implemented by the Open Public Academy ‘Step by Step’, an NGO funded by the Open Society Foundation in Croatia.
91 A more detailed analysis of the good practices here presented is available in Annex C.
 55

Policy Department C: Citizens' Rights and Constitutional Affairs
____________________________________________________________________________________________
The project carried out training and workshops for teachers and parents, involving mainly women (190 women out of 300 participants). Romani women were the large majority of the beneficiaries of the project: while they were not involved in the design and implementation, they participated in the evaluation. Their point of view on the benefits of the projects was considered at that step.
Objective
The overall goal of the project was to increase well-being and successful development and learning of children by supporting and developing capacity of parents and school and the cooperation between families and schools92.
It worked well
The good practice worked well because in this initiative Romani women went through a process of significant empowerment in terms of: (a) better parenting; (b) quality support to their children once they enrol in elementary school; (c) social skills and relation with non­Roma93; (d) the process of education, which helped increase their literacy (having in mind that a great number of Romani women are without elementary education); (e) awareness of Romani women about aspirations for their children ‘s (including daughters’) education.
The participation of Romani women/mothers in workshops for empowerment in parenting has not significantly changed their level of education but has contributed to increase their aspirations regarding the education of their children (girls in particular) that is where the change starts.
5.4.2. The good practice for empowerment in employment job quality and good working conditions
‘Valore Lavoro’
This initiative was financed by the Italian Ministry of Labour and Social Policy, and promoted by the Lombardy Region Family, Social Solidarity and Voluntary Sector Department and implemented by Comunità di Sant’Egidio (a charity, and ISMU Foundation), the project leader, with other CSOs. It was implemented between May 2009­ November 2010 (18 months). The beneficiaries were the Romani population in vulnerable conditions (women, young people) in the cities of Milan, Rho and Mantua (Lombardy region). The majority of the 60 beneficiaries of Valore Lavoro initiative were women. The project, however, involved also young people and men.
Objective
The overall goal of the project was the labour integration through a participatory approach that involved Roma in defining and implementing social policies addressing them. Valore Lavoro was aimed at improving and facilitating the labour integration of Roma through their involvement in decision­making processes. It was articulated in different but integrated actions: 1) vocational training; 2) promotion and support of already existing
92 The project had two specific objectives: 1) to contribute to the cooperation between school and parents in order to better support children’s learning and development; 2) to contribute to the empowerment of Roma parents in supporting their children’s development and education. It was also available for non­Roma parents of children aged between 5 and 7 years. It lasted 20 months and finished in June 2013. It was implemented in Municipalities of Drzimurec Strelec/Mala Subotica, Macinec, Orehovica in Medjimurje County, and in the City of Kutina in Sisak­Moslavina County.
93 Since they attended the workshops together with a number of non­Roma parents and children, they were placed in an intercultural environment that was beneficial for the development and the improvement of their social skills.
 56

Empowerment of Roma Women within the European Framework of National Roma Inclusion Strategies
____________________________________________________________________________________________
working activities (i.e. cooperatives); 3) hiring of Roma as employees; 4) encouragement of self­employment; 5) improvement of Roma autonomy in accessing public services (empowerment); 6) promotion of the capability and sensitivity of public services in assessing and meeting Roma­specific needs.
It worked well
It worked well because it achieved the overall objective and its specific objectives. Romani vulnerable people including women have been positively affected by the initiative, with direct effects of finding a job and indirect effects of empowerment. The Romani people who benefitted from the project (the majority of them are women) have been involved through active participation. Gender equality as an objective has been considered in the planning, in the implementation, in the monitoring and evaluation, of the initiative.
Through participatory mechanisms during the trainings and self­employment activities, they took decisions on how to design, implement and monitor the project. Increased general experience and awareness, work experience, improvement of socio­economic position through legal employment can be noted as results. The project’s activities had a great impact on women’s life, in terms of increased autonomy and improved family management. This approach led to Roma empowerment, emancipating Roma from reliance on passive measures of social protection.
Mainstreaming of empowerment and transferability
An indirect effect of labour integration on citizenship rights could be identified: the possession of a regular job stimulated the Roma people involved in the project and without Italian citizenship to obtain permanent residence documents in Italy. This initiative can be adapted and replicated in other contexts.
5.4.3. The good practice for empowerment in health
Empow-air: Empowering women against intimate partnership violence in Roma communities
This initiative was coordinated by SURT: Fundació de dones. Fundació privada, based in Barcelona, Spain, with the following partnerships: International Centre for Minority Studies and Intercultural Relations (Bulgaria), Giacomo Brodolini Foundation (Italy), Gypsy Women Association for Our Children (Romania) and Fundación Secretariado Gitano (Spain).
The project involved 120 women and 40 men from Roma communities in Spain, Italy, Bulgary, and Romania, with the direct involvement of Romani women’s CSOs in all the phases of the project, concluded in March 2013.
Objective
The initiative was aimed at expanding research on male violence against women in intimate partnerships within Roma communities in order to generate tools which help professionals in dealing with violence detection and prevention. Additionally, it intended to promote empowerment of Roma women by addressing gender-based violence situations and raising awareness on the existence of violence against women within the Roma communities among decision makers, professionals working with the Roma population, and the Roma population itself.
Romani women empowerment was the main objective of the project and gender equality was pivotal in the design, implementation, and evaluation. The project investigated
57

Policy Department C: Citizens' Rights and Constitutional Affairs
____________________________________________________________________________________________
intimate partnership violence in Roma communities which represent one of the most evident manifestations of the unequal distribution of power between men and women in Roma communities.
Mainstreaming of empowerment and transferability
The initiative can be adapted and replicated in other communities. Despite differences between Roma communities in the EU, patriarchal family systems are a common element subordinating women to men and limiting access to women’s basic human rights. This aspect is a crucial challenge in Romani women’s empowerment process. This initiative is therefore particularly valuable because, although the initiative focused on intimate partnership violence within Roma communities, it is rather likely that it will positively influence other areas of life.
5.4.4. The good practice for empowerment in housing
It has not been possible to find enough information to present and assess a good practice in housing aimed at empowering women. It should be stressed that good practices in housing often have positive impacts on women but was not subject of the initiatives collected for this study.
5.4.5. Good practice for Romani women’s political empowerment
Hungarian Women’s Lobby and European Women’s Lobby mentor program for future Romani and migrant women politicians
While no relevant initiative has been conducted by public authorities for Romani women’s political empowerment, the Hungarian Women’s Lobby, with support of the European Women’s Lobby, is implementing an initiative for the empowerment of Romani women that fosters their political participation. The project aims at increasing the political participation of Romani and migrant women who are already involved in political life and who are interested in running for the European Parliament Elections in May 2014.
Objective
Nevertheless, it aims at increasing the number of Romani women in the European Parliament. The project clearly supports Romani women empowerment and could be implemented in other countries with regard also to local and national political life.
Results
The project has not been concluded, therefore an ultimate evaluation of its working-well feature cannot be presented. However, the project has involved 8-12 women of foreign origin or ethnic minority background for whom taking part to a training for political participation is already a step forward in political empowerment.
58

Empowerment of Roma Women within the European Framework of National Roma Inclusion Strategies
____________________________________________________________________________________________
6. CONCLUSIONS 6.1. Background
Discrimination traps Romani communities in a vicious circle of poverty and social exclusion. There are more than 90% of Romani people in Europe living in poverty. Despite the efforts of EU institutions and national governments throughout the last decade, their living conditions are still dramatic. Romani women are most vulnerable due to the fact that they experience multiple forms of discrimination inflicted not only by society at large but also within their own communities.
6.2. Innovative approach: empowerment
Romani women’s empowerment represents an innovative approach to support the improvement of Romani women’s living conditions. Women’s empowerment has been widely used in development strategies by international development organizations since the 1980s because of its great potentiality to break the vicious circle of poverty and of gender inequality in communities. Women’s empowerment approach considers human rights as a crucial starting point to tackle gender and multiple forms of discrimination experienced by women withing their communities.
6.3. Empowerment: a complex process and an outcome
Romani women’s empowerment is a complex process and at the same time an outcome that involves simultaneously three dimensions: personal, relational, collective. It includes political structures, cooperative actions, at local or institutional level.
Romani women’s involvement in all phases of all policy process is essential. Moreover, the analysis of NRIS shows that Roma women’s empowerment needs an integrated approach between policy areas: education, empowerment, health, and housing.
6.4. Romani women’s empowerment in the NRISs
The analysis of the 28 NRISs concerning the attention for Romani women’s empowerment shows that it has been explicitly mentioned in 6 out of 28 NRIS, however its meaning in the NRIS greatly varies. For instance, Italy considers Romani women’s empowerment as an approach to be introduced and developed as a principle of intervention. In Sweden, Romani women’s empowerment is part of the process to draw up, implement, and evaluate the whole NRIS, as it is in the Welsh NRIS (UK). Romani women’s empowerment is the focus of a project in Germany, supporting women employment through micro credit actions. In Croatia, it is a part of the mainstreaming approach in most of the document with a special attention to Romani women¡s empowerment in the public life.
6.5. Preconditions of empowerment of Romani women: health policies as a negative example
In most of the NRISs and also in EU documents, women are mainly considered vulnerable subjects (as are children) and deserve protection. Where the empowerment approach is discussed, it does not adequately consider gender differences. Recognizing the condition of Romani women’s higher vulnerability is a crucial starting point; nevertheless, this approach needs to be further developed to draw­up policy that is evidence based and aiming to advance Romani women’s empowerment.
There is the need to overcome the risk of a top-down and paternalistic approach that could exclude Romani women from the decision and policy­making processes. Actions addressing women’s health issues in the maternal area which consider women as passive
59

Policy Department C: Citizens' Rights and Constitutional Affairs
____________________________________________________________________________________________
beneficiaries of services are examples of an approach that does not consider Romani women as active protagonist of their policy. The focus on maternal health of Romani women characterizes a top­down approach that in most of the cases does not consider Romani women’s health in the context of socio­economic conditions and tends to apply a victim­blaming approach ignoring the relevant literature on health inequalities.
6.6. Housing policies have a high potential of indirect positive effects (mainstreaming empowerment)
Housing segregation as well as inadequate social housing policy strongly hampers education, increases segregation, and limits access to the labour market and health conditions. Tackling housing segregation is a crucial starting point to promote Romani women’s empowerment.
6.7. Gender mainstreaming of the NRISs: good practices
Promoting Romani women’s empowerment is to promote a gender equality development approach based on gender mainstreaming. In the 28 NRISs, gender differences have been explored in most of the cases through a gender-disaggregated analysis of the situation in education, employment and health. Nevertheless, only few NRIS have applied a gender mainstreaming approach when drafting, implementing, and evaluating policy.
Croatia represents a good example of an explicit gender mainstreaming approach in most of the policy areas. Sweden has to be considered a good practice with regard to the structural approach to Romani women’s empowerment in the policy making process through both involving Romani women’s CSOs and applying an equal opportunities and gender mainstreaming approach throughout the NRIS. Germany’s project on Romani women’s employment is a good concrete example of actions to support Romani women’s empowerment.
The CSWDs have highlighted key elements and identified gaps but have applied a gender- blind approach, while they have stressed the positive attention for empowerment in the Swedish and UK NRIS.
6.8. The role of public authorities
As experienced in Sweden, Wales (UK) and in Croatia the involvement of Romani women’s CSOs on the initiative of public authorities is a crucial aspect to draw up efficient policy and collect concrete experiences of Romani women’s empowerment. The support of public authorities to Romani women’s CSOs is a key starting point.
60

Empowerment of Roma Women within the European Framework of National Roma Inclusion Strategies
____________________________________________________________________________________________
7. RECOMMENDATIONS
Romani women’s empowerment needs an integrated approach that involves different levels of governance.
7.1.
1. 2.
Recommendations for National Governments
Assume an evidence-based policy approach, grounded on the analysis of gender disaggregated data concerning outputs and outcomes of policy.
Make the actual policy participatory approach operational by involving all stakeholders throughout the policy­making process. Romani women have to be involved in the analysis of their needs, in planning policy and related services, implementing actions, in monitoring and evaluating the outputs and the outcome of the services and of the policies. The active participation of Romani women’s CSOs at local, national, and European level, as well as of gender equality bodies and women’s rights organizations, is indispensable.
Specifically with regard to the five key policy areas:
3. Promote Romani women’s political participation by introducing Romani
women’s quotas at all governmental levels.
4. Housing policy: improve housing conditions and desegregation of Roma
communities by means of supporting active participation of Romani women’s CSOs;
5. Employment policy: enhance access to the labour market with measures countering Romani women’s horizontal (glass box) and vertical (glass ceiling) segregation;
6. Education policy: guarantee access to high quality educational programs for Romani women and girls;
7. Health policy: Support active participation of Romani women’s CSOs in the drawing­up, implementation and evaluation of health policy concerning Romani women;
7.2. Recommendations to the European Parliament
The European Parliament should:
1. Promote the adoption of an integrated - gender mainstreamed - evidence- based – participatory policy approach in the National Roma Inclusion Strategy focused on Romani women’s human rights.
2. Raise the conditions of Romani women in discussions with national parliaments so that Member States are encouraged to include their empowerment as a key element in the national strategies to improve the overall condition of all Roma communities;
3. Call upon the Commission to observe that Romani women’s rights are reflected as a crucial dimension in the national strategies and that gender mainstreaming as a tool supports the reduction of gender inequality and discrimination against Romani women within the Roma communities and in the society.
61

Policy Department C: Citizens' Rights and Constitutional Affairs
____________________________________________________________________________________________
4. Cooperate with the Council and the Commission to develop more assertive and binding tools to promote Roma inclusion in EU Member States, for example by including appropriate objectives in the European Semester process as the situation of Roma minorities influences the economic and social performance of Member States.
7.3. Recommendations for the European Commission
1. Implement an integrated - gender mainstreamed - life course – evidence- based – participatory policy approach focused on Romani women’s human rights in the National Roma Inclusion strategies with in particular:
a. Specific attention to the interrelation between the four key areas (education, employment, health, housing) with a special attention on housing as starting point because of the influence that housing conditions and segregation have on education, employment and health. Moreover, integration implies also a strong relationship to gender equality policies.
b. Specific attention in policy making to the life-course of Romani women as their needs are different according to their age and because previous life experiences affect all the subsequent living conditions. The empowering approach has to address Romani women’s needs in different moments of their lives, through their young, adult, and older age.
2. Request Roma inclusion in EU Member States in a more sensitive and assertive way.
3. Foster specific tools targeted at Romani women’s empowerment in the National Strategies for Roma Inclusion.
4. Foster gender equality as a key objective to contrast the discrimination Romani women experience within their communities and as a part of the Romani women’s empowerment strategy in the National Strategies for Roma Inclusion.
5. Define a clear step by step EU Roma inclusion process, linking each local and national initiative to the fulfilment of EU community goals, and establish a clear definition of the procedures concerning the involvement of stakeholders; draw up objectives, implementation processes, monitoring, evaluation, and impact assessments and allocate resources through the EU budget.
6. Propose measures to eliminate health inequalities for Romani women as a prerequisite for Romani women’s empowerment.
7. Promote mutual learning processes among EU Member States with regard to EU good practices in Romani women’s empowerment.
8. Include specific objectives to tackle trafficking of Romani women in the National Strategy for Roma Inclusion.
7.4. Recommendations for the European Council
1. Invite Member States to adopt a policy approach focused on Romani women’s human rights and empowerment within the framework of the National Roma Inclusion Strategy by reminding that all the 10 Common Basic Principles on Roma Inclusion should be equally taken into consideration when designing, implementing and evaluating policies aimed at promoting Roma inclusion. More particularly, Member States should be invited to consider the following:
62

Empowerment of Roma Women within the European Framework of National Roma Inclusion Strategies
____________________________________________________________________________________________
“awareness of the gender dimension”, “involvement of civil society” and “active participation of the Roma”.
2. Encourage better cooperation among Member States in the framework of the open method of coordination for health and social inclusion for the exchange of good practices for Roma inclusion with special attention to Roma women’s empowerment in the four areas of intervention and with the aim of assuming an integrated approach between the different areas.
3. Invite Member States to assume, besides targeted actions, also a mainstreaming approach in the fields of education, employment, housing, and healthcare, towards Romani people and in particular towards Romani women’s empowerment with a view to effectively promote their social inclusion.
63

Policy Department C: Citizens' Rights and Constitutional Affairs
____________________________________________________________________________________________
REFERENCES
 Amalipe Center for Interethnic Dialogue and Tolerance, Preventing Early Marriages, 2011, available at: http://www.amalipe.com/files/publications/ranni%20brakove%20last.pdf
 Balogh L., Kóczé A. (2011) Current Issues in Europe Regarding the Social and Political Inclusion of Romani Women (policy paper issued for the Roma Women in Focus conference held in Budapest, on the 7th April, 2011), Budapest: Hungarian Women’s Lobby, available at: https://cps.ceu.hu/sites/default/files/field attachment/news/node­ 22487/Romani­women­social­inclusion­in­Europe­Apr2011.pdf
 Batliwala, S. (1994): "The Meaning of Women's Empowerment: New Concepts from Action", in Gita Sen, Adrienne Germain and Lincoln C. Chen (eds.), Population Policies Reconsidered: Health, Empowerment, and Rights, Boston: Harvard University Press, 127­138.
 Corsi M. et al., “Ethnic minority and Roma women in Europe: a case for gender equality?”, Synthesis report of the Expert Group on Gender Equality, Social Inclusion, Health and Long­term Care (EGGSI) of the European Commission DirectorateGeneral for Employment, Social Affairs and Equal Opportunities, G.1 unit, November 2008, p. 6. Report available at: http://ec.europa.eu/social/BlobServlet?docId=4833&langId=en
 Council of Europe (2010), Working with Roma to improve their own lives: statistics; latest update in 2010 available at: http://www.coe.int/t/dg3/romatravellers/Source/documents/stats.xls
 Council of Europe, Commissioner for Human Rights, (November, 2008), Memorandum by Thomas Hammarberg, Council of Europe Commissioner for Human Rights, following his visit to France from 21 to 23 May 2008, available at: http://www.refworld.org/cgi­ bin/texis/vtx/rwmain?page=country&category=&publisher=COECHR&type=&coi=FRA&ri d=4562d8b62&docid=492a6da72&skip=0
 Council of Europe, Commissioner for Human Rights, (February 2012), Human rights of Roma and Travellers in Europe, available at:
http://www.coe.int/t/commissioner/source/prems/prems79611_GBR_CouvHumanRights OfRoma_WEB.pdf .
 Council of Europe, 18 May 2012, Descriptive Glossary of terms relating to Roma issues available at:
http://a.cs.coe.int/team20/cahrom/documents/Glossary%20Roma%20EN%20version% 2018%20May%202012.pdf
 Council of the European Union, 28 May 2009, Inclusion of the Roma draft Council conclusions [10394/09]. Available at:
http://register.consilium.europa.eu/pdf/en/09/st10/st10394.en09.pdf
 Council of the European Union, 8 June 2009, Council conclusions on Inclusion of the Roma 2947th Employment, Social Policy, Health Ad Cosumer Affairs Council meeting, the presentation of the Common Basic Principles for Roma Inclusion; Available at: http://www.consilium.europa.eu/uedocs/cms data/docs/pressdata/en/lsa/108377.pdf
 Council of the European Union, 7 June 2010, Council conclusions on Advancing Roma Inclusion 3019th Employment, Social Policy Health and Consumer Affairs Council meeting, Available at:
      64

Empowerment of Roma Women within the European Framework of National Roma Inclusion Strategies
____________________________________________________________________________________________
http://www.consilium.europa.eu/uedocs/cms_data/docs/pressdata/en/lsa/115003.pdf
 Council of the European Union, 21 February 2011, conclusions on the Fifth Report on economic, social and territorial cohesion 3068th General Affairs Council meeting, the adoption of the Fifth report on economic, social and territorial cohesion on February 2011. Available at:
http://www.consilium.europa.eu/uedocs/cms_Data/docs/pressdata/EN/genaff/119400.p df
 Council of the European Union, 19 May 2011, Council conclusions on an EU Framework for National Roma, Integration Strategies up to 2020, 3089th Employment, Social Policy, Health and Consumer Affairs Council meeting,. Available at:
http://www.consilium.europa.eu/uedocs/cms data/docs/pressdata/en/lsa/122100.pdf
 Council of the European Union, 24 May 2011, “An EU Framework for National Roma Integration Strategies up to 2020, [10658/11], Council Conclusions, available at: http://register.consilium.europa.eu/pdf/en/11/st10/st10658.en11.pdf
 Council of the European Union, 23/24 June 2011, Conclusions Available at: http://register.consilium.europa.eu/pdf/en/11/st00/st00023.en11.pdf
 Demirovski, M. (2013), European Year of Citizens: How the European Parliament can deliver for Roma, available at:
http://www.opensocietyfoundations.org/voices/european­year­citizens­how­european­ parliament­can­deliver­roma.
 Dominic B., Jothi C.A. (2012) Education­A tool of Women Empowerment: Historical study based on Kerala society, International Journal of Scientific and Research Publications, Volume 2, Issue 4, April 2012, p.1­4
 ECRI (2003) Fourth report on Bulgaria,f p. 26. EUMC, Breaking the Barriers: Romani Women and Access to Public Health Care, available at: http://fra.europa.eu/fraWebsite/attachments/ROMA­HC­EN.pdf
 EIGE (2011), “Mainstreaming gender into the policies and the programmes of the institutions of the European Union and EU Member States Study. Good practices in gender mainstreaming” commissioned to the Fondazione Giacomo Brodolini (FGB), http://eige.europa.eu/sites/default/files/Good­Practices­in­Gender­Mainstreaming.pdf.
 ERRC (2007) The Glass Box. Exclusion of Roma from Employment http://www.errc.org/cms/upload/media/02/14/m00000214.pdf
 ERRC, (March, 2011), Breaking the silence. A report by the European Roma Rights Centre and People in Need. Trafficking in Romani Communities, http://www.errc.org/cms/upload/file/breaking­the­silence­19­march­2011.pdf
 EUMC (2003), Breaking the Barriers: Romani Women and Access to Public Health Care, available at: http://fra.europa.eu/fraWebsite/attachments/ROMA­HC­EN.pdf
 European Commission (2009) “Vademecum: the 10 Common Basic Principles on Roma Inclusion” available at:
http://www.coe.int/t/dg4/youth/Source/Resources/Documents/2011_10_Common_Basi c_Principles_Roma_Inclusion.pdf
   65

Policy Department C: Citizens' Rights and Constitutional Affairs
____________________________________________________________________________________________
 European Commission, (21 May 2012 a), Communication from the Commission to the European, Parliament, the Council, the European Economic and Social Committee and the Committee of the Regions, National Roma Integration Strategies: a first step in the implementation of the EU, Framework [COM(2012) 226 final] Available at: http://eur­ lex.europa.eu/LexUriServ/LexUriServ.do?uri=CELEX:52012DC0226:en:NOT
 European Commission, (21 May 2012 b), Commission Staff Working Document accompanying the document Communication from the Commission to the European, Parliament, the Council, the European Economic and Social Committee and the Committee of the Regions, National Roma Integration Strategies: a first step in the implementation of the EU, Framework [/* SWD/2012/0133 final */]. Available at: http://eur­lex.europa.eu/LexUriServ/LexUriServ.do?uri=SWD:2012:0133:FIN:EN:PDF
 European Commission, (26 June 2013), Communication from the Commission to the European, Parliament, the Council, the European Economic and Social Committee and the Committee of the Regions, Steps forward in Implementing NationaL Roma Integration Strategies, [COM(2013) 454 final] available at: http://ec.europa.eu/justice/discrimination/files/com_2013_454_en.pdf
 European Commission, 26.6.2013 Proposal for a Council Recommendation on effective Roma integration measures in the Member States COM(2013) 460 final 2013/0229 (NLE). Available at:
http://ec.europa.eu/justice/discrimination/files/com_2013_460_en.pdf
 European Commission webpage on Roma: http://ec.europa.eu/justice/discrimination/roma/index_en.htm
 European monitoring centre on racism and xenophobia (2003), Breaking the barriers — Romani women and access to public healthcare, Vienna. P.14 http://fra.europa.eu/sites/default/files/fra_uploads/180­ROMA­HC­EN.pdf
 European Parliament, Resolution of 8 April 2005, on Roma in the European Union [P6_TA(2005)0151] Available at:
http://www.europarl.europa.eu/sides/getDoc.do?type=TA&reference=P6­TA­2005­ 0151&language=EN
 European Parliament, (1 June 2006).Resolution of The Situation of Romani Women in the European Union, [P6_TA(2006)0244]. Available at:
http://www.europarl.europa.eu/sides/getDoc.do?pubRef=­//EP//NONSGML+TA+P6­TA­ 2006­0244+0+DOC+PDF+V0//EN
 European Parliament, Resolution of 11 March 2009 on the Social situation of the Roma and their improved access to the labour market in the EU [P6_TA(2009)0117] Available at: http://www.europarl.europa.eu/sides/getDoc.do?pubRef=­ //EP//NONSGML+TA%2bP6­TA­2009­0117%2b0%2bDOC%2bPDF%2bV0%2f%2fEN
 European Parliament resolution of 25 March 2010 on the Second European Roma Summit [P7_TA(2010)0085] Available at:
http://www.europarl.europa.eu/sides/getDoc.do?pubRef=­//EP//NONSGML+TA+P7­TA­ 2010­0085+0+DOC+PDF+V0//EN
 European Parliament resolution of 9 September 2010 on the Situation of Roma and on freedom of movement in the European Union [P7_TA(2010)0312] Available at:
    66

Empowerment of Roma Women within the European Framework of National Roma Inclusion Strategies
____________________________________________________________________________________________
http://www.europarl.europa.eu/sides/getDoc.do?pubRef=­//EP//NONSGML+TA+P7­TA­ 2010­0312+0+DOC+PDF+V0//EN
 European Parliament resolution of 7 September 2010 on the Social integration of women belonging to ethnic minority groups [P7_TA(2010)0305] Available at:
http://www.europarl.europa.eu/sides/getDoc.do?pubRef=­//EP//NONSGML+TA+P7­TA­ 2010­0305+0+DOC+PDF+V0//EN
 European Parliament resolution of 9 March 2011 on the EU strategy on Roma inclusion [P7_TA(2011)0092] Available at:
http://www.europarl.europa.eu/sides/getDoc.do?pubRef=­//EP//NONSGML+TA+P7­TA­ 2011­0092+0+DOC+PDF+V0//EN
 European Parliament report of 19 February 2013 on the impact of the economic crisis on gender equality and women’s rights [2012/2301(INI)]Available at:
http://www.europarl.europa.eu/sides/getDoc.do?type=REPORT&reference=A7­2013­ 0048&language=EN
 European Parliament resolution of 14 March 2013 on Strengthening the fight against racism, xenophobia and hate crime [P7_TA(2013)0090] Available at:
http://www.europarl.europa.eu/sides/getDoc.do?pubRef=­//EP//TEXT+TA+P7­TA­ 2013­0090+0+DOC+XML+V0//EN
 European Parliament report of 4 April 2013 on on women’s rights in the Balkan accession countries [2012/2255(INI)] Available at:
http://www.europarl.europa.eu/sides/getDoc.do?type=REPORT&reference=A7­2013­ 0136&language=EN
 European Parliament report of 18 June 2013 on Impact of the crisis on access to care for vulnerable groups [2013/2044(INI)] Available at:
http://www.europarl.europa.eu/sides/getDoc.do?type=REPORT&reference=A7­2013­ 0221&language=EN
 European Parliament report of 30 April 2013 on Social housing in the European Union (2012/2293(INI)) Available at:
http://www.europarl.europa.eu/sides/getDoc.do?type=REPORT&reference=A7­2013­ 0155&language=EN
 European Parliament resolution 3 July 2013 on Situation of fundamental rights: standards and practices in Hungary [2012/2130(INI)]Available at:
http://www.europarl.europa.eu/sides/getDoc.do?type=TA&reference=P7­TA­2013­ 0315&language=EN
67

Policy Department C: Citizens' Rights and Constitutional Affairs
____________________________________________________________________________________________
 European Union (26 October 2012), The treaty on European Union, consolidated version available at:
http://eur­ lex.europa.eu/LexUriServ/LexUriServ.do?uri=OJ:C:2012:326:0013:0046:EN:PDF
 European Union (26 October 2012), Treaty of the Functioning of the European Union consolidated version 2012, available at: http://eur­ lex.europa.eu/LexUriServ/LexUriServ.do?uri=OJ:C:2012:326:0047:0200:EN:PDF
 European Union (30 March 2010), Charter of Fundamental Rights of the European Union; available at:
http://eur­ lex.europa.eu/LexUriServ/LexUriServ.do?uri=OJ:C:2010:083:0389:0403:en:PDF
 European Women’s Lobby Position Paper, Tackling multiple discrimination of Romani and Traveller Women –a crucial factor for the successful implementation of the National Roma Integration Strategies, 2012: available at http://www.womenlobby.org/spip.php?article4454&lang=en
 FRA (March, 2010), Summary report: the state of Roma and Traveller housing in the European Union, steps towards equality.
 FRA/UNDP (2012), The situation of Roma in 11 EU Member States: Survey results at a glance available at http://fra.europa.eu/sites/default/files/fra_uploads/2099­FRA­2012­ Roma­at­a­glance_EN.pdf

 Genova A. (2011), Better health for better integration, Fondazione Giacomo Brodolini, Final Handbook, available at: http://www.bhbi.eu/sites/default/files/documents/Handbook_EN.pdf
 Genova A. (2012), Empow­air, Empowering Women Against Intimate partnership violence in Roma communities, National Italian country report, Angela Genova­ Fondazione Giacomo Brodolini http://www.surt.org/empow­air/4.html
 Griffiths, D., Sigona, N. and Zetter, R. (2005) Refugee Community Organisations and Dispersal: Networks, Resources and Social Capital, Bristol, Policy Press.
 Kaan, T. (2007) A Conceptual Framework for Gender and Development Studies: From Welfare to Empowerment. Available at: http://www.oefse.at/Downloads/publikationen/foren/Forum32.pdf
 Kabeer, N. (2001) The Power to Choose, Bangladeshi Women and Labour Market Decisions in London and Dhaka. London, UK: Verso Press.
 Kahanec M., Zaiceva A., Zimmermann K. F. (2010), Ethnic Minorities in the European Union: An Overview available at:
http://papers.ssrn.com/sol3/papers.cfm?abstract_id=1735955
 Kocze A. and Popa R.L, (2009) Missing Intersectionality Race/Ethnicity, Gender, and Class in Current Research and Policies on Romani Women in Europe, Central European
SURT (2012) Empow­air, Empowering Women Against Intimate partnership violence in Roma communities, various reports and documents available at: http://www.surt.org/empow­air/4.html
 68

Empowerment of Roma Women within the European Framework of National Roma Inclusion Strategies
____________________________________________________________________________________________
University. Available at: http://www.coe.int/t/dg3/romatravellers/archive/Angela%20Kocze%20Report%20Missi ng%20Intersectionality%20EN.pdf
 Liégeois J.P. (2007) Roma in Europe. Council of Europe. http://books.google.it/books?id=3A2bGG3_NAYC&printsec=frontcover&hl=it#v=onepag e&q&f=false
 Luttrell, C., Quiroz, S., Scrutton, C., & Bird, K. (2009). Understanding and operationalizing empowerment. London: Overseas Development Institute.
 Mosedale, S. (2005), Assessing women's empowerment: towards a conceptual framework. J. Int. Dev., 17: 243–257.
 Moser, Caroline O.N. (1993): Gender Planning and Development: Theory, Practice and Training, London and New York: Routledge.
 Narayan D., (ed by) (2005) Measuring Empowerment. Cross­Disciplinary Perspectives. The World Bank.
 Nikkhah H. A. (2010) The Effect of Women’s Socio­demographic Variables on their Empowerment Journal of American Science 2010;6(11)
 Open Society Foundation (2006), Broadening the agenda — the Status of Roma women in Romania, Brussels.
 OSI (2007), Roma Health Project, Public Health Fact Sheet, Left Out: Roma and Access to Health Care in Eastern and South Eastern Europe. Available at:
http://www.opensocietyfoundations.org/sites/default/files/leftout_20070423.pdf
 Razavi, S. and Miller, C. (1995): From WID to GAD: Conceptual Shifts in the Women and Development Discourse, UN Fourth World Conference on Women, Occasional Paper No. 1. United Nations Research Institute for Social Development (UNRISD).
 Ringold D., Orenstein M.A., and Wilkens E., (2003) Roma in an Expanding Europe: Breaking the Poverty Cycle, World Bank, Washington D.C..
 Rocca C.H. (2009) Challenging assumptions about women’s empowerment: social and economic resources and domestic violence among young married women in urban South India. International Journal of Epidemiology;38:577–585
 Rowlands, J. (1997) Questioning Empowerment: Working with Women in Honduras. Oxford, UK: Oxfam.
 Sen, G. and Crown, Cn for DAWN (1988): Development, Crisis and Alternative Visions: Third World Women's Perspectives, London: Earthscan Publications.
 Sigona, N. and Trehan, N. (eds) (2009) Romani politics in Europe: Poverty, Ethnic Marginalisation and the Neoliberal Order, Palgrave;
 Sigona, N. and Trehan, N. (2011) ‘Néolibéralisme et antitsiganisme: le suspens du rêve européen’, Lignes, n.34;
 Sigona, N. and Vermeersch, P. (eds) (2012) Journal of Ethnic and Migration Studies, special issue on ‘The Roma in the new EU: polices, frames and everyday experiences’, 38 (8);

Surdu M. and Surdu L., (2006) Broadening the agenda: the status of Romani women in Romania, Open Society Institute.
69

Policy Department C: Citizens' Rights and Constitutional Affairs
____________________________________________________________________________________________
 Tasli (2007)
 Townsend, J. G. et al (1999): Women and Power: Fighting Patriarchies and Poverty,
London and New York: Zed Books.
 UN Millennium Project (2005), Taking Action: Achieving Gender Equality and Empowering Women. Task Force on Education and Gender Equality.
 UNDP (2013), Human Development Report http://hdr.undp.org/en/
 UNICEF, Breaking the cycle of exclusion, Roma children in South East Europe, Belgrade,
February 2007.
 The World Bank (2012), Reducing Vulnerabilty and Promoting the Self­employment of Roma in Eastern Europe through Financial Inclusion. Available at http://siteresources.worldbank.org/ECAEXT/Resources/ES_Financial_Inclusion_of_Roma _9_3_2012.docx
National Roma Integration Strategies
 Austria: Austrian Federal Chancellery, Roma in Austria: An EU Framework for National Roma Integration Strategies up to 2020, Political and legal measures.
Available at: http://ec.europa.eu/justice/discrimination/roma/national­ strategies/index_en.htm
 Belgium:
Belgium, February 2012, National Roma Integration Strategy,
Vlaams actieplan MOE (Roma) migranten 2012
Available at: http://ec.europa.eu/justice/discrimination/roma/national­ strategies/index_en.htm
 Bulgaria:
National Roma Integration Strategy of the Republic of Bulgaria (2012 ­ 2020)
Republic of Bulgaria Council of Ministers, Resolution N° 1 of 5 January 2012. Approval of the National Roma Integration Strategy of the Republic of Bulgaria (2012­2020) and Adoption of the Action Plan for Implementation of the National Roma Integration Strategy of the Republic of Bulgaria (2012­2020).
Action Plan for Implementation of the National Roma Integration Strategy of the Republic of Bulgaria (2012­ 2020) and the Decade of Roma Inclusion 2005­2015
Available at: http://ec.europa.eu/justice/discrimination/roma/national­ strategies/index_en.htm
 Cyprus: Policy Measures of Cyprus for the Social Inclusion of Roma.
Available at: http://ec.europa.eu/justice/discrimination/roma/national­ strategies/index_en.htm
70

Empowerment of Roma Women within the European Framework of National Roma Inclusion Strategies
____________________________________________________________________________________________
 Czech Republic.
Czech Republic Government of the Czech Repubilc Annex to Government Resolution N°
393 of 12 April 2006 Principles of the long­term strategy for Roma integration to 2025.
Czech Republic, Minister for Human Rights, Roma Integration Concept for 2010–2013 December 2009.
Czech Republic, Roma Integration Concept 2010 ­ 2013 Implementation Plan, Tasks for Individual Ministries
Available at: http://ec.europa.eu/justice/discrimination/roma/national­ strategies/index_en.htm
 Germany:
Bundesministerium des Innern [Federal Ministry of the Interior] Report from the Federal Republic of Germany to the European Commission An EU Framework for National Roma Integration Strategies up to 2020 –
Annexes: Integrated packages of measures to promote the integration and participation of Sinti and Roma in Germany 2011
Annex 1 Equal participation for Sinti and Roma in Germany Position paper on the European Union framework to improve the situation of Roma in Europe
Annex 2 Access to education – Examples of projects
Annex 3 Access to employment – Examples of projects
Annex 4 Access to healthcare – Examples of projects
Annex 5 Access to housing – Examples of projects
Available at: http://ec.europa.eu/justice/discrimination/roma/national­ strategies/index_en.htm
 Denmark:
Ministry for Social Affairs and Integration Copenhagen, December 2011 Presentation to
the European Commission of Denmark’s National Roma Inclusion Strategy
Høringsnotatom Udkast til Danmarks nationale strategi til inklusion af romaer.
Annex 2, Social­ og Integrationsministeriet Jura og International J.nr. 2011­6568 29. december 2011 Høringsliste Ekstern høring over Udkast til Denmark's national Roma Inclusion Strategy
Available at: http://ec.europa.eu/justice/discrimination/roma/national­ strategies/index_en.htm
 Estonia: National set of policy measures for Roma integration in Estonia.
Available at: http://ec.europa.eu/justice/discrimination/roma/national­ strategies/index_en.htm
71

Policy Department C: Citizens' Rights and Constitutional Affairs
____________________________________________________________________________________________
 Greece, Hellenic Republic Ministry of Labour and Social Security National Strategic Framework For Roma December 2011
Available at: http://ec.europa.eu/justice/discrimination/roma/national­ strategies/index_en.htm
 Spain: National Roma Integration Strategy in Spain 2012 ­2020 Available at: http://ec.europa.eu/justice/discrimination/roma/national­
strategies/index_en.htm
 Finland:
Ministry of Social Affairs And Health, Working group report 2009:the Proposal of the Working Group for a National Policy on Roma
Ministry of Social Affairs and Health Appointment Decision. Steering and monitoring group for the implementation of the National Policy on Roma Appointment. Term of office 6 March 2012–31 December 2013
Ministry of Social Affairs And Health Working group report Finland’s Handbook on the European Policy on Roma, the Objectives of Finland for Advancing the European Policy on Roma.
Available at: http://ec.europa.eu/justice/discrimination/roma/national­ strategies/index_en.htm
 France: An equal place in French society: French government strategy for Roma integration within the framework of the Communication from the Commission of 5 April 2011 and the Council conclusions of 19 May 2011.
 Available at: http://ec.europa.eu/justice/discrimination/roma/national­ strategies/index_en.htm
 Hungary:
National Social Inclusion Strategy – Extreme Poverty, Child Poverty, the Roma–(2011– 2020) Budapest, December 2011 Ministry of Public Administration and Justice State Secretariat for Social Inclusion
Strategy action plan Resolution No. 1430/2011. (XII. 13. ) of the Government Regarding the National Social Inclusion Strategy and Governmental Action Plan for the Implementation Thereof in the Years 2012 to 2014
Annex I NATIONAL SOCIAL INTEGRATION STRATEGY – EXTREME POVERTY, CHILD POVERTY, THE ROMA – (2011 – 2020) SITUATION ANALYSIS
Annex 2 NATIONAL SOCIAL INCLUSION STRATEGY–EXTREME POVERTY, CHILD POVERTY, THE ROMA – (2011 –2020) FRAMEWORK AGREEMENT Between the Government of Hungary and the National Roma Self – Government 20/05/2011
Hungarian documents are available at: http://romagov.kormany.hu/hungarian­national­ social­inclusion­strategy­deep­poverty­child­poverty­and­the­roma
 Ireland: Ireland’s National Traveller / Roma Integration Strategy
72

Empowerment of Roma Women within the European Framework of National Roma Inclusion Strategies
____________________________________________________________________________________________
Available at: http://ec.europa.eu/justice/discrimination/roma/national­ strategies/index_en.htm
 Italy:
National Office on Anti­Racial Discriminations National Focal Point National Strategy for the Inclusion of Roma, Sinti and Caminanti Communities ­ European Commission Communication No.173/2011 Rome, February 28, 2012.
Annex 1: EU Measures, aimed at combating racism, xenophobia and related intolerance, and at strengthening social cohesion, in particular, of the RSC communities in the European Union.
Annex 2: Italian normative context
Annex 3: Regional and provincial regulatory framework
Annex 4: Good/best practices
Available at: http://ec.europa.eu/justice/discrimination/roma/national­ strategies/index_en.htm
 Latvia: Information on Roma integration policy measures in Latvia, Link with national and international standards and legislation, as well as the recommendations of organisations at international and national level.
Available at: http://ec.europa.eu/justice/discrimination/roma/national­ strategies/index_en.htm
 Lithuania: Minister of Culture of the Republic of Lithuania of 20 March 2012 the Action Plan for Roma Integration into the Lithuanian Society For 2012­2014
Availale at: http://ec.europa.eu/justice/discrimination/roma/national­ strategies/index_en.htm
 Luxembourg: Le Gouvernement Du Grand­Duche De Luxembourg, 14/01/2012, Mesures générales d'intégration au Luxembourg
Available at: http://ec.europa.eu/justice/discrimination/roma/national­ strategies/index_en.htm
 Malta: implementation of the National Roma Integration Strategy by Malta. Available at: http://ec.europa.eu/justice/discrimination/roma/national­
strategies/index_en.htm
 The Netherlands: Ministry of the Interior and Kingdom Relations the Netherlands www.rijksoverheid.nl Date December 16, 2011 Policy measures in the Netherlands for the social inclusion of Roma.
Available at: http://ec.europa.eu/justice/discrimination/roma/national­ strategies/index_en.htm
 Portugal: Government of Portugal, Deputy Secretary Of State to the Minister attached to the Prime Minister, Minister for Parliamentary Affairs High Commission for Immigration and Intercultural Dialogue, I.P. National Strategy for the Integration of Roma Communities (2012)350 ­ 02/01/2012.
 73

Policy Department C: Citizens' Rights and Constitutional Affairs
____________________________________________________________________________________________
Available at: http://ec.europa.eu/justice/discrimination/roma/national­ strategies/index_en.htm
 Slovenia: Republika Slovenija/Vlada Republike Slovenije Working Translation Ljubljana 11 March 2010 National Programme of Measures for Roma of the Government of the Republic of Slovenia for the Period 2010–2015
Available at: http://ec.europa.eu/justice/discrimination/roma/national­ strategies/index_en.htm
 Slovakia: The Office of the Plenipotentiary of the Government of the Slovak Republic for Roma communities submits this Strategy of the Slovak Republic for the integration of Roma up to 2020.
Available at: http://ec.europa.eu/justice/discrimination/roma/national­ strategies/index_en.htm
 Poland:
Republic of Poland Minister of Administration and Digitization Michał Boni Warsaw, 28
December 2011 National Roma Integration Strategy.
Ministry of the Interior and Administration, Programme for the Roma community in Poland, Warsaw, August 2003
Annex 1 – The population and distribution Annex 2 – The Roma organizations in Poland Annex 4 – The monitoring
Annex 5 – The Report of the National Minorities Affairs Malopolski Governor’s Attorney which talks about the execution of the Pilot government programme for the Roma community in the Malopolska province for the years 2001 – 2003 in years 2001 – 2002
Annex 6 – The Roma in Poland – description of the situation
The report comprises the implementation method of the Programme for the Roma Community in Poland in 2004­2010
Available at: http://ec.europa.eu/justice/discrimination/roma/national­ strategies/index_en.htm
74

Empowerment of Roma Women within the European Framework of National Roma Inclusion Strategies
____________________________________________________________________________________________
 Romania:
STRATEGY OF THE GOVERNMENT OF ROMANIA FOR THE INCLUSION OF THE
ROMANIAN CITIZENS BELONGING TO ROMA MINORITY FOR THE PERIOD 2012 – 2020
Annex 1. Plans of sectoral measures: A Education, B Employment, C Health, D Housing, E Culture, F Social infrastructure.
Annex 2 to the Strategy: Types of general performance indicators for the priorities of the Government Strategy.
Available at: http://ec.europa.eu/justice/discrimination/roma/national­ strategies/index_en.htm
 Sweden:
A coordinated long­term strategy for Roma Skr.inclusion 2012–2032 2011/12:56The Government hereby submits this communication to the Riksdag. Stockholm, 16 February 2012
Available at: http://ec.europa.eu/justice/discrimination/roma/national­ strategies/index_en.htm
 United Kingdom:
Council Conclusions on an EU Framework Strategy for Roma Integration up to 2020:
United Kingdom of Great Britain and Northern Ireland
Annex 1 ‘Travelling to a Better Future ’Gypsy and Traveller Framework for Action and Delivery Pan Progress report by the ministerial working group on tackling inequalities experienced by Gypsies and Travellers.
Available at: http://ec.europa.eu/justice/discrimination/roma/national­ strategies/index_en.htm
75

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
  ICRW(2019)4 final
7th INTERNATIONAL ROMA WOMEN’S CONFERENCE
ROMA AND TRAVELLER WOMEN’S ACCESS TO JUSTICE AND RIGHTS
INCLUDING TAKING STOCK OF THE IMPLEMENTATION OF THE
THEMATIC ACTION PLAN ON THE INCLUSION OF ROMA AND TRAVELLERS (2016-2019) AND POINTING THE WAY FORWARD FOR THE
POST-2019 STRATEGIC POLICY DOCUMENT ON ROMA AND TRAVELLER INCLUSION
organised under the Finnish Presidency
of the Committee of the Ministers of the Council of Europe
25-27 March 2019 HANAHOLMEN Swedish-Finnish Cultural Centre Espoo, Finland
ANALYTICAL SUMMARY
by Gwendolyn Albert General Rapporteur
23/08/2019

Introduction
In their daily life, many Roma and Traveller women find themselves caught between respect for traditions and new expectations regarding gender roles emanating from contemporary society and their own personal needs.
The overall objective of this conference was to recognise the rights of Roma and Traveller women to live their lives freely and to be able to make their own choices without being subjected to undue pressure from either their communities, their family members, or the states where they live. Its aim was to raise awareness about the serious obstacles faced by Roma and Traveller women in accessing justice and rights.
Finland is at the frontline of the topical human rights issues raised by the Council of Europe, namely the promotion of the human rights of disadvantaged and vulnerable groups, including women and Roma. In the framework of the priorities set by the Finnish Presidency of the Committee of Ministers of the Council of Europe, Finland hosted the 7th International Roma Women’s Conference from 25 to 27 March 2019 in Espoo.
The conference had three aims: first, to review the current state of Roma and Traveller women’s access to justice and rights in Council of Europe member states; second, to review how the Thematic Action Plan on the Inclusion of Roma and Travellers (2016-2019) has been implemented by the member states; and lastly, to indicate the way forward for a Council of Europe post-2019 Strategic Policy Document on Roma and Traveller Inclusion.
This report analyses the main findings of the conference for each of these aspects. It concludes with recommendations made by conference participants during the plenary sessions and the workshops.
1. General observations on Roma and Traveller Women’s discrimination, involvement in the making of integration policy, and access to justice and rights
Intersectional discrimination against Roma and Traveller women was discussed by many participants as a major barrier to their accessing justice and rights. Hate crime against Roma and Traveller women across Europe is a big problem, including ultra-right violence and violence resulting in fatalities. Forced evictions and segregation of Roma and Traveller children in schools are clear indicators that access to justice and rights remains weak. High- level national politicians across the political spectrum, as well as populist and extremist political parties, exploit anti-gypsyist and anti-nomadist rhetoric and openly encourage violence against Roma and Travellers with impunity, while the national institutions responsible for protecting Roma communities against hate-speech and hate crimes remain largely either unable or unwilling to influence this. In many countries, Roma and Traveller- related policies are generally ineffective and Roma and Traveller participation at all levels of policy-making is absent or ineffective. Also, the voice of Roma civil society has weakened in many European countries, such as the Czech Republic, Hungary or the Slovak Republic, due to cuts for financial support of state structures promoting Roma integration. Some states are currently even taking discriminatory approaches to Roma and Traveller-related issues.
The lack of funding and of human resources for Roma and Traveller civil rights organisations means that Roma and Traveller civil society involvement in policy design, implementation and monitoring is largely absent. This also means that many other stakeholders are more influential than Roma and Traveller civil society when it comes to creating and monitoring
[2]

Roma integration policies, to the detriment of policy design, implementation and monitoring. Ignorance of the Roma and Traveller civil rights movement, past and present, is a big factor in this circumstance. With very few exceptions, a common observation among NGOs is that governments and institutions still remain unwilling or unable to efficiently collaborate with Roma and Travellers. There is a clear tendency in some member states to speak of discrimination against Roma as a “European problem” in order to avoid taking responsibility for it. Statelessness and the more general refusal to treat Roma and Travellers as equal before the law render some Roma and Travellers even more vulnerable. To make things worse, in many of the cases, the international community has not granted Roma and Travellers adequate protection.
Given the current state of affairs with respect to Roma and Traveller women’s access to justice and rights it is important to highlight that Mr Rauno Merisaari, Human Rights Ambassador of Finland, told the conference that as a Council of Europe and European Union member state, “Finland is ready for a more ambitious European policy on Roma.” He observed that involving women was key to advancing European policy and that Roma and Traveller women currently were a driving force for promoting European policy at the CoE. He called on other member states to provide more political commitment and resources to relevant programmes. Local, national and European policies should complement each other in order to reduce structural discrimination. Therefore, different international minority rights and human rights treaties, Council of Europe project funding, ECRI and EU funds should be used for this purpose both nationally and locally. Combining national mainstreaming policies with locally targeted actions – a twin-track approach – would be the ideal combination, but too often just one or the other approach was taken, which meant that there was less long- term impact. Meaningful participation was important to add to this twin-track approach, and the voice of the Roma and Travellers in policy design should be encouraged through long- term political dialogue. There should be more discussion of this at the Committee of Ministers, and the Council of Europe needed to become a stronger institution by standing with human rights defenders. The Finnish Presidency of the Committee of Ministers of the Council of Europe is emphasizing this in its social media campaigns (“I STAND WITH HUMAN RIGHTS DEFENDERS” - #WeSupportHumanRights).
2. Taking Stock of the implementation of the Thematic Action Plan on the Inclusion of Roma and Travellers (2016-2019)
In her opening remarks, Mrs Tarja Halonen, former President of Finland, informed the conference that in her view, the opportunities available for Roma inclusion were not being taken advantage of by the Council of Europe member states and their efforts to date were not enough to address structural discrimination against Roma and Travellers in Europe. Her remarks were followed by a summary of the Action Plan implementation review from Mr Hallvard Gorseth, Head of the Anti-Discrimination Department and Head of Department a.i. for the Roma and Travellers Team, Directorate General of Democracy of the Council of Europe. Mr Gorseth noted that this was the second time Finland had hosted a Council of Europe International Roma Women’s conference and expressed appreciation for this commitment. He informed the conference that intersectionality was an important concept at the Council and that the review of the Action Plan’s implementation would include a gender perspective with respect to improving access to justice, with respect to promoting equality, and with respect to approaching the protection of reproductive rights and family cohesion.
[3]

2.1. Council of Europe review of the implementation of the Thematic Action Plan on the Inclusion of Roma and Travellers (2016-2019) through project work
Mr Thorsten Afflerbach, Head of Division for the Roma and Travellers Team, Council of Europe, recalled that the Action Plan’s three priorities were: 1) Tackling anti-Roma and anti- Traveller prejudice, discrimination and crimes (“anti-Gypsyism”); 2) Demonstrating innovative models for inclusive policies for the most vulnerable; and 3) Promoting innovative models for local-level solutions. The
 Ad Hoc Committee of Experts on Roma and Traveller
 Issues (CAHROM), which includes experts from 41 of the 47 Council of Europe member states, was overseeing its implementation. As of 2015, there have also been biannual Council of Europe Dialogue meetings with Roma and Traveller civil society. The Plan had been implemented through joint programmes with the European Commission such as
  INSCHOOL, JUSTROM,
ROMACT, and ROMACTED,
through law enforcement trainings,
  support
to the European Roma Institute for Arts and Culture (ERIAC), as well as previous
 International Romani Women’s conferences and their follow-up trainings.
 The EU/Council of Europe Joint Programme ROMACT had been implemented since 2013 in 105 municipalities in Bulgaria and Romania with the objective of building up political will and sustained policy engagement through capacity-building at local level. The project aimed at improving local democracy, accountability, inclusiveness and responsiveness towards
 Roma citizens and thereby improving the delivery and use of services.
 Similarly, the ROMACTED programme (2017-2020) aimed to build up political will and the sustained policy engagement of local authorities in order to enhance democratic local governance. The programme was currently being implemented in 61 municipalities in the Western Balkans and Turkey. Like ROMACT, it stimulated the empowerment of local Roma communities and their capacity to contribute to the design, implementation and monitoring of plans and projects concerning them. The project also assisted the local authorities with integrating Roma-specific dimensions and measures into mainstream local policies, budgets and public service delivery. The participation of Roma women at local level, particularly as members of the community action groups (CAG), and the design of local, specific solutions that address the priorities identified by the women in the community were crucial features of
 this programme.
 Gender balance was an important aspect of these programmes: 55% of those attending local ROMACT meetings were women, while a total of 281 women took part regularly in the CAG meetings and other local dynamics generated by ROMACTED. For both programmes, in some of the municipalities it had been decided to have a specific Community Action group(s) composed only of Roma women, while in other municipalities it was still a challenge to mobilise Roma women to participate regularly in the process. It was a priority for all the ROMACT and ROMACTED teams, regional, national and local, to improve the conditions
 for the participation of Roma women.
The 6th International Roma Women’s Conference about improving political participation and representation of Roma and Traveller women was followed up by training sessions throughout 2017-2018. The conference itself was attended by some 70 Roma and Traveller women, party members or sitting members of parliaments, experts and diplomats and had over 100 participants in total. One of its key recommendations to political parties, international organisations, governmental and European representatives – namely to train Roma and Traveller women to run for election – was followed up by training sessions in 2017 in Germany and in 2018 in Moldova. In 2019, a training session was envisaged in Greece. International organisations, governments, civil society, practitioners and academics [4]

should also invest in capacity-building, and good practices should be supported such as community mediators (as in a current project underway in Ukraine). Action needed to be taken to eradicate obstacles to voting, including resolving the fundamental issues of lack of personal identification and statelessness. Measures to increase Roma and Traveller women’s political participation should be promoted as part of an overarching gender equality strategy including actions to overcome gender stereotypes and sexism. As a result of the conference, 13 political parties in attendance signed its Pledge to improve Roma and Traveller women’s participation, which had been translated into 15 languages.1 On 8 April 2018, Secretary General Jagland urged political parties to fast-track Roma and Traveller women into politics and referenced the pledge, which the Roma and Travellers Team invites everybody to join. Many audio-visual and written materials from the conference were available at https://www.coe.int/en/web/roma-and-travellers/international-roma-women-s- rights-conferences.
The Joint Programme on Roma Women’s Access to Justice (JUSTROM), implemented in Bulgaria, Greece, Italy and Romania, provided legal aid and training by setting up legal clinics (two per country). The project had so far provided information and services to more than 3,000 women in more than 50 communities. Its second phase resulted in more than 600 legal submissions. Trainings had been offered to more than 140 judges, 130 police, and to staff in women’s prisons. Programme manager Ms Michèle Bergdoll, along with representatives from three country teams, presented its methodology as first involving Roma women to inform them of their rights, and training legal professionals (judges, lawyers, police, prison staff, prosecutors), media and social workers about Roma women’s access to justice, anti-Gypsyism, and Council of Europe standards. She emphasised that, for a common sense of ownership, all stakeholders - bar associations, civil society, equality bodies, police, universities, local and national authorities - had been involved in developing the proposal for a two-year extension of the project.
Ms Alexandra Karagianni (Greece) said that the programme was about more than improving access to courts or getting lawyers, as there was no access to justice when many Roma were afraid of the system. During the pilot phase, a top-down approach was easier, since the main priority was to address the authorities with the programme’s findings, and this advocacy resulted in a significant amendment to the law about birth registration to include Roma women, in procedural improvements regarding identification cards, and in the Greek Parliament passing legislation improving Roma access to citizenship. The JUSTROM team also initiated the national Gender Equality Body’s possible adaptation of a new law concerning gender-based violence. During JUSTROM2, the programme used a bottom-up approach to empower the community and advised professionals working for community centres on how to support their beneficiaries with accessing legal services. The JUSTROM teams also closely cooperated with two women’s associations and pointed out that more gender mainstreaming was needed.2
Ms Teodora Krumova (Bulgaria) expressed her gratitude to the people involved in the field with the programme in two localities, one in Plovdiv dealing with patriarchal attitudes, radicalization tendencies, segregation and violence against women, and one more diverse locality in Veliko Turnovo. Strong civil society organisations in both places invested resources and capacities into the project and there was a good synergy between them. The network of community moderators from the Amalipe NGO, with the support of the Bar Association in Veliko Turnovo, used pro bono legal services through JUSTROM, and local
1 https://rm.coe.int/pledge-on-political-representation-of-roma-women-/168076252b
2 Recommendation CM/Rec(2017)10 of the Committee of Ministers to member States on improving access to justice for Roma and Travellers in Europe, available at https://rm.coe.int/168075f2aa.
     [5]

Roma ownership of the project was developed. Roma women gained confidence that institutions would support them, and the community began to realize that violence against women was unacceptable and would spark criminal law consequences. Institutions have also begun to change their attitude about violence against women as a “Roma problem”. The Veliko Turnovo Bar Association continued this work in remote locations and police were also consulting the programme now about how to aid victims of child marriages and violence against women.
Ms Argentina Dragutinovic (Italy) told the conference that immigrant Roma women living in Naples had applied for political asylum and had never received any official communication about their cases. They had asked for JUSTROM’s aid and saw that this programme was not just aid for individuals, but for their entire families. At the beginning, they had believed that JUSTROM were there to exploit them the way other NGOs do, but over time they had understood that that was not the case, and the programme served 60 to 70 people a week at the legal clinics, aiding them, for example, with accessing health care services. Women from the Bosnian immigrant Roma community initially referred the JUSTROM staff to their husbands, as they were not really allowed to speak for themselves or to present their own views, but the staff explained they needed to speak with the women and then helped them to visit doctors and local authorities. Many of those Roma women did not even believe that women could be employed, and at first, they asked the JUSTROM staff how their husbands could allow them to work outside the home; within two years, though, 15 of them were employed themselves, and the men in the community are even proud of this now. In Italy, JUSTROM also enrolled 172 children into school for the first time, from primary through secondary school. In Giuliano, for example, the Roma children had been rejected by the school because local non-Roma parents feared that they would have infectious diseases; JUSTROM had all the children vaccinated and helped them enrol in a school.
2.2. Roma NGO perspectives on the implementation of the Thematic Action Plan
Mrs Miranda Vuolasranta, President of the European Roma and Travellers Forum (ERTF), and President a.i.3 of the International Roma Women’s Network IRWN/Phenjalipe, gave the ERTF perspective on the implementation of the Action Plan. She first emphasised that the ERTF was an advocacy umbrella organisation,4 not an implementer. ERTF advocated for combating racial discrimination and for improving the living conditions of Roma in Europe by voicing Roma concerns as a stakeholder, including by contributing to the design of Council of Europe meetings on women’s rights and participating in them, and participating in the Council’s Dialogue meetings with Roma and Traveller civil society and other conferences.
The ERTF President regretted the fact that while there were 3,500 Roma and Traveller organisations in Europe, those who were most regularly invited to international consultations on Roma and Traveller policies were the Brussels-based Roma networks. She also felt that Roma and Traveller civil society could have been further consulted in developing the Thematic Action Plan and that the impact of the Plan’s projects had not been communicated to Roma and Traveller civil society effectively enough.
Her review of the progress reports on the implementation of the Action Plan was the following:
3 The new President of IRWN/Phenjalipe, Christina Raducan, was elected after these remarks were given.
4 Representing the International Romani Union (IRU), Roma National Congress (RNC), International Roma Women Network (IRWN-Phenjalipe), Gypsies and Travellers International Evangelical Fellowship (GATIEF), East Meets West (EMW) Roma youth organisation, International Romani Mission (IREM).
  [6]

1) For the first priority of tackling anti-Gypsyism, including anti-Roma and anti-Traveller crime, discrimination and prejudice, the activities reported did not seem to have been of a nature or on a scale that could convincingly achieve results. Details about beneficiaries and impact were missing from the progress reports. A synthesized assessment of the impact of the Dosta! Campaign was needed, and implementation of it required partnering with civil society more.
2) For the second priority of improving access to justice, the reports do not describe the impact of the meetings of the Operational Platform for Roma Equality (OPRE): while an OPRE joint statement on evictions of Roma and Travellers was co-ordinated by the SRSG Roma Support Team and signed by six intergovernmental organisations, the impact of that exercise is not reported.5 Similarly, a synthesized assessment of the impact of JUSTROM needed to be clearly communicated to the public and Roma civil society; in addition to quantitative information about the number of events, information about impact and sustainability needed to be reported.
3) For the third priority of empowerment and participation, in the ERTF’s view, this was the area where the least progress had been made. The question was raised as to whether the consultants and experts engaged to design and implement these projects were really also the best-placed to assess the efficiency and impact of the empowerment activities. Moreover, it was not clear from the implementation reports to what degree the Council of Europe was financially and technically supporting civil society input to the Council.
Ms Manjola Veizi, Vice-President of the International Roma Women’s Network IRWN/Phenjalipe, reviewed its activities undertaken for and with Roma and Traveller women and its assessment of the Action Plan. In 2016, the Council of Europe’s Support Team of the Special Representatives of the SG for Roma Issues and Soraya Post MEP had supported a meeting in Brussels between the IRWN and Phenjalipe to create a new joint network to advance Romani women and girls’ empowerment. Members6 agreed to combine their objectives and to prioritize the Strategy for the Advancement of Romani Women and Girls 2014-2020. In June 2016, 17 members of IRWN/Phenjalipe were invited by the Council of Europe for a two-day study visit to Strasbourg, where they were trained in fundraising and other skills. The network’s short-term and long-term objectives were defined, and initial responsibilities and tasks were distributed. The network contributed to the design of the Sixth International Roma Women’s Conference, where the lack of Roma women’s participation in decision-making bodies was proposed as the topic by 23 Roma women’s organisations. The administrative requirements for registering the new network in France were not resolved until 2018, when the Council’s Roma and Travellers Unit supported the network’s Governing Board members to meet in Strasbourg and complete the registration.
As for the Thematic Action Plan, IRWN/Phenjalipe expressed appreciation for the member states’ efforts to date to train police and other state administration bodies about anti- Gypsyism, but believed this would not be enough if there was no commitment to bolster anti- discrimination legislation with tougher sanctions. Likewise, the network appreciated the ROMACT, ROMACTED and JUSTROM joint programmes, but was concerned that Roma civil society had not been involved in their design. Lastly, IRWN/Phenjalipe was not aware of what the impact of the Pledge to promote political participation and representation by Roma and Traveller women had been.
5 https://rm.coe.int/1st-progress-report-implementing-the-action-plan/168073df4e
6 From Albania, Austria, Bosnia-Herzegovina, Croatia, Czech Republic, France, Hungary, Italy, Moldova, Montenegro, North Macedonia, Romania and Serbia.
  [7]

3. Council of Europe’s post-2019 Strategic Policy Document on Roma and Traveller Inclusion
The development of a post-2019 strategic policy document on Roma and Traveller Inclusion for the Council of Europe coincides with developments at the European Commission for the extension of the EU Roma Framework beyond 2020. Ms Sirpa Pietikainen MEP (EPP) informed the conference that she had signed a letter to the European Commission asking for the EU Roma Framework to be extended, in part because not all of the EU-28 had been taking advantage of the available funding for promoting Roma inclusion, a fact that the Council of Europe’s own forthcoming strategy should somehow address.
Mr Hallvard Gorseth, Head of the Anti-Discrimination Department and Head of Department a.i. for the Roma and Travellers Team, Directorate General of Democracy, Council of Europe, said that the new Council of Europe strategy would designate priorities for the Council’s future work on Roma and Traveller inclusion. He also emphasised that Roma and Traveller women’s civil society input during and after the meeting would be crucial to defining that work.
In this regard, Ms Mervi Sarimo, Ministerial Adviser, Ministry of Justice, Finland, informed the conference that support for crime victims was a crucial step towards promoting equal access to justice. The two main international legal instruments to draw from were the EU Crime Victims Directive of 2012 and the Istanbul Convention. States should ensure that victims and their families ha access to victim support services free of charge that were relevant to them, including advice related to financial and practical issues, emotional support, and referral to other services, because some victims were in circumstances where they required expert support. Women and children should be offered access to shelter and specialist support services due to the risk of repeat victimization, and victims of close relationship violence, gender-based violence and sexual violence deserved trauma counseling. There should be 24/7 telephone lines established to provide this. The EU Directive said member states should ensure that victims were recognized and treated in a non-discriminatory manner within the context of criminal proceedings, and this included citizenship, nationality or residence status as grounds for non-discrimination. Violence could escalate into persecution if it was not reported, and while crime victims were entitled to victim support, they had to be aware of it and had to have access to it. More awareness-raising about this was needed in the Roma and Traveller community.
Mr Ioannis Dimitrakopoulos, Scientific Adviser at the European Union Agency for Fundamental Rights (FRA), informed the conference that gender equality affected all of society, that regression on this issue was underway across Europe, and that it had to be counteracted. Roma and Traveller women were particularly vulnerable, and early and child marriages in some communities were a complicating factor. It was important that Roma and Traveller women and girls claimed their rights. FRA’s research demonstrated that no adequate action was currently being taken on this, and the European Commission had published recommendations on how equality bodies could reach out to individuals affected by discrimination, communicate with them so that they claimed their rights, and increase sanctions so they would be dissuasive. In his view, European states needed to transit to a discussion with Roma and Traveller communities about their human rights – for example, instead of lamenting Roma and Traveller non-participation in education, the state should help Roma and Travellers to understand that education was their children’s right, and that meant being honest with the public about bullying and safety at school, about issues of respect for different languages, and about the celebration or negation of children’s ethnic
[8]

identity. The civil society work being done in this regard needed to be taken up by the governments and intergovernmental institutions such as the Council of Europe.
Mr Dan Doghi, Chief of the OSCE/ODIHR Contact Point for Roma and Sinti Issues (CPRSI), noted that Roma and Sinti women were significantly underrepresented politically in the OSCE area, even when they had obtained enough education to qualify as candidates, and ODIHR’s election observation missions had commented on this. In terms of participating as voters, lack of identification documents meant that many Roma and Sinti could not vote. Other issues included “family voting” (where ballots were not individually completed), vote- buying in Roma and Sinti communities, etc. Roma and Sinti women’s lack of awareness of the political systems was due to a lack of civic education and a lack of female Roma and Sinti role models in politics. The established parties remained mostly closed to Roma and Sinti women candidates. Violence against women was also a persistent challenge, and the violence against Roma and Sinti women was intensified by the racism and other barriers they encountered when attempting to accessing public services, which put them at greater risk of sexual violence and trafficking. Unfortunately, even criminal justice authorities tended to excuse violence against women in Roma and Sinti families as endemic to their “culture”. With respect to other violence targeting Roma and Sinti women, the ODIHR had provided a forum for dialogue on the issue of forced and coercive sterilization and the need to compensate the victims of these rights violations. Redress for police misconduct against members of their communities was also something Roma and Sinti women did not generally know how to access.
4. Recommendations from the Plenary Sessions and the Workshops
There were several recommendations for the post-2019 strategy that were mentioned during the plenary sessions or workshop reporting events that were livestreamed online and therefore could receive real-time feedback from those participating, both remotely and from within the venue itself. The livestream and online commenting opportunity doubled the number of conference participants. This transparent approach to communicating with the conference live in real time was greatly appreciated by those attending and observing.
4.1. Recommendations emanating from the Plenary Sessions
1) Sirpa Pietikainen MEP (EPP) recommended that a special spokesperson for Roma and Traveller issues be established institutionally as part of the intergovernmental and international order in Europe.
2) ERTF President Ms Miranda Vuolosranta proposed conducting an analysis of the impact of the Council of Europe’s “Dosta! Campaign” and improving it based on that analysis. She also said that it was very important to involve more civil society NGOs at national and European level in the campaign dissemination.
 3) IRWN/Phenjalipe Vice President Ms Manjola Veizi proposed that the Council of Europe
 should consider nominating a member of Roma and Traveller civil society in each member state involved with CAHROM to communicate with and involve Roma and Traveller civil society organisations in CAHROM.
4) Ms Ursula Till-Tentschert, Deputy Head of Unit, Technical Assistance & Capacity Building Unit, European Union Agency for Fundamental Rights (FRA), recommended that the General Data Protection Regulations (GDPR) should be used to promote compliance with fundamental rights provisions and to protect against discrimination. She insisted on transparency about the design of algorithms generating “big data”; on assessing the potentially discriminatory impact of data-supported decisions; and on the provision of meaningful explanations about how algorithms operate to the public so people can
[9]

 challenge data-supported decisions and access remedies for any such decisions
resulting in discrimination or violation of other rights.
5) Ms Carmen Santiago Reyes, Spain; Ms Yvonne MacNamara and Ms Jenni Berlin of The
Traveller Movement, United Kingdom; and Ms Jenita Rauta, of the Finnish Police, all discussed how online campaigning and smartphone technology could be used to encourage victims and witnesses of discrimination and hate crime to report it to the authorities and recommended focusing on the use of such technology as part of empowering Roma and Traveller women to access the justice system
4.2. Recommendations emanating from the Workshops
1) Assign new resources for these networks so that they can become effective multipliers and bring the ROMACT and ROMACTED Community Action Group members together to share their expertise with each other and with Roma and Traveller women’s networks, including expertise on how to develop sustainability.
2) Promote and support reintegration programmes for Roma and Travellers re-entering society, whether after returning home from emigration abroad or from prison, that involve civil society networks of Roma and Traveller women.
4.2.2. Roma and Traveller women’s general access to justice
1) Roma and Traveller women should be encouraged and included in decision-making consultation processes from the local and regional community level to the national and international levels.
2) States should assess Roma and Traveller women’s access to justice and the impact of the international, national and local strategies on gender equality, and should define the necessary gender equality indicators for the National Roma Integration Strategies, such as following the comparative outcomes of particular activities, policies and programmes for women and men, or changes to the comparative situations or status of women and men (such as levels of participation or poverty, for example).
3) Council of Europe member states, NGOs, and other relevant bodies should continue promoting the formulation/improvement/modification of free legal aid programmes to facilitate access to justice for Roma and Traveller women.
4) Develop specific strategies for effectively including Roma and Traveller women’s civil society input into the design, implementation and monitoring of such programmes.
5) Train existing Roma and Traveller mediators in how to promote access to justice and encourage them to disseminate the information and help facilitate access to justice.
6) Establish monitoring mechanisms for access to justice that will involve all stakeholders, from the international to the national to the civil society level.
4.2.3. Role of equality bodies in monitoring and enforcing Roma and Traveller women’s equal access to justice and rights
1) Promote ombudspersons’ abilities to work ex officio and with intersectionality, including aspects of poverty, ensuring that free, accessible and functional legal aid schemes exist in the member states.
2) Promote Roma and Traveller women’s consultation to and participation in the national equality bodies and in EQUINET.
 4.2.1 Roma and Traveller women’s networks’ cooperation with the CoE-EU joint programmes ROMACT and ROMACTED
[10]

3) Promote research into what Roma and Traveller women need in order to access justice and rights in practice.
4) Promote gender-sensitive data collection and the gender dimension generally.
5) Mainstream the approach of the OSCE police trainings to other judicial authorities on
these issues through EQUINET.
6) Promote leadership by employers, whether private or public, to achieve gender balance
as part of their social responsibility.
4.2.4. Child marriage, early marriage and forced marriage
1) These harmful practices and serious human rights violations should be eradicated primarily by Roma communities with the support of the states and NGOs.
2) Approaches to combating this phenomenon should be tailored to the Roma communities involved, which are very diverse, acknowledging that input from all genders is crucial to the success of the applied measures.
3) States should promote equal treatment of Roma and Travellers before the law and law enforcement, emphasising that culture/tradition is no excuse for violating children’s rights.
4) States should promote research on these issues and develop legal frameworks for combating child/early/forced marriage before the age of 18 and towards eventually
criminalising it.
5) Educational institutions should promote sex education for all genders in both informal and
formal education as part of children’s right to information.
6) Promote work on this issue by Roma and Traveller persons of all genders, various NGOs
and other stakeholders.
4.2.5. Forced removal of Roma and Traveller children from their families by the state
1) Forced removal of Roma and Traveller children should only be used as a last resort because, according to research, it is extremely risky for children to be reared in institutions instead of in families, as they are disproportionately likely to become addicted, homeless, or suicidal if they do not develop a clear sense of belonging.
2) States and regional administration should promote communication between child welfare institutions and Roma and Traveller parents with a view to preferring social support for families over institutionalisation.
3) States should include research on Roma and Traveller children’s placements into institutional care as part of their general quality control system for child welfare measures and develop alternative measures together with Roma families through open child welfare services.
4) States should promote the training of child welfare authorities, public care and child-care institutions on the situation of Roma and Traveller communities, cultures, and diversity affecting child-rearing practices in order to develop their knowledge base, intercultural skills and understanding.
4.2.6. Violence against women, including forced sterilisation and gender violence
1) States implementing the Istanbul Convention should ensure Roma and Traveller civil society input about breaking the taboo of gender violence and eliminating all forms of violence against women through work done with all genders.
2) Continue to call on Council of Europe member states to compensate the victims of forced sterilizations as a matter of priority, and promote general awareness-raising about the issue and the imperative of women providing free and informed consent to reproductive health care procedures.
[11]

3) Promote the design of data collection processes about Roma and Traveller women who are victims of reproductive/obstetric/gender violence.
4) Medical professionals should develop methods and security procedures to combat forced sterilisation, different forms of obstetric violence, and violations of reproductive rights.
5) Promote awareness-raising among Roma and Traveller women about how to defend their
rights when they are subjected to violence, and how to help each other defend their rights
when they are subjected to violence.
6) Promote Roma and Traveller women’s involvement in the Group of Experts on Action
against Violence against Women and Domestic Violence (GREVIO) process by reporting
violations to it.
7) Provide training to police about violence against women and reproductive rights
violations.
4.2.7. Forced evictions and pogroms against Roma and Travellers
1) Make combating pan-European anti-Gypsyism and anti-nomadism a priority on the agenda of the international community, especially in the context of security of tenure for Roma and Travellers.
2) Promote mechanisms for monitoring law enforcement practices in cases of forced evictions that sometimes rise to the level of hate crimes and pogroms, often involving personal injury, property damage, or violence, with a view to holding local administrations accountable for neglecting their obligations to safeguard Roma and Travellers’ right for freedom of movement, safety, housing and privacy.
3) To prevent forced evictions and pogroms against Roma and Travellers, member states, local authorities and police should pilot the use of depolarization and conflict resolution measures at the early stages of emerging inter-ethnic crisis situations and pilot restorative justice practices during and after such crises.
5. General Encouragements
The following more general encouragements were addressed to Roma and Traveller women and to their allies and reflect fundamental principles necessary to the promotion of Roma and Traveller women’s empowerment and protection of their human rights.
“You are entitled to be different and visible. Be visible, be proud.”
- Mrs Tarja Halonen, Former President of Finland
”An attack on anybody based on their culture is an attack on all of us. There is no separation between us. We who have a voice must use it. Let’s commit to not remaining quiet. Hate speech is loud, we must be louder.”
- Ms Vivian Isberg, Finnish Roma Youth Activist
  [12]

 DIRECTORATE GENERAL OF DEMOCRACY
Directorate of Anti-Discrimination Roma and Travellers Team
IRWC(2021)6 Strasbourg, 15 March 2022
8th INTERNATIONAL ROMA WOMEN’S CONFERENCE PROTECTING THE HUMAN RIGHTS AND DIGNITY
OF ROMA AND TRAVELLER1 WOMEN IN TIMES OF CRISES 24-26 November 2021
REPORT
by Nesime Salioska General Rapporteur
 organised by the Roma and Travellers Team, Council of Europe,
 the Ministry of Labour and Social Affairs, North Macedonia and
 Roma and Traveller civil society organisations
    1 The term “Roma and Travellers” is used at the Council of Europe to encompass the wide diversity of the groups covered by the work of the Council of Europe in this field: on the one hand a) Roma, Sinti/Manush, Calé, Kaale, Romanichals, Boyash/Rudari; b) Balkan Egyptians (Egyptians and Ashkali); c) Eastern groups (Dom, Lom and Abdal); and, on the other hand, groups such as Travellers, Yenish, and the populations designated under the administrative term “Gens du voyage”, as well as persons who identify themselves as Gypsies. The present is an explanatory footnote, not a definition of Roma and/or Travellers.
1

Contents
1. Introduction.......................................................................................................................................... 3 2. General observations and conclusions .................................................................................................... 4 3. Recommendations ................................................................................................................................... 7
Civil society recommendations regarding the work of the Council of Europe....................................... 8 Civil society recommendations regarding the work of the member states ........................................... 8
Civil society recommendations regarding the work of the Roma and Traveller and pro-Roma and Traveller Civil Society ............................................................................................................................... 9
4. Proceedings ............................................................................................................................................ 10 4.1. Opening statements and keynote speeches ................................................................................. 10
4.2. Plenary session 1: How the pandemic has impacted on Roma and Traveller women and girls’ health? .................................................................................................................................................... 12
4.3. Plenary session 2: Parallel workshops............................................................................................ 14 4.3.1. How to become influencers? Youth activism! ........................................................................ 14 4.3.2. Racism, antigypsyism and anti-nomadism..............................................................................14 4.3.3. Intersectional Romani Feminism ............................................................................................. 15 4.3.4. Empowerment through art......................................................................................................15
4.4. Plenary session 3: How the pandemic affects the problem of statelessness and lack of ID? ...... 15 4.4.1 Advancing gender equality of Roma and Traveller Women in Council of Europe member
states................................................................................................................................................... 17 4.5. Plenary session 4: Parallel workshops............................................................................................ 17 4.5.1. Environmental racism .............................................................................................................. 17 4.5.2. Education of children and training .......................................................................................... 18 4.5.3. Employment ............................................................................................................................. 18 4.5.4. Being LGBTI and Roma or Traveller women............................................................................19 4.6. Closing remarks ............................................................................................................................... 19
 
1. Introduction
The current COVID-19 situation has brought to light many systemic and structural failings that protect Roma and Traveller women and girls, highlighting also the ambient antigypsyism and anti-nomadism which in many countries are manifesting themselves as racist actions towards Roma and Travellers.
The
examined whether intergovernmental co-operation and existing National Roma Inclusion Strategies support the measures taken by national authorities during
the COVID-19 pandemic. The conference aimed to provide answers to the three main questions:
 8th International Roma Women’s Conference “PROTECTING THE HUMAN RIGHTS AND DIGNITY OF
 ROMA AND TRAVELLER WOMEN IN TIMES OF CRISES”
1)
2) 3)
How should the Council of Europe, member states and civil society target the specific needs of women and girls by developing Roma and Traveller women and girls gender equality related thematic work in the member states?
Which priorities should be put forward to ensure that Roma and Traveller women and girls are not left behind but can equally benefit from the on-going and future crisis mitigation efforts?
How can civil society organisations in general, and Roma and Traveller women’s civil society organisations in particular, influence the advancement of gender equality and of gender mainstreaming?
Approximately 120 participants participated physically and online. They represented Roma and Traveller women’s civil society organisations and networks; gender equality rapporteurs; members of national parliaments and other elected officials; representatives of governmental authorities or agencies; representatives of European Institutions or Agencies and of other International Organisations; as well as academia.
The conference was enriched by confident and dedicated Roma and Traveller women who delivered excellent presentations and spoke with the voice of vulnerable groups from the community to bring better understanding of the emerging needs and issues, which unfortunately have developed and deepened existing inequalities in an uncontrolled way due to the COVID-19 health crisis. Likewise, compelling presentations by some men, clearly expressed their understanding of gender equality as a concept from which the whole community and society, including men themselves will benefit.
On 24th November, during the conference, the Slovak Government adopted a resolution and formally apologised for the coercive sterilisation of socially-disadvantaged women in the years 1966-1989, among which Roma women were the most affected. The resolution is to be followed-up by a compensation mechanism. Human rights organisations have had for years been demanding that Slovakia admit to the systematic human rights violations as it symbolises a reconciliation effort and positive expression towards marginalised communities.
  3

2. General observations and conclusions
According to Roma and Traveller women their main challenge at the moment is the fact that manifestations of systemic and institutional racism during the global pandemic have intensified and overlapped with intersectional discrimination. Roma and Traveller women and girls’ vulnerabilities are mainly based on unequal access to basic and specialised health care services and generally poor living conditions. Poor accommodation is specifically problematic when children have to access classes online remotely, while living in overcrowded spaces. This worsens the inequality of education. During the lockdown, many Roma and Traveller women and girls, whose homes are not safe, have become more exposed to domestic violence. As a result of ethnic stigma, the amplitude of violence was and remains unreported and invisible while COVID-19 has become the leading cause of institutional unresponsiveness.
Roma and Traveller women and girls continue to face many social barriers and prejudices which do not allow them to participate in public life. They continue to be underrepresented in the local, national and international political structures and decision-making processes.
Although there is a systematic approach to overcome employment issues in the Balkan region and in Europe, analysis shows that it should be constantly upgraded and adjusted to the specific needs.
Responsibility for respecting human rights is twice as high in pandemic times. Challenges at policy level are not only related to the gaps in the implementation and the allocation of funds of the existing ones but can also be linked to inefficient government structures.
Conclusion 1: Making progress towards greater inclusion of Roma and Traveller women and girls is not only a human rights imperative, it is a key component of how countries can respond to the challenges they face.
 As part of this discussion it was concluded that most importantly no country in Europe has an accurate number of its Roma and Traveller citizens according to the official census. Many Roma do not officially register their ethnicity as they are afraid of discrimination, long-standing assimilation pressures, and lack of information on the benefits of registration. Some are still left without civil status and documentation and struggle to prove or gain nationality in the countries in which they live. This all leads to the creation of “invisible” citizens, legally defined as stateless or persons living without IDs. Recognition of their existence and addressing their challenges is one of the ways to move forward since many of them cannot
 access education, health services, social benefits, and employment opportunities. In addition, whenever an integration policy is established, indicators cannot be fully effective, outcomes cannot be properly predicted or quantitatively measured without this kind of data. In relation to this issue, factors of gender discrimination can also be seen as causes and consequences of Roma statelessness. The first risk of statelessness is the lack of birth certification due to the lack of documentation of the mother. It is essential to ensure equal parental rights for all women regardless of whether they have identification documents themselves.
4

 “Certain pandemic challenges can be tackled much more easily if there is an existing system which addresses the demands and needs of citizens”2
Conclusion 2: Mainstream society and states need to see young Roma and Traveller women and girls not as a threat or a burden, but as a huge untapped potential. This approach will support more vibrant young women to be part of diverse societies and to contribute to their development.
The main challenge of Roma and Traveller young women and girls can initially be seen as the absence of their needs in policy documents while at the same time they lack political education. Roma and Traveller young women’s needs are related to their access to rights, tools and provision of equal opportunities as a way to invest back to their communities.
Young Roma and Traveller women and girls who lack opportunities of equal participation both in their own community and in the wider society; whose capacities are not resourced even though they are highly educated, usually migrate to seek better opportunities elsewhere, instead of accessing employment opportunities in local or national governments. Their potential should be used not only to provide new kind of initiatives for economic development of their communities but more importantly to introduce diversity, avoid homogenous structures and illustrate openness by the society for persons with different backgrounds. It was emphasised that the best tool to fight against stereotypes and prejudices is by embracing them, meaning an open space for discussions around stereotypes is needed as by hiding from them taboos are created.
“The young people (women) of today are the leaders and influencers of tomorrow.”3
Conclusion 3: We need to fight absolute poverty in all its aspects to empower Roma and Traveller women to access the labour market so that they become more economically independent as individuals and at community level and also more resilient to domestic violence.
In relation to this conclusion we must not forget the ones who fall through the net of the educational system and who do not have an opportunity to access proper education and who, due to the lack of support and information, do not manage to exit the cycle of intergenerational poverty, still live in poor living conditions and in homes which do not satisfy the minimum requirements such as lacking electricity, running water, and a toilet or a bathroom. As a result, many escape dire circumstances and become asylum seekers with a focus on those from non-EU countries. As a consequence,
Generally, the high unemployment rate puts Roma and Traveller women at risk of working in the informal economy and eventually the inability to access pension and social security rights. Roma women are currently mostly employed in the informal sector, in jobs such as scrap, paper and metal collecting, flower selling and cleaning. As nearly all their jobs require public space and social interaction, during the times of social distancing measures and lockdowns their sources of income decreased or stalled entirely.
2 Statement by Jagoda Sahpaska, Minister of Labor and Social Policy of North Macedonia
3 Conclusion from the workshop on Youth Activism, Rapporteur, Berill Baranyai (Portugal), ADI ROM Rapporteur on Roma and Traveller youth
 another generation of
 Roma and Traveller women and girls is lost since many of them abandoned education as children.
 5

Additionally, most Roma and Traveller women are not informed about business application procedures; they do not know how to promote their work and how the labour market works in terms of digitalisation, social networks and online platforms.
The National Traveller Women’s Forum in Ireland have been advocating at national level to introduce a National Traveller Employment and Enterprise Strategy that will help to improve employment opportunities for Traveller women. However, it needs to be resourced since funding is still lacking.
Governments must work with employers in the public and private sectors to open doors for real employment opportunities for Roma and Traveller women.
“Roma women have ideas, they are creative, but they need to be taught how to realise them and how to move from the informal to the formal sphere of work.”4
Conclusion 4: We need to see at member state level more pragmatic and harmonised gender, health and educational policies which can respond to individuals’ needs with positive narratives around women and girls instead of generalised approaches which do not always reach the most affected; i.e. socially disadvantaged/discriminated women and girls.
Roma and Traveller women and girls may not have access to reproductive and sexual rights and information, they lack education on family planning, in particular in relation to the usage of contraceptive means, and often do not send their children to kindergarten. All of these factors strengthen gender inequality while women’s participation is restricted, including the fact that they have no income or property. On the one side high fertility rates are noted, but on the other side infant mortality is also high, as a result of late or irregular check-ups during pregnancy, as well as negligence during childbirth and post-natal care, which reveals the low quality of health services provided by some healthcare providers with hidden negative attitudes. Evidence proves that Roma and Traveller women and girls who visit family practice centers or hospitals are kept waiting, ignored, not given enough attention or sometimes entirely rejected by health personnel. This situation not only increases Roma and Traveller women’s and girls’ physical problems but mental ones as well.
Despite the increasing evidence demonstrating the link between poor health and COVID-19 fatalities, Roma and Travellers in some states have not been prioritised in national vaccination strategies and have lower access to COVID-19 vaccination and testing services.
Talking about education, deprivation is not only linked to formal classes but also to provision of meals, after school lessons and other activities; as well as access to electronic devices and internet access. Also, the increasingly worse economic situation does not allow many Roma and Traveller families to prioritise their children’s education. Limited or lack of access to digital learning especially puts the girls at risk of school dropout and increases their likelihood of falling victim to early marriages. When only one digital device is available in the household, it was reported that often times boys were given the priority to use
4 Conclusion from the workshop on Employment, Rapporteur: Ana Sacipovic, Association of Roma Women Osvit, Serbia
 6

 them. In particular, concerning the education of Traveller children in Ireland, the historical context of Traveller only classes in mainstream schools were mentioned.
The Roma and Traveller LGBTI women’s key message in the conference is that they exist. They are a clear example of the intersecting issues of gender, race, nationality, class and minority sexual existence. There is constant discrimination and neglect of Roma and Traveller LGBTI women’s position within Roma, feminist and LGBTI movements.
“Policies are gender blind and research on intersectional discrimination of Roma and Traveller women carried out by Roma and Traveller is lacking. It is also very important to work inside the communities to reduce sexism and patriarchy thinking and relationship”5
Conclusion 5: We need better alignment of social and environmental policies to tackle racism , as well as to provide adequate infrastructural services and improve living conditions and temporary halting sites/permanent trailer sites in general.
The lack of basic infrastructural services to households is mainly due to the fact that they are located in non-urbanised parts of towns, which is augmented by environmental racism. Communities are seen as environmentally problematic and are disconnected or not provided with public environmental services such as waste collection. Sometimes they have no other choice but to live and/or work in polluted sites including landfills, contaminated industrial sites, or in areas prone to environmental hazards such as floods. Forced evictions are also common as Roma and Traveller have little legal protection or access to legal recourse against them.
Environmental racism disproportionately affects Roma and Traveller women and girls since they are often the caretakers and provide for meals, drinking water and cleaning among other household chores. They are more susceptible to suffer from environmental issues especially when pregnant. For example, women and girls must often cross busy roads or other areas to fetch water.
“Non-communicable as well as communicable diseases are part of their daily struggle due to environmental racism.”6
3. Recommendations
The definition of empowerment needs to be clarified. Discussions pointed to the opinion that it means enabling people to strive for power. Addressing discrimination and inequalities faced by Roma and Traveller women and girls, and bringing them to the forefront of society, will help countries to remedy long-standing issues with which they are confronted such as access to healthcare, housing, education and employment and indirectly cope with the effects of the COVID-19 pandemic, which has exacerbated all these issues. By investing in the rights, skills and opportunities of Roma and Traveller women and girls,
5 .”- Conclusion from workshop on Intersectional Romani Feminism, Rapporteur, Kateryna Levchenko, Vice- President of the Council of Europe Gender Equality Commission (GEC), Ukraine
6 Conclusion from workshop on Environmental Racism, Rapporteur, Diego Marin, Expert on environmental justice, Project lead on Roma environmental justice, European Environmental Bureau (EEB), Belgium
 7

countries can consolidate their overall human capital. It is an opportunity to create more inclusive and more diverse societies that we cannot afford to leave untapped. Increased determination to fight violence against women and girls should be the priority objective of all stakeholders as well as coordination of efforts and activities.
Civil society recommendations regarding the work of the Council of Europe
1. Civil society participation is fundamental to democracy and necessitates continuous strengthening and commitment to the work of various structures. As a consequence, it is crucial to create opportunities for a structured dialogue, partnership and other collaborative efforts with Roma and Traveller women organisations;
2. Local
3.
4.
5. The Council of Europe should recommend to member states to create programmes for the employment of Roma and Traveller women and girls, so that new opportunities are enabled, in particular programmes on Social Enterprise Legislation and Strategies;
6. The Council of Europe should adopt a recommendation on the empowerment of Roma and Traveller women and girls;
7. Roma and Traveller women should be explicitly mentioned in cross-cutting and transversal issues such as gender equality, domestic violence against women, and trafficking in human beings;
8. Roma and Traveller women should be mainstreamed in all strategic action plans affecting them;
9. Traveller women and girls should have better visibility and representation by modifying the name of the IRWC to International Roma and Traveller Women’s Conference (IRTWC);
Civil society recommendations regarding the work of the member states
1. Ensure that all Roma are registered in the official state system through national censuses and by introducing procedures for granting citizenship and documentation for those who currently lack them
2. Implement the collection of ethnic data through an equality and a human rights framework that protects the rights of persons documented and ensures communities feel safe being registered.
3. Create conditions and the tools for young Roma and Traveller women and girls to participate in decision-making processes and policy creation, including affirmative actions for their employment or political education;
4. Fight against harmful practices such as arranged/early/child/forced marriages and ensure integration in gender-based and racial violence policies;
 governments need secure funding to ensure environmental services, decent housing and
 green public spaces;
 It was proposed that the Council of Europe should establish the position of an Antigypsyism
 Coordinator in order to monitor and guide member states in dismantling structural racism and
 antigypsyism and take part in the development of the EU Anti-Racism Strategy;
 The Council of Europe should recommend to member states to improve the living conditions of
 Roma and Travellers as part of public investments in green technologies;
8

5. Actions and funding for social inclusion must be explicitly targeting the community level as a way to fight absolute poverty and inequality;
6. Equal representation of Roma and Traveller women and youth in politics should be enabled through targeted measures and ethnic quotas in local Councils and Parliaments, and gender- sensitive legislation, policies and programmes, and gender budgeting initiatives should be adopted;
7. Enhanced participation should be enabled through mentorship and leadership programmes, formal and informal, career advice, networking and capacity building initiatives, and the promotion of role models;
8. Increased Roma and Traveller women’s and girls’ participation in policy design and implementation at all levels through the funding of Roma and Traveller Women NGOs to conduct national and international research, including in-depth discussions using intersectional methodology;
9. Women working in art should be supported by national governments, including financially, to facilitate the expression of their work through the introduction of scholarships, training and most importantly – health and pension safety ;
10. Training and capacity building for officials and health care providers should be introduced as a way to improve intersectional and intercultural understanding and eliminate stereotypical and discriminatory attitudes;
11. Creating more targeted health programmes for Roma and Traveller women and girls with a focus on sexual and reproductive health;
12. COVID-19 vaccination and testing services need to be made available to Roma and Traveller women and girls without restrictions or delays;
13. Institutional racism in education should be recorded by officials and actions to eliminate it should be taken, ensuring that every child, especially girls, have devices to follow remote classes and can enroll freely;
14. Warrant more opportunities for Roma and Travellers to be trained as teachers and support employment in schools, which is crucial for improving girls’ education.
Civil society recommendations regarding the work of the Roma and Traveller and pro-Roma and Traveller Civil Society
1. Increase the visibility and understanding of the need to remove obstacles faced by Roma and Traveller women and girls regarding their residency and documentation status and nationality issues;
2. Provide legal assistance to resolve these issues.
3. Provide support for the establishment of Social Enterprises to enable the legalisation of informal
activities which would create security and financial stability for Roma and Traveller women, with
a focus on access to working and pension rights;
4. Include an LGBTI dimension in the development of strategic policies and build alliances with other marginalised social groups;
9

5. Initiate more grass-root activities and mutual collaboration through which Roma and Traveller women will be mobilised and enrolled in integration activities with a focus on gender equality;
6. Strengthen the collaboration between Roma and Traveller women networks.
4. Proceedings
4.1. Opening statements and keynote speeches
Mabera Kamberi, representative of the Ministry of Labour and Social Policy of North Macedonia, also a Member and Gender Equality Rapporteur of the Council of Europe Committee of Experts on Roma and Traveller Issues (ADI-ROM) explained that Roma and Traveller women and girls in their daily life find themselves caught between respect for tradition and social expectations regarding gender roles as well as their personal needs. Roma and Traveller women and girls are among the most vulnerable groups. They face multidimensional discrimination and intersectional challenges including early school dropouts, early and forced marriages, forced sterilisation and a high rate of unemployment. She also acknowledged that Roma and Traveller women and girls face many social barriers and prejudices which impact their capacity to participate in public and political life. More precisely, she mentioned that they are underrepresented in local or national political structures and decision-making processes.
Jagoda Shahpaska, Minister of Labour and Social Policy of North Macedonia, explained that respect for human rights and freedoms is the foundation of democracy in every country. Therefore, the greatest responsibility for respecting the human rights of Roma and Travellers lies within the decision-makers who create public opinions, create policies and measures, but also within the non-governmental sector as a partner in implementation. This responsibility is twice as high in pandemic times. This is why she believes that this conference is of the utmost importance to better tackle the challenges which Roma and Traveller women and girls are faced with in every country.
Latest social reforms in North Macedonia as well as adopted gender policies and laws that systematically protect and support vulnerable groups are in line with the governmental concept “One society for all”. Priorities of Roma women and girls are part of the governmental efforts which can best be illustrated by the development of the special National Action Plan for Roma women and girls 2022-2024.
Bjorn Berge, Deputy Secretary General of the Council of Europe stated that in 2021 this choice of topic could not be more relevant. The Covid-19 pandemic has taken a terrible toll on individuals, communities and countries throughout Europe and around the world. But the nature and severity of the impact has been different.
The Council of Europe recognised early on in the pandemic that minority and vulnerable groups face particular challenges and in extreme cases lack access to adequate health care, which may lead to “inhuman and degrading treatment”. Not taking into account the needs of disadvantaged groups could result in discrimination; and especially vulnerable populations must continue to have access to the rights outlined in the European Social Charter – Rights that range from health to education to housing. He concluded by saying that change for women must be led by women, and that leadership can take many forms. This event is another example of that kind of leadership.
 10

Miranda Vuolasranta, President of the European Roma and Traveller Forum (ERTF) informed the conference that:
Firstly, women still face inequalities in many aspects: extreme poverty, exclusion, low level of education, and unemployment. It is worth to remind that women generally continue to carry an unequal part of family responsibilities. In the case of Roma women, early marriages and births, the number of children, and severely deprived housing conditions make them particularly vulnerable.
Secondly, progress in Council of Europe member states is slow concerning women's political representation overall, while the representation of Roma women is even worse, as there are currently almost no Roma women elected to national parliaments.
Thirdly, structural violence manifests itself at different levels, from law enforcement officers, social protection services, to shelters supposed to protect from aggressors and perpetrators of violence.
Fourthly, in some Council of Europe member states, political parties have unfortunately used the pandemic to gain political support by blaming the Romani population for the spread of the COVID-19 pandemic. Consequently, Roma were banned from entering the hospital, accessing health care services, or from receiving the same support as their fellow citizens.
Fifthly, she stressed that education is a crucial area for progress. However, according to FRA's7 "Roma survey – Data in focus" more Roma men (85 %) than women (77 %) say that they can read and write and more Roma women (19 %) than men (14 %) say that they have never been to school.
In conclusion she referred to one of the most visible progresses which started in the early 2000s aiming to present a good practice: namely, when the ERTF adopted its founding constitution, it required that at least 40% of the members are Roma women. Today, 20 years later, the majority of them are women.
Cristina Termizcay, President of the International Roma Women Network “Phenjalipe” greeted the organisers and participants and underlined the need of ensuring that no woman is left behind and unprotected; as well as the hope that the agenda will provide enough space for rich and constructive discussions on all important topics.
Nina Nordström, Ambassador and Permanent Representative of Finland to the Council of Europe and Chair of the Committee of Ministers’ Rapporteur Group on Human Rights informed the conference that the Steering Committee on Anti-discrimination, Diversity and Inclusion (CDADI) suggested during its second meeting in February to develop a Committee of Ministers’ Recommendation to member states on promoting equality for Roma and Traveller women and girls.
Thorsten Afflerbach, Head of Division for the Roma and Travellers Team, Directorate of Anti- Discrimination, Council of Europe, gave an overview of what has happened since the 7th International Roma Women’s Conference that took place in 2019 in Helsinki when the participants took stock of the implementation of the Council of Europe’s Thematic Action Plan on the inclusion of Roma and Travellers (2016-2019). The challenges of intersectionality, equality, empowerment, access to justice, and
7 Data in Focus Report | The Roma - European Union Agency for Fundamental Rights
 11

participation in political and public life were named as a result from the exercise. These issues were taken as a center count in the two-year follow up.
Eileen Flynn, Senator, Upper House of the Irish Parliament talked about the impact of the COVID-19 pandemic on Traveller women in Ireland. Even though the Irish Government sent a message to its people that they are together in this crisis, it seemed they forgot that some people have less resources than others, like it is the case for Roma and Traveller women who are often left behind. 6% of the Traveller and Roma women have been infected, while representing only 1% of the total population.
She underlined that we must not forget Traveller women in prison where they are overrepresented as well as the media attention to Traveller women who broke restrictions; media created a public picture that only Travellers do not follow guidelines.
Some local authorities used the global pandemic to provide basic sanitation services to the Traveller community as a way to protect them from the virus, even though they had been waiting for it for more than 15 years. It took pressure from Traveller organisations to include them in the eviction freeze that was provided to the general population. Yet, some Traveller families received threats of evictions. The impression is that protection afforded to Travellers arrived thanks to the pandemic. The National Traveller Women and Girls’ strategy has not been implemented and some local self-governments are not held accountable for that. Ms. Flynn believes that equal representation of minority groups in politics would help in the protection of their rights on a daily basis and not only during the pandemic.
Eglantina Gjermeni, Rapporteur on “Enhancing participation of women from under-represented groups in political and public decision-making”, former Chair of the Sub-Committee on Gender Equality and former Member of the Parliamentary Assembly of the Council of Europe gave a presentation on positive Roma women role models whom she met, in order to inspire more women and girls to enter politics and participate in decision making processes. However, she pointed out that still the European political landscape remains quite homogeneous. Politics and decision-making seem out of reach to many women of various backgrounds. Some of the obstacles and barriers which she found as crucial are the following: multiple discrimination, weight of prejudice, risk of violence, fear of stigmatisation, barriers within political parties, social pressure, unequal sharing of care responsibilities, lack of accessibility, as well as poor consideration of the skills and expertise of women.
Ms. Eglantina mentioned that she is more than aware that change will happen only if there is political will and commitment to make it happen. A profound change of both mind-sets and political culture is essential to ensure that political and public decision-making will be more inclusive and accessible for persons from various backgrounds. She concluded that transforming politics and the whole society is a long and challenging process as it is about changing power relations.
4.2. Plenary session 1: How the pandemic has impacted on Roma and Traveller women and girls’ health?
Elmas Arus, Chair of the Zero Discrimination Association and Ekin Cuhadar, member of Zero Discrimination Association, Turkey, explained that it has been observed that Roma people are neglected and rejected by health care personnel.
12

In terms of economic status, they stated that Roma women are mostly employed in the informal sector and that their sources of income disappeared due to social distancing measures and lockdowns. The ones who still have work are the seasonal agricultural workers, however, the increase of labour supply has decreased the daily wages.
While others in society can sustain some kind of socialisation through online platforms, many Roma women do not have this option as their phone lines and internet connections have been cut due to unpaid bills. This situation increases the psychological burden on them. Roma women have little or no trust in the system and institutions and state that "if not the virus, hunger will kill us". Ms. Elmas emphasised that since Turkey had withdrawn from the Istanbul Convention, it is obvious that Roma women are more vulnerable to domestic violence, gender-based violence and femicide.
Radost Zaharieva, Independent expert on Roma health and health inequalities, France explained that Roma women, who are already victims of antigypsyism, are also more vulnerable to face gender-based and racial violence, including human trafficking, which have devastating impact on their health, both physical and mental. Ms. Zaharieva also outlined that increased hate speech against Roma in mainstream and social media have impacted on health services provided to Roma which has resulted in reduced access to reproductive and sexual healthcare services for Roma women and consequently in increased numbers of child marriages and teenage pregnancies.
Mary Brigid Collins and Bridget Nevin, Pavee Point Traveller and Roma Centre, Ireland, presented their project “Reflecting on COVID-19: The impact on Traveller Health in Ireland”. Initially they mentioned that Roma and Travellers are seen as at high risk during COVID-19 and there is a lack of trust by healthcare providers. However, thanks to the good co-operation of Pavee Point with the Department of Health and the strengthened relationship with service providers, as well as the close work with the Agencies, they managed to develop culturally appropriate leaflets and videos; offered phone helplines that the communities could access, lobbied for Travellers and Roma to become priority groups for COVID-19 testing and vaccinations. Also evictions were banned and Travellers were represented at local community Call and Community Response Forums. 73% of Travellers accessed COVID-19 information via their local project which was recognised by the Irish Prime Minister.
Beata Bislim Olahova, Adviser, OSCE Office for Democratic Institutions and Human Rights (ODIHR), Contact Point for Roma and Sinti Issues (CPRSI), said that ODIHR had received reports on a number of measures adopted by States and local authorities that can be considered discriminatory towards Roma and Sinti communities during the pandemic. For example, she mentioned the targeted community testing administered by the military, quarantine measures and full lockdowns of entire communities when only a handful of individuals were infected. It was worth noting that in Hungary isolated Roma communities had their vaccination delayed by more than one year and were only vaccinated when mobile vaccination services became available. However, the stateless and Roma without IDs could not obtain COVID vaccination certificates after receiving their shot.
When it comes to Roma and Sinti women specifically, she explained that the closure of schools increased the burden of household work and support for children’s online education even when they lacked digital skills themselves. Roma women from Slovakia have reported experiences of segregation in maternity
13

health departments, racial harassment, humiliation, neglect and abuse during childbirth as well as failure to be informed and give consent to medical treatment. Regarding the case of a racist cartoon in a Romanian publication where a Roma woman was portrayed in a stereotypical image related to their literacy, Ms. Olahova said that in this case media had played a major role in spreading the stereotypes. In this regard she also informed the conference that based on ODIHR analyses, 33% of the media reports in 10 countries were replicating hate speech against Roma in relation to the pandemic.
Ramiza Sakip, Advisor for Education from the Municipality of Shuto Orizari, North Macedonia gave examples of what the municipality had done in the time of crisis. A crisis headquarter was initially established with the aim of providing food and hygiene packages to the most vulnerable. The increased activities led to the opening of a soup kitchen targeting poor families. In terms of specific issues faced by Roma women, cleaning ladies whose income had drastically decreased were impacted severely as a result of COVID-19. Another important issue in terms of health care was the lack of gynecological services at the Health Clinic but as a result of the support and good cooperation with the Ministry of Health, a specialist was identified and is now engaged and provides health services to Roma women.
4.3. Plenary session 2: Parallel workshops
4.3.1. How to become influencers? Youth activism!
The main challenge of Roma youth is the absence of their needs in policy documents while their political education is of great importance. Roma women organisations are very important since the same women present role models in the communities. Roma youth needs are related to the access of rights, tools and opportunities as a way to invest back in their communities. Roma women have the potential to change society if they use their own experiences to guide girls in becoming leaders. Even though young Roma are very active they are not taken seriously by decision makers.
4.3.2. Racism, antigypsyism and anti-nomadism
The main challenges are intensified manifestations of systemic and institutional antigypsyism during the pandemic (e.g. ill-treatment by the police, conspiracy theories, mistrust) as well as intersectional discrimination (e.g.. Traveller women experience racism while also oppression within their communities). In terms of legislation it was mentioned that they have been specifically targeting Travellers (e.g. legislation against trespassing in Ireland) while at the same time there is lack of data on the situation of Traveller women.
Living conditions and access to basic services have worsened while homeless migrant Roma women in Oslo are experiencing rough sleeping, harrassment and precarious health situations. Shared European Roma and Traveller Forum (ERTF) data was devastating: 57% of Roma children were not attending school since the start of COVID-19; over 40% of Roma are unemployed; 72,71% had to stop income generating activities; 91,93 % have no possibility of teleworking.
14

4.3.3. Intersectional Romani Feminism
Challenges have been indicated as part of structural racism manifestations: marginalisation, violence, inappropriate access to health care services, education, justice, police, and neglect of the specific problems of Roma women. These are the same inequalities Roma women face in their families while institutions do not act accordingly to protect their rights, including labour rights. Experience of Roma women cannot be understood from the experience of all Roma or the experience of all women and need relational thinking.
4.3.4. Empowerment through art
Women in art and culture work in different ways: organising exhibitions, digital media trainings, providing mentoring, building networks, producing books, comics, driving visible social media online, producing theatre performances and speaking at conferences for educational progress. This approach is seen as a very radical and transformative, very progressive, very modern and very inclusive.
However, long-term funding for their programmes is the biggest challenge. The second challenge is that many of them work independently and in order to receive funding it is necessary to establish an organisation, despite being recognised as role models. The promotion of art and history is not a political priority yet. These women face multiple forms of hate speech and disrespect.
They are often, in an unstable financial situation, and they contribute to the community during their free time using their private money. In addition, special measures are needed including internships to ensure Roma and Traveller women can access affordable childcare; retain secondary benefits while participating in training; and retain medical coverage for a set period after entering employment.
4.4. Plenary session 3: How the pandemic affects the problem of statelessness and lack of ID?
Nina Murray, Head of Policy and Research, European Network on Statelessness, presented an initiative aimed at exploring the challenges Roma women and girls face when it comes to access to civil status and equal nationality rights. She stated that statelessness is a violation of human rights and means “to not be recognised as a national by any state”. In Europe, states succession, displacement, complex civil registration procedures and deep rooted antigypsyism, leave many Roma without civil status and documentation.
Four priority issues have been identified by their initiative, from an intersectional perspective:
 Access to socio-economic rights;
 Access to birth registration and parental rights;
 Violence against women and girls;
 Absence of Roma women expertise from debates and discussions on statelessness and legal
identity.
15

Senada Sali, European Roma Rights Centre (ERRC), Hungary in her presentation focused on the risk and consequences of statelessness on pregnant Roma women, including evictions. Furthermore, she presented 4 cases on which the ERRC has worked:
* Forced eviction of 6 pregnant women living on the riverside in Skopje, North Macedonia in 2016 who lacked identity documents after the demolition of their homes. They filed a complaint with the CEDAW Committee (Complaint no. 107/2016 and Complaint no. 110/2016) which brought a decision in favour of the Roma women in March 2020.
* Eviction during the COVID-19 pandemic in Belgium in April 2020. As a result, several pregnant young women had no access to a gynecologist because of the lack of personal documents. The ERRC filed a complaint (no.195/2020) before the European Committee on Social Rights which is pending.
* Roma Camp burned in Kiev, Ukraine.
* Death of a pregnant 37 year-old Roma women and her unborn child in Skopje, North Macedonia, while she was waiting for the results of the COVID test in front of the hospital. This happened in March 2021 and the ERRC has filed a complaint before the Skopje Civil Court.
Lena Haap, Statelessness Officer, UNHCR Regional Bureau for Europe, Geneva, emphasised the impact of COVID-19 on civil registration and documentation:
- Birth registration not declared “essential services” during the pandemic;
- Backlogs in processing due to reduced staffing and opening hours’
- Discontinuation of birth registration campaigns.
 Sonja Barbul, Balkan Roma Women Network, Serbia explained that Montenegro had already achieved a lot in its efforts to eradicate statelessness. Montenegro recognised this issue through the introduction of the 2015 Law on Non-Contentious proceedings, which facilitates birth registration of persons born outside the national healthcare system. Furthermore, the 2018 Law on Foreigners introduced for the first time ever a statelessness determination procedure (SDP) and so far, 9 persons have been recognised as stateless through this procedure. In 2017, the UNHCR, together with the Ministry of Interior and the Ministry of Labour and Social Welfare identified 607 persons at risk of statelessness and in 2021 brought this number down to 423. In addition, 992 persons, both formerly displaced and internally displaced and those at risk of statelessness, were provided support by UNHCR under the programme ACTIVATE, which aims to enhance the capacities of the social welfare system in Montenegro and support vulnerable people
 in accessing social protection and employment. However, the issue of returnees, people returning from
Europe who also lack documentation and need birth certificates so they can be legally visible citizens in the country in which they wish to live also needs to be addressed. These are mostly people whose parents originate from Serbia orKosovo8 and who were born elsewhere in Europe.
   8
All references to Kosovo, whether the territory, institutions or population, in this text shall be understood in full
 compliance with United Nation's Security Council Resolution 1244 and without prejudice to the status of Kosovo
16

Mabera Kamberi, Ministry for Labour and Social Policy of North Macedonia spoke about the measures that the government of North Macedonia took to solve the issues of persons without IDs. Firstly, she distinguished between persons without IDs and stateless persons, as they are two separate categories. When the government held the Chairmanship of the Committee of Ministers in 2012, they decided to open discussions on persons without IDs and heard from NGOs that there were 5 000 persons in that situation named “phantoms” by the media. The alarming information led the government to immediately establish an inter-ministerial working group including international organisations, Macedonian law organisations and Roma NGOs. In 2018 they established a smaller group to draft new legislation for persons without IDs. The exact number of persons without IDs had to be determined and mobile teams were established which registered those persons directly on the spot. 650 persons were identified in a period of 8 months. They were registered by the Ministry of Justice to access temporary documents and were asked additionally to apply for a temporary birth certificate, but only 200 applied. The Ministry was not able to find the remaining persons because they had moved from their place of living. However, the people who had applied for and had received temporary documents could access their social rights to education, health, employment and housing.
4.4.1 Advancing gender equality of Roma and Traveller Women in Council of Europe member states
As a follow up to the 7th IRWC was the research on Empowerment of Roma and Traveller women: A change under construction “Towards a Roadmap for Advancing Gender Equality of Roma and Traveller women in Council of Europe member states” through which national policies on gender equality and Roma integration, in relation to Roma women and girl were analysed based on 6 National Roma Inclusion Strategies (NRIS) and replies to a questionnaire sent out to the members of the Expert Committee on Roma and Traveller Issues (ADI-ROM). Dr. Zora Popova, Independent Expert on minorities from Bulgaria who was commissioned by the Council of Europe to undertake the research, presented the main findings and opened the floor for discussion.
The discussion was mainly related to the methodology of the research and ownership of the report. Roma women expressed their concerns on the relevance and accuracy of the information and proposed to the Council of Europe to engage Roma women gender experts for future research, who, based on their experience and understanding of the Roma community could draft a more accurate report. It was clarified that the report, which is about legislation and policies, was based on replies by member states’ governments to a questionnaire which had been sent by the Council of Europe Secretariat.
4.5. Plenary session 4: Parallel workshops
4.5.1. Environmental racism
The main challenge that Roma face is that Roma communities are stereotyped as being environmentally problematic while at the same time the topic of environmental racism is underappreciated and understudied. The EU’s policy response is only just now emerging. Environmental racism is structural and interlinked with other dimensions, racially motivated discrimination and exclusion.
  17

Roma Communities are disconnected or not properly provided with public environmental services. For instance, they are deprived or limited in access to clean and safe water, adequate sanitation and/or waste collection, while neighbouring areas receive these environmental services. Roma communities fall victim to forced evictions from land and water resources or other locations with high economic value to be used, for instance, for new housing or road projects, tourism facilities or for environmental reasons such as nature protection measures. In many cases, Roma communities are not included in urban planning. The
4.5.2. Education of children and training
The main challenge is that Roma and Traveller children are deprived and faced with the negative consequences of COVID-19 in a disproportionate manner while the COVID-19 pandemic is still ongoing. School closing stopped many projects related to the presentation of Roma culture by Roma pupils to their non-Roma peers. The Roma Education Fund (REF), in order to address the above-mentioned challenges implements many activities – inclusion of Roma pupils; humanitarian aid; providing school material and smart devices to pupils, mentoring and tutoring classes; providing sanitary technical equipment for disinfection in kindergartens and schools. They have noted that access to electronic devices is easier given to boys than to girls by their parents, which illustrates the gender inequalities within the families. The role of Roma school assistants is especially note-worthy in the context of the pandemic as they are the bridge between school and Roma pupils, deliver school materials and try to ensure regular participation of children in school.
4.5.3. Employment
The workshop highlighted many challenges and obstacles to Roma and Traveller employment: the very high unemployment rates, especially for women, stem from a lack of access to education and training; more Roma and Travellers are using employment measures and incentives, but not so many Roma and Traveller women; Roma and Travellers face discrimination in employment; they hide their identity to avoid discrimination in their job search; they mainly work in the informal sector and hesitate to transition to formal work for fear of losing their right to social benefits, facing unpredictable costs and accumulating debt; they lack information about business application proceduresand knowledge on how to promote their work and how the labour market works (digitalisation, social networks, online platforms); although
 portrayal of environmental racism in the media is based on two postulates : Romani people as victims,
 living on landfill sites, in dire living conditions. This idea creates the perception of Roma wanting to be
 poor. The other postulate is that the Roma are harming the environment by burning copper, rubber,
 cutting down wood etc.
In particular, concerning the education of Traveller children in Ireland it was mentioned that
  institutional racism can be observed in the form of Traveller-only classes in mainstream schools and Traveller-only schools of which one was only phased out in 2020. This causes low educational attainments by Traveller girls and women, future unemployment, poverty, and social exclusion. There is also a complete lack of
positive visibility of Traveller culture in the curricula and in the whole school environment in Ireland.
18

there are strategic documents for Roma in the field of employment throughout the region, they do not have information on how to access these programmes and how to apply for incentives.
The National Traveller Women’s Forum in Ireland has been advocating at national level to introduce a National Traveller Employment and Enterprise strategy that will help to improve employment opportunities for Traveller women. However, it needs to be resourced since actions are lacking. The unemployment rate of Traveller women is 80%, based on the last national census in 2016. From the 20% who are employed, many face insecurity since they work part-time. Access to pension is a serious gap.
Good practices were identified in North Macedonia where three programmes were implemented: the Roma digital boost programme, the Roma Loan Officers programme, the Matching Fund of Roma organisations with Government funds as well as in Serbia with the Programme on Promoting Roma Entrepreneurship, which improved the capacities of young Roma in the field of digitalisation, starting an online business, professional practices, and reduced the number of Roma working in the informal market through the development of a legal framework, all introduced by the Roma Enterprise Development Initiative.
Active communication with the Roma community in order to identify the source of vulnerability and cross sector partnerships are needed. Women cannot do it alone; they need the support of men to achieve one community for all.
4.5.4. Being LGBTI and Roma or Traveller women
The intersectionality of being Roma or Traveller, woman and of different sexual orientation or gender identity is subversive both in the eyes on their community and those of mainstream society. Roma homosexual persons, particularly lesbians, do not fall under the racist and sexist stereotypes of Roma women which is causing even more hate. Moreover, Roma communities serve as both direct and symbolic oppressors: direct because they strive to preserve the existing system and symbolic in that the community structure actually tries to preserve the white male hierarchical order.
Roma and Traveller LGBTI women invite their heterosexual sisters for solidarity and critical thinking on heterosexual privileges. They should be able to develop their movement in their own safe place and reflect on how and whether to partner with other groups without losing their own battle for recognition.
4.6. Closing remarks
Tatjana Anđelić, Chair of the Council of Europe Committee of Experts on Roma and Traveller Issues (ADI- ROM), Montenegro, moderated the closing session. Kjmet Amet, President of RWYA "Luludi", Roma Women and Youth Association LULUDI, North Macedonia emphasised that there are laws and policies for Roma integration, however their implementation is lacking as well as systematic solutions to the discrimination and segregation faced by Roma women. She stressed that in the 1990s’ Roma women organisations in North Macedonia were very strong and well organised but that in the last 5 years many of those organisations have shut down. She called for more sustainable programmes supported by the
19

governments to allow for the continuous functioning of Roma women’s organisations. She also called for Roma women organisations to be partnering with international organisations.
Snežana Samardžić-Marković, Director General of Democracy, Council of Europe, highlighted that the Conference programme was wide reaching and bold and of particular importance were: truth, justice, compensation and reconciliation; feminism, intersectionality and LGBTI issues; environmental racism; participation in public and political life. She also informed participants about the follow up as recommendations will contribute to the implementation of the Strategic Action Plan for Roma and Traveller Inclusion (2020-2025) and the Gender Equality Strategy (2018-2023), and feed into the work of the ADI-ROM on drafting a forthcoming recommendation by the Committee of Ministers on promoting equality for Roma and Traveller women and girls, as well as into the Advisory Committee on the Framework Convention for National Minorities.
Georgina Laboda, Rapporteur on Roma, Council of Europe Joint Council on Youth, board member of Phiren Amenca, Hungary, expressed that the Roma population is the youngest population in Europe, approximately 40% are under 18. Youth needs are marginalised: 65% encounter racism while attending school or university, and 95% observe discriminatory treatment and behaviour directed at Roma, as the research of Phiren Amenca revealed in 2019. The situation with regard to Roma girls is even worse. She called on keeping the strength of young Roma activists in the following years with the hope that their needs and recommendations will be valued soon by the Council of Europe and the member states.
Steffen Hudolin, Head of Cooperation, Delegation of the European Union in North Macedonia explained that throughout the conference he noticed that the needs of women and girls is not only about financial aids. He also presented some of the achievements around Roma integration in the last decade. However, the cycle of poverty, discrimination and exclusion still prevails in many countries. For Roma women and girls, the situation is much more complex. He concluded that there is a need to work together on improving the coordination of activities and delivery of measurable results.
Mabera Kamberi, Adviser to the Minister, Ministry of Labour and Social Policy of North Macedonia and member of the Committee of Experts on Roma and Traveller Issues (ADI-ROM) thanked all the participants and speakers for the productive and lively discussions and reiterated the importance of these International Roma Women’s Conferences as a platform to exchange and discuss between the younger generations of Roma and Traveller women and the more experienced ones to ensure the continuity of the work and the transmission of knowledge.
20

OUR VOICES HEARD
Report from the Romani Women’s Rights Conference December 2007 in Sweden
           ROMANI WOMEN’S RIGHTS CONFERENCE • 1
            
Our Voices Heard!
Our Voices Heard – Amare Glasura Ashunde – a Romani Women’s Rights Conference held in Sweden in December 2007 provided a forum for discussion about the challenges facing Romani women today. It was an opportunity to share information and good practices between policymakers and Romani Women’s Networks across Europe.
This magazine is based on the speeches and discussions held at the conference, which was co-organised by the Swedish Ministry of Integration and Gender Equality, the Council of Europe and the European Union Agency for Fundamental Rights.
The core themes of the conference were: Romani Women’s Rights, Combating Trafficking, Respecting Reproduc- tive Rights and Roma Access to Public Health Care.
The opinions expressed in the texts do not necessarily reflect those of the organisers of the conference.
Important to Break Social Exclusion
A PRIORITY FOR me and the Swedish Govern- ment is to break the social exclusion that too often has been the marker of the daily lives of Roma. Not only in Sweden, but throughout Europe. Roma are one of Sweden’s five national minorities and Romani chib is one of Sweden’s national minority languages. Romani culture and the Romani language are an important part of Sweden’s and Europe’s common cultural heritage.
I know that Roma in Sweden and Europe have a strong will to achieve empowerment. Majority society can assist the Roma with tools to defend and strengthen themselves. There is a need for a conscious strategy and the work must move forward and be character- ised by reconciliation and dialogue.
For many women in the world the daily struggle for personal survival excludes them from active participation. Gender equality is a pre-condition for democracy and central to human rights. Despite considerable progress, we still have a long way to go before we achieve gender equality. It is time to agree and implement concrete actions that determine clearly how states and societies can guarantee all women and girls their fundamental
freedoms and rights. Even if this may mean going against traditional customs and prac- tices.
NGOs have an important role in encourag- ing women and girls to make active and informed choices. They find efficient methods of reaching women and girls on all levels: globally, nationally and above all, locally. Women movements play an important part in this work. They need the support and recognition that they have deserved. The basic principle is simple: all people, regardless of sex, ethnic affiliation, sexual orientation, age, disability or cultural and religious traditions, are of equal value and must be able to enjoy human rights. The principle of non-discrimination is one of the cornerstones of human rights. It is guaranteed by a number of UN conventions.
DESPITE THIS, FOR centuries life for Roma in
Sweden – and throughout Europe – has been characterised by discrimination and exclusion. Abuses of Roma in the form of banishment, forced transportation, bans on owning busi- nesses, bans on immigration, forced sterilisation and forced assimilation are a reality. This has led to a mistrust of the authorities among Roma.
We have a common responsibility to change this.
Since the 1960s Sweden has taken a range of actions at central and local governmental level to bring justice and improve the situation of Roma in Sweden. In 2006 the Government appointed a Delegation for Roma issues. Together, we will push nationally to improve the situation of Roma in Sweden. This work requires a close dialogue and cooperation with Roma.
It is my hope that we will be able, in dialogue, to live up to the title of today›s conference and listen to each other so that we can say with pride amare glasura ashunde!
Nyamko Sabuni
Ministry of Integra- tion and Gender Equality, Sweden
(Excerpt from opening speech)
Photo: Pawel Flato
  This paper is published in connection with the Romani Womens Rights Conference in Sweden 2007.
A pdf of the paper and the articles can be downloaded at: http://www.sweden.gov.se/sb/d/574/a/102428
Publisher responsible: Ministry of Integration and Gender Equality in partnership with the Delegation for Roma Issues.
Production: Global Reporting, Sweden
Editor: Anki Wood
Texts: Anki Wood, Petter Bolme, Anna Sjögren Graphic design: Lisa Jansson/Global Reporting Photos: Stefan Bladh or according to byline
Printed by Åsbrink Grafiska, Sweden 2008
    Project coordinators: Bilge Tekin Befrits and Elin Strand
2 • ROMANI WOMEN’S RIGHTS CONFERENCE

Time to Empower Roma Women
ROMA IN EUROPE continue to face wide- spread, deep-rooted and often officially endorsed discrimination and prejudice. Roma children are segregated in schools, some are left to learn in virtual ghettos. Roma are disrespected in their human dignity every- where in Europe and on a daily basis.
It is true that the picture is not equally bleak across the continent. However, the human rights violations which I described exist; today and in Europe. Within that minority there are Roma women. In addition to all the prejudice based on their ethnicity, they suffer from discrimination and violence based on gender.
The Council of Europe’s first line of action is to protect and promote the rights of Roma, as members of their communities and as individual citizens. We are doing this through a number of legal and political mechanisms, from the European Court of Human Rights to
the compliance procedure under the Revised European Social Charter, as well as through other legal, protective and monitoring mecha- nisms.
On the specific issue of trafficking in human beings, we have produced a new and, in many respects, ground-breaking legal instrument – the Council of Europe Convention on Action against Trafficking in Human Beings. It is a legal instrument setting a framework for joint action between countries of origin, transit and destination, not only in Europe, but also in the world. The underlying philosophy of the Convention is that it treats persons who are trafficked as victims, and not as offenders. It may sound obvious, but it is not.
The philosophy of the Council of Europe activities is that we do not work for Roma – we work with them. In order to take full advantage of the new possibilities opening up to them, Roma, including Roma women, need
to assume their full share of responsibilities. Respect for cultural identity, diversity and tradition must go hand in hand with respect for essential principles of the European society – such as gender equality. Tradition cannot justify gender discrimination and submission. The way to have the voice of Roma women heard is to empower them. And the way to empower them is to give them responsibilities and give them respect – as women – and as Roma.
Maud de Boer- Buquicchio Deputy Secretary General of the Council of Europe
(Excerpt from opening speech)
 Long Way to Equal Access to Public Health Care
ALTHOUGH WE HAVE come a long way in agreeing on norms against discrimination, and developing policies, the situation of Roma has not improved satisfactorily. The task of the Fundamental Rights Agency (FRA) is to collect data, conduct research, raise public awareness about fundamental rights, promote dialogue with civil society and provide advice to EU institutions and Member States.
Our reports on Romani women’s rights regarding public health care have, for example, shown that in many cases Roma are still subjected to delayed care, segregation, verbal abuse and denial of services. Romani women are disproportionately affected by discrimina- tory treatment and have also been subjected to forced sterilisation.
Romani Women have a great role in the process of addressing discrimination. The Romani Women Networks have achieved much, by promoting advocacy and activism and sharing common concerns and values.
A number of national policies and public
health programmes highlight the existence of inequalities in access to health care services and discrimination against Roma, as well as the intention to combat these phenomena. However, only a limited number of countries establish preventive multi-sectoral holistic strategies to tackle health inequalities and discrimination by addressing the social determinants of health: education, housing conditions and employment.
It has been said on a number of occasions that the situation of Roma in Europe has become a benchmark of the EU’s development in the field of fundamental rights and social justice. We now need to step up the imple- mentation of policies and monitor their impact.
The 2005 Resolution of the European Parliament specifically “Calls on Member States and candidate countries to take steps to ensure equal access to health care and social security services for all, to end all discrimina- tory practices, in particular the segregation of
Roma in maternity wards, and to prevent the practice of nonconsensual sterilisation of Romani women”. The Resolution urges the Fundamental Rights Agency in particular to devote more attention to Anti-Gypsyism/ Romaphobia in Europe and to allocate the necessary resources to monitor racial abuse and human rights violations against Roma. Rest assured that the Fundamental Rights Agency is committed to respond positively to this Resolution as is already evidenced by our work.
Constantinos Manolopoulos Acting Director EU Agency for Fundamental Rights
(Excerpt from opening speech)
 ROMANI WOMEN’S RIGHTS CONFERENCE • 3

THEME: ROMANI WOMEN’S RIGHTS
Multiple Discrimination Plagues Romani Women
Romani women face multiple discrimination, based on both ethnic background and gender, in their own community and in society as a whole. Health care injustices, evictions and unemployment are a reality for Romani women all over Europe. The dismal list of human rights violations goes on to include forced sterilisation, extreme violence, trafficking, forced marriages, virginity testing, forced begging and drug addiction.
“BEING A ROMANI WOMAN means a necessity to be present in both the movement for Romani rights, on one hand, and the women’s rights movement, on the other,” said Enisa Eminova, a Romani women’s rights activist from Macedonia and one of the panel discus- sants at the workshop on Romani Women’s Rights.
Enisa Eminova pointed out that the male leaders have opened up a discussion with Romani women because they otherwise feared that “they could be manipulated by western feminist movements”. But as a Romani woman she has also experienced prejudiced views on Romani culture in the non-Romani feminist movement. “We clearly need to be present in both movements since we are Romani women and must not have to choose one identity in preference to the other,” said Enisa Eminova.
Sarita Friman-Korpela, Secretary General of the Advisory Board on Romani Affairs at the Finnish Ministry of Social Affairs and Health, agreed that the exclusion of Romani is not only limited to government institutions, but also exist in the broader women’s move- ment, and in the human rights’ movement.
“Finnish equality institutions need to make Romani women more visible, both on their own agendas and when cooperating with Romani institutions,” she said.
KIRSTI KOLTHOFF, PRESIDENT of the European Women’s Lobby (EWL) underlined in her key-note speech that “No religious or cultural practice can ever excuse the violation of the human rights of any woman”.
“The EWL considers it essential to name, expose and condemn practices that violate women’s rights and silence women’s voices”, continued Kirsti Kolthoff.
The mission of the EWL is to achieve equality between women and men, promote women’s empowerment and eliminate all forms of violence against women.
Enisa Eminova stressed that Romani women need to be present in both the movement for Romani rights and the women’s rights movement. Thomas Hammarberg agreed with her.
 4 • ROMANI WOMEN’S RIGHTS CONFERENCE
The European Women’s Lobby is a non-govern- mental organisation established in 1990, that now brings together more than 4,000 women’s organisations from all over Europe. The International Romani Women’s Network, IRWN, is a member of the EWL.
During the workshop there was general agreement that in order to end harmful practices and discrimination within the community, Romani women must be actively involved and included. Several participants pointed out the sad fact that very few reports on problems within the Romani culture are written by Romani.
Another difficulty is that politicians and policymakers tend to ignore severe discrimina-
tion against Romani women for fear of not being seen as politically correct, since some of the problems derive from Romani traditions. But in doing so, they ignore the fact that violence and discrimination against women exist in all societies.
The situation for Roma is especially hard in Central and South-eastern Europe. Many Roma live in great poverty, lack housing, employment and education. Their health situation is severe; infant mortality is, for example, eight times higher among Roma than among the rest of the population.
In a first ever multinational project to improve the living conditions of Romani in Europe, 2005–2015 has been declared to be

 “WE NEED AN ANNUAL GATHERING”
“We often hear that the problems Romani women face are related to our culture and our way of life. It is not true. The problems come from the persistent discrimination in European societies. We believe that our culture is a European one, and that it has to be respected,” said Soraya Post, President of the International Romani Women’s Network (IRWN), and one of the speakers who opened the conference.
IRWN was set up four years ago and has brought together Romani women activists from 20 countries.
“We have become
valid negotiators
and mediators at
local, national and
international level.
Our empowerment
has been beneficial
not only for us, but
also for our
communities. We
call for full and
comprehensive equality in the societies where we live. We call for the abolition of existing laws, policies, regulations and customs that directly or indirectly discriminate against our people,” said
  Miranda Voulasranta.
Soraya Post.
Soraya Post. Miranda
Vuolasranta, Vice Chair of the European Roma and Travellers Forum (ERTF), commented in her opening speech that IRWN has been very important for
Romani women’s rights. “But we still need to organise better and to create a common vision and action plans for future equality work.”
The latest FRA report claims that the Romani are the most disadvantaged ethnic minority in Europe.
“And most vulnerable of all are Romani women, who suffer extreme levels of discrimination”, said Miranda Vuolasranta.
Both speakers hoped that the conference would be the first of a series of annual gatherings.
“We need your support to promote this idea in your governments and I am sure international organisations will stand by us,” concluded Soraya Post.
“The Decade of Roma Inclusion”.
Nine governments in Central and South-
eastern Europe have agreed to improve the socio-economic status and social inclusion of the Romani community. The initiative brings together governments and intergovernmental and non-governmental organisations, as well as Romani civil society. The founding interna- tional partner organisations include the Council of Europe Development Bank, the World Bank, UNDP, Open Society Initiative (OSI), and the European Roma and Traveller Forum.
Tatiana Peric, an OSI international Policy Fellow in Serbia, presented her study on how Romani women’s rights have been expressed in the National Action Plans created for the Decade of Roma Inclusion. Of the nine participant countries, only Serbia had created a separate National Action Plan for Romani women. Also, Romani women organisations in Serbia participated actively in drafting the action plan. However, the action plan has yet to be adopted by the authorities.
Tatjana Peric concluded that implementa- tion of the Roma Decade is slow. “There is an urgent need for policy developments to support the growing activism among Romani women in the Decade member states. Other- wise the Roma Decade runs a high risk of being transformed into a failed promise to Romani women,” she said.
“Most human rights watchdogs focus on the rights of all Roma, often applying a gender-blind approach to human rights violations.”
SARITA FRIMAN-KORPELA FROM Finland and Thereza Eriksson, an assistant teacher from Sweden, agreed that although the situation of Romani women in their countries is better than in many other places, they still face discrimination, particularly with regard to employment, education and everyday activi- ties, such as being allowed to enter restaurants and shops.
Thereza Erikson exemplified the discrimi- nation in the labour market with Romani not being employed in schools as assistant teachers in spite of having completed a special educa- tion programme created for the purpose of working with Romani children. However, after protests, employment opportunities material- ised. “We, the women, must fight for our
rights”, said Thereza Erikson and expressed her gratitude to the work of the older genera- tion. “I am proud of the older generation. Thanks to their fight, the situation is much better than it used to be,” said Thereza Erikson.
There was general agreement during the workshop that the empowerment of Romani women is vital to combat stigmatisation and trafficking, and to challenge open as well as hidden discrimination in all societies. One of the most important tools is to include more Romani women in drafting and implementing strategies and programmes intended to promote the rights of Romani. “Most human rights watchdogs focus on the rights of all Roma, often applying a gender-blind approach to human rights violations,” concluded Tatjana Peric.
One question raised was how to involve Romani men. In view of her experience of enhancing women’s rights in general, Kirsti Kolthoff proclaimed the need for women to have their own forum for discussions and to meet Romani men who support their agenda separately. Finally Kirsti Kolthoff encouraged Romani women to “come together and organise yourselves and ask for support from other women’s networks.”
Another difficulty is that politicians and policymakers tend to ignore severe discrimina- tion against Romani women from fear of not being seen as politically correct, since some of the problems derive from Romani traditions. But in doing this, they ignore the fact that violence and discrimination against women exist in all societies.
Kirsti Kolthoff (right) encouraged Romani women to ask for support from other women’s networks.
  ROMANI WOMEN’S RIGHTS CONFERENCE • 5

THEME: COMBATING TRAFFICKING
Cooperation Necessary to Stop Trafficking
Trafficking is the modern form of worldwide slavery where human beings are traded as commodi- ties, bought and sold over and over again. Increasingly children and women are used as beggars or to do petty crime for organised criminal groups. Women and children of Romani origin have been specially targeted by the criminal networks engaged in trafficking because of their marginalised position in society.
A RECENT REPORT from the UN agency ILO estimates that the trafficking of human beings generates USD 32 billion every year and that it is the third most profitable criminal activity in the world. But Gulnara Shahinian, an Armenian expert on counter trafficking, and one of the panellists at the workshop on trafficking, believes it is the most profitable criminal activity of all, generating more profits than the trafficking of illicit drugs and weap- ons. Trafficking in human beings “continues for several years and criminals use and reuse the same person over and over again, with in comparison to other crimes, limited invest- ments,” she said.
Most people associate trafficking with sexual exploitation of women. Although this is very common, there are many other forms of trafficking. In northern Europe the trafficking of young people used for begging or petty crime is becoming increasingly common. Many victims of trafficking are exploited in several ways and minors account for a significant percentage of victims, an estimated 23 per cent in 2003 according to the International Organisation for Migration (IOM).
“ENCOUNTERING CHILDREN THAT we think can be victims of trafficking is a new and growing phenomenon in Sweden. Many times our authorities don’t see these children as victims of trafficking – often we see them as young criminal tourists,” said Karin Norlin from the Youth Emergency Unit in Stockholm, Sweden.
These children seldom seek asylum and are instructed to avoid getting involved with the authorities. Usually they do not have any identification papers and they are often traumatised and scared – which makes it hard for them to express their need for help. “Sometimes I think we forget that the legisla- tion that we have for children’s protection includes ALL children staying in Sweden,” continued Karin Norlin and underlined that
Gulnara Shahinian underlined that prevention is one of the most important components of anti-trafficking policy.
 6 • ROMANI WOMEN’S RIGHTS CONFERENCE
NGOs and authorities must cooperate across borders to stop and combat the criminal adults who use children.
As both a counter trafficking mediator in Albania and a Romani woman, Miranda Fejzo has experienced the problem at first hand, and according to her the root cause of the traffick- ing of Romani women and children from Albania is that they belong to the “lower segment of society” in a country suffering from a long transition from an ex-dictatorship system to a democratic system. But it is also caused by “the non-realisation of any of the national strategies for Roma inclusion.”
The Romani community is also marginalised when it comes to employment and education. “Illiteracy is still touching most of the Roma children and women. Another fact is the gender inequality inside Roma families,” continued Miranda Fejzo. “Gender inequality
and economic despair cause divorce, domestic violence and even cases where men sell their own wives and children to criminal trafficking networks.”
Another problem she pointed to is that representatives of the Romani community are rarely invited to participate in the local anti-trafficking committees. “The question is why Roma are not allowed to participate in the work that concerns us.”
GULNARA SHAHINIAN CONFIRMED that Roma and Egyptians (a small ethnic group in Albania, often called Roma) account for a substantial number of assisted victims of trafficking, and she added that trafficking does not originate from the Romani people. “The people earning the money use weak groups. We must not blame trafficking on minorities – it is a global phenomenon.”

 FRA ROUNDTABLE WITH ROMANI WOMEN NET- WORKS
The EU Agency for Fundamental Rights (FRA) organised a Roundtable with Romani women networks the day before the start of the conference “Our Voices Heard”. The aim was to initiate a debate on the conference themes and provide comments on the draft research guidelines for the upcoming FRA study on indicators measuring the implementation, protection, respect and promotion of children’s rights in the EU.
The participants expressed concern about the increased anti-Roma attitudes on the part of politicians and citizens across Europe, and the inaction of some Council of Europe Member States in acknowledging and addressing the forced sterilisation of Romani women. They also noted the increasing numbers of cases of forced evictions of Roma families, especially in winter, and the inaction of central administrations in ending this illegal practice.
The unacceptably poor health status of Roma communities was a main concern of the Roundtable partici- pants, as was the failure of govern- ments to follow up the report “Breaking the Barriers – Romani Women and Access to Public Health Care”, published in 2003, with concrete measures and programmes.
The Roundtable participants adopted 27 recommendations, which were later on echoed in the conference working groups.
Read the recommendations at:
http://fra.europa.eu/fra/index. php?fuseaction=content.dsp_cat_ content&catid=3e5ce17d37410
In his key-note speech, Ambassador Anders Oljelund put trafficking into a historical perspective and compared it to slavery. “Selling and buying of human beings is nothing new. It has taken place all over the world, for a long time. It has never been abolished, like we thought slavery was two hundred years ago,” said Anders Oljelund, who is the coordinator against trafficking at the Swedish Ministry for Foreign Affairs.
Trafficking is a violation of fundamental human rights since it means taking ownership of a human being. Both Anders Oljelund and Gulnara Shahinian gave examples of the international protocols and documents that can be used to fight trafficking. Most coun- tries have ratified the international conven- tions and all EU Member States are obliged to follow them. The 1989 UN Convention on the Rights of the Child states that governments have the obligation to protect all children; even from their parents if necessary. Children have been increasingly targeted by adults for begging and sexual exploitation. The most vulnerable are the children who are not registered, which is all too common among the marginalised groups in southern and central Europe.
“NGOs and authorities must cooperate across borders to stop and combat the criminal adults who use children.”
The Palermo Protocol, which is part of a United Nations convention from 2002, states that human trafficking means that somebody has been recruited in order to exploit him or her later on. Trafficking can take place without the use of force and “it is enough to lure somebody, or to use his or her weakness or dependence.”
WHEN IT COMES TO trafficking children there is no need for force or deception: “Children are of course always vulnerable because they trust adults; they must because they have no choice,” said Anders Oljelund.
In working against trafficking, governments have promised to do three things: to prevent people from becoming victims of trafficking, to prosecute those who commit these crimes, and thirdly to protect those who have been used in trafficking.
»The most vulnerable are children who are not registered«, said Anders Oljelund.
“We have to realise that victims of prostitu- tion, victims of slave-like labour or child beggars are victims and not illegal immigrants or simple prostitutes, outlaws or misbehaved children,” emphasised Anders Oljelund. Gulnara Shahinian underlined that “The victims have to be treated with dignity and respect.”
All panel members at the workshop agreed that prevention of trafficking, protection of victims and prosecution require better international and national cooperation. “Prevention is one of the most important components of anti-trafficking policy,” said Gulnara Shahinian. There was also a general consensus about the necessity of improving the socio-economic situation in areas where poverty is the main reason for people being lured in to trafficking.
Gulnara Shahinian also pointed out that no country in the world is immune to trafficking in human beings, “be it the country of destination, origin or transit.” That is why national and international cooperation is necessary.
   ROMANI WOMEN’S RIGHTS CONFERENCE • 7

  Elena Gorolova (left) and Helena Balogova were both sterilised against their will. They cannot afford to pursue their cases in court as no legal aid is available. They are now active in an NGO where sterilised women give each other support – and demand that the government publicly apologises.
THEME: RESPECTING REPRODUCTIVE RIGHTS
Forced Sterilisation of Romani Women
Illegitimately performed sterilisations have been reported from a number of European countries. In the 1990s Sweden and Norway spent several years coming to terms with the fact that women – many of them Romani – had been forcibly sterilised for many years. The process ended with an apology from the governments of both countries.
TODAY IT IS THE turn of several other coun- tries to face the fact that this practice has also been conducted in their countries in the past few years – and is still happening in some places even today.
“I am one of the women sterilised against my will. I have lodged a complaint with the Czech Ombudsman, but I don’t expect my case to reach court – I can’t afford to pursue my case and no legal aid is available. But I want the Ombudsman to know what happened to me. There are other ways of protecting a woman from pregnancy; methods that allow you to have a child at a later date if you so wish,” said Helena Balogova, representative of the Group of Women Harmed by Sterilisation, Czech Republic, and one of the panel discus- sants.
The workshop on Respect for Reproductive Rights focused entirely on illegitimately
performed sterilisations. Since 2004 the Office of the Ombudsman of the Czech Republic is deeply involved in the issue of forced sterilisa- tions. By November 2007 the total number of complaints lodged concerning illegitimately performed sterilisations had exceeded 100. Most of them came from Romani women. The Ombudsman concluded that in none of the complaints he has received had consent been given that was without error and fully free in the human rights sense.
“This applies to all 100 cases, without exception,” commented Filip Glotzmann, Head of Office of the Czech Republic Defender of Rights, in his presentation. “Some examples of errors included the application for sterilisation being signed after the operation, the proce- dure being performed without consent, and consent being given under threat,” he ex- plained.
Few of these cases will ever reach the Czech courts since no legal aid is available. But an NGO has pursued two cases and in 2007 the courts established that these two women have been sterilised without a free and informed choice. One of the women received financial compensation; in the other case the hospital had to issue a written apology.
One of the legislative proposals from the Ombudsman is that a minimum of seven days must elapse between providing information and expressing free, serious and informed consent. Other recommendations are that a handbook about the essence and implications of sterilisation be produced, and that lifelong learning of doctors on the main principles of patient’s rights be introduced. The Ombuds- man also recommends that the government issue an apology and that compensation be paid to the victims.
8 • ROMANI WOMEN’S RIGHTS CONFERENCE

 DELEGATION FOR ROMA ISSUES
In the autumn of 2006, the Swedish Government set up the Delegation for Roma Issues with the task of improving the situation of Roma people in Sweden. Counteracting discrimination and breaking social, political and economic exclusion requires close dialogue and cooperation with the Roma community.
One of its first tasks is to conduct an inquiry into the situation of Roma in Sweden. The Delegation will also promote and support municipal projects and services aimed at improv- ing the situation of the Roma and spread knowledge and information about the Roma. In partnership with government agencies, organisations and Roma representatives, the Delegation will also arrange conferences and seminars, take part in international cooperation on Roma issues and examine the need and scope for building up Roma institutions.
The Delegation consists of ten members, half of whom are of Roma origin. A number of experts and a broad reference group consisting of representatives of Roma associations have also been appointed and will be consulted on a continuous basis. A final report is to be presented to the Government in December 2009, together with a proposal for how work to improve the situation of Roma is to continue.
Sweden has five national minorities: the Jews, the Roma, the Sami, the Swedish Finns and the Tornedalers. In 1999, the Swedish Parliament approved ratification of the Framework Conven- tion for the Protection of National Minorities and the European Charter for Regional or Minority Languages. A minorities policy was adopted in 2000.
For further information: www.romadelegationen.se
 “The most fundamental fact is that sexual sterilisation is a medical intervention causing the permanent loss of reproductive capacity,” said Filip Glotzmann.
A new law on health care in the Czech Republic was drafted in 2006 but was not approved prior to Parliamentary elections and is still pending.
IN SWEDEN, AROUND 63,000 people were sterilised between 1935 and 1975. More than 95 per cent were women. It is not known how many of them were Romani. The chief motive for introducing the 1940s sterilisation law was to prevent mentally ill and so called “feeble- minded” individuals from reproducing.
“In practice the Swedish law was used as a means of ‘cleansing and purifying’ society from unwanted problems. The common denomina- tor of these women was the fact that they were dependent on public support and that they were considered to be, or likely to become, ‘bad mothers’,” explained Maija Runcis, Associate Professor of History at Södertörn University College, Sweden.
The Swedish law prohibited the use of physical force, and in actual fact some 90–95 per cent of the persons sterilised in 1935– 1975 signed their own applications.
“From a legal point of view, these are voluntary operations. But on the other hand, the institutions and physicians used varying forms of persuasion and indirect coercion, thus eliminating free will for those sterilised,” said Maija Runcis.
IN NORWAY THE Romani have been subjected to a tough assimilation policy as well as forced sterilisation. Methods that were used well into the 1970s included children being forcibly removed from their families, and families being placed in work camps designed to adjust them to a settled lifestyle.
“Making up for previous discrimination is a long process,” explained Tove Skotvedt, Senior Adviser at the Norwegian Ministry of Labour and Social Inclusion.
In the early 1990s the Ministry of Social and Health Affairs commissioned the Norwe- gian Research Council to conduct a major research project. The report was published in 2000 and estimates that more than 300 female Romani were illegally sterilised from the 1930s into the 1970s. The Norwegian Government has apologised and has set up collective and individual compensation schemes for the previous violations of the Romani people in Norway.
“The Norwegian experience shows that we need a public ‘watchdog’ that can sound the alarm when the situation so requires. We also need governments that are ready to investigate
allegations, acknowledge wrongdoing and apologise. Such a process is necessary in order to re-establish confidence,” underlined Tove Skotvedt.
During the discussion it was underlined that sterilisation is never an acute and pressing treatment – a few days or weeks for the decision should therefore always be allowed. National and international legislation also set out special conditions for its performance to guarantee that the intervention is performed with free and informed consent.
Several participants underlined that reports about forced sterilisations still being per- formed are coming from Slovakia, for example. In Hungary the state recently lost a case (A.S. v. Hungary) concerning a woman who was sterilised 17 minutes after being admitted for delivery. She had given her signed consent, but the court ruled that this does not prove that the consent was free and well-informed. The time that had lapsed after she was admitted was too short to guarantee that she was in any condition to make such a crucial decision.
“We need governments that are ready to investigate allegations, acknowledge wrongdoing and apologise.”
THE VICTIMS OF sterilisation often feel shame, and because they are reluctant to talk about what has happened, they do not get the help and support they need.
“I had no idea that other women had suffered the same thing as me. It made us all feel stronger to realise that we were not alone, that we did not have to hide and be ashamed,” said Elena Gorolova, spokesperson of the Group of Women Harmed by Sterilisation, Czech Republic.
The organisation was formed in 2003 and the women meet once a month to discuss their situation and to give each other support. They have also organised demonstrations and put together a photo exhibition. The organisation aims to inform doctors, patients and the general public about forced sterilisation. They demand that the government publicly apolo- gise to the victims, and they demand compen- sation.
“In the beginning it was hard to speak about it, to give media interviews and to be photo- graphed. But as time went by it felt more and more important to be frank and talk about it. It gave us energy and we want to make sure that this does not happen to our daughters,” said Elena Gorolova.
 ROMANI WOMEN’S RIGHTS CONFERENCE • 9

THEME: ROMA ACCESS TO PUBLIC HEALTH CARE
Health Care – Without Care
Shorter life spans, high infant mortality, low access to health care, ambulances that do not arrive when called for. In many countries in Europe, Romani people receive poorer health care than the rest of the population. In Romania, however, a project using health mediators has vastly improved the situation.
“ACCESS TO HEALTH care is a fundamental human right, but in some countries Romani women have a life span that is 14 years shorter than for other women, and infant mortality is almost twice as high,” said keynote speaker Nicoleta Bitu, from the organisation Romani Criss in Romania.
Romani Criss receives reports from all over Europe and Nicoleta Bitu is often shocked by what she reads.
“It was unbelievable to see that in Italy and France there are refugee camps where Romani from Macedonia and Kosovo live under incredibly difficult conditions. We know of countries where Romani children have not been vaccinated for 20 years, where there are specially segregated maternity wards for Romani women and areas with no health services for Romani at all.”
During the workshop Savelina Danova from the European Roma Rights Center (ERRC), presented the organisation’s report “Ambu- lance Not on the Way: The Disgrace of Health Care for Roma in Europe.”
“There is evidence that in many instances Romani patients receive a lower standard of health care than others,” said Savelina Danova and emphasised that Romani rights organisa- tions need to demand that governments respect their human rights commitments.
OBSTACLES THAT PREVENT Roma from accessing health care are often of a systemic nature. For example, unemployment and a lack of citizenship or personal documents mean exclusion from health insurance coverage and no access to social assistance. Segregation and geographical isolation make it even more difficult to get adequate care.
“In Bulgaria, for example, according to official estimates in 2004, 46 per cent of Roma are not covered by health insurance,” ex- plained Savelina Danova.
Romani women are particularly vulnerable because they are even more disadvantaged than the men as far as education and employ- ment are concerned.
“Women are especially vulnerable during pregnancy and childbirth. Alleged negligent
Hanna Dobronauteanu, responsible at the Ministry of Public Health for the successful system of health mediators in Romania.
The health care for Roma in Europe is a disgrace, according to Savelina Danova from the European Roma Rights Center.
“Our long term goal is that mediators shall not be needed at all. The needs of the most vulnerable groups must be mainstreamed in all policy development.”
treatment of Romani women has caused death and serious health damage in a number of instances documented by the ERRC in, for example, Bulgaria, Croatia and Romania. Women also suffer from inadequate protection against domestic violence,” Savelina Danova pointed out.
DISCRIMINATION CAN BE overt and very harsh. In a number of countries, there are widespread reports by Roma about being denied access to emergency assistance.
“In 2004, research in Hungary found that 40 per cent of the Roma who live in segregated settlements experienced the denial of an ambulance visit,” she noted.
Bulgaria, Greece and Italy have been found in recent years to be in violation of the Revised European Social Charter due to a failure to undertake effective measures to improve the situation of many Roma who live in inadequate housing and are subjected to forced evictions and segregated housing. The ERRC has documented the exposure of Romani commu- nities to environmental hazards in countries including Germany, France, Kosovo and Slovakia.
The International Covenant on Economic, Social and Cultural Rights demands that states parties ensure that the principle of non-discrimination in access to health care has an immediate effect.
“This means that states have a special obligation to undertake positive action to provide the most vulnerable with health insurance and health care facilities,” com- mented Savelina Danova.
She presented a list of actions that need to be taken by European Governments, including revision of legislation which is found to have a unequal impact on Roma and other vulnerable groups, regular assessment of the impact of health and social policies on groups threatened by social exclusion, targeted positive action and investments in health care provision in areas with a high Romani population. Special mechanisms for monitoring discrimination are also necessary.
“Targeted actions to involve Romani people
   10 • ROMANI WOMEN’S RIGHTS CONFERENCE

 “SHE CHANGED SWEDISH SOCIETY”
“Huge problems still haunt the Romani people in Europe and their lack of influence ensures that the voices of the Romani people are not heard.”
Thomas Hammarberg, the Council of Europe Commissioner for Human Rights, has fought injustices and protested about discrimination against the Romani people for many years. He was a close friend of author Katarina Taikon, born in 1932 in Sweden, who let her voice be heard in a number of books about the Roma in Sweden.
Katarina Taikon grew up as Nazism and Fascism spread across Europe. In Sweden the Romani were chased from place to place and their children were prevented from attending school. Katarina Taikon did not start school until she was 26. But she soon started to write books that described and explained Romani culture and customs. “Her importance to the Romani community and to justice and understanding is an enormous contribution to our country. She
 Thomas Hammarberg.
changed and opened the Swedish society,” said Thomas Hammarberg.
Another of her important contributions was to highlight the situation of the Romani people in Sweden during the Mayday demonstrations in 1966. She and others brought signs that said “We want to go to school” and “We want to live in houses”. “The other demonstrators were shocked to discover that a group in Sweden lived under such harsh conditions – there was not much awareness of this. And the first time I heard about forced sterilisation in Sweden was when Katarina Taikon talked about it,” recalled Thomas Hammarberg.
Katrina Taikon wrote a series of autobio- graphical youth books about Katitzi; books
that are still read all over Sweden and still play a vital role in explaining Romani culture.
“She had the courage to talk about a culture that was not respected. Much has changed since she died in 1995, and I wish she could see it. I am positive that if she had lived today, she would have worked internationally and tried to improve the situation of Romani people all over Europe,” concluded Thomas Hammarberg.
Katarina Taikon was an activist for Romani rights, and she is one of Sweden’s most beloved authors of children’s books. The first book in her series about Katitzi, for the first time translated into Romani, has just been released. Katarina Taikon was hospitalised after suffering a cardiac arrest in 1982. She died in 1995.
  as employees in the health sector can make a difference, and anti-discrimination training must be offered to public and private health care providers,” concluded Savelina Danova.
IN ROMANIA A SYSTEM of health mediators has improved health care provision for Roma. The health mediators are Romani women, who have received training to function as interpret- ers between Romani patients and health care staff.
The system was introduced through a project by the NGO Romani Criss in 1993. In 2001 it expanded as the Government intro- duced a Strategy and Action Plan to improve the situation of Roma. Today there are almost 600 health mediators, all financed by the Ministry of Health. All 42 counties in Romania now have health mediators.
“The basis for this success is that Romani culture and traditions have been respected and the commitment of the Romani repre- sentatives has been strong,” explained Hanna Dobronauteanu, former Adviser to the Romanian Minister of Health.
The results are very good. The proportions of vaccinated children in communities with health mediators have increased from between 20 and 68 per cent to between 90 and 100 per cent. Infant mortality has dropped to zero in several communities, in some of the worst areas the figure was almost 48 per cent before,” explained Hanna Dobronauteanu.
“Most noticeable is the positive change in the perception of Roma shown by health care staff. The Romani communities also show an increased desire to work and participate in society. In the long run I am sure this will lead to a positive change in the general view of the Romani population,” said Hanna Dobronaute- anu.
One important side effect is the jobs that are created for Roma women in their commu- nities.
“This leads to women’s voices being heard and shows that they are respected members of the community who actively create profound changes,” underlined Hanna Dobronauteanu.
Nicoleta Bitu, from Romani Criss, agreed that the health mediators project has been a great success and pointed out that mediators are needed in other areas as well. But she warned that if the method becomes perma- nent, its effects could lead to increased segregation:
“Our long-term goal is for mediators not to be needed at all. The needs of the most vulnerable groups must be mainstreamed in all policy development,” was Nicolata Bitu’s message to the governments of Europe.
ROMANI WOMEN’S RIGHTS CONFERENCE • 11

What did you think about the conference?
     THEREZA ERIKSSON, Romani Studies Institute (RSI), and International Roma Women Network (IRWIN), Sweden:
As a Romani woman from Sweden I was, and am, very proud that the conference was held in my country. I hope that the 2008 conference will be held somewhere else, in order to allow different countries to act as host. I think that the conference lived up to its name – “Our Voices Heard” – but I also hope that the result will be “Our Voices Remembered”. Since I work on Romani women rights issues I was familiar with most of what was said, but it was an important opportunity to meet, talk, listen and discuss what needs to be done nationally and internationally in the future. Because there is much to be done – and big structural changes are certainly needed. We strive for better cooperation between Roma and the authorities at all levels – the local, municipal, national and international levels must be involved.
    MAIJA RUNCIS, Associate Professor in History, Centre for Baltic and East European Studies, Södertörn University College, Sweden:
In a way, the conference was an eye-opener for me as it showed the lack of human rights for Romani women from Eastern European countries. The switch from totalitarianism to democracy and membership of the EU seem to have strengthened exclusion, as well as to have created new repressive methods against unwanted social groups – for example the lack of access to health care and social security. The responsibility of the state towards these groups seems to be very weak and needs to be stressed more in public debate. How is it possible for democratic countries to be so repressive towards the Romani people, and especially Romani women? For me that was a new experience.
REMZIYE UMUNC, Edirne Roma Association (EDROM ), Turkey:
I think the most important aspect of the conference is the gathering of Roma women from different countries and backgrounds. We hardly ever find this kind of opportunity. Also I’m glad that we talked about discrimination of Roma women and how to combat this. Finally, I’m happy to have met women activists from Roma NGOs. We only have a few women activists in the Roma community in Turkey. I hope we can provide more participation from Turkey at the next conference.
SARITA FRIMAN-KORPELA, Senior Officer at the Ministry of Social Affairs and Health, working as Secretary General of the Advisory Board on Romani Affairs, Finland:
The most important thing was probably bringing people together. The topics were interesting. In the future, however, it would be very valuable to link people from different countries, who work on similar issues concerning the Roma. For example: during this conference I raised the issue of Romani people begging in the streets – a topic currently being discussed in Finland. This is a common phenomenon in many countries, and several participants had experience of the matter. We discussed how different authorities have dealt with it, how the Roma feel about it, if it is right to take small children into custody etc. This discussion has been an asset to me. In future conferences I would like working groups to come up with practical solutions that serve participants in their work.
I personally appreciated the Swedish Government’s high level of involvement during the conference. It is always an added value when a government shows genuine interest in Romani matters.
The set up of the conference was one of a kind. The practical arrangements worked well, the Lejondal Castle was very inspiring and I can’t remember another event when the conference food – or food in general – was so great.”
Lunch on the veranda.
“I think the name of the conference: “Our Voices Heard” was fulfilled – but I also hope that it will entail: “Our Voices Remembered”.
On their way to the next meeting.
 Lejondal’s Castle.
   12 • ROMANI WOMEN’S RIGHTS CONFERENCE
The singer Hans Caldaras performed after dinner.
  
  Parliamentary Assembly Assemblée parlementaire
http://assembly.coe.int
   Resolution 1927 (2013)1
Final version
Ending discrimination against Roma children
Parliamentary Assembly
1. Discrimination against Roma in Europe is widespread and affects members of this community already at a very young age. It takes a variety of forms, including lack of adequate prenatal and infant health care, statelessness, child poverty, inadequate housing conditions, unequal access to education and an increased risk of being subjected to bullying, violence and trafficking.
2. Efforts aimed at addressing this state of affairs are all the more urgent when one considers that around 50% of the Roma population in Europe, which corresponds to about 5 to 6 million people, is under 18 years of age. These efforts should be aimed at improving the material living conditions of Roma families through investment in housing, sanitation and job creation, and at changing stereotyped and discriminatory attitudes towards Roma. The ultimate objective should be ensuring that Roma children are given the same opportunities as any other children, and supporting their ability to make decisions freely about their future.
3. If Roma are given equal opportunities during their childhood, as adults they will be in a position to contribute to the workforce and economic activity in Europe as qualified professionals in various fields. Being more integrated in society, they will act as bridges to promote tolerance and diversity on the continent. They will engage in political and social activism, playing a leading role in improving the situation of the Roma and other disadvantaged communities in Europe.
4. The Parliamentary Assembly underlines that discrimination is a two-way process. To eradicate it, it is necessary to address both sides of the equation. Those who are discriminated against should be provided with opportunities and their self-confidence should be improved by encouraging rhetoric and targeted policies. At the same time, awareness-raising activities and opportunities to engage with “others” should be put in place in order to develop mutual understanding and tolerance.
5. Empowering Roma children and their families implies not only working and supporting Roma, but working with them and creating the conditions for community organisation and active participation in the development of policies, including in the decision-making process. Many non-governmental organisations (NGOs), both at international and national level, work effectively on Roma issues and it is essential that national governments co-operate with them to devise relevant policies.
6. The Assembly refers to its Recommendation 2003 (2012) on Roma migrants in Europe and Resolution 1740 (2010) on the situation of Roma in Europe and relevant activities of the Council of Europe, and reiterates its call to all Council of Europe member States to face up to their responsibilities and tackle the issue of the situation of Roma in a serious and sustainable manner.
7. The Assembly urges its member States to take concrete measures to end discrimination against Roma children, and in particular to:
7.1. expand access to integrated early childhood services by:
7.1.1. enabling easier registration of births and issuing of birth certificates;
1. Assembly debate on 23 April 2013 (13th Sitting) (see Doc. 13158, report of the Committee on Equality and Non- Discrimination, rapporteur: Ms Memecan). Text adopted by the Assembly on 23 April 2013 (13th Sitting).
  F - 67075 Strasbourg Cedex | assembly@coe.int | Tel: +33 3 88 41 2000 | Fax: +33 3 88 41 2733
 
Resolution 1927 (2013)
7.1.2. strengthening outreach services for young children and families from isolated communities; addressing maternal health, food security, child-rearing and the family environment, health protection, responsibility for and care of new-born infants; sending mobile health care units to visit Roma neighbourhoods and communities for screening on dental care, childcare and reproductive health; sending officials to inform Roma women about their rights, health care services, and educational opportunities for their children;
7.1.3. helping poor Roma families to promote the growth and development of their young children at home in a safe and stimulating physical and psycho-social environment;
7.1.4. regularly informing the Roma communities about public services such as health provision and educational opportunities, by using the media, and especially television, for awareness raising;
7.1.5. training Roma mothers on childcare, health care and education directly within their own communities or providing free transportation to training centres where such training sessions can be organised;
7.2. make school more accessible by:
7.2.1. providing at least two years of inclusive, mandatory and affordable high-quality preschool education;
7.2.2. providing all teachers and professional trainers with anti-discrimination training, information and materials;
7.2.3. preparing schools at all levels to welcome Roma children and promote their development on an equal basis with other children; by including intercultural values and diversity in the curriculum, training the teachers to deal with a diverse group of children, providing individual instruction adapted to children’s development level, creating a democratic learning environment in which every child feels the right to participate, and establishing a physically and emotionally secure environment free from violence;
7.2.4. paying special attention to confidence building at an early age by ensuring that Roma children are included in class work and in extracurricular activities, are provided with classroom materials if they do not have the means to purchase them, rewarding them for positive behaviour and achievements, and encouraging them and their parents to work on improving their talents;
7.2.5. adapting curricula to embrace inclusion as a core goal of education, free of gender stereotypes;
7.2.6. including, where appropriate, the teaching of Roma culture and history and, when necessary, providing support for Romani to be taught as a second language;
7.2.7. introducing appropriately trained and paid Roma assistants and mediators in classrooms and encouraging greater numbers of Roma to become teachers;
7.2.8. ensuring that Roma children are taught the core curriculum on an equal basis with other children;
7.2.9. investing in promoting parental literacy, especially of the mother, to strengthen support for children’s education, and conducting training programmes such as vocational or language training for mothers to better equip them to become active members of society;
7.2.10. introducing measures to ensure that Roma girls are given the same opportunities to receive formal education as Roma boys;
7.2.11. if necessary, providing transportation, clothing, food and other basic necessities in order to facilitate integration and acceptance of Roma children in classrooms;
7.2.12. providing after-school activities of interest to Roma children and encouraging the students and their families to take advantage of these activities to improve their talents, and providing children with the necessary tools and training so that they can participate in these activities;
2

7.3. end school segregation and promote inclusion by:
7.3.1. ensuring that all students start learning about equality, respect and teamwork in their early years at school and that the curriculum, as well as extracurricular activities, reinforce these values, thus encouraging the students to learn from and appreciate each other in order not to develop prejudices in the future;
7.3.2. executing, where appropriate, judgments of the European Court of Human Rights relating to discrimination in the enjoyment of the applicants' right to education due to their assignment to special schools;
7.3.3. setting up comprehensive policies to implement a long-term commitment to inclusive education that include national and local action plans to promote inclusion, supported by financial, legal and administrative measures and requiring local municipalities to produce desegregation plans;
7.3.4. setting up awareness-raising campaigns to inform Roma about their rights and responsibilities and introducing complaints mechanisms for Roma families to challenge breaches of their right to inclusion;
7.3.5. engaging Roma families in parental activities in schools, for example as chaperones or members of parents’ associations;
7.3.6. familiarising teachers with Roma children, their culture and identity during their training, in addition to designing teaching methods that prevent discrimination and promote diversity; ensuring that teachers are trained to overcome personal biases and prejudices;
7.4. remove the socio-economic barriers to education by:
7.4.1. introducing preparatory programmes and additional academic support for Roma children to facilitate readiness for school, to support the transitions from one educational level to the next and to re-engage those who drop out of school;
7.4.2. providing scholarships and financial support for Roma students to attend school; designing incentives and engaging the private sector to offer scholarships to Roma children;
7.4.3. encouraging the promotion of role models for the Roma communities including successful Roma students, businessmen and artists; creating opportunities and designing events for them to engage with the Roma communities to share experiences and serve as a source of inspiration;
7.4.4. supporting internship programs for Roma in government offices, or in the private sector during the summer, which will facilitate their entry into the job market and inclusion in the business world;
7.4.5. encouraging Roma students to take part in school trips, in order to expose them to the outside world, by covering their expenses if necessary;
7.5. protect Roma children’s right to respect for their personal and physical integrity by:
7.5.1. ensuring that legal prohibition of all forms of violence and manifestations of racism and anti-Gypsyism in schools is effectively enforced;
7.5.2. promoting in Roma communities awareness of values and standards relating to gender equality, non-discrimination and human rights;
7.6. provide sufficient state financing to ensure the activities mentioned in paragraphs 7.1 to 7.5 are effective and efficient.
8. The Assembly also believes that governmental measures to promote good governance form the minimum foundation on which such specific measures must be based to achieve maximum results. Member States should therefore encourage initiatives to improve the accountability and transparency of different levels of government and actors, to enhance access to justice and the rule of law, to empower human rights institutions, such as ombudspersons, and to better monitor and address complaints from Roma children.
9. In order to address the root cause of discrimination, politicians and public opinion leaders must act responsibly. They have an important role to play in reversing stereotyping and discriminatory attitudes towards Roma and in promoting a culture of diversity and respect between different groups.
3
Resolution 1927 (2013)

United Nations
General Assembly
Human Rights Council Nineteenth session
Agenda item 5
Human rights bodies and mechanisms
A/HRC/19/71
     Distr.: General 3 January 2012
Original: English
    Recommendations of the Forum on Minority Issues at its fourth session: guaranteeing the rights of minority women and girls
(29 and 30 November 2011)
 GE.12-10005

A/HRC/19/71
 Contents
I. Introduction .............................................................................................................
II. General considerations ............................................................................................
III. General recommendations .......................................................................................
A. National, regional and local governments.......................................................
B. National human rights institutions ..................................................................
C. Civil society ....................................................................................................
D. United Nations system and human rights mechanisms...................................
E. Media ..............................................................................................................
IV. Thematic recommendations ....................................................................................
A. Minority women and girls and the right to education .....................................
B. Effective political participation ......................................................................
C. Effective participation in economic, social and cultural life...........................
Paragraphs Page
1–6 3
7–9 4 10–50 4 12–32 5 33–36 8 37–39 8 40–49 9
50 10 51–103 10 51–63 10 64–79 12 80–103 14
2

I. Introduction
1. The fourth session of the Forum on Minority Issues (held 29-30 November 2011) focused on practical and concrete measures and recommendations aimed at guaranteeing the rights of minority women and girls. It was informed by and built on the work of the previous three sessions of the Forum relating to “Minorities and the right to education”, “Minorities and effective political participation” and “Minorities and effective participation in economic life”. The Chairperson of the Forum was Graciela Dixon of Panama. The work of the Forum was guided by the independent expert on minority issues, Rita Izsák. The participants, more than 400, included representatives of Governments, treaty bodies, United Nations specialized agencies, regional intergovernmental bodies, national human rights institutions and civil society. Importantly, participants also included several representatives of minority communities from all regions of the world.
2. In accordance with Human Rights Council resolution 6/15, the present document contains the recommendations that emanated from the fourth session of the Forum, which sought to provide concrete and tangible outcomes in the form of thematic recommendations of practical value to all stakeholders. These action-oriented recommendations are aimed at increasing the role of minority women within the State while enabling them to maintain their own identity and characteristics, thus promoting the good governance and integrity of the State.
3. In addition to the Declaration on the Rights of Persons Belonging to National or Ethnic, Religious and Linguistic Minorities and the commentary thereon, the recommendations are based on other international and regional human rights standards, principles and guidelines developed by different stakeholders as well as national legislation. The Declaration on Minorities is inspired by article 27 of the International Covenant on Civil and Political Rights The jurisprudence and general comments of the Human Rights Committee and other treaty bodies, including the Committee on the Elimination of Discrimination against Women, have also informed the recommendations.
4. The range of issues included in the recommendations is not exhaustive. It is hoped that the recommendations will be interpreted in a constructive manner, in cooperation and dialogue with minority communities in the light of the obligations of States to implement human rights standards effectively in practice.
5. The recommendations are phrased in broad terms and can be implemented in countries with diverse historical, cultural and religious backgrounds, with full respect for universal human rights. The Forum took into account the fact that a great variety of country and minority situations exist and that, consequently, different measures may be required to improve the participation of minority women, who can be deeply affected by the context in which they live. Standard solutions are generally neither possible nor desirable.
6. The present document provides decision-makers, public officials, non-governmental organizations, academics and others, including minorities and minority women themselves with an overview of possible options and solutions to the challenges facing minority women. The recommendations are a resource for decision-makers, assisting them to make appropriate and informed choices when designing legislation and policies aimed at guaranteeing the rights of minority women, with emphasis on the rights and opportunities for minority women to have access to education, to take part effectively in economic life and to have access to labour markets, and to participate fully in social, cultural and political life. The document further constitutes a useful tool for minorities themselves, both men and women, guiding them in their efforts to improve the situation of minority women. Moreover, it should be borne in mind that a country situation will evolve over time, and
A/HRC/19/71
 3

A/HRC/19/71
 4
therefore needs to be assessed on a regular basis in order that existing mechanisms may be improved or new mechanisms established to ensure that minority women can enjoy their rights fully.
II. General considerations
7. Women belonging to minorities frequently experience unique challenges and multiple or intersecting forms of discrimination emanating from their status as members of minorities and as women or girls. This may make minority women and girls particularly vulnerable to violations of their rights in both public and private life. Without explicit recognition of the different life experiences of minority women and men, such discrimination will often go unnoticed and not be addressed adequately. A gender perspective that takes into account the multiple and intersecting forms of discrimination that minority women and girls might face is critical when addressing minority rights and the situation of minority women and girls in a given minority group, and in a particular country. The rights of every single member of such minority groups must be respected fully and equally, in all circumstances. Likewise, the existence of entrenched gender roles or local customs does not relieve the State of its responsibility to respect, protect and fulfil the rights of minority women.
8. The diversity that exists within every minority group must also be recognized. They are diverse communities, including women and girls, who may experience multiple forms of discrimination in the course of their interactions within and outside their group. Women may be regarded as subordinate or inferior by men; in addition, minority women may face discrimination on the basis of their ethnicity, nationality, language or religion from those outside the community.
9. The issues and concerns of minority women are frequently given a lower priority than the efforts made to ensure minority rights for the group in general. Women belonging to minority groups often struggle within their communities to advocate for their rights, which may be set aside as a result of the prioritization of the general concerns of the group. Barriers to the empowerment of some minority women, including lack of social or economic contacts, networks or minority women’s support groups, and scarcity of female minority role models have an important impact on the enjoyment by minority women and girls of their human rights. Minority women may hesitate to voice their gender-specific grievances even within their own groups, and much less outside them. Minority women’s rights could benefit from greater attention by the broader movement for women’s rights. In turn, the women’s rights movement would also benefit from the specific experiences of minority women in their overall struggle for equality.
III. General recommendations
10. All measures taken with a view to implementing the recommendations made below should be developed, designed, implemented and reviewed with the full and effective participation of minorities, both men and women. The conditions allowing for such collaboration and mechanisms to facilitate consultation should therefore be put in place by all actors involved. Since no community is homogenous, efforts should also be made to ensure that the diverse views within minority groups be heard and taken into account in the process.
11. In this conjuncture of difficult worldwide economic situation, all stakeholders should ensure that the attention to gender and issues of minority women not be sidelined or reduced.

A. National, regional and local governments
12. Governments should acknowledge the particular challenges and barriers faced by minority women. They should ensure that domestic legislation relevant to anti- discrimination, equality, the rights of women and minority rights is adequate to guarantee the protection of minority women and, where appropriate, that it take explicitly into account the rights of minority women and the multiple and intersecting forms of discrimination to which they may be subjected.
13. Governments should review, reform as appropriate and make transparent any legislation, policy or practice that has a disproportionately negative effect on women from particular minority groups, for example, by restricting their access to public and work places, employment opportunities and educational institutions.
14. In addition to adopting domestic legislation preventing direct and indirect discrimination against minority women and girls, Governments should ensure the implementation of such legislation and that adequate penalties exist for acts of discrimination.
15. Minority women’s access to justice should be evaluated and barriers identified. Governments should consider appropriate safeguards, including those aimed at guaranteeing the right of minority women and girls to non-discrimination and their equal access to remedies in cases of violation of their rights. The justice system, in particular at the local level, should be equipped to help ensure that minority women have full and effective access to justice and comprehensive reparation. For example, legal aid could be targeted at and made more easily accessible to women from minority groups, including by means of outreach and the provision of translation services in minority languages.
16. Governments should take all necessary measures to ensure protection of minority women’s rights defenders and minority women who fulfil leadership roles and may be at greater risk of violence.
17. Governments should recognize the need for special measures, policies and programmes in order to address entrenched situations of discrimination and exclusion experienced by certain women belonging to national or ethnic, religious and linguistic minorities. They should ensure that policies equally benefit minority women by adopting targeted approaches devised to eliminate gaps and inequality between them and others in society. Such measures should be time-bound, monitored and evaluated to assess their impact on the situation of disadvantaged minority women and girls.
18. Accurate data disaggregated by ethnicity, gender, nationality, religion and language allows for a greater understanding of the issues affecting minority women and their circumstances, including their socio-economic situations, and enable targeted interventions to be considered. A crucial prerequisite for this data collection to be initiated is the recognition by Governments of the very existence of minorities on their territory. Governments should undertake data-gathering exercises that are designed and implemented in full consultation with minorities and minority women. Disaggregated data collection should serve three ends: it should be used first of all to assess the prevailing situation, then to assess the resources that are available and actual access to and use of such resources and finally to conduct an outcomes and impact assessment. Data collection should be conducted in an ethnically sensitive manner and on a voluntary basis, with full respect for the privacy and anonymity of the individuals concerned, in accordance with international standards of personal data protection. The reason for data collection, the process and the way that the information collected will be used should be fully transparent. Using equal opportunity and non-discrimination indicators is essential to develop, monitor and regularly review effective and targeted programmes to improve the situation of minority women and tackle
A/HRC/19/71
 5

A/HRC/19/71
 6
discrimination against them. States should consider issuing a national status report or a white paper on the status of minority women.
19. Governments should evaluate and, where necessary, improve minority women’s access to information, including with regard to such areas as service provision, social and child services and health care. Where appropriate, this should be provided in their mother tongue and to those living in remote regions, and should include measures to facilitate access to and use of new information technologies, including social media.
20. Governments should take measures to identify and integrate consideration of minority women and the intersectional dimensions of discrimination, as well as a gender and minority perspective, in all national programmes, policies and initiatives relevant to minorities. Decisions on policy choices should be fully transparent and made with the full and effective participation of minority women. Obstacles preventing minority women’s participation in decision-making should be identified and addressed by prioritizing the development of a systematic and consistent approach to identifying, evaluating, monitoring and eliminating existing forms of discrimination against minority women and girls.
21. Governments should systematically include principles of gender equality in their planning and budgeting processes and policies, and allocate adequate resources to projects to address the priorities of minority women. Where they have gender-sensitive budgets, Governments should ensure that these include minority women, as should Governments where they have budgets for minorities or marginalized groups.
22. Governments should build multidimensional partnerships at the national and local levels with ministries, training institutions, parliaments, minority groups, women's organizations and, more broadly, civil society organizations operating at policy or community levels. When working on gender equality and minority rights, all should collaborate in the development of clear, long-term strategies and programmes that reflect the needs, expectations, priorities and agendas of the different minority groups in society and minority women belonging to these particular groups. These programmes could include training sessions tailored for minority women in leadership and negotiation skills, as well as in civic representation.
23. Governments should work together with minority communities, minority and women’s rights organizations to develop and implement programmes to sensitize minority women about their rights, and men about minority women’s rights. Carefully designed and implemented public sensitization programmes should also address discrimination and violence against minority women perpetrated by both majority communities and in minority communities. Such public sensitization programmes should be sensitively carried out so that they do not exacerbate discrimination against the minority communities.
24. Efforts to identify and address violence against minority women should be made in close collaboration with local and minority institutions and existing administrative structures. Governments should also ensure that their strategies to tackle violence against women include – and are culturally sensitive and relevant to – all women, including by reflecting the views, opinions and experiences of minority women, and make sure that they have full access to protection and effective remedies. Violence against women occurs in all communities, not only minority communities, and minority women have the right to protection as much as majority women.
25. Government and law enforcement officials, social workers, health professionals and other relevant actors should receive training on non-discrimination, women’s rights and violence against women, including domestic violence, and on the particular situation of minority women who may be disadvantaged or vulnerable. In areas where minorities predominantly live, public sector employees should be encouraged to have at least a basic

knowledge of the minority languages. Governments should further ensure that officials who discriminate against minority women are effectively sanctioned.
26. Governments should conduct periodic reviews of the accessibility of key social services to minority women, with a view to identifying and removing possible barriers that may prevent minority women, including those who are victims of violence, from having access to remedies and protection. The provision of and access to refuges, shelters and social and health-care services should be culturally sensitive and secure.
27. Minority women and girls may be particularly vulnerable in conflict and post- conflict situations. Peacekeeping operations and national security forces working to secure peace in regions affected by war and/or rebellion should pay particular attention to the need to protect minority groups, including the specific needs of minority women and girls. Staff members, police and military personnel should receive training on the specific needs and vulnerability of marginalized minority women and girls, in particular with regard to the use of sexual violence as an instrument of war. Women’s and minority rights should be mainstreamed in the constitution-making processes in conflict or post-conflict areas. Minority women should be included in all processes of conflict settlement and post-conflict reconstruction. Measures should also be taken to ensure access to justice for minority women and girls and accountability for those guilty of violating their rights.
28.
29. Minority women may be particularly vulnerable to trafficking in persons, particularly those living in situations of poverty or conflict, or in remote and border regions. Governments should strengthen bilateral, regional and international cooperation aimed at the elimination of trafficking in persons, especially women and children. Regional institutions should be established with concrete plans of action to combat and eliminate all forms of trafficking in persons and, which should include explicit attention to minority women and girls, as well as protection measures, in order to prevent their return to their country of origin where they might be at risk of further violence from traffickers or of re- trafficking. Such institutions should pay particular attention to ensuring the recruitment of minority women within all of their programmes and to the several factors that might make minority women particularly at risk of trafficking in some situations. Counselling and support programmes should be culturally sensitive and accessible for minority women who are victims of trafficking.
30. Disadvantaged minority women and girls may also be particularly vulnerable to other contemporary forms of slavery, including forced labour, debt bondage, child labour, the sale of children, forced prostitution and forced and early marriage. Governments should put in place systematic measures to identify such practices and take robust action to eradicate violations.
31. All women have the right to protection from harmful practices, which may be found in all communities - majority or minority. Governments should take measures to eliminate all harmful practices, including those that discriminate against minority women and girls, or subject them to violence or physical injury. This process should seek and involve the collaboration of minority, traditional and religious leaders, and especially of minority
A/HRC/19/71
  Evidence demonstrates that minorities in all regions experience denial or deprivation
 of citizenship, which affects their full enjoyment of their rights and frequently leaves them
 stateless. The consequences of denying or depriving minority groups of citizenship are
 considerable. It can have a negative impact on affected persons’ living conditions and the
 degree of their integration in all aspects of society. These situations are sometimes
 compounded by discrimination against minority women, for example, with regard to the
 acquisition, change or retention of nationality and the conferral of nationality on their
 children. States are urged to review national laws or policies that may deny or deprive
 minority women and their children of their legitimate right to citizenship.
7

A/HRC/19/71
 8
women themselves and women’s organizations. Minority women frequently work on eradicating harmful practices and their efforts should be supported. The rights of minority women to equality before the law and to non-discrimination must be given priority over long-standing harmful practices. Governments should ensure that any prohibition of minority practices, that are not per se harmful, be based on reasonable and objective grounds, proportionate to the aims pursued, and not result in an indiscriminate attack on minority cultures. Practices that lead to and/or perpetuate gender inequality or violate the rights of individual women in certain minority communities should be rectified, including through dialogue directly with the communities concerned and with the effective participation of minority women.
32. Governments should allow full access to regions where minorities, and minority women in particular, predominantly live during country visits by special procedures as well as to international organizations and the media, in order for the latter to be able to collect information directly from minority women on their experiences and bring more visibility to the situation of minority women and the challenges they face.
B. National human rights institutions
33. National human rights institutions should ensure that the full spectrum of views, issues and challenges and the diversity of their respective societies are reflected in their activities and programmes. They should consider specific mechanisms in their secretariat to address minority issues, for instance, a focal point on gender and discrimination, with particular attention paid to issues relevant to minority women.
34. National human rights institutions should design a programme of work to analyse the implementation of non-discrimination legislation for minority women. They should analyse domestic legislation and customary laws that are discriminatory towards minority women and recommend policy and legislative reforms where appropriate. They should also assist in developing programmes to enhance the implementation of non-discrimination legislation, including with regard to minority women’s access to education and vocational training, employment, labour rights, social security, financial services and land and property rights.
35. National human rights institutions should support Government actors in such areas as the training of public officials, the design and implementation of gender and racial equality projects, and ensuring access to justice for minority women. They should also act on behalf of minority women and facilitate their access to justice.
36. In the design of promotional and educational human rights material and programmes, national human rights institutions should ensure that they mainstream not only a gender perspective but also a minority rights focus, with particular attention to the specific situation of women who are members of the minority groups in society.
C. Civil society
37. International and national institutions and non-governmental organizations working on women’s rights should review the extent to which they integrate minority issues into their work, with a view to strengthening their attention to the issues of women belonging to minorities. Equally, those working on minority rights and issues of racial discrimination should ensure that they integrate a gender perspective into their work and programmes. Organizations should consider developing joint programmes to ensure that issues of minority women and intersectional discrimination are made visible and addressed in their work.

38. Minority and women’s rights organizations should implement targeted programmes to address the exclusion and discrimination experienced by certain minority women. These could include literacy training and adult education programmes, support for the creation of women’s committees in communities, assistance for minority women to establish networks and organizations providing advice and social support, local advocacy groups to address problems as they arise, and the identification and sharing of experiences of positive role models.
39. Minority rights organizations should encourage a process of national consultation with minority communities with a view to studying the impact of customary practices, as well as national legislation and policies on the rights of minority women. Such studies could then be used to assist the Government in reviewing existing legislation and in designing targeted interventions in favour of minority women’s rights and empowerment.
D. United Nations system and human rights mechanisms
40. All United Nations and regional human rights bodies should address minority issues specifically and systematically, and adopt a gender perspective throughout their programmes and activities. If it is not already the case, they should adopt a specific policy on minority issues, including paying particular attention to the rights of minority women. They should consider appointing a specialist to focus on intersectional discrimination and to help to address minority women’s issues.
41. Development agencies should work with minority women and minority non- governmental organizations to ensure that, wherever appropriate, their interventions address the specific issues faced by minority women, including by systematically collecting and disseminating disaggregated data to inform policy direction in all their fields of work.
42. Development agencies should provide adequate resources for detailed research on minority women for capacity-building support for minority women’s organizations, to help them implement effective advocacy and development programmes for minority women and support initiatives on the access of minority women to legal remedies, economic opportunities, education and health.
43. The United Nations Entity for Gender Equality and the Empowerment of Women (UN-Women) should take the lead on issues related to multiple or intersectional forms of discrimination faced by certain minority women, and collaborate with other agencies with a view to addressing those issues in an effective manner. The approach taken by UN-Women in putting emphasis on particularly vulnerable and marginalized groups should encompass a minority rights-based focus with a view to ensuring that the situation of minority women is addressed and mainstreamed into all their programmes, and that national frameworks ultimately cover the full range of women’s rights concerns.
44. Individual mandate holders and working groups of the Human Rights Council and special representatives of the Secretary-General mandated by the General Assembly are encouraged to continue to examine, where appropriate within their mandates, the situations of minority women and intersectional discrimination affecting them. The existing collaboration between special procedures mandate holders in this regard, at the United Nations level and with the regional mechanisms, should be further strengthened and consolidated. Greater collaboration could lead to a more efficient information-gathering process, enhanced discussions with States with a view to revising discriminatory laws and facilitate the exchange of best practices.
45. Treaty bodies should require States to provide information in their periodic State reports on the situation of minority women and on policies and programmes of the State to ensure the full enjoyment by minority women of their rights.
A/HRC/19/71
 9

A/HRC/19/71
 10
46. Treaty bodies should continue to develop and embrace a systematic approach to their consideration of multiple forms of discrimination, involving not only rural or vulnerable women but also minority women. They should ensure analysis of intersectional discrimination in all their work so that it reflects the realities of minority women, and should consider adopting general recommendations on minorities and minority women.
47. Treaty bodies should systematically consider cases where harmful practices breach the principle of equality, including family law, land, property and inheritance rights, and marital rights, and cases where other human rights of minority women and girls, such as the rights to life, health, dignity, education and physical integrity, may have been violated.
48. Within the context of the universal periodic review, all stakeholders, including Member States, non-governmental organizations and the Office of the United Nations High Commissioner for Human Rights, should require specific information relating to the situation of minority women in countries under review and make recommendations aimed at guaranteeing the rights of minority women.
49. A United Nations voluntary fund for minorities should be created to enable minority representatives, to participate in, assist and use the human rights mechanisms of the United Nations system. This fund should ensure that its composition be gender-balanced. The voluntary fund should also provide funding for projects managed by minority groups in general and minority women’s groups in particular, aimed at guaranteeing the enjoyment of their rights by minority women, and strengthening their effective participation in all spheres of life.
E. Media
50. Private and public media actors should avoid perpetuating existing misconceptions and stereotypes about minority women and ensure that they conform fully to legislation and guidelines for the media with regard to non-discrimination and the appropriateness of references and language. Media reports should be monitored by independent oversight bodies to ensure compliance with standards, and penalties should be imposed for breach of standards. Media should evaluate and, where necessary, increase the representation of minority women in their staff and in all categories. Efforts should be made to ensure positive representation of minority women in broadcast programming; this includes programme content that portrays minority women positively and raises awareness of the diversity of minority women’s perspectives and personal experiences.
IV. Thematic recommendations
A. Minority women and girls and the right to education
51. Access to education for minority girls may pose particular challenges, especially in highly patriarchal family and community structures where gendered societal roles persist. Lack of education represents an absolute barrier to their progress and empowerment in every region of the world. In some cases, where barriers to access are compounded for girls, sometimes owing to the prioritization given to the education of boys, this results in a vicious circle leading to severe educational exclusion and diminished opportunities for girls to take part fully in economic, social, cultural and political life. As a consequence, some minority girls and women excluded from education suffer from high illiteracy levels.
52. To warrant equal opportunity for women belonging to minorities, it is essential that they and their children be offered the opportunity, upon their request, to have access to

education in their minority language, without impeding the high level acquisition of the official State language.
53. Ensuring equal access to education for women and girls from minority groups, upon whom poverty and family responsibilities may have a disproportionate impact, remains a considerable challenge. Internal factors, including cultural practices, early marriage and entrenched patriarchal structures and gender roles that, for example, restrict the free movement of girls and women, are important issues that raise barriers to access to education for girls, and must be addressed. External barriers, such as discrimination against minority girls at school by teachers and pupils, discrimination in textbooks, targeted and mass violence against minority groups, including minority women and girls, sexual violence or fear of violence against minority girls because of stereotypes about them, parents’ fear of violence against their daughters on the journey to school in more remote regions, and poor infrastructure should also be taken into consideration.
1. National, regional and local governments
54. Governments should identify the underlying causes that might prevent minority girls from exercising their right to have access to quality education, including extreme poverty; hunger; living in remote areas; cultural issues; early marriage and pregnancy; security issues; lack of adequate water and sanitation and separate bathrooms, in order to address these root causes systematically. Governments should implement specific programmes to tackle the underlying causes.
55. Governments should develop and implement inclusive and targeted education policies that provide access to high-quality learning environments for all women and girls belonging to minorities in their languages. They should develop adult-literacy schemes for minority women who missed out on education. The core principles of equality and non- discrimination should be at the centre of the design of their education systems.
56. Governments should make every effort to identify girls from marginalized communities and systematically support them in ensuring that they begin school at the same age as other children, and subsequently continue to the level that they choose. Awareness- raising schemes should be implemented to inform minority parents about the importance of quality education for their daughters and to encourage them to prioritize education, while discouraging such practices as early marriage.
57. In reforming school curricula, Governments and other relevant stakeholders should pay particular attention to empowering girls belonging to minorities. A good understanding of cultural and religious identity issues will assist Governments and education authorities in designing better educational interventions. Intercultural education approaches that are minority and culturally sensitive and that address gender discrimination should be adopted, with particular attention paid to countering stereotypes and myths with regard to minority women and girls. Educational programmes and learning environments, including non- formal and flexible learning approaches, appropriate for minority girls should be developed in collaboration with minority groups to ensure that they respect their history, culture, religion and language, as well as distinct minority cultures of learning. As well, more resources should be created to highlight relevant role models and include them in the education curriculum.
58. Governments should monitor school authorities to ensure that they fulfil their obligations with regard to the educational rights of all minority girls.
59. As part of their right to education, minority women and girls should be provided with human rights education as a means of empowering them to claim and defend their rights. Governments should collaborate with minority women and minority rights
A/HRC/19/71
 11

A/HRC/19/71
 12
organizations in the development of material to provide human rights education, including material focusing on minority rights.
60. Governments should make targeted efforts to increase the training and recruitment of women teachers and teaching assistants from minority groups. Training of teachers should include anti-discrimination, gender-sensitivity and intercultural training.
2. National human rights institutions
61. National human rights institutions should play a central role in ensuring the provision of human rights education for all majority and minority communities in accordance with the plan of action of the World Programme for Human Rights Education, which includes information relating to the rights of minority women and girls.
62. National human rights institutions should develop material on the importance of access to education for all, including women and girls, and make sure that such material is tailored to the situation of all minority groups present in their State and available in minority languages.
3. United Nations system and human rights mechanisms
63. United Nations entities should consider including minority rights in general and minority women's rights in particular in all their relevant human rights education programmes, including in human rights training material and other educational tools and resources produced by them. United Nations Children’s Fund in particular should ensure a full inclusion of minority girls in all their education programmes.
B. Effective political participation
64. Minorities often lack adequate representation and participation in national and local bodies responsible for policy, including with regard to economic life, national development and budgeting, and this is particularly the case for minority women. Consequently, the issues and situations of minority women may be neglected or not given the priority that is required to achieve meaningful change. Minority women may face obstacles within their homes and communities that deny them a role in decision-making. In the larger society, they may in turn be denied a say in decisions of the national polity because they are subject to multiple forms of discrimination owing to their status as women, and as minorities. Ensuring effective political participation for minority women not only ensures their participation in decision-making on issues directly affecting them but also helps to ensure that society as a whole benefits from their contribution and truly reflects its diversity.
1. Governments and parliaments
65. Governments should adopt a policy statement that recognizes the diversity in their respective societies with regard to gender, race, ethnicity, religion and language. They should develop plans and programmes to ensure the effective political participation of all sectors of society. These plans should explicitly require measures to promote the participation of minority women, including the adoption of positive measures to increase their participation, the development of educational programmes and campaigns to promote minority women’s political participation, measures to ensure diversity and multiculturalism among public administration staff, and the allocation of sufficient resources to realize identified objectives. Minorities, including minority women, should be fully involved on an informed basis in debates on the design of plans and programmes. The establishment of a specific mechanism or institutional procedure to monitor progress achieved in increasing

minority participation, with a specific focus on minority women’s participation and their equal and meaningful representation in political life at all levels should be considered.
66. Obstacles preventing the effective political participation of minority women should be identified and addressed through laws, policy and programme measures.
67. Literacy, language or religious or other requirements that unfairly or disproportionally exclude minority women from the right to vote or from standing for elected office at the national, regional or local level should be removed, given that they breach the prohibition of discrimination and result in women belonging to minorities not being able to effectively participate in political life. Governments should develop mechanisms to tackle the root causes of such exclusion.
68.
ensuring that women who have a role in decision-making bodies are able to play that role effectively, namely, that they know and understand their duties, are not discriminated against or prevented from carrying out those duties because of prejudice, do not face any backlash or
violence for taking up those roles and are not given positions as a token gesture.
69. Parliamentary groups and committees of both minorities and minority women should be encouraged and supported, including through experience-sharing and capacity- building.
70. The Inter-Parliamentary Union is encouraged to continue to promote the representation and participation of minority women in parliaments and political life, and to specifically address the challenges facing minority women in this regard.
71. Central Governments should encourage the representation of minority women in local governments and provide them with opportunities to build their leadership skills once they gain seats. Minority women who become community leaders should be supported and promoted to become positive role models in their community and to educate society at large about the issues relevant to its minority groups.
72. Local governments and minority communities themselves should also empower and encourage young women members of minority communities to engage in the political life of their localities.
2. Political parties
73. Political parties should be aware of the diversity of the society and/or communities that they represent and take concrete steps, including adopting a policy statement to recognize the importance of reflecting such diversity. Parties should develop strategies to increase the level of minority women’s participation with specific targets, including by ensuring gender-balanced representation within their ranks.
74. Political parties and legislatures can consider adopting quotas or other measures to increase participation of women, including those belonging to minorities. In their efforts to reach out to the minority groups within their constituencies, they should make sure that they are also reaching out to the women in these groups and that they cultivate minority women’s engagement. Such efforts should include holding meetings in the regions where minorities live, seeking views of minority women within those groups, promoting them to leadership roles and engaging with minority and women’s organizations.
A/HRC/19/71
  Governments should intensify their efforts to ensure fair and adequate participation
 of all minority women in political life and public service. They should elaborate innovative
 initiatives and tailored measures aimed at increasing and strengthening minority women’s
 representation and participation, including, for example, support for women’s committees,
 leadership training initiatives, mentoring programmes, awareness-raising campaigns,
 networking and the sharing of good practices. Such measures should also aim at
13

A/HRC/19/71
 14
75. Political parties should consider establishing such measures as mentoring programmes through which successful minority women politicians may act as role models. They should identify minority women with potential and encourage them to run for office, raising awareness on minority women’s political participation while also reaching out to the majority population to ensure continuous dialogue among all groups in society.
3. National human rights institutions
76. National human rights institutions should consider developing outreach programmes and civic education aimed at increasing the effective political participation of women belonging to minorities.
4. Civil society
77. Civil society should seek to play a role in breaking down the barriers preventing the effective political participation of minority women, including by drawing on different approaches, such as capacity-building and training.
78. Civil society should develop civic education projects targeted at minority and majority communities, highlighting a citizen’s rights, roles and responsibilities, and train young women belonging to minorities in the skills of negotiation, communication, advocacy, policymaking and governance.
79. Support should be given to minority women’s organizations to elevate their status in decision-making in general and also to increase their participation in traditional decision- making structures that are all too often male-dominated. It is also necessary to involve male leaders in activities undertaken to increase the participation of minority women and develop their leadership skills in order to also help in changing men’s perceptions of these women in certain societies.
C. Effective participation in economic, social and cultural life
80. Minority women are often restricted in their access to the labour market or at higher risk of unemployment. Barriers to minority women’s access to labour markets include lack of education, lack of awareness of job opportunities, remoteness of the work location, lack of public infrastructure for child care, cultural traditions and gendered societal roles, gender- and minority-based discrimination in hiring, promotion and pay. Many working minority women are involved in low-income earning activities, frequently in the informal sector. In such informal labour markets, women are often excluded from basic labour protection and employed under not only poor but also insecure, difficult, harmful or even dangerous working conditions. The full and effective participation of minority women in economic life is a prerequisite for the achievement of the Millennium Development Goals, especially with regard to Goal 1, target 1 (a), on halving extreme poverty, and target 1 (b), on the achievement of full, productive and decent work for all, and with regard to Goal 3, on the promotion of gender equality.
81. In some societies, minority women experience even more complex burdens of poverty, ethnic, religious or descent-based prejudice and gender-based restrictions that can frequently result in increased challenges relating to the right to an adequate standard of living, including adequate housing. Access to and use and ownership of land and property are central to women’s economic independence, social status and political influence. Existing legislation and practices may, however, disadvantage minority women, while entrenched gender roles leave them highly vulnerable, particularly with regard to ownership of land or property, inheritance rights and access to credit, technology or markets. Displacement as a result of any of a wide range of reasons, such as war, men having been

forced to flee or killed in a conflict, increased poverty and climate change may also render minority women more vulnerable to such issues as kidnapping, sexual exploitation, violence and HIV/AIDS.
1. National, regional and local governments
82. Governments should take steps to redress imbalances in the representation and participation of minority women in employment and access to labour markets, economic progress and development. Such measures should be implemented in particular in the fields of employment, credit and other financial services, land tenure and property rights and social security.
83. Minority women frequently find themselves confined to specific low-skill, low- status and low-paid sectors of employment. Governments should therefore allocate resources to expand the employment opportunities available to minority women, including through education, literacy (including in minority languages), vocational training (including skills to run small businesses), credit and market access so that they can realize their economic rights, and both seek and create new forms of employment within and beyond their communities.
84. Governments should lead by example and aim at achieving better representation of minorities, including women, and encourage the recruitment and retention of minority women in public employment, the civil service, law enforcement bodies, social services and other administrative bodies, including in senior positions. Equally, private sector employers should be required by Governments to comply fully with non-discrimination legislation, including on the grounds of ethnicity and gender, and should be encouraged to ensure that minority women have equal opportunities for recruitment and promotion.
85. Governments should take concrete measures aimed at enabling minority women to express their views and to take well-informed decisions, in order to guarantee their effective participation in economic and social policy at the national level and in regional or local economic and social policy decision-making. This could include creating women’s committees in areas where minority communities live, conducting sensitization and awareness-raising programmes, as well as developing the skills of minority women so that they become not only economically independent but also leaders. Governments should also involve minority men and leaders in programmes and workshops in order to achieve a change in traditional perceptions and practices and to eradicate discrimination against minority women from within communities. Sensitization programmes should also be tailored for the majority communities with a view to eradicating existing stereotypes that may make employers reluctant to employ or promote minority women.
86. Governments should ensure that minority women realize their economic rights by developing policies geared to build their capacity and creating new employment opportunities for them as alternatives to traditional gendered occupations. Governments should also guarantee access of minority women working in the informal economy to non- contributory and contributory or insurance-based schemes. Minority women’s burdens can also be alleviated by providing sufficient child benefits, which would allow them to secure child care and pursue employment, as well as by making other key social services accessible to minority women in their communities.
87. Governments should implement policies and programmes, including gender- responsive budgeting, in regions where minorities predominantly live and ensure minority inclusion in gender budgets and programmes for women’s economic empowerment.
88. Certain measures, including the creation of specific projects for minority women in such areas as training, including in livelihood diversification, and support for business initiatives or quota systems to enhance their participation, could be envisaged to ensure the
A/HRC/19/71
 15

A/HRC/19/71
 16
equal participation of minority women. Programmes for employers to assist them to fight discrimination or to raise cultural awareness, mentoring and positive action in recruitment should be considered.
89. Governments should facilitate minority women’s access to microcredit to allow them to establish small business initiatives, and design training programmes on how to effectively use microcredit and run businesses.
90. Minority women may face challenges relating to property rights and barriers to their ownership of land and property and their control of assets in some minority communities owing to certain factors, including traditional and customary practices and inheritance laws that assign property rights to men. This can leave minority women highly vulnerable. Governments should work together with minority communities, their leaders and minority women to eliminate traditional and cultural practices that discriminate against women and create inequalities in such areas as access to land and inheritance rights of minority women. Governments should also ensure that property and inheritance laws safeguard fully the rights of minority women.
91. A review of service provision to minority communities and needs assessment projects should be undertaken in order to reveal priority areas of concern relating to minority women. Governments should establish national programmes that facilitate access for all, including minority women, to basic health and social services without discrimination.
92. Minority women often lack health care and medical treatment owing to economic, social, political and geographical barriers. Minority women may be denied proper health or medical services, fear the consequences of asking for medical assistance, receive improper or low-quality care or live in places where no health services are available. Governments should ensure that health services are suitable as far as possible and accessible to mobile households and to the reality of the different minority groups present in their territory. Practices such as employing female minority health mediators to work closely with minority communities and to help build bridges between minority women and health and social services providers should be considered.
93. The activities of health-care providers, including hospitals, should prevent discriminatory practices against minority women such as the refusal of treatment, isolation in separate wards or conducting medical interventions without their consent.
94. Governments, in collaboration with national human rights institutions and minority and women’s rights organizations, should seek to ensure fully the cultural rights of minority women, including through the promotion of intercultural and interreligious dialogue and cooperation at all levels, especially at the local and grass-roots levels.
2. National human rights institutions
95. National human rights institutions should study impediments and recommend legislative and policy reforms and assist in developing programmes to guarantee the implementation of non-discrimination legislation with regard to such areas as minority women’s access to education and training, employment, labour rights, social security, financial services and land and property rights.
3. Civil society
96. Civil society actors should consider dedicated initiatives that focus on issues such as promoting minority women’s access to training and skills, employment, financial services, social security and land tenure and property rights.

97. Civil-society actors’ efforts should be focused on identifying the particular needs of minority women and drawing the attention of relevant Government departments and bodies to them in order to address challenges and discrimination faced by minority women that contribute to poverty and gender inequality in their communities. Particular attention should also be paid to the monitoring of resources allocated to initiatives to build the capacity of minority women and to supporting the role of minority women in participatory budgeting processes at the local level. Efforts should be made to ensure that resources are used to the best effect in reaching the most marginalized minority women.
4. Trade unions
98. Trade unions should explore the situation of minority women and extend membership and institutional, legal and advocacy support to informal economic sectors where minority women are overrepresented. They should inform minority women about their activities in the relevant minority languages and build their capacity to defend their labour rights.
99. Trade unions should also aim to secure minority women’s active involvement in union decision-making and in the development and implementation of policies, plans of action and equality initiatives. In their efforts to address the gender pay gap, they should pay particular attention to the situation of minority women, who frequently earn less than the average salary for women.
5. United Nations system and human rights mechanisms
100. Representatives of minority women’s groups should be invited by the United Nations and its specialized funds, agencies and programmes to provide information on aspects of economic, social and cultural participation that are priority concerns for them, including in the areas of poverty reduction, employment, social security, financial services, education and training and land rights protection.
101. United Nations human rights mechanisms should urge Governments to ensure the full and effective participation of minority women in all aspects of economic, social and cultural life and to involve representatives of minority women’s groups in the preparation of reports to be submitted to international supervisory bodies. To this end, they should seek information from Governments on domestic policies that show the extent to which minority women enjoy and exercise their rights equally and without discrimination, and have access to effective remedies when violations occur.
102. Development agencies should consider the inclusion of a focus on minorities in their projects on women’s social and economic empowerment. They should work in collaboration with Governments and civil society to identify barriers to development and to remedy the root causes of multiple and intersecting forms of discrimination faced by minority women that result in their economic and social exclusion.
103. Development agencies should ensure the full and effective participation of minority women in the design, implementation, monitoring and evaluation of all programmes or projects that will affect minorities or the regions in which they live. They should seek the active participation of a minimum number of minority women in civil-society consultations relating to the country strategy development process. To this end, they may consider making information on their activities accessible to minority women by means of proactive outreach to minority women’s groups, communities and minority media outlets, holding meetings in regions where minorities predominantly live, and by facilitating attendance of minority women in such gatherings.
A/HRC/19/71
  17

    The way forward to the International Roma Women’s Conference Organised by the Council of Europe and the Finnish Government Technical Meeting
Council of Europe (Agora Building), Strasbourg
Friday 15 June 2012
Participants:
 Mrs Hannele SYRJÄ
Senior Officer- Advisory Board on Romani Affairs Ministry of Social Affairs and Health - Finland
 Ms Miranda VUOLASRANTA
Senior Adviser, Ministry of Foreign Affairs-Finland
 Ms Mihaela ZATREANU
Director, Centrul National de Cultura a Romilor - ROMANO KHER
 Ms Isabela MIHALACHE, Independent expert, Romania
 Ms Gordana HEROLD, Romnialution, Germany
 Ms Norica COSTACHE, International Roma Women Network (IRWN)
 Mr Jeroen SCHOKKENBROEK, Special Representative of the Secretary
General for Roma Issues, Council of Europe
 Ms Eleni TSETSEKOU, Administrator, Support Team of the Special
Representative of the Secretary General for Roma Issues, Council of Europe
 Ms Cathie BURTON, Media Officer/Spokesperson on Roma, Directorate of
Communication, Council of Europe
 Ms Johanna NELLES, Administrator, Directorate of Justice and Human Dignity,
Gender Equality and Violence Against Women
 M. Robert RUSTEM, Secretariat of the European Roma and Travellers Forum
Aims of the meeting
The Special Representative of the Secretary General for Roma Issues, Mr Jeroen Schokkenbroek, introduced the aims of the present meeting:
 To pursue discussions already started in Grenada between different stakeholders such as the Roma women (Isabella Mihalache, Enisa Eminovska), the Finnish Advisory Board on Romani Affairs (Sarita Freeman-Korpela), the Romanian Government (Mihaela Zatreanu) and the Council of Europe, in
 1
 
   particular on the need for an inclusive consultation process leading up to the
2013 Conference.
 To define the process towards the International Conference of Roma Women
in Finland. The aim is to achieve something more meaningful and strategic,
not just a one-off event.
 The purpose of the Conference is not to organise civil society. Hopefully one
of the effects will be the stimulation and reinforcement of the Roma women’s movement. It is not the role of the Council of Europe to establish civil society networks or to judge if a network exists or not.
 The Council of Europe has no tradition in providing grants. Political support for empowerment yes, and this is what we are actually doing. It is not for the Council of Europe to say we are going to support one network or another. In this process every organised movement has a place.
 The Conference should lead to proposals, agreements and recommendations to all kinds of stakeholders: Governments, Roma women’s organisations, general Roma organisations and the European Institutions (CoE, EU, OSCE/ODHIR). We should think of channels to use after the Conference and follow up, such as a CAHROM discussion on the results of the Conference, possibly a meeting of governments on Roma women etc. (follow up could be an item of the agenda of the preparatory meeting in Romania).
 Technically speaking, the Conference is organised by the Council of Europe and the Finnish Government.
Organising the consultation process
The Finnish Government represented by Hannele Syrjä and Miranda Vuolasranta
highlighted that this kick-off meeting is a technical one on the practical arrangements of the Conference and on the first steps to be taken towards the preparatory meeting which will be taking place in Romania following the invitation of the Romanian Government.
The strategic project plan for the Finnish Government is to end up with a European Action Plan for Roma Women. Having a strong Roma women’s movement is a prerequisite to negotiating a European Strategy on Roma Women with stakeholders.
Based on lessons learnt from previous conferences, the Roma Women Conference in Finland should lead to the empowerment of the Roma Women both at national and European level. The aim of the conference is to elaborate a basis for defining the long term objectives and developing the European Action Plan for Roma Women. The questionnaire and the request for a background paper on the situation of Roma women in every country, to be prepared by the Finnish Government (through the Advisory Board on Romani Affairs and Council for Gender Equality), will provide the opportunity for national Roma women NGOs to be consulted and to
  2
 
   define the themes of the meeting. The Finnish proposal for the questionnaire and background paper aims to reach as many as possible Roma women organizations, networks, experts and individuals.
The idea is to present the results of the questionnaire and the background paper during the preparatory meeting in Bucharest in order to obtain a clear picture of priorities and to decide on the themes of the Conference. The purpose is to have a broad consultation process.
The Romanian National Center of Roma Culture (Mihaela Zatreanu) in cooperation with the Romanian Institute of Research (Quality Life) could provide technical assistance to the Finnish Government in order to set the parameters of the questionnaire and obtain clear replies. They will also take care of the translation of the questionnaire into Romani. They will also explore the possibility of collecting and analysing the results.
During the meeting, participants made several comments and suggestions on the draft questionnaire and the request for background paper.
Permanent Expert Group on Roma Women Issues?
To ensure future monitoring and implementation of the outcomes of the Conference, as well as follow up between Conferences, the Finnish representatives suggested to the Council of Europe to establish a permanent Roma women working group. It is important to mention that Roma women’s issues are absent from the UN (CEDAW) reports mentioned and that working with mainstream women’s networks is essential in order to promote Roma women’s issues.
Jeroen Schokkenbroek expressed doubts whether this would be feasible from a budgetary point of view. We could develop cooperation within/between the CAHROM or the Gender Equality Commission to address this issue as we have a coordinating approach now and could create cooperation with other parts of the Council of Europe
  Isabela Mihalache recalled that the discussion on how the civil society should be involvedhad already started in Granada. The consultation should be constant, consistent and substantial. It is clear that the Council of Europe or the Finnish Government cannot and should not organise the civil society. One of the criticisms on
 international institutions has been the fact that they take the lead in organising Romani women. Because of that, current criticism has to consider whether we want to let international organisations do the same.
So far, the Council of Europe has taken the responsibility to keep Romani women’s issues on the agenda of Governments through organising International Romani Women's Conferences together with interested governments. The Finnish government has agreed to organise the 2013 international conference. The problem with this scenario is that there is very little done in between these conferences in
3
 
    terms of implementation of initiatives or policy work and I think because nobody owns takes responsibility over this process. I think the CoE has to consider whether they want to lead this process and take some responsibility for what happens in between these conferences also.
As for the conference in Finland, who is going to take the lead so that important things do not fall out of the process? I believe the Finnish government will want mainly to organise the conference. If the case, the Finnish government has to decide whether the aim of the conference is to strengthen Romani women movements or to create a political process? I would say both. I think the role of these conferences is the ensure wide participation of Romani women and to make sure that what it is discussed and agreed on during the Conference is taken forward by someone else. It
 means that on the one hand a group of people takes this as an additional task and works with different actors to promote the results of the Conference. It also means that the Finnish government (and follow up organising governments) should engage with the Council of Europe and the EC during the preparation period of the conference to create a political commitment for initiatives on capacity building and empowerment resulting from a broad consultation of civil society and and later from conclusions of conferences. This is why we should add another point on the agenda, which is lobby/negotiations with international stakeholders (EC and others) between January and May 2012 led by the Council of Europe and the Finnish government.
For the purpose of transparency and consultation, the Council of Europe could consider having a conference web page, for posting information of the preparation process, the questionnaires and relevant documents etc. It can also host a forum for consultations.
Mrs Nora Costache underlined that measuring from one conference to another what has been done (not necessarily positive) is a healthy process. Another aspect is that the preparatory meeting in Romania is timely as there are elections at the moment, and a need to keep the Roma women issue on the domestic agenda. It is a good opportunity to campaign for the Roma population and to promote messages. In Romania, some Roma women are already candidates at both local level and in mainstream parties, and so maybe this will reinforce the impact for the Roma women.
Preparatory Meeting in Romania (Bucharest)
Mihaela Zatreanu recalled the discussions in Grenada on an inclusive consultation process and the offer of her Government, through the Institute of Roma Culture, to host the preparatory meeting. Various consultation channels could lead to an inclusive consultation process: the online network of Romnialution, the questionnaire to be answered by active Roma women, teleconferences etc. Involving Romania in
 4
 
   the process brings added value as one more Government gets interested in the issue.
The suggested dates for the preparatory meeting in Bucharest are (5-6 October).
The fact that one European institution like the Council of Europe is bringing forward the Roma women’s agenda is very important since it provides the strongest support, which is necessary to become stronger and independent. We pay attention to all organisations, to every single woman. You cannot exclude other networks.
Presentation of the Romnialution critical analysis
Gordana Herlod: Romnialution intends to build up and organise the Roma women’s conferences in order to include as many participants as possible. For the Conference in Finland, Romnialution would like as many women as possible to be included in the preparation and that the process will be transparent. A Preparatory Committee should be established on a European level, as well as systems and structures allowing Roma women from the settlements to have a say in the organisation of this Conference with the help of the network/committee and the Council of Europe. Although the idea of Romnialution existed already in the Roma Women’s Conference in Greece, it was established after the conference in Spain. It was a reaction to certain women being unhappy with the conferences organised so far. They wanted to change things. Since Spain, the Facebook platform has 2,000 members. It is not a registered network yet, but there are plans to legally register it. In view of the Finland Conference, the Romnialution requests support to participate in the process and would like to work for the establishment of structures. Romnialution wants to have an inclusive process. It does not want just another conference, but rather a meeting with strategic objectives as mentioned by the Finns (European Plan for Roma Women) with the aim of strengthening the capacity of Roma Women. Romnialution believes that IRWN does not exist.
Miranda Vuolasranta: there is a basic misunderstanding of the role of the Council of Europe which has never financed any Roma women’s network, supported activities etc. In 2003, Roma women became mobilised and started campaigning at international level with the forced sterilisation cases. Finally, in 2011/2012, the European Court of Human Rights issued judgments on forced sterilization against Slovakia. In two conferences, forced sterilization was on the agenda and Roma women victims were present and spoke about their painful experiences. If Roma women’s networks or any other forms of activism are active and want to build a project, they could apply for financing from the EU or other sources. The Conference could be a good basis for future projects financed by international organisations, therefore we should find the right platform to promote the results of the Conference.
 5
 
    Participants
The Finnish Government has estimated the capacity to organise a conference of 60 to 80 participants from abroad including the self-financed participants. In addition there will be 50-60 Finnish Roma women and other domestic participants.
On the issue of the participation of governmental experts, it was agreed that we should stick to the format agreed at the beginning and to keep the emphasis on Roma Women. It would be wiser to organise follow up discussion with governments where the conclusions and recommendations of the Conference will be put forward (e.g CAHROM thematic discussion, Gender Equality Commission, joint event with other international organisations, agencies (European Commission, FRA, OSCE/ODIHR, European Platform for Roma Integration).
Next Steps
 The questionnaires and the replies will be technically handled by the Romanian and Finnish Authorities. The dissemination of the questionnaires will be ensured by all possible online networks (Roma Virtual Network, Romnialution, IRWN contact list, list of participants of all previous Roma Women Conferences etc.) and online on the internet site of the Advisory Board on Romani Affairs in Finland and the Council of Europe. The overall operation will be supervised by the Finnish Government. By the end of June, the revised version of the questionnaire based on the comments made at the present meeting will be ready. A final consultation with the group will then follow and in July the questionnaire will be made public. The request for the background paper will be sent out to Roma Women NGOs at the same time as the questionnaire. The sending out of these is planned for the beginning of July with a deadline for submission of responses on 10th September.
In the meeting the draft request for background paper was discussed and modified. The delivery of the Background paper was left open in the meeting for further discussion. Actually it was decided to send separately later on. Because of the early dates for the preparatory meeting in Romania the deadline for Background papers as described above is too tight as it takes time to prepare the paper. The deadline should be earliest in the end of September. Anyhow the first step to take could be sending the request to Roma women NGOs and then for further elaboration to national authorities like focal points on gender equality and/or via CAHROM. The Roma women organizations and networks should be encouraged to co-operate and to prepare one country report if possible.
The information at national level might be gathered by a focal point. One option could be the Council of Europe’s focal point on gender equality in
 6
 
   cooperation with the national Roma women associations. The results of the background paper request could constitute a shadow report alongside the official reports submitted to international organisations by the Governments. At a later stage, the background papers could be requested through the CAHROM meeting (to be discussed at the November meeting).
 Internet Site of the Conference: the Council of Europe will work on a specific internet page for the Roma Women Conference in Finland, with a Forum of discussion to which all interested partners will have access. The Support Team of the SRSG will explore the technical details with the Communication Directorate of the Council of Europe. The internet site should be available after the preparatory meeting in Bucharest.
 Preparatory meeting and participation (5-6 October 2012, Bucharest): the replies to the questionnaires will form the basis of the discussions in Bucharest. In addition the Bucharest meeting should explore the possibilities of organising teleconference (remote participation) at the Finnish conference with all interested Roma Women NGOs in Member States in order to allow Roma women to bring their ideas based on the national reality. For practical reasons, the option of a small scale meeting (similar to the present one) enlarged with a limited number of specific experts (technical expertise on remote participation, substantive expertise on gender equality) was retained.
 Budgetary questions were discussed briefly. It was decided to continue the discussions about the costs of the conference (like travelling and accommodation, interpretation and communication expenses) to be covered and divided between Council of Europe and the Finnish Government.
 Conference: May or September 2013 (Helsinki); to be confirmed depending on the dates of other CoE meetings.
7
 
  INTRODUCTION
Strategy on the Advancement of Romani Women and Girls (2014-2020)
Romani women[1] across Europe face the additional burden of racism as well as gender discrimination, which push them to the margins of their societies. Low educational achievement, high rates of irregular attendance and school dropouts, high unemployment rates and poor employment opportunities deprive Romani women and girls of realistic possibilities for integration and full participation in society. Lack of personal documents hinders the possibility for many Romani women and/or girls to access education, health care, employment and other related services. Increased racism and anti-Gypsyism in the context of a global economic crisis and international mobility of Romani families affects the safety of Romani women and girls, making them increasingly vulnerable to social exclusion, exploitation, trafficking and violence. Traditional family roles that many Romani women find themselves in, creates additional mechanisms of exclusion. Early and child marriages are still recurrent among Romani girls and boys in traditional families. While there is a positive ascending trend in the gender relations between Romani women and men, there is yet a long way to go for Romani women to become autonomous and feel that they can make choices outside pre-assumed ascribed gender roles.
Romani women and girls are often excluded from consultation and decision-making processes on legislation, policies and programmes, including those that are specifically designed to address their situation. This contributes to a lack of, or a limited perspective on Romani women and girls in policies on gender, social inclusion or Roma which further hinders Romani women’s equal access to resources and their full participation in all spheres of public and private life. While some progress has been made in recognizing the multiple discrimination of Romani women and girls and the inequalities they face in their access and distribution of resources and public services, the lack of disaggregated data by gender and ethnicity addressing the status of Romani women and girls across European countries prevents policy makers and human rights advocates from devising viable and meaningful policies and measures for the advancement of Romani women’s rights and of their situation at local and national level. The lack of data further prevents the opportunity for establishing a base line and providing a possibility for adequate monitoring and evaluation.
Romani women and girls’ empowerment and gender mainstreaming are key to achieving gender equality and strengthening democratic societies. The process of mainstreaming Romani women and girls’ concerns and priorities, both in policy and practice would enable public policy to advance equality and to combat discrimination by facilitating better policy responses to meet the needs of people who experience inequality such as Romani women and girls. Gender mainstreaming would also introduce a culture of disaggregated data collection by gender and ethnicity, impact assessment, monitoring and review into the public policy process and thus enhance the effectiveness of Roma specific policies; and not lastly, it would eliminate barriers for Romani women and girls experiencing inequality, reduce poverty, boost economic growth and strengthen citizenship.
Investing in educating Romani girls, increasing literacy rates among Romani women, increasing Romani women’s labor force participation and strengthening labour policies affecting women, improving their access to credit, land and other resources and promoting Romani women’s political rights and participation are some of the important driving factors to Romani women’s empowerment.
Therefore, it is essential to address the multiple discrimination and social exclusion of Romani women and girls in a systematic and comprehensive way, in order to achieve full enjoyment of their rights and substantive gender equality and good governance.
CONTEXT
Notwithstanding the multiple and intersectional discrimination faced in all areas of their life, Romani women and girls are still waiting to become part of priorities at national level. Despite notable actions by many international organisations in addressing concerns of Romani women and girls, Romani women are still excluded from most policy making processes at local and national level. The discourse involving Romani women and girls has yet to be accompanied by elements of real empowerment through gender mainstreaming approaches, which should not be unique to them, but in the same way the principles of gender mainstreaming and empowerment are applied to non-Romani women. The reluctance to do so should not be justified, however, the lack of information on the situation of Romani women at local level, as comprehensive worldwide reports demonstrate that poverty, discrimination, social exclusion and gender inequality manifest and affect women of various backgrounds in a similar way.
Romani women’s issues first emerged in the mid-90s with the support of international organisations, which have started both an internal process of identifying institutional mechanisms to address Romani women’s issues within as well as collaborative efforts together with Roma NGOs and other international organisations in promoting and supporting Romani women’s issues and building capacity in women’s groups and activists.
One of the first important opportunities for Romani women to make their voices heard was the First Congress of Roma from the European Union, organised with the support of the European Commission, in May 1994, in Seville, Spain, where Romani women from all over Europe discussed their problems for the first time. The outcome of the meeting was a “Manifesto of Roma Women”, which referred to the situation of Romani women in Europe and stressed the need for having access to education as a means to empower their fight against discrimination and patriarchal rules within and outside the family. Similar notable participation of Romani women have taken place in 2000 at the Beijing Plus Five meeting in New York and at the UN World Conference against Racism in Durban, South Africa, in 2001, where Romani women raised issues such as forced sterilisation, unemployment and domestic violence.
Among other international organisations, the Council of Europe (CoE) started to raise awareness on Romani women and youth in 1995 when the Steering Committee for the Equality between Women and Men held a “Hearing of Romani women” in Strasbourg. The same year, the Youth Directorate of the Council of Europe organised a training session for young Roma leaders and as a result, the Forum of European Roma Young People was established in 1998. A series of seminar on Romani women and discrimination of youth have been organized since; unfortunately, the youth related issues promoted by the Council of Europe have remained, to a large extent, isolated from the Romani women’s rights broader agenda.
In 2003, the Council of Europe raised the issue of Romani women again through a series of training, campaigns, meetings and studies. In 2003, the Migration and Roma/Gypsy Division conducted, together with the Fundamental Rights Agency (FRA) and the OSCE High Commissioner on National Minorities, the study on “Breaking the Barriers - Romani Women and Access to Public Health Care”. The Report was aimed at helping policy and lawmakers understand the nature for healthcare access for Romani women and to assist them to improve the design and implementation of policies on Romani women and health. In the same year, the Council of Europe and the FRA, in partnership with national governments, started to support initiatives by and of Romani women, such as the establishment of the International Romani Women’s Network (IRWN), and to provide forums for Romani women to define policy priorities and facilitate exchanges of information and country experiences.
Since 2007, a number of member States have joined the Council of Europe in an effort to increase the visibility of Romani women and girls’ concerns at international level, while providing a bigger forum for Romani women to exchange experiences and elaborate
common agenda. In September 2007, the Council of Europe organised, together with the Swedish Government, the 1st International Conference of Romani women in Stockholm followed by the 2nd International Conference of Romani Women in Athens, together
with the Greek government in January 2010, and the 3rd Romani Women’s Congress in Granada together with the Spanish Government in October 2011. On the 17-18 September 2013, the Government of Finland organized the 4th International Romani Women’s Conference in Helsinki in co-operation with the Council of Europe. An Internet page on the International Conferences has been created on the official Council of Europe Internet site.
Gender mainstreaming and a focus on Romani women are an increased priority for the Support Team of the Special Representatives for Roma issues in 2014. A number of follow-up initiatives to the Helsinki Conference have been envisaged and supported with the contribution of the Finnish Government, amongst which are the follow-up work to the Phenjalipe platform and support for the implementation of this Strategy. In addition, the Support Team included in its activities the objective of mainstreaming gender among its programmes and in other Council of Europe initiatives. In the same vein, the CoE Committee of Experts on Roma issues (CAHROM), appointed a Gender Rapporteur from Finland with the aim at mainstreaming gender within the work of the Committee and has endorsed several thematic reports that address school enrolment, with a specific focus on Romani girls, as well as on measures to reduce school dropouts, absenteeism and school segregation. In 2013, the CAHROM paid particular attention to trafficking of Romani women and girls and its possible links with early marriages. A joint paper by the European Roma and Travellers Forum and Phenjalipe on early marriages was also presented, which was discussed again at the CAHROM May 2014 meeting together with the Group of Experts on Action against Trafficking in Human Beings. In the beginning of 2014, Lithuania requested the setting-up of a CAHROM thematic group on the empowerment of Romani women and the gender dimension of Roma integration policies. Finland, Italy, the Republic of Moldova and Spain are among partner countries. The CAHROM thematic visit to Lithuania was tabled for June 2014. In addition, between 2014 and 2015, the CAHROM will also set up thematic groups on Roma youth empowerment and Roma youth dimension of national policies for Roma, child and early marriages in Roma communities and a thematic group on human trafficking, with a particular focus on Roma women and children.
The OSCE Office for Democratic Institutions and Human Rights (ODIHR) started addressing Romani women’s issues more consistently in 2003, when the Ministerial Council endorsed the Action Plan for Roma and Sinti within the OSCE Area. The 2003 Action Plan is a first comprehensive policy document on Roma, addressing key areas and recommending action by participating States. For the first time, the Action Plan underlines that Roma and Sinti women should be systematically mainstreamed in all relevant Roma policies and should be able to participate on an equal basis with men.
In its work on promoting gender equality, ODIHR also co-operated with the Gender Section and the OSCE Special Representative and Co-ordinator for Combating Trafficking in Human Beings, addressing the multiple forms of discrimination against Romani women and girls and the particular vulnerability of Roma to trafficking. It also focused on promoting and supporting voters’ education among Romani women, and supported Romani women’s NGOs and initiatives in conducting information and voter-education campaigns for Roma communities in Serbia and the Former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia. As part of the “Best Practices for Roma Integration” project, implemented by the Office for Democratic Institutions and Human Rights in the Western Balkans in 2012 and 2013, Romani women’s participation in local elections became a best practice in Bosnia and Herzegovina. In addition, ODIHR supported a “Campaign to Prevent and Combat the Practice of Early Marriage” in Roma communities in Romania, in 2011. As part of the campaign, a documentary on early marriage was made and activities in ten Roma communities in Romania have been implemented.
The OSCE Parliamentary Assembly, at its Twentieth Annual Session in Belgrade in July 2011, adopted two resolutions on Roma, among which was the resolution on “Promoting polices on equality between women and men of the Roma population”. In 2012, ODIHR shifted greater focus to raising awareness on the multiple forms of discrimination and vulnerability that Roma and Sinti women face. The Special Day on Roma and Sinti during the Human Dimension Implementation Meeting on 26 September focused on the empowerment of Romani women. Representatives from participating States and Roma women’s organisations stressed that education is vital to increasing Roma women’s active participation in public and political life.
ODIHR has also placed special emphasis on empowering Roma youth and supporting the Roma youth net- work TernYpe. In 2011, ODIHR supported the efforts of Roma organisations to enhance youth activism, including training on youth mobilisation and civic participation, which led to the establishment of the Roma Youth Alliance. ODIHR also hosted the third “Roma Consultation Meeting” with more than 40 Roma and Sinti women civil society representatives from across the OSCE region. The consultation meeting led to the adoption of the “Warsaw Romani, Sinti and Travellers Women’s Declaration”, which highlights the vulnerable situation of Roma, Sinti and Traveller women and the negative impact of government austerity measures on them.
After the Supplementary Human Dimension Meeting in September 2013, dedicated to the assessment of the 10 years of implementation of the Action Plan on Roma and Sinti, on 6 December 2013 the Ministerial Council endorsed the Decision No. 4/13 on Enhancing OSCE Efforts to Implement the Action Plan on Improving the Situation of Roma and Sinti Within the OSCE Area, With a Particular Focus on Roma and Sinti Women, Youth and Children.
Since 2006, the European Union has focused on Romani women, with the adoption of the European Parliament Resolution on the situation of Romani women in the European Union. The resolution noted that: "Romani women constitute among the most threatened groups and individuals in the member States and accession and candidate countries".
In the context of the 2007 European Council conclusions on Roma and the 2008 European Parliament resolution for a comprehensive European framework strategy on Roma, in 2008 the European Commission issued a staff working document on community instruments and policies for Roma inclusion (COM 2008/420), which underlines that most national strategies for Roma inclusion have tended to be silent on the specific obstacles faced by Roma women and underlines that “the incorporation of gender mainstreaming and specific actions to improve the situation of Roma women in all policies is an important step towards gender equality and social cohesion”, by adopting the “dual approach of gender mainstreaming and specific actions, in order to ensure that the issues faced by Roma women are not left behind and are properly addressed.”
In the same year, the European Commission published the report on “Ethnic minority and Roma women in Europe: a case for gender equality”, which confirms that ethnic minority and especially Romani women are the most vulnerable to multiple discriminations and face higher risks of social exclusion and poverty than the women of the native population and minority men.
As regards the work of the FRA, the Agency has facilitated the work of Romani women networks through the participation of Romani women at international conferences addressing the implementation of national policies on Roma, through training and roundtable discussions, which allowed the Agency to ensure that the perspective of Romani women was integrated in its wider work. A conference “Our Voices Heard” which was co-organised by the Swedish Government, the Council of Europe and the FRA in December 2007, focused on the issues of women’s rights, combating trafficking, reproductive rights and access to public healthcare for Romani women. It was an opportunity to share information and good practices between policymakers and Romani Women’s networks across Europe.
In 2011, FRA published a “Study on the situation for Roma women and men in the EU” in eleven member States and presented its gender-focused report at the joint LIBE and FEMM public hearing on ‘The EU Framework for National Roma Integration Strategies’ on 18 September 2011. The findings showed that on average the situation of Roma women in core areas of social life, namely education, employment, housing and health is worse than that of men.
In 2011, the European Commission issued the European Framework for National Roma Integration Strategies (thereof “the European Framework”), which aims at making a tangible difference in the lives of Roma by encouraging member States to adopt or develop a comprehensive approach to Roma integration. Gender figures only with reference to the Common Basic Principles on Roma Inclusion, whereby member States and candidate countries were encouraged to be aware of the gender dimension when designing their strategies on Roma. In May 2011, the EPSCO Council, when adopting conclusions on the European Framework, highlighted that “special attention should be paid to the interests and difficulties of Roma women and girls, who face the risk of multiple discrimination, and thus a gender perspective needs to be applied in all policies and actions for advancing Roma inclusion.” Nonetheless, most National Roma Integration Strategies failed to mainstream gender and Romani women and girls’ issues appropriately and comprehensively. In this context, the European Parliament Committee on Gender Equality and Women’s Rights, under the leadership of the Vice-Chair Livia Jaroka, adopted, in October 2013, the report on the “Gender Aspects of the European Framework of National Roma Inclusion Strategies”, on the account that gender was either missing or addressed in an incidental and inconsistent way in national strategies. The report calls on member States and the Commission to strengthen gender mainstreaming, conduct gender impact assessments, and consult women’s organisations and Roma NGOs with regard to national strategies. It formulates several specific policy proposals and measures addressing, among other issues, children’s poverty, school dropout and early marriage. In its December 2013 conclusions, the EU Council recommended to member States to combat all forms of discrimination, including multiple discrimination, faced by Roma children and women, and fight violence, including domestic violence, against women and girls, trafficking in human beings, underage and forced marriages, and begging involving children, in particular through the enforcement of legislation.
Since 1999, the Open Society Foundations (OSF) through its various programs started to support initiatives on Romani women at regional and European level, when the Roma Participation Program (RPP) organised an International Conference of Romani Women in Budapest. The OSF supported Romani women through its grants for capacity building of Romani NGOs, ensured an increased quota of Romani women and young girls throughout its initiatives on Roma (ex. the internship scheme for young Roma graduates with the European Commission) and created special initiatives for Romani women with the aim to promote and advance the leadership role of Romani women, build local community-based initiatives led and managed by women activists, and widen the possibilities for more substantive participation through greater numbers of Romani women in policy development. The OSF is currently awarding three fellowshipsto Romani women university graduates from Albania, Bulgaria, the Czech Republic, Hungary, Italy, "The former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia", Romania, Serbia, Slovakia, Spain, and Turkey who are committed to engaging in Romani women’s rights work.
The Open Society Foundations, the European Roma Rights Centre and other human rights institutions have supported the elaboration and submission of shadow reports by Romani and women’s NGOs to various United Nations monitoring committees on Romani women’s concerns, calling for action from reporting states such as Albania, Bosnia and Herzegovina, Bulgaria, Croatia, Czech Republic, Greece, Hungary, Italy, "The former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia", Portugal, Romania, Serbia, Slovakia, Spain, Ukraine and the United Kingdom.
Despite all these efforts by international organisations to support Romani women’s concerns and priorities, Romani women and girls at national and local level have received very limited attention, while the pool of Romani women’s NGOs and women’s activists at national levels is largely under-represented and under-equipped. Romani women need to be able to affirm and enjoy their rights in order to fully participate in society. Therefore, while Romani women and girls started to be recognised at international level as one of the most vulnerable categories to (multiple) discrimination, social marginalisation and poverty, efforts have to focus on making the discourse of gender equality and mainstreaming a tangible reality for Romani women and girls. This calls for specific and sustainable approaches on Romani women and girls to enable them to become transformers of their lives and that of their communities, whereas actions should focus on raising awareness of local authorities and political elites on the necessity to include Romani women and girls in their priorities.
PROCESS
On 17-18 September 2013, the Government of Finland organized the 4th International Romani Women’s Conference in Helsinki in co-operation with the Council of Europe. More than one hundred Romani women from various European countries gathered to take stock of past initiatives and developments at policy and Roma community level and to contribute to a Strategy on ways to advance the status of Romani women and girls in Europe.
The 4th International Romani Women’s Conference in Finland is part of a series of similar initiatives facilitated and supported by the Council of Europe jointly with various national governments since 2003. Within these forums, Romani women raised concerns, exchanged experiences and mobilised jointly over common purposes. In the context where Romani women expressed concerns over the worsening situation of Romani women at national level and the need for more sustainable ways to act as a network and
cooperate with other stakeholders on various priority issues, the process of organising the 4th International Romani Women’s Conference provided mechanisms for wider consultations with Romani women and engagement of national governments.
In 2012, the Finnish government, which had previously announced its intention and commitment to hold the 4th International Romani Women’s Conference in Helsinki, organised, together with the Romanian government (the National Roma Cultural Institute) and in co-operation with the Council of Europe, a brainstorming meeting of Romani women’s experts and activists in Bucharest, which prepared the groundwork for the international conference and defined ways for an inclusive consultation and involvement of Romani women in the outcome of the conference. This included the creation of online consultations via questionnaires for defining priority areas, open calls for participation in the conference and online streaming of the conference in Helsinki.
During the Helsinki conference, Romani women reiterated the need to build on previous developments and increase visibility on Romani women’s issues. A platform initiative called Phenjalipe (“Sisterhood”) was launched at the conference aimed at supporting the implementation of the strategic outcome document formulated in the objectives of the conference and further facilitates exchanges of information and coordination at regional level on issues related to Romani women and girls. An own initiative Working Group of Romani women experts undertook to develop a Strategy on the situation of Romani women, which could be used as a framework document for policy makers, Romani women activists and human rights institutions.
The Council of Europe facilitated a follow-up expert meeting of the Phenjalipe Romani women’s Working Group in Strasbourg, on 17 February 2014, to facilitate the elaboration of the strategy of Romani women and the development of tools for its effective implementation. The draft Strategy together with a bi-annual draft action plan was put forward for final adoption by the Phenjalipe Informal Platform.
RATIONALE AND APPROACH
The Strategy for the Advancement of Romani Women and Girls (2014-2020) is a response to the needs expressed by Romani women activists and civil society, human rights institutions, professionals working on gender equality and Romani women’s issues, governments and policy makers. The present strategy is the result of consultations with members of the Phenjalipe Informal Platform, civil society, governments and international organisations, with a view to preparing a reference document on the situation of Romani women and girls at European and international level for all relevant stakeholders working on Roma, gender equality, social inclusion and human rights protection.
The Strategy is based on existing human rights standards[2], regional policies on Roma, Romani women and social inclusion[3] and reports[4] and recommendations on the situation of Romani women at European and international level.
The Strategy outlines objectives and priorities for the advancement of Romani women and girls in Europe and beyond. It identifies the main partners needed to achieve its objectives. The Romani community and women’s groups are central to the implementation of the Strategy by various stakeholders.
The Strategy may be used, but not exclusively, by the Informal Platform of Romani Women, Phenjalipe, and other relevant stakeholders to:
Promote, support and facilitate the process of gender/Romani women and girls’ mainstreaming in all relevant policies and programmes; Promote, support and facilitate the process of protecting Romani women and girls’ rights;
Promote, support and facilitate the empowerment of Romani women and girls in practice;
Inform and raise awareness of state authorities, legislators, policy makers and relevant actors on the status of Romani women and girls.
While the Strategy can be used as a stand-alone document by various relevant stakeholders in order to advance the status of Romani women and girls, the Working Group of Phenjalipe developed a bi-annual Action Plan with the aim of attaining the objectives of the Strategy more effectively. The Action Plan will be implemented by the Phenjalipe members in co-operation with relevant international and national partners. The Working Group of Phenjalipe will revise the Action Plan and assess its implementation every two years.
I. GOAL AND STRATEGIC OBJECTIVES
The overall goal of the Strategy is to achieve the advancement and empowerment of Romani women and girls in Europe and the strengthening of gender equality and non-discrimination thereof in countries of residence by supporting the implementation of six strategic objectives which also integrate the issue of multiple discrimination while taking into account the specific needs, challenges and opportunities of Romani women and girls.
Strategic objective 1:
Combating racism, anti-Gypsyism and gender stereotypes against Romani women and girls
Romani women suffer from racism and anti-Gypsyism that is particular to them due to their ethnic belonging and because of their gender. In addition, the impact of racism, anti-Gypsyism and social exclusion of Roma in general has a greater impact on the lives of Romani women and girls, who become more vulnerable to poverty, forced evictions, homelessness, racist violence, trafficking, etc. More so, gender stereotypes and gender ascribed roles within some Romani communities limit the individual development and opportunities of Romani women and girls.
Action will focus on:
! Monitoring the human rights situation of Romani women and girls at national level;
! Raising awareness on the extent of racism, anti-Gypsyism and gender stereotypes against Romani women and girls;
! Calling on government and intergovernmental measures and action on combating racism, anti-Gypsyism and gender stereotypes against Romani women and girls;
! Promoting and supporting joint action on combating and preventing racist violence and anti-Gypsyism against Romani women and girls;
! Promoting a positive and non-stereotyped image of Romani women and girls;
! Promote a positive and objective image of Romani women in the media;
! Promoting and supporting a meaningful participation of Romani women in decision-making positions in public institutions and political life;
! Promoting and supporting the role of Romani men in achieving gender equality;
! Promoting and supporting the collection of data on the status of Romani women and girls in all areas of life; and the culture of impact assessment, monitoring and review into the public policy process.
Strategic objective 2:
Preventing and combating various forms of violence against Romani women and girls
Violence against Romani women and girls remains widespread in Europe, with devastating consequences for Romani women and girls as well as for societies and democracies. Romani women often fall victims to domestic violence, forced marriage, trafficking and forced prostitution, forced sterilisation, violence by the police and verbal or physical abuse by various state actors, etc. The Council of Europe Convention on Preventing and Combating Violence against Women and Domestic Violence (the Istanbul Convention) is the most far-reaching international treaty to tackle this serious violation of human rights.
Action will include:
! Calling on CoE member States to sign, ratify and implement the Istanbul Convention, as relevant;
! Promoting and supporting the collection and dissemination on data regarding legal and other measures taken at national level to prevent and combat violence against Romani women and girls;
! Promoting and supporting bilateral, regional and international co-operation aimed at the elimination of trafficking in persons, targeting Romani women and children;
! Promoting and supporting measures to prevent and end child and forced marriages;
! Calling on governments to combat and prevent all forms of violence against Romani women and girls, including practices that lead to and/or perpetuate gender inequality or violate the rights of Romani women and girls. ! Promote and support measures aimed at preventing and combating all forms of violence against Romani women and girls, including inclusive and culturally adapted enforcement measures;
! Promote best practices aimed at preventing and combating violence against Romani women and girls both by state and non-state actors.
Strategic objective 3:
Guaranteeing Equal Access of Romani Women and girls to public services
Engrained discrimination and extreme social exclusion prevent Romani women from an adequate and equal access to education, health, social protection, employment, housing and accommodation. The lack of personal documents and high level of illiteracy further their social exclusion and marginalisation. Their participation in society is also prevented by pre-ascribed gender roles within traditional families.
Action will seek to:
! Promote and support adequate mechanisms for preventing and combating discrimination, including on multiple grounds in Romani women’s access to education, employment, health care, social protection, housing, accommodation, etc.;
! Promote and support measures for the economic empowerment of Romani women and girls;
! Promote and support measures for the human rights advancement of Romani women and girls;
! Promote and support exchanges of best practices on good governance on gender/Romani women’s mainstreaming in policy and practice;
! Promote and support mechanisms for gender and ethnicity data collection, gender impact assessments and monitoring progress in increasing Romani women’s and young girls’ participation in society and their equal and meaningful representation in public
and political life at all levels.
Strategic objective 4:
Ensuring access to justice for Romani women
Discrimination, racism and gender inequalities impinge on Romani women’s access to justice. Romani women are reluctant to access complaint mechanisms and seek justice in courts due to lack of awareness and information, but also confidence and resources, including economic barriers for legal representation. In addition, gender stereotypes and gender power imbalance make Romani women victims of biased and ineffective justice systems, i.e. Romani women get sentenced for crimes committed by their husbands.
Action will seek to:
! Identify and raise awareness on obstacles Romani women encounter in gaining access to justice;
! Condemn practices that discriminate against Romani women and girls in their access to justice;
! Identify, collect and disseminate any existing remedies and good practices aiming at facilitating access of Romani women to justice, including out-of-court and quasi-legal stages of protection of women’s rights (inter alia through Ombudspersons and other human rights institutions);
! Make recommendations to improve the situation.
Strategic objective 5:
Achieving adequate and meaningful participation of Romani women in political and public decision-making
Romani women lack adequate representation and participation in national and local public administration institutions and in political life. Ensuring effective participation of Romani women in public and political life, not only ensures their participation in decision- making on issues directly affecting them, but also helps to ensure that society as a whole benefits from their contribution and truly reflects its diversity.
Action will seek to:
! Promote and support adequate and meaningful participation of Romani women in political or public life in any decision-making bodies;
! Monitor progress on Romani women’s participation in decision-making; promote the visibility of data and good practices across countries;
! Promote and support measures aimed at supporting and empowering candidate and elected Romani women, to facilitate and encourage their participation in elections at local and national level; ! Call on governments to ensure the effective participation of Romani women in public and political life.
Strategic objective 6:
Achieving Gender and Romani Women’s Mainstreaming in all policies and measures
The mainstreaming of gender and Romani women’s concerns and priorities, both in policy and practice would enable public policy responses to advance equality and to combat discrimination. Gender mainstreaming introduces a culture of disaggregated data, impact assessment, monitoring and review into the public policy process and thus enhances the effectiveness of Romani women and girls specific policies; it also eliminates barriers for Romani women experiencing inequality, reduces poverty, boosts economic growth and strengthens citizenship. Mainstreaming creates means for the empowerment of Romani women and their autonomy.
Action should support mainstreaming in:
! various policy areas, in particular the areas of justice, law enforcement, local government, media, culture, education, minorities, migration, Roma, children’s rights, social inclusion and cohesion, youth and sports, trafficking in human beings and drug abuse; ! the development and implementation of programmes, projects and activities of local and national authorities, intergovernmental institutions, human rights organisations and women’s groups;
! the policy processes and functioning of the various bodies and institutions;
! the staff policies of local public administration, intergovernmental organisations, monitoring bodies, relevant human rights/Roma rights institutions, etc.;
! good practices on gender/Romani women and girls’ issues.
  II.
PARTNERSHIPS
The Working Group of Romani Women for the implementation of the Strategy will create links and partnerships with existing initiatives and relevant implementing mechanisms such as the following:
Council of Europe
! Council of Europe Special Representative of the Secretary General for Roma issues
! Council of Europe Ad-Hoc Committee of Experts on Roma Issues (CAHROM) and its Gender Rapporteur
! Council of Europe Human Dignity and Equality Directorate (and all its relevant sectors such as Gender Equality, CDDECS, SOGI, GRETA, GREVIO, Lanzarote Convention, Children’s Rights, FCNM, ECRI etc.) ! Council of Europe Gender Equality Rapporteurs
! Council of Europe Gender Equality Commission
! Council of Europe Gender Mainstreaming Task Force
! Council of Europe Youth Department
! Council of Europe Permanent Representations
! Commissioner for Human Rights
! European Court of Human Rights
! Congress of Local and Regional Authorities
! Parliamentary Assembly (in particular its Committee on Equality and Non-Discrimination)
European Union
! European Commission o Equality Unit
o Roma Unit ! European Parliament
o FEMM Committee
o Party Groups ! European Council
! Fundamental Rights Agency o Gender Focal Points
OSCE/ODIHR
! Contact Point for Roma and Sinti Issues ! Commissioner on National Minorities
! Gender Equality Department
United Nations
! UN WOMEN
! CEDAW Committee
! Office of the High Commissioner on Human Rights ! Human Rights Council
! UNICEF
! UNDP
International Human Rights and Roma organisations
! Open Society Foundations
! European Roma and Travellers Forum
! European Roma Rights Centre
! European Roma Information Office
! European Roma Grassroots Organisation
! European Roma Policy Coalition
! Roma Education Fund
! Roma Decade Secretariat
! International and Regional Romani Women’s Networks ! Romani Youth networks
National level
III.
! National Focal Points of the National Roma Integration Strategies ! Local and regional authorities
! Members of National Parliaments
! Gender Equality bodies
! Ombudspersons
! National Human Rights institutions
o Gender Institutes
o OSF national foundations
! National and local Roma organisations
! Romani women NGOs, Romani women’s groups and networks ! Romani women mediators and their networks
! Romani Youth networks and NGOs
OUTREACH
An outreach plan will be developed with aimed at:
! increasing the visibility of the Strategy;
! facilitating the mainstreaming of the Strategy objectives into relevant policies at regional and national level; ! increasing visibility of the Informal Platform of Phenjalipe and its work;
! raising awareness on specific issues pertaining to Romani women and girls;
! facilitating the exchange of information with partners;
! making good practices more visible at local, national and regional level.
IV.
ACTION PLAN
An Action Plan will be developed every two years by the Phenjalipe Working Group, in consultation with relevant partners and stakeholders, in order achieve the objectives of the Strategy. The bi-annual Action Plan will include specific activities deriving from the strategic objectives, which will be implemented primarily, but not exclusively, by the Phenjalipe Informal Platform and its Working Group. After every two-year cycle of implementation, an assessment of the activities implemented and of their impact will be undertaken together with members of the Phenjalipe Platform.
[1] Romani women is a generic term used to cover all diverse groups of women that associate with the plight of Romani women, such as women belonging to Sinti, Manush, Kale, Dom, Lom, Gypsies, Travellers, Yenish, Beash, Ashkali, Egyptians, and other related groups.
[2] Convention for the Protection of Human Rights and Fundamental Freedoms and Its Protocols, International Covenant on Civil and Political Rights, International Covenant on Economic, Social and Cultural Rights, United Nations Convention on the Elimination of All Forms of Discrimination Against Women and its Optional Protocol, Council of Europe Convention on preventing and combating violence against women and domestic violence, United Nations Convention on the Rights of the Child and its Optional Protocols, Council of Europe Convention on the Protection of Children against Sexual Exploitation and Sexual Abuse, Council of Europe Convention on Action against Trafficking in Human Beings, United Nations Convention on the Rights of Persons with Disabilities, Lisbon Treaty, European Union Charter of Fundamental Rights, EU legislation on employment and training (Equal pay Directive 2006/54/EC), social security and pensions (Directive 79/7/EEC), access to goods and services (Directive 2004/113/EC), professional, private and family life ((Directive 92/85/EEC) and Recast Directive 2006/54/EC, the EU Racial Directive 2000/43/EC, EU Employment Framework Directive 2000/78/EC etc.
[3] European National Framework for Roma Integration Strategies, 10 Common Basic Principles on Roma Inclusion, OSCE Action Plan for Roma and Sinti, OSCE Action Plan for the Promotion of Gender Equality, Beijing Declaration and Platform for Acton, Council of Europe Strategy on Gender Equality 2014-2017, Council of Europe Strategy for the Rights of the Child (2012-2015), Europe 2020 Strategy, Council of Europe Strasbourg Declaration on Roma, etc.
[4] Helsinki 4th International Romani Women’s Conference report
     
                  Council of Europe Strategy for the Rights of the Child (2016-2021)
Children’s human rights
 www.coe.int/children
Building a Europe for and with children
  
Council of Europe Strategy for the Rights of the Child (2016-2021)
Children’s human rights
Council of Europe

 French edition:
Stratégie du Conseil de l'Europe pour les droits de l'enfant (2016-2021)
All requests concerning the reproduction or translation of all or part of this document should be addressed to the Directorate of Communication (F-67075 Strasbourg Cedex or publishing@coe.int). All other correspondence concerning this document should be addressed to the Directorate General of Democracy.
Cover photo: © Zev Hoover
Cover and layout: Documents and Publications Production Department (SPDP), Council of Europe
© Council of Europe, March 2016 Printed at the Council of Europe

Contents
INTRODUCTION 4 I. THE COUNCIL OF EUROPE AND THE RIGHTS OF THE CHILD: ACHIEVEMENTS TO BUILD UPON 6 II. ARE WE THERE YET? CHALLENGES FOR CHILDREN’S RIGHTS TODAY AND TOMORROW 7
1. Poverty, inequality and exclusion 7 2. Violence 8 3. A justice system made for adults 8 4. Challenges for families and parents 8 5. Racism, hate speech and radicalisation 9 6. Growing up in a digital world 9 7. Migration 9
III. PRIORITY AREAS 10
1. Equal opportunities for all children 10 2. Participation of all children 13 3. A life free from violence for all children 15 4. Child-friendly justice for all children 18 5. Rights of the child in the digital environment 20
IV. DELIVERING THE STRATEGY 22
1. Making the standards work for children 22 2. Involving all relevant stakeholders 22 3. Communicating children’s rights 23 4. Evaluating performance 23
                      ¬ Page 3

Introduction
1. The Council of Europe protects and promotes human rights, which includes the rights of the child. This document sets the priorities of the Council of Europe in this area for the period 2016 to 2021.
 2.
3.
4.
guarded by the European Convention on Human Rights, the United Nations Convention on the Rights of the Child (UNCRC) and other international human rights instruments. These include civil, political, economic, social and cultural rights. This Strategy seeks to encompass all these categories of human rights and sets out the Council of Europe’s and its member States’ commitment to make these rights a reality for all children.
5. The Council of Europe’s work on the rights of the child is based on the UNCRC and in particular its four general principles:1
f f f f
1. 2. 3. 4. 5.
This Strategy identifies:
the Council of Europe’s achievements to build upon (chapter I);
the major challenges for the rights of the child (chapter II);
five priority areas and actions for meeting those challenges (chapter III); working methods to deliver the Strategy (chapter IV).
The five priority areas to guarantee the rights of the child are:
Equal opportunities for all children Participation of all children
A life free from violence for all children Child-friendly justice for all children
Rights of the child in the digital environment
1.
2.
3.
4.
1.
2. 3. 4.
Non-discrimination (Article 2). The rights of the child apply to all children without discrimination on any ground. All rights are to be granted without discrimination of any kind, irrespective of the child’s or his or her parent’s or legal guardian’s race, colour, sex, language, religion, political or other opinion, national, ethnic or social origin, property, disability, birth2, sexual orientation, gender identity3, or other status. This Strategy attributes attention to the application of the non-discrimination principle across all five priority areas.
Best interests of the child (Article 3). In all actions concerning children, the best interests of the child shall be a primary consideration. The Council of Europe will work on making this principle operational throughout the objectives of this Strategy.4
Right to life, survival and development (Article 6). Children have an inherent right to life and to protec- tion from violence and suicide. Development should be interpreted in its broadest sense, embracing the child’s physical, mental, spiritual, moral, psychological and social development.
The right to be heard (Article 12). Children’s participation is one of the five priority areas of the Strategy, but it is also a cross-cutting objective. Involving children in decision-making at individual, family, organ- isation and policy level in society is key to realising their rights. The Council of Europe is committed to taking a participatory approach to the rights of the child in all dimensions of this Strategy and to support its member States in doing so.
UN Committee on the Rights of the Child General Comment No. 5 (2003) on General measures of implementation of the Convention on the Rights of the Child.
UNCRC, Article 2.1.
CM/Rec(2010)5 on measures to combat discrimination on grounds of sexual orientation or gender identity.
Decision of the Committee of Ministers of the Council of Europe on the Conclusions of the Conference on the “Best Interests of
the Child”, Brussels, 9-10 December 2014 at its meeting of 15 April 2015 (DD(2015)266).
¬ Page 4
Children in Council of Europe member States are entitled to enjoy the full range of human rights safe-

6. The Strategy is the result of a broad consultation with member States, civil society, ombudspersons for children, other international organisations and children.5 This process was guided by the Committee of Experts on the Council of Europe Strategy for the Rights of the Child (DECS-ENF) which met three times from 2014 to 2015. The Strategy was adopted by the Committee of Ministers of the Council of Europe on 2 March 2016 and launched at a high-level conference in Sofia, Bulgaria, on 5-6 April 2016.
7. The stakeholders contributing to the Strategy development also considered the views of children. A secondary analysis of over 130 consultations with children in Council of Europe member States was specifi- cally prepared to inform the development of this Strategy.6 The results of this analysis will remain a reference document in the course of the Strategy implementation. Some member States also directly consulted children at national level on their contribution to the Strategy.
8. The beneficiaries of the priority areas and actions outlined in this Strategy and its Annex are children, i.e. persons under the age of 18 living in the 47 Council of Europe member States. The action of the Council of Europe as an intergovernmental organisation, however, is mediated through the governments of its member States, which are driving its implementation along with other stakeholders, such as civil society and ombud- spersons for children.
9. The duration of this Strategy is six years. A mid-term evaluation with the possibility for adjustments will be carried out after three years under the guidance of member States and other relevant stakeholders.
5. Questionnaires were completed by 39 member States, 34 NGOs and 13 ombudspersons for children. Six international organisa- tions provided written feedback.
6. Council of Europe (2015), Challenges to children’s rights today: What do children think? A desktop study on children’s views and priorities to inform the Council of Europe Strategy for the Rights of the Child.
Introduction ¬ Page 5

I. The Council of Europe
and the rights of the child: achievements to build upon
10. In its almost 10 years of existence since 2006, the programme “Building a Europe for and with Children” has striven to protect and promote the rights of the child in Council of Europe member States. Among many others, the following results have been achieved:7
 f
f
f
f
f f
f
f
7. 8.
9.
Legislative and policy change to improve the protection of children’s rights has been brought about through a comprehensive set of two binding and 18 non-binding standards on children’s rights elaborated by member States and adopted by the Committee of Ministers.8 These conventions, recommendations and guidelines advance the implementation of the UN Convention on the Rights of the Child at European level.
The knowledge base on progress and challenges in the implementation of the rights of the child under the relevant Council of Europe conventions has been broadened through reliable data collected by at least eight monitoring and other mechanisms of the Council of Europe.9
Member States have received support, upon request, in implementing children’s rights through more than 160 activities in 28 co-operation projects10 implemented by the Council of Europe, as well as through numerous bilateral activities within the Council of Europe Programme and Budget. More than 200 activities on children’s rights involving all 47 member States were organised under the previous Strategy, from 2012 to 2015.
Transversal and flexible working methods have been established with member States through the Network of National Co-ordinators on Children’s Rights and, in 2014 and 2015, the Committee of Experts on the Council of Europe Strategy for the Rights of the Child.
Children’s views have been sought and taken into account in the development of recommendations of the Committee of Ministers on children’s rights11 and communication tools targeted at children.
Strong partnerships with other international organisations and non-governmental organisations have been developed and have placed the Council of Europe as a key driver of children’s rights at European and international levels.
Children, parents, professionals and policy makers were made more aware of the rights of the child through accessible tools, attractive audio-visual material and innovative campaigns produced by the Council of Europe such as the ONE in FIVE Campaign to stop sexual violence against children.12
Children’s rights have been mainstreamed across the organisation with the effect that 35 sectors and policy fields of the Council of Europe contributed to the implementation of the 2012-2015 Strategy for the Rights of the Child.
See the Implementation Report on the Strategy 2012-2015 (CM(2015)174).
European Convention on the Adoption of Children (revised) (CETS No. 202; 2008/2011); Council of Europe Convention on the
Protection of Children against Sexual Exploitation and Sexual Abuse (Lanzarote Convention) (CETS No. 201: 2007/2010). For a list of all binding and non-binding Council of Europe standards protecting children’s rights, see www.coe.int/children.
European Committee of Social Rights (ECSR); Committee of the Parties to the Convention on the Protection of Children against Sexual Exploitation and Sexual Abuse (Lanzarote Committee); Committee for the Prevention of Torture (CPT); European Commission against Racism and Intolerance (ECRI); Advisory Committee on the Framework Convention for the Protection of National Minorities (ACFC); Group of Experts on Action against Trafficking in Human Beings (GRETA); European Commission for Democracy through Law (Venice Commission); Committee of Experts of the European Charter for Regional or Minority Languages (ECRML).
10. From 2006 to mid-2015, children’s rights were addressed in 11 Joint Programmes with the European Union and 17 co-operation projects financed by Voluntary Contributions.
11. For instance, the Guidelines on child-friendly justice adopted by the Committee of Ministers in 2010 take into consideration the conclusions from approx. 3,800 children in 25 member States. Children’s views were also taken into account in the drafting process of the Guidelines on child-friendly health, the Recommendation on child-friendly social services, and the Recommendation on participation of children and young people under the age of 18.
12. Forinstance,theTVspotandchildren’sbook“KikoandtheHand”werecreatedwithintheframeworkoftheONEinFIVECampaign targeting young children and their parents (www.underwearrule.org).
¬ Page 6

II. Are we there yet? Challenges for children’s rights today
and tomorrow
11. The UNCRC brought about a paradigm shift in the way in which society should view children, namely as true subjects of rights and agents of change. 25 years after the entry into force of the UNCRC (1990), however, this idea is still challenged. Despite the progress achieved, children’s rights are violated on a daily basis. There are still gaps in children’s legal protection, and even more between law and practice. Strong political com- mitment paired with the allocation of sufficient resources and a broad societal awareness of the rights of the child are needed to ensure that children are seen and treated as full rights-holders. Based on children’s own views as well as information received from member States, civil society and ombudspersons for children, this chapter gives an overview of the most compelling challenges for children’s rights over the coming years.
1. POVERTY, INEQUALITY AND EXCLUSION
12. The economic crisis has deeply affected children. Out of the 32 Council of Europe member States moni- tored in a UNICEF report, child poverty increased in 20 countries and decreased in only 12.13 According to Eurostat, children are the age group at the highest risk of poverty or social exclusion. Children living in poverty reportedly are feeling excluded and stigmatised.14 They are less likely than their better-off peers to do well in school, enjoy good health and realise their full potential later in life.15 With cycles of poverty lasting through generations, Europe risks producing a “lost generation” of disillusioned young people, with potentially grave consequences for cohesive societies and political stability.16 High levels of unemployment and cutbacks in public welfare may lead to increasing levels of stress amongst affected families, which create new risk factors of violence and neglect.17
13. A large number of children across Europe feel excluded and identify discrimination as a key rights issue to be dealt with.18 Not being able to enjoy education, play and share leisure time with others, or being bullied because of one’s ethnic origin, sexual orientation or other status, are all marking experiences for children that leave traces throughout their lives. From a human rights perspective, the quality of a society is measured by how it is treating its most vulnerable and marginalised groups. These include several groups of children, such as children with disabilities, children without parental care, children from minorities including Roma19 children, children on the move or otherwise affected by migration, children deprived of liberty, children living and/or working on the streets and children of imprisoned parents.
13. UNICEF Office of Research (2014), Children of the Recession: The impact of the economic crisis on child well-being in rich countries, Innocenti Report Card 12.
14. Council of Europe (2015), Challenges to children’s rights today: What do children think?, chapter 10.
15. European Commission Recommendation “Investing in children: breaking the cycle of disadvantage”, 2013.
16. See Parliamentary Assembly Resolution 1885(2012) “The young generation sacrificed: social, economic and political implications
of the financial crisis”.
17. Child Helpline International (2013), Voices of young Europe RWD.
18. Council of Europe (2015), Challenges to children’s rights today: What do children think?, chapter 8.
19. The terms “Roma and Travellers” are being used at the Council of Europe to encompass the wide diversity of the groups covered
by the work of the Council of Europe in this field: on the one hand a) Roma, Sinti/Manush, Calé, Kaale, Romanichals, Boyash/Rudari; b) Balkan Egyptians (Egyptians and Ashkali); c) Eastern groups (Dom, Lom and Abdal); and, on the other hand, groups such as Travellers,Yenish,andthepopulationsdesignatedundertheadministrativeterm“Gensduvoyage”,aswellaspersonswhoidentify themselves as Gypsies.
  ¬ Page 7

 2. VIOLENCE
14. Violence is a primary concern expressed by children.20 Violence against children constitutes a violation of the rights of the child, compromises children’s social development and affects the enjoyment of their other rights.21 Violence often has devastating short- and long-term mental and physical health consequences, at times persisting across generations. Beyond the impact on individual victims, research by non-governmental organisations indicates that violence is associated with far-reaching costs for society.22 Ending all forms of violence against children is therefore a legal, ethical and economic imperative.
15. Despite significant advances in addressing violence against children, progress is still too slow and frag- mented. The risk of violence against children, especially girls, remains present in every setting, including in the digital environment and in places where children should be safest – in schools, in all forms of care, in justice institutions, during leisure activities, sports and in the home. Progress is hampered by insufficient investment in violence prevention, fragmented and poorly enforced national policies, scarce data and research, as well as insufficient attention to child-sensitive mechanisms for counselling, reporting, recovery and reintegration.
16. Violence against children in conflicts is an unacceptable reality in Europe. Even once a conflict ends, chil- dren will remain traumatized by what they were obliged to experience and witness. Building and re-building trust among the young generation is an important task to tackle.
3. A JUSTICE SYSTEM MADE FOR ADULTS
17. European judicial systems are still insufficiently adapted to the specific needs of children. Research dem- onstrates that the rights of children to be heard, to be informed, to be protected, and not to be discriminated, are not always fulfilled in practice.23 Children in conflict and in contact with the law all have specific rights to which the justice system frequently does not respond to adequately. Restriction of liberty of children is not, contrary to UNCRC requirements, considered only as a last resort and for the shortest possible period of time. Administrative detention of migrant and other children and conditions of deprivation of liberty pose serious challenges to the realisation of their rights.
18. The case law of the European Court of Human Rights and the European Committee of Social Rights illus- trates the many situations in which children’s rights are at stake. In recent years, the Court has found a range of violations of the European Convention on Human Rights with respect to children, for instance of Article 8 (Right to respect for private and family life), Article 9 (Freedom of thought, conscience and religion), and Article 14 (Prohibition of discrimination).24 The European Committee of Social Rights has also found several States in breach of the European Social Charter, including for not having prohibited corporal punishment in a sufficiently precise and binding manner.
4. CHALLENGES FOR FAMILIES AND PARENTS
19. The family, whatever its form, is the fundamental unit of society and the natural environment for the growth and well-being of children. Children enormously value relationships with their parents and siblings.25 Families can, however, be confronted with numerous challenges: the economic crisis has exposed many families to unemployment and insecurity about the future. Reconciling work and family life remains difficult for many parents and in particular for single parents, who are mostly women. Violence experienced and witnessed by children can take place within a family context. An increasing number of families are affected by migration. New information and communication technologies add an entirely new dimension to parenting. Many parents lack support in fulfilling their role in raising their children and guaranteeing their rights.
20. Ibid., chapter 4.
21. See UN Committee on the Rights of the Child General Comment No. 13 (2011) on the right of the child to freedom from all forms
of violence, according to which “violence” is understood to include all forms of physical or mental violence, injury or abuse, neglect
or negligent treatment, maltreatment or exploitation, including sexual abuse.
22. Overseas Development Institute and Child Focus Alliance (2014), The costs and economic impact of violence against children. 23. EU Agency for Fundamental Rights (FRA) (2015), Child-friendly justice – Perspectives and experiences of professionals on children’s
participation in civil and criminal judicial proceedings in 10 EU member States.
24. European Court of Human Rights, Factsheet Children’s Rights, March 2015.
25. Council of Europe (2015), Challenges to children’s rights today: What do children think?, chapter 11.
  Council of Europe Strategy for the Rights of the Child ¬ Page 8

 5. RACISM, HATE SPEECH AND RADICALISATION
20. The recent economic crisis has deeply affected social cohesion in many member States, which may eventually threaten both the rule of law and democracy.26 The European Commission against Racism and Intolerance (ECRI) speaks of “scapegoating” and notes an increase in hate speech against vulnerable groups and in racist violence. Radicalisation of children and youth is another issue of concern that calls for more investments into education for tolerance and intercultural dialogue.27 There are cases in which children from European countries are being recruited by extremist groups. Responses will need to be found to prevent this, but also to re-integrate minors who have been abroad to join extremist groups and have returned.
6. GROWING UP IN A DIGITAL WORLD
21. Whether it is through computers, gaming consoles, tablets or smartphones, the digital world exposes children to a wealth of opportunities. Access to the Internet and to digital literacy is gradually being considered as dimensions of the rights of the child to freedom of expression, to participation and to education. Yet the digital environment also exposes children to harmful content and its effects, privacy and data protection issues and other risks, including online sexual abuse and excessive exposure to sexualised images. In some cases, such as cyber-bullying and self-exposure, children’s own conduct online may harm others and represent a risk to them. Parents and teachers struggle to keep up with technological developments so that a generational divide has become increasingly apparent.28
7. MIGRATION
22. Children on the move and otherwise affected by migration are one of the most vulnerable groups in Europe today. 29 In some countries, they face limited access to justice, education, social and health services. While unaccompanied children face a particularly precarious situation30, migrant children at large even when accompanied by parents often suffer persistent violations of their human rights. The principle of the best inter- ests of the child is too often neglected in asylum and immigration procedures. The use of detention instead of child welfare protection, failures in appointing effective guardianship, family separation and demeaning age assessment procedures are emblematic of the different ways in which migrant children fall through loopholes in child protection frameworks. They are also at high risk of trafficking31 and exploitation. Children left behind when their parents migrate, as well as stateless children are likewise at a heightened risk of finding their rights violated.
  26. Council of Europe (2015), State of Democracy, Human Rights and the Rule of Law in Europe. Report by the Secretary General of the Council of Europe.
27. Declaration of the Committee of Ministers of the Council of Europe: “United around our principles against violent extremism and radicalisation leading to terrorism”, Brussels, 19 May 2015.
28. EU Kids Online (2014), EU Kids Online: findings, methods, recommendations.
29. See SG/Inf(2015)33, Migration challenges for Europe: need for collective action.
30. See UN High Commissioner for Refugees (UNHCR), Safe and Sound: what States can do to ensure respect for the best interests of
unaccompanied and separated children in Europe, 2014.
31. See Council of Europe Group of Experts on Action against Trafficking in Human Beings (2015), 4th General Report.
II. Are we there yet? Challenges for children’s rights today and tomorrow ¬ Page 9

III. Priority areas
23. To address the issues outlined above, five priority areas have been identified. This chapter describes these areas, which are all anchored in the UNCRC, the European Convention on Human Rights, the European Social Charter, and other Council of Europe standards protecting the rights of the child.
24. Figures at the end of each chapter summarize for each priority area the expected impact at beneficiary level (children), outcome at the level of member States and other stakeholders, and a non-exhaustive selec- tion of outputs produced by the Council of Europe. Given the normative character of the Council of Europe’s mandate, the Council of Europe’s performance will mainly be evaluated at output and outcome level, though efforts will be made to also generate evidence on impact.32
25. In the framework of a pilot project on risk management within the organisation,33 a certain number of risk factors that could negatively affect the achievements of outcomes as well as mitigating actions were identi- fied. The described risk factors are not exhaustive and will be elaborated in more detail during the inception phase of the Strategy implementation. Insufficient financial and human resources as well as lack of political commitment are general risk factors that apply to all priority areas.
1. EQUAL OPPORTUNITIES FOR ALL CHILDREN
26. The UNCRC recognises the right of every child to a standard of living adequate for the child’s physical, mental, spiritual, moral and social development. The European Social Charter guarantees children’s rights to appropriate social, legal and economic protection. In line with the UNCRC and the European Social Charter, families should be afforded all necessary protection and assistance in order to fulfil their crucially important role.
1.1. Guaranteeing children’s social rights
27. The Council of Europe will promote the European Social Charter as a key set of minimum standards safeguarding the rights of families and children, which is particularly relevant in times of economic austerity.34 Special attention will be given to the follow-up of the conclusions and decisions of the European Committee of Social Rights on provisions relevant to children’s rights.35
28. Child poverty and social exclusion can most effectively be addressed through child protection systems that carefully integrate preventive measures, family support, early childhood education and care36, social services, education and housing policies. Member States will therefore be encouraged to follow and implement the Committee of Ministers Recommendations on child-friendly social services37, on child-friendly healthcare38, on the access of young people from disadvantaged neighbourhoods to social rights39, and the Recommendation of the Congress of Local and Regional Authorities on the social reintegration of children living and/or working on the streets40. They may also take into consideration the European Commission Recommendation “Investing in children: breaking the cycle of disadvantage”41 and its work on integrated child protection mechanisms42. With a view to guaranteeing the best interests of the child in all measures affecting them43, member States will also be supported in introducing and enhancing the quality and effect of child impact assessments.
32. See United Nations Evaluation Group (2013), Handbook for Conducting Evaluations of Normative Work in the UN System.
33. See Financial regulations and supplementary provisions of the Council of Europe, adopted by the Committee of Ministers on
29 June 2011 and amended on 19-20 November 2013.
34. Parliamentary Assembly Resolution 1995(2014) “Ending child poverty in Europe”.
35. See in particular Article 7 (right of children and young persons to protection), Article 11 (right to protection of health), Article 16
(right of the family to social, legal and economic protection), Article 17 (right of children and young persons to social, legal and
economic protection), Article 30 (Right to protection from poverty and social exclusion) and Article 31 (right to housing). 36. See CM/Rec(2002)8 on child day-care.
37. CM/Rec(2011)12.
38. Guidelines on child-friendly healthcare, adopted by the Committee of Ministers on 21 September 2011.
39. CM/Rec(2015)3.
40. Recommendation 253 (2008) of the Council of Europe Congress of Local and Regional Authorities.
41. European Commission Recommendation “Investing in children: breaking the cycle of disadvantage”, 2013.
42. See European Commission (2015), 9th European Forum on the rights of the child, Reflection Paper, Coordination and cooperation
in integrated child protection systems.
43. UN Committee on the Rights of the Child General Comment No. 14 (2013) on the right of the child to have his or her best interests
taken as a primary consideration.
   ¬ Page 10

1.2. Countering discrimination
 29. The right to non-discrimination (see chapter I) is guaranteed by the European Convention on Human Rights and the UNCRC, of which it is also a general principle.
30. The Council of Europe will continue to protect the rights of children with disabilities based on the UN Convention on the Rights of Persons with Disabilities (UNCRPD) and the Council of Europe Recommendations on ensuring full inclusion of children and young persons with disabilities into society44 and on deinstitution- alisation and community living of children with disabilities45. Participatory research will be undertaken on the specific opportunities and risks for children with disabilities in the digital environment.
31. In line with Committee of Ministers Recommendation on the rights of children living in residential institutions46 and the UN Guidelines on the Rights of Children in Alternative Care, the Council of Europe will also pay specific attention to the situation of children in all forms of alternative care and provide guidance to professionals in this field in implementing a child-rights based and participatory approach to their work. Where large residential care facilities (institutions) remain, the Council of Europe will promote the deinstitu- tionalisation of care of children, in particular of children under the age of three.
32. The rights of children on the move or otherwise affected by migration will be protected and promoted by various Council of Europe bodies, including the Council of Europe Commissioner for Human Rights. Member States will be supported in upholding their human rights obligations in line with the case-law of the European Court of Human Rights, the conclusions of the European Committee on Social Rights (ECSR), and of the Committee for the Prevention of Torture (CPT), the Group of Experts on Action against Trafficking in Human Beings (GRETA) as well as the European Commission against Racism and Intolerance (ECRI). Furthermore, the Council of Europe will guide member States in taking a co-ordinated child rights based approach, bearing in mind also the Recommendations on life projects for unaccompanied migration minors47, on strengthening the integration of children of migrants and of immigrant background48, and on the nationality of children.49 Special attention will be paid to the situation of unaccompanied migrant children and to the link between migration and trafficking of children. The Parliamentary Assembly of the Council of Europe will continue to support the Campaign to End Immigration Detention of Children.50
33. The Council of Europe will continue to protect and promote the rights of children from minorities, in particular through the work of the Advisory Committee on the Framework Convention for the Protection of National Minorities (ACFC) and the Committee of Experts of the European Charter for Regional or Minority Languages (ECRML). Through the latter, the Council of Europe will particularly protect and promote the rights of children from traditional ethnic or national minorities regarding the use of their language in private and public life and at school.
34. Action will be undertaken in particular to evaluate the effective implementation of Roma children’s rights, to address the issue of early/child marriage, to strengthen access of Roma children and in particular girls and children with disabilities to inclusive education, to make full use of trained Roma mediators and assistants under ROMED,51 as well as to fight stereotypes against Roma children through developing a child-friendly version of the Dosta! campaign.52
35. To fight discrimination on the grounds of gender and promote equality between girls and boys, the Council of Europe will continue to address stereotypes and sexism, notably in media53 and education54, as well as oversexualisation.
36. Based on Recommendation CM/Rec(2010)5 on measures to combat discrimination on grounds of sexual orientation or gender identity, the Council of Europe will undertake research on the situation of LGBT and intersex children as regards the realisation of their rights.
44. CM/Rec(2013)2.
45. CM/Rec(2010)2.
46. CM/Rec(2005)5.
47. CM/Rec(2007)9.
48. CM/Rec(2008)4.
49. CM/Rec(2009)13.
50. See http://website-pace.net/web/apce/children-in-detention.
51. ROMED is a Joint Programme by the Council of Europe and the European United aiming to train Roma mediators around Europe.
See www.coe-romed.org.
52. See www.dosta.org.
53. CM/Rec(2013)1 on gender equality and media.
54. CM/Rec(2007)13 on gender mainstreaming in education.
III. Priority areas ¬ Page 11

Priority area 1: equal opportunities for all children
 IMPACT
Children enjoy their right to equal opportunities
OUTCOMES
Member states and other target groups...
1. change legislation and policy and join interna- tional instruments to improve the protection of children's social rights
2. rely on Council of Europe standards and tools to counter discrimination of children
  RISKS AND MITIGATING ACTIONS
Council of Europe guidance and tools for implementing social rights and countering discrimination are not known by legislative actors and policy makers in member states
Æ More awareness raising about Council of Europe standards and tool, including by translating them in local language.
 OUTPUTS (selection)
f Targeted actions to follow-up monitoring of the Social Charter
f Capacity building of Ombuds and NGOs on advocacy on social rights
f Child-friendly version of the "Dosta" Campaign on Roma
fMonitoring of the situation of migrant children, including unaccompanied migrant minors, through ECRI, ECSR, CPT, ECRML, etc.
f Training of professionals on rights of children in alternative care
f Needs assessment on anti-discrimination measures for LGBTI children
Council of Europe Strategy for the Rights of the Child ¬ Page 12

 2. PARTICIPATION OF ALL CHILDREN
37. Children have the right to be heard and participate in decisions affecting them, both as individuals and as a group. Indeed everyone has the right to freedom of expression, as guaranteed under Article 10 of the European Convention on Human Rights. The UNCRC grants children the right to express their views freely in all matters affecting them and to have their views given due weight in accordance with their age and maturity.55
2.1. Promoting children’s right to participate
38. The Council of Europe will provide guidance on how to embed child participation in practice in a sys- tematic manner and in all contexts relevant for children. Based on the Recommendation on the participation of children and young people under the age of 1856, it will support member States in using the Council of Europe’s Child Participation Assessment Tool as one means to measure progress towards fulfilling the rights of children to participate in matters concerning them. Action will be undertaken to facilitate exchange of experi- ences on rights-based child participation57 in co-operation with the Council of Europe youth sector, child and youth organisations, ombudspersons for children and child advisory bodies and based on the principles of independence, representation, competence, information and continuity.
2.2. Reaching out to children
39. The Council of Europe will continue to involve children and give due respect to their views in the devel- opment, implementation and evaluation of its child-related standards, policies and activities, respecting the above-mentioned principles. In doing so, special emphasis will be given to the participation of children in vulnerable situations, such as children with disabilities, children living in poverty, children in care, Roma chil- dren, children on the move or otherwise affected by migration, and children from minorities. Efforts will be reinforced to reach out to children and those who care for and work with them through websites, applications, social media, games, publications and other child-friendly tools.
2.3. Strengthening participation in and through schools
40. The Council of Europe will strengthen the opportunities for children’s participation in the school set- ting and the democratic governance of schools by supporting the development of citizenship and human rights education in its member States, in the framework of the implementation of the Charter on Education for Democratic Citizenship and Human Rights Education. 58 Children’s participation in the 2nd review of the implementation of the Charter will be facilitated. Peer-to-peer learning among the member States will be supported through the pilot projects scheme “Human Rights and Democracy in Action” jointly funded by the European Union and the Council of Europe.59
   55. See UN Committee on the Rights of the Child General Comment No. 12 (2009) on the right of the child to be heard. 56. CM/Rec(2012)2.
57. See European Commission (2015), Evaluation of legislation, policy and practice on child participation in the EU.
58. CM/Rec(2010)7.
59. Subject to the financial contribution from the European Commission.
III. Priority areas ¬ Page 13

Priority area 2: participation of all children
 IMPACT
Children enjoy their right to participation
OUTCOMES
Member states and other target groups...
1. change legislation and policy to implement children's right to participation
2. benefit from the child participation assesment tool to evaluate implementation of Art. 12 UNCRC
3. take steps to embed child participation in all contexts relevant for children
4. furtherimplementtheCharteronEDC/HRE
  RISKS AND MITIGATING ACTIONS
f Lack of effectiveness and credibility of Council of Europe guidance and tools on child participation
ÆGenuine collaboration with children and reliance on pilots and tested good practices
 OUTPUTS (selection)
f Multi-annual project on the Child Participation Assessment Tool
f Dissemination and translation of Rec(2012)2
f Research, tools and child-friendly materials developed with children f Pilot project scheme "Human Rights and Democracy in Action"
f Conference on "Education for Democracy", Strasbourg 2017
Council of Europe Strategy for the Rights of the Child ¬ Page 14

 3. A LIFE FREE FROM VIOLENCE FOR ALL CHILDREN
41. The UNCRC requires States to take all appropriate legislative, administrative, social and educational mea- sures to protect children from all forms of physical or mental violence, injury or abuse, neglect or negligent treatment, maltreatment or exploitation, including sexual abuse. The European Convention on Human Rights, the European Social Charter and other Council of Europe treaties guarantee children’s right to protection from harm and violence.
42. In its efforts to address violence against children, the Council of Europe will continue to act as a regional driver of initiatives to promote the implementation of the recommendations of the UN Secretary General’s Study on Violence against Children and to support the mandate of the Special Representative of the UN Secretary-General on Violence against Children.
3.1. Promoting an integrated approach to protection from violence
43. Addressing violence against children calls for an integrated and strategic approach. The Council of Europe will contribute to the elimination of violence against children in all settings and in particular in the fields of education, media, justice, equality, family, migration, alternative care, and children with disabilities. The Council of Europe will support member States in implementing the Committee of Ministers Recommendation on integrated national strategies for the protection of children from violence.60 The Recommendation contains guidance for the development of solid legal, policy and institutional frameworks, the promotion of a culture of respect for the rights of the child, the establishment of child-friendly mechanisms and services and the adop- tion of a national research agenda to prevent, address and respond to all forms of violence against children. The Council of Europe will act as a clearing house providing access to existing national strategies in this field and providing a platform for peer-to-peer support in their development, implementation and review, includ- ing on data collection, at national, regional and local levels.
3.2. Combating sexual exploitation and sexual abuse
44. The Council of Europe will promote, monitor and support the implementation of the Council of Europe treaties aiming at preventing and addressing the various forms of sexual violence against children. Effort will in particular aim at achieving ratification of the Council of Europe Convention on the Protection of Children against Sexual Exploitation and Sexual Abuse (Lanzarote Convention) by all member States, ensuring its effective implementation through the monitoring work of the Committee of the Parties to the Lanzarote Convention, as well as its role as a platform for capacity building and collection of good practices.
45. A European Day on the Protection of Children against Sexual Exploitation and Sexual Abuse will be celebrated on 18 November each year. The day will be dedicated to raise awareness of this scourge, share good practices, and to promote the ratification and implementation of the Lanzarote Convention. Taking into consideration the work of its Network to stop sexual violence against children in the framework of the ONE in FIVE Campaign, the Parliamentary Assembly will continue promoting the ratification and implementation of the Lanzarote Convention, and will co-operate to make the European Day a success.
46. The Council of Europe will also support the mandate of the UN Special Rapporteur on the sale of children, child prostitution and child pornography.
3.3. Eliminating corporal punishment
47. The Council of Europe will continue to promote the effective elimination of corporal punishment and other cruel or degrading forms of punishment of children in all settings, including within the home. It will identify particular challenges in the path to universal prohibition and elimination of corporal punishment and how these may be overcome. Member States will be supported in legal reform to achieve a full ban and in attaining higher collective awareness about children’s right to equal protection from assault, the dangers of violent punishment, as well as in promoting non-violent discipline and positive upbringing in line with the Recommendation on policy to support positive parenting.61
60. CM/Rec(2009)10. 61. CM/Rec(2006)19.
   III. Priority areas ¬ Page 15

3.4. Protecting children from violence in various settings and forms
 48. The Council of Europe will continue to address the issue of violence in schools, notably on the basis of the Council of Europe Charter on Education for Citizenship and Human Rights Education. Pursuing a transver- sal approach, the Council of Europe will support strengthening the role of education in preventing specific forms of violence such as bullying in schools, homophobic bullying, cyber-bullying, and violence linked to radicalisation. The Council of Europe will support awareness-raising actions and campaigns on democratic citizenship and human rights education based on educational materials, such as the video clip “Beat Bullying” and the publication “Human Rights and Democracy Start with Us: Charter for All”.
49. The Council of Europe will encourage all its member States to sign, ratify and implement effectively the Council of Europe Convention on preventing and combating violence against women and domestic violence (Istanbul Convention), in particular through the work of the Group of Experts on Action against Violence against Women and Domestic Violence (GREVIO), with a view to protecting girls from gender-based violence, preventing, prosecuting and eliminating such violence, as well as to apply the convention to all child victims of domestic violence.
50. The Council of Europe will support member States in fulfilling their obligations under the Convention on Action against Trafficking in Human Beings, in particular through the Group of Experts on Action against Trafficking in Human Beings (GRETA).
51. The Enlarged Partial Agreement on Sport of the Council of Europe (EPAS) will continue to promote a healthy and safe sports environment for children, including through the project Pro Safe Sports (PSS)62 and a toolkit providing guidance and training to sport administrators and coaches on physical, psychological and social well-being in sports. It will also monitor and promote the implementation of the Recommendation on the protection of child and young athletes from dangers associated with migration63.
62. See http://pjp-eu.coe.int/en/web/pss. 63. CM/Rec(2012)10.
Council of Europe Strategy for the Rights of the Child ¬ Page 16

Priority area 3: a life free from violence for all children
 IMPACT
Children enjoy their right to be free from violence
OUTCOMES
Member states and other target groups...
1. change legislation and policy to implement Rec(2009)10
2. ratifyandimplementtheLanzaroteandIstanbul conventions
3. takeactiontobancorporalpunishment
4. changepoliciesandlegislationtoimplementCoE standards concerning other forms of violence
  RISKS AND MITIGATING ACTIONS
f Lanzarote Committee monitoring reports do not fully match the reality in member StatesÆInvest in checking information, submitted by States, including through NGOs and case-law
fNegative public opinion on CoE action regarding corporal punishmentÆexplain negative consequences of corporal punishment and benefifits of positive parenting
 OUTPUTS (selection)
f Monitoring of the Lanzarote Convention by Committee of the Parties f European Day on the protection of children against sexual violence f Online toolbox on good practices to promote non-violent parenting f Support to member states to achieve legal ban of corporal punishment f Monitoring reports by GREVIO and GRETA and follow up activities
III. Priority areas ¬ Page 17

 4. CHILD-FRIENDLY JUSTICE FOR ALL CHILDREN
52. According to the UNCRC, children shall be provided the opportunity to be heard in any judicial and administrative proceedings affecting them and to access competent, independent and impartial complaints mechanisms when their rights are breached. Furthermore, States Parties to the UNCRC recognise the right of every child in conflict with the law to be treated in a manner consistent with the promotion of the child’s sense of dignity, and taking into account the child’s age and the objective of his or her reintegration into society. In all actions concerning children, whether undertaken by public or private social welfare institutions, courts of law, administrative authorities or legislative bodies, the best interests of the child shall be a primary consideration.
4.1. Promoting child-friendly justice
53. The Council of Europe will promote the implementation of the Council of Europe Guidelines on child- friendly justice64 by supporting member States in strengthening access to, treatment in and participation of children in civil, administrative and criminal justice proceedings. This will include a range of actions implemented by the European Committee on Legal Co-operation (CDCJ), the Programme on Human Rights Education for Legal Professionals (HELP) and other relevant bodies. In doing so, the Council will continue to work closely with the European Commission, the EU Fundamental Rights Agency, as well as UNICEF CEE/CIS and the Council of Baltic Sea States (CBSS). Action will also be taken to support member States to ratify and implement the Third Optional Protocol to the UNCRC on a Communications Procedure.
4.2. Protecting children in the context of deprivation of liberty
54. Under the UNCRC, deprivation of liberty must be used as a measure of last resort and for the shortest appro- priate period of time. Council of Europe member States will be supported in avoiding and preventing deprivation of liberty and criminalization of children through measures such as extension of diversion and preparation for reintegration. Material conditions and detention regimes should be improved in line with Council of Europe standards. Support will be provided to member States in implementing the European Rules for juvenile offend- ers subject to sanctions or measures.65 The Council of Europe will promote the implementation of the Standards of the European Committee for the Prevention of Torture and Inhuman or Degrading Treatment or Punishment (CPT)66 regarding the protection of children deprived of liberty from ill-treatment and violence, follow-up to the recommendations of the report on violence in institutions for juvenile offenders67, and develop practical guidance for monitoring places of deprivation of liberty for children. It will consider addressing the situation of children whose parents are detained. The Council of Europe is ready to support, as appropriate and within its mandate, the UN Global Study on Children Deprived of Liberty,68 notably as far as the European region is concerned.
4.3. Children’s rights in the family
55. The Council of Europe will promote the implementation of its standards on family law, including the European Convention on the Adoption of Children (Revised), and the Committee of Ministers Recommendations on family mediation69, on policy to support positive parenting70, and on preventing and resolving disputes on child relocation71. The Council of Europe will undertake action on the best interests of the child in the context of new family forms and bioethics, especially with reference to surrogacy and donor-assisted human reproduction. Particular attention will be paid to the assessment process of the best interests of the child in family matters. It shall be explored how member States could put into place laws, regulations and procedures which ensure that the best interests of the child are a primary consideration in removal from parental care, placement and reunification decisions.72
64. Guidelines on child friendly justice adopted by the Committee of Ministers of the Council of Europe on 17 November 2010. See also Parliamentary Assembly Resolution 2010(2014) “Child-friendly juvenile justice: from rhetoric to reality”, and the orientations on promoting and supporting the implementing of the Guidelines on child-friendly justice by the European Committee on Legal Co-operation (CDCJ(2014)15).
65. CM/Rec(2008)11.
66. CPT/Inf/E (2002) 1 - Rev. 2015.
67. European Committee on Crime Problems, PCCP (2014), Report on Violence in Institutions for Juvenile Offenders.
68. See UN General Assembly Resolution A/C.3/69/L.24/Rev.1, paragraph 51.d.
69. Rec(98)1.
70. CM/Rec(2006)19. See also Recommendation Rec(98)8 on children’s participation in family and social life.
71. CM/Rec(2015)4.
72. SeeParliamentaryAssemblyResolution2049(2015)on“SocialservicesinEurope:legislationandpracticeoftheremovalofchildren
from their families in Council of Europe member States”.
   Council of Europe Strategy for the Rights of the Child ¬ Page 18

Priority area 4: child-friendly justice for all children
 IMPACT
Children enjoy their rights in the justice system
OUTCOMES
Member states and other target groups...
1. change legislation and policy to implement the Guidelines on child-friendly justice
2. takestepstodecreasethenumberofchildren deprived of liberty and improve deprivation of liberty conditions
3. strenghten the realisation of the rights of the child including the best interests determination in the family context
  RISKS AND MITIGATING ACTIONS
f Council of Europe guidance and tools meet resistance in national justice systems and public opinion
ÆRaise awareness and explain the benefifits of a child rights and child centred approach; disseminate good practices
 OUTPUTS (selection)
f Regional meetings to exchange good practices on child-friendly justice
f Data collection on selected aspects of child-friendly justice
f Training of legal professionals on child-friendly justice, mediation, monitoring places of deprivation of liberty etc.
f Monitoring of places of detention of children by the CPT
f Parliamentary Campaign to End Immigration Detention of Children
f Needs assessment on new challenges in family law and in the biomedical fifield
III. Priority areas ¬ Page 19

 5. RIGHTS OF THE CHILD IN THE DIGITAL ENVIRONMENT
56. New Information and Communication Technologies (ICT) affect children’s enjoyment of a significant number of fundamental rights guaranteed by the UNCRC, the European Convention on Human Rights and the European Social Charter. According to recommendations issued by the UN Committee on the Rights of the Child, all children should be able to safely access ICTs and digital media, and be empowered to fully partici- pate, express themselves, seek information and enjoy all the rights enshrined in the UNCRC and its Optional Protocols without discrimination of any kind.73
57. The digital world offers children boundless learning and connectivity opportunities as well as chal- lenges of real concern which must be tackled by member States in an integrated manner and in line with the Council of Europe Internet Governance Strategy 2016-2021.74 The Council of Europe will provide guidance and support to member States in ensuring children’s participation, protection and provision rights in the digital environment.
5.1. Participation of children in the digital environment
58. The Council of Europe will promote and protect children’s rights to non-discrimination, access to informa- tion, freedom of expression and participation in the digital environment in co-operation with other stakehold- ers active in this field.75 Smartphone and tablet applications and other communication tools will be created and disseminated to empower children, parents and educators in making full and safe use of the potential of ICT and digital media. Particular attention will be paid to empowering children in vulnerable situations, such as children with disabilities. Drawing on the Recommendation on policy to support positive parenting and other relevant standards, guidance will be developed on rights-based parenting in the digital age. Guidance for member States will be developed on an integrated approach to children’s rights in the digital environment.
5.2. Protection of children in the digital environment
59. Council of Europe conventions provide a solid basis for the protection of children from potential risks to their safety, security and privacy in the digital environment. The Council of Europe will promote, monitor and support the implementation of the Council of Europe Convention on the Protection of Children against Sexual Exploitation and Sexual Abuse, the Convention on Cybercrime and its Additional Protocol, and the Convention for the Protection of Individuals with regard to Automatic Processing of Personal Data, the Convention on Preventing and Combating Violence against Women and Domestic Violence, the Convention on Action against Trafficking in Human Beings, as well as the relevant Recommendations by the Committee of Ministers.76
5.3. Provision for children in the digital environment
60. ICT and digital media have added a new dimension to children’s right to education. To promote the cre- ative, critical and safe use of the Internet the Council of Europe will launch a pan-European project on digital citizenship education, building on the achievements of the programme on Education for Democratic Citizenship and Human Rights Education and the results of the project on Competences for Democratic Culture. Based on multi-stakeholder consultations and exchanges of good practice, policy guidelines and a set of descriptors for digital citizenship competence will be developed and made available to member States for use in the school setting.
61. Internet and the social media are widely used to advocate hate speech, radicalisation and terrorism among young people. As a response, the Council of Europe will continue the “No Hate Speech” campaign and invest in a set of measures in the educational field and on the Internet as set out in the Action Plan “The fight against violent extremism and radicalisation leading to terrorism” adopted by the Committee of Ministers on 19 May 2015.77
73. UN Committee on the Rights of the Child, Report of the 2014 Day of General Discussion “Digital media and children’s rights”, May 2015.
74. Currently under consideration by the Committee of Ministers.
75. See CM/Rec(2014)6 on a Guide to human rights for Internet users.
76. See for example CM/Rec(2009)5 on measures to protect children against harmful content and behaviour and to promote their
active participation in the new information and communications environment . 77. CM(2015)74 final.
   Council of Europe Strategy for the Rights of the Child ¬ Page 20

Priority area 5: rights of the child in the digital environment
 IMPACT
Children enjoy their rights in the digital environment
OUTCOMES
Member states and other target groups...
1. changelegislationandpolicytoprotectchildren in the digital environment
2. take action to empower children to make use of the full potential of ICT
3. provide education on digital citizenship and address radicalisation and hate speech
  RISKS AND MITIGATING ACTIONS
f Technology develops faster than Council of Europe standards and toolsÆGreater investments in ICT and research, partnerships with private sector
f Council of Europe standards and tools do not reach the key actors in Internet governanceÆmulti-stakeholder approach including private sector
 OUTPUTS (selection)
f Child-friendly tools on the Human Rights Guide for Internet Users
f Tablet application for children and parents on navigating the Internet
f Guidance on integrated approach to children's rights in the digital environment
f Monitoring of conventions on cybercrime, data protection and sexual exploitation and abuse
f Pan-European project on digital citizenship education f No Hate Speech campaign
III. Priority areas ¬ Page 21

IV. Delivering the strategy
62. The Council of Europe intends to deliver this Strategy through a continued focus on implementation of existing standards, partnerships, communication and evaluation.
1. MAKING THE STANDARDS WORK FOR CHILDREN
63. To make the objectives set out in this Strategy a reality for children, the Council of Europe will concentrate its resources on the implementation of existing standards. Increased efforts will be put into co-operation activi- ties wherever a need is expressed by a member State and resources are made available, for instance through voluntary contributions by member States or joint programmes. Children’s rights issues will be mainstreamed into relevant co-operation projects and activities of other sectors of the Council of Europe.
64. Based on the achievements under the previous Strategy, the rights of the child will continue to be addressed in the Council of Europe’s thematic and country-based monitoring of conventions. The focus will be on giving visibility and support to member States in following up the findings of monitoring mechanisms concerning children’s rights. This will be achieved, inter alia, through a more systematic co-operation with the UN Committee on the Rights of the Child.
65. Given the existence of a wide spectrum of up-to-date Council of Europe legal standards on the rights of the child, the development of any new standards will be subject to a thorough assessment of needs and feasibility. Children’s rights will continue to be mainstreamed into all relevant new conventions and Recommendations developed by the Council of Europe.
2. INVOLVING ALL RELEVANT STAKEHOLDERS
66. The implementation of this Strategy depends on many actors: member States, international organisations, civil society, ombudspersons for children, academic networks, the private sector and children themselves.
67. The implementation of this Strategy will be guided and evaluated, by an ad-hoc committee on the rights of the child answerable to the Committee of Ministers of the Council of Europe. The committee will be com- posed of representatives of all 47 member States of the Council of Europe and other relevant stakeholders.78
68. Based on a Joint Declaration by the Secretary General of the Council of Europe and the Executive Director of UNICEF of 2007, both organisations seek to further reinforce their co-operation to maximise synergies between their programmes, including through increasing co-ordination and exploring possible regional co- operation in key priority areas and country-level co-operation, as appropriate. The Special Representative of the UN Secretary-General on Violence against Children, the UN Special Rapporteur on the sale of children, child prostitution and child pornography, the Office of the UN High Commissioner on Human Rights and the Office of the UN High Commissioner on Refugees (UNHCR), are other valuable partners in this respect.
69. Through the priorities set out in this Strategy, the Council of Europe aims at contributing to the ratifica- tion and implementation of the Optional Protocols to the Convention on the Rights of the Child on the Sale of Children, Child Prostitution and Child Pornography and on a Communications Procedure, as well as to the implementation of the UN 2030 Agenda for Sustainable Development79 with its specific experiences and capacities.
70. Furthermore, the Council of Europe will continue its close co-operation with the European Union, in par- ticular the European Commission and the Fundamental Rights Agency, which are key partners in promoting the implementation of Council of Europe standards. Possibilities to strengthen this co-operation even further will be explored. The Council of Europe will also continue to co-operate closely with the Council of Baltic Sea States (CBSS) and the International Organisation of La Francophonie (OIF).
78. The terms of reference of this committee will be presented, together with this Strategy, to the Committee of Ministers and are subject to its approval.
79. UNGA A/Res/70/1 of 25 September 2015, Transforming our world: the 2030 Agenda for Sustainable Development.
   ¬ Page 22

71. Ombudspersons for Children and their European Network (ENOC), as well as international and national NGOs are important implementing partners for the Council of Europe. Ways to increase transparency and efficiency of co-operating with civil society will be further explored.
72. The Parliamentary Assembly of the Council of Europe, the Congress of Local and Regional Authorities, the Council of Europe Conference of INGOs, and the Council of Europe Commissioner for Human Rights will be crucial partners in achieving the objectives of the Strategy through their own mandates and priorities. Furthermore, all relevant steering, expert committees and monitoring bodies will play an important role in implementing this Strategy. The Council of Europe Development Bank can provide loans to its member countries to co-finance infrastructure projects that benefit children.
73. The Council of Europe’s work on the rights of the child will continue to be co-ordinated by the Children’s Rights Division within the Directorate General of Democracy. The Inter-Secretariat Task Force on Children’s Rights will facilitate this task.
3. COMMUNICATING CHILDREN’S RIGHTS
74. Raising the awareness of children’s rights among children, parents, carers, professionals and policy mak- ers is an enormous task, which the Council of Europe is determined to fulfil jointly with member States. More efforts will be put into online and audio-visual communication tools as well as the further development of the website www.coe.int/children into a European hub with comprehensive, accessible and up-to-date informa- tion on children’s rights.
4. EVALUATING PERFORMANCE
75. Progress of this 6-year Strategy will be evaluated against the objectives, with reference to the expected impact, outcome and output set out for each priority area, based on a set of indicators. A mid-term evalua- tion with the possibility for adjustments will be carried out after three years under the guidance of member States and other relevant stakeholders. Efforts will be made to duly include the views of children themselves in evaluation of and adjustments to the Strategy. Furthermore, the Secretariat will report every two years to the Committee of Ministers on the implementation of this Strategy.
  IV. Delivering the strategy ¬ Page 23

                 Since launching the Programme ”Building a Europe for and with children” in Monaco in 2006, the Council of Europe has implemented strategies over a series of policy cycles to guide its work on strengthening child rights protection in Europe. This document – adopted by the Committee of Ministers of the Council of Europe – contains the text of the Strategy for the Rights of the Child which will be implemented for the period 2016-2021. It covers priority areas to guarantee all children their rights, namely in the areas of equal opportunities, par- ticipation, a violence-free life, child-friendly justice and their rights in the digital environment.
 PREMS 017916
ENG
 The Council of Europe is the continent’s leading human rights organisation. It comprises 47 member states,
28 of which are members of the European Union.
All Council of Europe member states have signed up
to the European Convention on Human Rights, a treaty designed to protect human rights, democracy and
the rule of law. The European Court of Human Rights oversees the implementation of the Convention
in the member states.
 
 Information Documents SG/Inf(2015)38 final
Thematic Action Plan on the Inclusion of Roma and Travellers1 (2016-2019)2
Strasbourg, 2 March 2016
  1 The terms “Roma” and “Travellers” are being used at the Council of Europe to encompass the wide diversity of the groups covered by the work of the Council of Europe in this field: on the one hand a) Roma, Sinti/Manush, Calé, Kaale, Romanichals, Boyash/Rudari; b) Balkan Egyptians (Egyptians and Ashkali); c) Eastern groups (Dom, Lom and Abdal); and, on the other hand, groups such as Travellers, Yenish, and the populations designated under the administrative term “Gens du voyage”, as well as persons who identify themselves as Gypsies.
2 Approved by the Committee of Ministers of the Council of Europe on 2 March 2016 at the 1249th meeting of the Ministers’ Deputies.

SG/Inf(2015)38 final 2
Introduction
Across Europe many Roma and Travellers continue to live on the margins of society, where they are frequently subjected to discrimination, prejudice and hate. Their situation remains of profound concern.
A major objective for the Council of Europe has been to help contribute to the full inclusion of Roma and Travellers in their local communities. The genuine and effective participation of fellow Europeans of Roma and Traveller origin is a precondition for success.
In 2010, the Council of Europe strengthened its political commitment to the inclusion of Roma and Travellers through the adoption of the “Strasbourg Declaration on Roma”3. In line with the strategic orientations agreed by the Ministers’ Deputies at their 1231st meeting on 17 June 20154, the Council of Europe will now focus its action on three major priorities:
1) to tackle anti-Roma and anti-Traveller prejudice, discrimination and crimes more effectively;
2) to demonstrate innovative models for inclusive policies for the most vulnerable; 3) to promote innovative models for local-level solutions.
This thematic Action Plan provides the political, logical and budgetary framework for Council of Europe action in the years 2016 to 2019, subject to the decisions of the Committee of Ministers on the Programme and Budget. Particular efforts will be taken to enhance the level of focus and concentration of project activities and to increase their visibility and impact. In addition, it aims to offer targeted support to member States on relevant inclusion policies and to implement result-oriented projects with a concrete impact.
Priority 1: Tackling anti-Roma and anti-Traveller prejudice, discrimination and crimes (“anti-Gypsyism”)
The results of the monitoring activities of the Council of Europe, and evidence from other sources, show that Roma and Travellers still suffer from widespread anti-Gypsyist prejudice and stereotyping and are still the victims of massive discrimination in many member States. These processes perpetuate the marginalisation of Roma and Traveller communities and pose serious obstacles for any policy initiatives to improve their situation.
Prejudice, discrimination and crimes must be tackled by a combination of legal responses, capacity-building, as well as educational and awareness-raising initiatives.
3 CM(2010)133
4 SG/Inf(2015)16 final
   
3 SG/Inf(2015)38 final
All bodies and institutions of the Council of Europe are engaged in securing the full application of European standards in order to abolish the discrimination of Roma and Travellers, in monitoring the progress achieved, and in building the capacities of public authorities and civil society. The conventions and recommendations of the Council of Europe provide the relevant standards, together with the recommendations of the convention mechanisms, the Commissioner for Human Rights and the European Committee against Racism and Equality (ECRI).
Overall objective
To achieve the inclusion of Roma and Travellers in European societies as citizens with full rights and responsibilities.
Specific objectives
1.1 Strengthening the competence to fight against anti-Gypsyism
 The Council of Europe will be a partner of the “European Roma Institute for Arts and Culture” (ERIAC)5, set up as an independent institution to promote Romani arts and culture. The Council of Europe will during the launching phase make a financial contribution and engage itself in its governance.
 The Council of Europe will work towards the integration of curricular elements on the history of Roma and Travellers in school, reaching Roma, Travellers and non-Roma pupils and students alike. The activity includes the production of teaching material, the training of educational professionals and the promotion of the website devoted to the remembrance of Roma victims during WWII. Furthermore, Council of Europe support for the European Parliament’s resolution of 15 April 2015 to declare 2 August the “European Roma Holocaust Memorial Day”6 will be explored.
 The “Dosta!”7 awareness-raising campaign against prejudice, stereotypes and anti- Gypsyism and for the promotion of Romani culture, language and history will be prolonged and if possible expanded beyond its current implementation in 17 member States and Kosovo8. A child-friendly version of “Dosta!” campaign material will be produced and distributed in participating member States. The “No Hate Speech” campaign will also contribute to spreading a counter-narrative against anti-Roma and anti-Traveller hate speech.
5 Working title. Cf. decision in principle of the Committee of Ministers at the 1235th meeting, 15-16 September 2015, item 6.4
6 European Parliament document P8_TA(2015)0095
7 “Dosta” is the Romani word for “enough”
8 All reference to Kosovo, whether to the territory, institutions or population, in this text shall be understood in full compliance with United Nations Security Council Resolution 1244 and without prejudice to the status of Kosovo.
 
SG/Inf(2015)38 final 4
1.2 Improving the access of Roma and Travellers to justice
 Based on a successful pilot project in 2012, effective primary legal aid to Roma and Travellers will be rolled out on a wider scale by the Council of Europe.
 In co-operation with national police forces, human rights institutions and equality bodies, the Council of Europe will promote solutions which have been successfully implemented in member States to tackle the notorious under-reporting and under- prosecution of racist crimes against Roma and Travellers.
1.3 Developing the skills and knowledge of legal professionals and administrators
The Council of Europe is co-operating with OSCE-ODIHR, Amnesty International, the European Network of Equality Bodies (EQUINET), the European Network of Nation Human Rights Institutions (ENNHRI) and the EEA /Norway Grants. The Council of Europe will try to establish a common initiative with the European Commission and the OSCE on practical ways to strengthen the capacities to promote the inclusion of Roma and Travellers. This initiative must take account of existing practices and be conducted in close co-operation with national governments. Accessing and managing EU structural funds available for the social inclusion of vulnerable groups is a particularly important issue.
 Comprehensive Council of Europe training programmes for legal professionals on non- discrimination with a focus on vulnerable groups, including Roma and Travellers, will be implemented more widely. New and updated HELP training courses for judges, prosecutors and lawyers will be made available in several member States. Training opportunities dealing with diversity and non-discrimination, focusing on the situation of Roma and Travellers will be offered to national police forces, including border police.
 The Council of Europe will co-operate with Romania, “the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia” and Albania to help strengthen the capacity of detention systems to comply with relevant international human rights instruments by improving the competences of police staff in pre-trial detention centres.

5 SG/Inf(2015)38 final
Priority 2: Demonstrating innovative models for inclusive policies for the most vulnerable
Roma and Travellers are extremely vulnerable to violence, crime, economic and cultural discrimination. Within these communities, women, children and youth are particularly exposed to multiple discrimination and specific forms of violence, including early or forced marriage, domestic violence, trafficking and forced begging. Young women and men receive insufficient support in their transition to autonomy and working life and risk permanent exclusion. At the same time, women, children and young people are fundamental for bringing about social and economic change in Roma and Travellers communities; their full enjoyment of rights requires special support, also from within the Roma and Traveller communities themselves.
Overall objective
To empower the most vulnerable among Roma and Travellers, and strengthen their protection against all forms of discrimination.
Specific objectives
2.1 Strengthening the self-organisation of young Roma and Travellers and their participation in society
Council of Europe action in this area aims at mainstreaming youth-related matters in all policies dealing with Roma and Travellers issues and Roma and Travellers issues in youth policies. In education, a pilot project on the exchange of experience between teaching staff from different member States has produced positive results.
 Training and education programmes will be set up to support Roma and Travellers youth leaders, youth workers and human rights educators with a view to strengthening the development of democratic leadership of Roma and Travellers youth organisations and the emergence of Roma youth leaders (“Roma and Travellers Youth Academy”).
 Peer-to-peer training of teachers on inclusive education for Roma and Travellers pupils will be rolled out to more member States.
2.2 Better protecting the rights of Roma and Travellers children
Action in this area will be conducted as a part of the Council of Europe strategy on the rights of the child in the forthcoming period.
  
SG/Inf(2015)38 final 6
 The Council of Europe will keep a focus on the access of Roma and Traveller children, in particular girls, to inclusive education and address the negative consequences of early/child marriage. Priority topics will be school attendance, early school-leaving and absenteeism, particularly of girls, early and forced marriage, human trafficking within Roma and Traveller communities, the situation of street children, prostitution, forced begging and domestic violence, and access to personal identity documents where they do not yet have them.
2.3 Empowering Roma and Traveller women and promoting gender equality
Action in this area will be conducted in the framework of the Council of Europe Gender Equality Strategy 2014-2017. It will follow up on the results of the International Roma Women’s Review Conferences of the Council of Europe9 and the CAHROM thematic report on empowering Roma women and gender mainstreaming in national Roma integration strategies.
 The Council of Europe will implement a new project to improve the access of Roma and Traveller women to justice, starting in 2016 in Bulgaria, Greece, Italy, Lithuania and Romania, possibly in co-operation with the European Commission. The project includes training opportunities for Roma and Travellers women, capacity-building action for legal professionals and law enforcement bodies and the establishment of low-threshold services providing legal advice.
 In co-operation with the European Commission, the Council of Europe Development Bank will encourage entrepreneurship particularly of Roma women through pilot projects in the Southeast European region.
 The conceptual framework of gender equality and empowerment action will be promoted through the Roma Women’s International Conferences planned for 2017 and 2019.
 9 The 5th International Review Roma Women’s Conference is held in Skopje, “the former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia”, on 6-7 October 2015

7 SG/Inf(2015)38 final
Priority 3: Promoting innovative models for local-level solutions
Policy measures at local and regional level are decisive for bringing about real improvement for the social inclusion of Roma.
Overall objective
To enable local and regional authorities to address discrimination more effectively and develop successful strategies for the full inclusion of Roma and Travellers in society.
Specific objectives
3.1 Supporting the participation of Roma and Travellers in local decision- making
“Democratic Governance and Roma Community Participation through Mediation” (ROMED2), a Joint Programme with the European Commission, aims to improve the participation of Roma by mobilising Roma and Travellers communities and to bring them closer to local decision- making. ROMED2 uses mobilisation of Roma citizens and the Roma community to promote effective participation in decision making, training and accompanying measures, empowering Roma and local administrations for more effective civic dialogue and co-operation, including through Community Action Groups, and local awareness raising actions for the understanding of the local governance and power relations. In 2015, the programme has been implemented in over 80 municipalities in 12 member States. The programme is currently being evaluated.
 Following the conclusion and evaluation of the ROMED2 programme in 2016, the Council of Europe will in co-operation with the European Commission prepare and implement a follow-up programme, building on the ROMED1 and ROMED2 results.
3.2 Strengthening the capacity of local and regional authorities to develop and implement plans, strategies and services for the inclusion of Roma and Travellers
The Joint Programme ROMACT aims to facilitate capacities and resources for local development in areas with majority Roma population. ROMACT supports local administrations, enabling them to implement sustainable inclusion policies, including through a better use of EU funds. Training and coaching sessions for local authorities to become familiar with key principles and tools for successful Roma inclusion policies, functional multisectoral platforms/teams within local administrations and technical support in the process of accessing and using EU funds are the main actions. ROMACT promotes good governance processes in education, employment, health, housing, urban development and culture. In 2015, the programme has been implemented in six member States.
 
SG/Inf(2015)38 final 8
 The ROMACT programme will be continued and extended to additional member States. New programme components will be added, particularly as regards co-operation and common actions and projects between municipalities in Southeast and Western Europe.
Accompanying measures
In order to support the implementation of the Thematic Action Plan on the inclusion of Roma and Travellers 2016-2019, it will be necessary to also take a certain number of accompanying organisational steps.
 Starting in 2016 and at regular intervals thereafter (annually or bi-annually), the Secretary General will publish a “digest” which makes the most relevant results of monitoring and other activities of the Council of Europe pertaining to on the inclusion of Roma and Travellers available to a larger public.
 Roma rapporteurs will be appointed in additional intergovernmental committees, including CDDH, CDPPE and CDDG the CAHROM will however retain its role as the provider of strategic orientation for the Council of Europe action in favour of Roma and Travellers and will therefore be consulted in all issues of importance to the Council of Europe’s work for Roma-integration.
 The Council of Europe will continue and develop its dialogue with international organisations engaged in inclusion policies, notably through regular consultation meetings in the context of the CAHROM meetings held twice a year. This dialogue will especially focus on how to create synergies and avoid duplications in the work of the different international organisations. The member States will have the possibility to discuss these issues with the international organisations in the aftermath.
 The Council of Europe will organise two annual dialogue events with civil society organisations of Roma and Travellers, in order to discuss the results and follow-up of CAHROM thematic visits and Council of Europe monitoring activities.10
 The “European Alliance of Cities and Regions for Roma Inclusion” will remain under the stewardship of the Congress of Local and Regional Authorities, whereas its management will be brought closer to the operational activities of the SRSG Roma Support Team, in order to increase its outreach.
 A special initiative will be taken to promote the recruitment of young Roma professionals into the Council of Europe Secretariat.
 10 Decision of the Ministers’ Deputies, 1229th meeting 3 June 2015, item 6.3

Implementation of the Action Plan
9 SG/Inf(2015)38 final
The activities foreseen under this Thematic Action Plan for the next two years are contained in the Secretary General’s proposal for the Programme and Budget 2016-201711, and subject to the final decision of the Committee of Ministers. They will be financed either under the Ordinary Budget, with the help of voluntary contributions, under a Joint Programme with the European Commission, or with a combination of funding sources. The Thematic Action Plan is understood as a flexible instrument, open to revision if changing circumstances demand this.
Activities foreseen for the years 2018 and 2019 are indicative. They will be adapted to future needs and requirements in the course of the preparation of the Programme and Budget for the next biennium.
The proposed actions take into account complementarity and co-operation with the European Union and other international actors. Gender and youth aspects are mainstreamed throughout the activities.
The activities listed in this Thematic Action Plan on the inclusion of Roma and Travellers are implemented by various services of the Council of Europe. Internal and external co-ordination will be ensured by the Special Representative of the Secretary General for Roma Issues. The Committee of Ministers will receive yearly updates on the progress and results.
Appendices
- Financial overview for the biennium 2016-2017, and outlook beyond 2017
- Sources of justification
 11 Document CM(2015)130

SG/Inf(2015)38 final 10
APPENDIX I
Financial overview for the biennium 2016-2017, and outlook beyond 2017
    Action Plan sectors
2016
2017
Indicative annual costs expected after 2017
           OB*
Extra- budgetary resources (available or required)
OB*
Extra- budgetary resources (available or required)
      1. Tackle anti-Roma prejudice, discrimination and crimes
355 000
620 000
355 000
118 000
> 1 380 000
             2. Innovative models for inclusive policies for the most vulnerable
400 000
1 302 000
400 000
1 302 000
1 652 000
             3. Innovative models for local-level solutions
4. Accompanying measures
Total
806 000
150 000
1 711 000
1 500 000 . 3 422 000
694 000
150 000
1 599 000
1 500 000 . 2 920 000
3 000 000 95 000 > 6 167 000
                  * These figures only refer to non-staff appropriations.

11 SG/Inf(2015)38 final
APPENDIX II
Council of Europe sources of justification Overall sources of justification
o Framework Convention for the Protection of National Minorities
o CM Resolution (1997)10 and 2009(3)
o Reports 2014 and 2015 of the Secretary General on the “State of Democracy,
Human Rights and the Rule of Law in Europe” (chapter V)
o “The Strasbourg Declaration on Roma”, Council of Europe High Level Meeting
on Roma (Strasbourg, 20 October 2010), CM(2010)133
o CM/Rec(2008)5 Recommendation of the Committee of Ministers to member
States on policies for Roma and/or Travellers in Europe
o CM/Rec(2012)9 Recommendation of the Committee of Ministers to member
States on mediation as an effective tool for promoting respect for human
rights and social inclusion of Roma
o CM/Rec(2009)4 Recommendation of the Committee of Ministers to member
States on the education of Roma and Travellers in Europe
o CM/Rec(2006)10 Recommendation of the Committee of Ministers to member
States on better access to health care for Roma and Travellers in Europe,
o CM/Rec(2005)4 Recommendation of the Committee of Ministers to member
States on improving the housing conditions of Roma and Travellers in Europe
Sources of justification for specific actions
1. To tackle prejudice, discrimination and crimes against Roma and Travellers (“anti-Gypsyism”)
o Recommendation CM/Rec(2009)4 of the Committee of Ministers to member States on the education of Roma and Travellers in Europe
o Recommendation Rec(2001)15 of the Committee of Ministers to member States on history teaching in the 21st century Europe
o Declaration by the Ministers of Education of the Council of Europe member States establishing the Day of Remembrance of the Holocaust in schools and the Prevention of Crimes against Humanity
o Declaration adopted on 27 March 2015 at the Brussels High Level Conference o Recommendation Rec(2004)4 of the Committee of Ministers to member States on the European Convention on Human Rights in university education
and professional training

SG/Inf(2015)38 final 12
o Council of Europe report: “Police training concerning migrants and ethnic relations”, 1993.
o ECRI General Policy Recommendations (GPR) Nos. 2, 7, 13; new ECRI GPR No. 15 on combating hate speech (forthcoming)
o Case-law of the ECtHR: Velikova group of cases v. Bulgaria (pending execution), pilot judgement Neshkov and others v. Bulgaria, Kehayov v. Bulgaria (pending execution), Bragadireanu group of cases v. Romania (pending execution)
o CPT reports and standards, CPT public statement concerning Bulgaria
o CM Recommendation Rec(2006)2 of the Committee of Ministers to member
States on the European Prison Rules
2. To demonstrate innovative models for inclusive policies for the most vulnerable
o Resolution CM/Res(2008)23 on the youth policy of the Council of Europe
o Recommendation CM/Rec(2015)3 of the Committee of Ministers to member States on the access of young people from disadvantaged neighbourhoods to
social rights
o Recommendation CM/Rec(2010)7 of the Committee of Ministers to member
States on the Council of Europe Charter on Education for Democratic
Citizenship and Human Rights Education
o Recommendation 354 (2014) of the Congress of Local and Regional
Authorities of the Council of Europe, Empowering Roma youth through
participation: effective policy design at local and regional levels
o “Children’s Human Rights — Council Of Europe Strategy For The Rights Of
The Child 2016 – 2021”, 2nd draft, 26 May 2015
o Gender Equality Strategy 2014-2017, document CM(2013)136, 6 November
2013
o CM Recommendation No. R(79)10 concerning women migrants
o CM Rec(2013)1 on gender equality and media
o CM Rec(2007)13 on gender mainstreaming in education
o CM R(93)1 on effective access to the law and to justice for the very poor

13 SG/Inf(2015)38 final 3. To promote innovative models for local-level solutions
o The Final Declaration of the Summit of Mayors: “Building Mutual Trust at the Grassroots” (Congress of Local and Regional Authorities, 22 September 2011)
4. Accompanying measures
o CM decision on co-operation with Roma organisations, 1229th meeting on 3 June 2015, item 6.3
o Congress of Local and Regional Authorities, “European Alliance Of Cities And Regions For Roma Inclusion — Strategic Guidelines (2014/2020)”, 9 September 2014
